
                               1 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              December 27, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

13 CUBAN REFUGEES WITH FAKE PAPERS FLEE FROM CUSTODY

BYLINE: By LARRY ROHTER

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 4; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 780 words


Thirteen of the 77 Cubans detained by immigration authorities at Kennedy
International Airport last week have ''absconded'' from the Queens hotel where
they were being held, immigration officials said yesterday.

The officials also said that, because of a lack of space in the New York
detention center, 26 others were sent to a center in Houston on Christmas Eve
without notice to their lawyers or relatives.

The Cubans who fled were among those supposed to appear for hearings in New York
yesterday on their requests for political asylum, said Duane Austin, an
Immigration and Naturalization Service spokesman. ''But when we started
proceedings and took a count, we found that 13 had not showed up,'' he said.



38 Still Held at Hotel

The whereabouts of the missing Cubans were unknown. But Mr. Austin indicated
that the immigration service might move to prevent the flight of the remaining
38 Cubans still being held at the hotel if the agency ''foresees a problem.''

The 13 missing Cubans had been held at the JFK Plaza Hotel in Queens under the
custody of Iberia Airlines, which flew the group of 77 from Madrid last Friday.
They were detained, immigration authorities said, because the documents allowing
them into the country as political refugees were found to be fake. The Cubans,
while acknowledging that the papers might have been forged, said they obtained
them in Madrid from a man who represented himself as a lawyer with connections
in the State Department.

Under international aviation agreements, Iberia must provide food and lodging
for the detained passengers until their status is resolved. Mr. Austin said the
airline might be ''subject to a fine if they don't present the individuals'' for
hearings.

Ray Wort, Iberia's marketing manager in the United States, said the airline had
hired a private security service to guard the Cubans. He said: ''We're not a law
enforcement agency. What are we supposed to do, shoot our passengers?''

Deportation hearings for the 38 detainees still in custody in New York began
yesterday at Federal Plaza amid complaints of procedural irregularities by
detainees, their relatives, Hispanic community groups and the lawyers
representing them.

Immigration Judge John Speer granted lawyers' requests for a 10-day delay to
prepare formal petitions for political asylum on behalf of some of the detainees
still being held in Queens. But relatives of the 26 detainees transferred to
Houston complained that the immigration authorities had sought to deceive them.

''We're being kicked around like a football,'' complained Nieves Lezcano, whose
son and daughter-in-law were among those transferred. ''It's like dealing with
Fidel Castro all over again.''

Immigration Service Criticized

Mr. Austin said the detainees had been sent to Houston ''purely and simply
because there was no space for them in New York.'' There are no other detention
centers in the Northeast, he said, and all the centers in Miami were full.

But detainees and their relatives, some of whom had flown to New York from as
far away as San Diego and Miami, said the transfer would make it harder for them
to prepare their cases and was designed to keep them ignorant of their rights.

''We were not given any kind of explanation,'' said Manuel Pocero, one of the
transferees, in a telephone interview from Houston. ''When they took us to the
airport, we thought they were sending us back to Spain. We still haven't been
told anything about our cases, and none of us has seen a lawyer yet.''

Amado Cid, who was separated from his son Leif and daughter Heidi when they left
Havana airport in 1980, said that an interrogation on the case of his two
children, who are now teen-agers and flew alone on the Iberia flight, took place
without the presence of a lawyer.

''The immigration people threatened me and said I was lying,'' said Mr. Cid, who
lives in Miami and has taken a leave from his job as a mechanic to secure the
release of his children. ''They told me that my children will never be admitted
to the United States.''

Three immigration service officials in New York were said to be unavailable and
did not return messages left for them. A fourth official refused comment.

Mr. De Mell said he plans to file petitions requesting the release of the
detainees while hearings on the political asylum motion are held. That move is
backed by Hispanic community and social service groups.

''We want these people released into the care of their relatives,'' said Israel
Romero, a representative of the Cuban Patriotic Junta, an exile group. ''After
that, the normal legal processes can be carried out.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                               2 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             December 26, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION

SECTION: Section A; Page 12, Column 5; National Desk


Happily Reunited Couple Spends Holiday in U.S.

LOS ANGELES, Dec. 25 (AP) - Eleanor and Richard Parnes considered themselves
among ''the luckiest couples in the world'' today, two and a half weeks after
immigration officials who had deported Mrs. Parnes allowed her to return.

''It's good to be back here, very nice,'' said Mrs. Parnes, 29 years old, who is
expecting a baby in May. She was deported to the Philippines on Nov. 15 and
allowed to fly back to Los Angeles Dec. 7.

Mrs. Parnes had been an undocumented alien since leaving her job as a
housekeeper to the Philippine consul general in Los Angeles in 1974, and had
been under an immediate deportation order for several years.

The United States Immigration and Naturalization Service arrested Mrs. Parnes in
November and deported her. But after public outcry and widespread publicity, she
was allowed to return.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                               3 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               December 24, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

FORGED PAPERS MEAN CUSTODY FOR 77 CUBANS

BYLINE: By LARRY ROHTER

SECTION: Section 1; Page 21, Column 6; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 846 words


After more than four years of trying to join their relatives in the United
States, 77 Cubans have found themselves under detention by American immigration
authorities - without a country to call their own and, they say, victims of a
scheme to defraud them.

The Cubans arrived together Friday afternoon

 at Kennedy International Airport on an Iberia Airlines flight from Madrid. They
were detained after officials became suspicious of the large number of
passengers carrying copies of the same document authorizing political asylum in
the United States, according to detainees and their relatives.

Upon examination, the papers were found to be ''not legal for entry into the
United States,'' and the passengers were taken into custody, according to a
statement issued by the Immigration and Naturalization Service in Washington.
The immigration service is to seek to deport the refugees at hearings scheduled
for this week.

Yesterday, an immigration service supervisor in New York, Carmen Ortiz, declined
to comment on the case.

Documents Cost $60

The Cubans said their entry documents may have been forged. But they said they
were duped by a lawyer in Madrid who took advantage of their desire to rejoin
their families. They said they paid him about $60 each for the documents, and
$300 more for airfare.

''We fell for a scam, one that was so well executed that even the I.N.S. was
fooled at first,'' said Maria Cristina Camarena, one of the detainees, in a
telephone interview yesterday. ''But now that we are here, we will do everything
we can to stay. We don't want to go back.'

The refugees also fear that if they are deported, they may be denied re-entry to
Spain. In order to leave, they say, many surrendered their Cuban passports;
others, who did not have Cuban passports, gave up the Spanish document of
political exile they were granted when they arrived in Madrid.

''At this point, we are stateless,'' said Mrs. Camarena. ''Most of us have no
documents at all.''

Many Left Cuba in 1980

According to relatives of the detainees, many of those being held left Cuba
early in 1980 after seeking asylum in the Peruvian Embassy in Havana. It was
that initial influx of 10,000 disaffected Cubans onto the embassy grounds that
triggered the exodus of 125,000 refugees that came to be known as the Mariel
boatlift.

Many of the relatives of the refugees say they themselves fled Cuba at the same
time and were separated from family members during the chaotic departure from
Cuba. It is only by chance, they say, that they are in the United States and
their relatives are barred from entering.

''These people fled Cuba rejecting the Communist system, so there is nothing
more logical than that they should want to settle here,'' said Osvaldo Alvarez,
whose nephew and niece are among those being held. ''They have asked repeatedly
during the past four years to be permitted to rejoin their families, but there
has been no response from the authorities.''

The Reagan Administration last week announced an agreement with Cuba that will
allow 20,000 Cubans a year to immigrate to the United States. It also agreed to
admit 3,000 political prisoners now held in Cuban jails, but it is not clear
whether the 77 detainees will qualify under either heading.

Both the refugees and their relatives say that they were originally approached
in Madrid by a man who claimed to be a Cuban-American lawyer with ties to State
Department officials in Washington.

The supposed lawyer, they said, offered to use these connections to obtain
political asylum in the United States for the refugees.

Initial skepticism about the authenticity of the man's claims was eased, the
refugees and their relatives said, when the Spanish police examined the papers
and allowed the refugees to depart.

On arrival at Kennedy, the papers were initially accepted as genuine by
immigration officials, according to refugees and their relatives. ''My husband
made it through customs and was waiting for our luggage when they called him
back because there were so many people with the same piece of paper,'' said
Mariana Abran, a detainee.

'

A Professional Operation'

''The papers looked very, very official,'' said Joaquin Pradas, an Iberia
Airlines spokesman. ''This was obviously a professional operation.''

After initial questioning at the airport, 26 of the Cubans were sent to an
immigration service detention center on Varick Street in Manhattan. The rest,
mostly family groups, are now at a Howard Johnson's hotel in Queens, where their
food and lodging is being paid for by Iberia Airlines.

Yesterday, relatives went to the Varick Street center in hopes of a brief
reunion with the detainees, but they were turned away by a guard and told to
return today.

Nieves Lezcano had gone to visit her son, Domingo Emilio Alvarez Lezcano, and
his wife, whom she has not seen since leaving Cuba.

''I ended up on a plane to the United States while my son was sent to Spain,''
she said. ''I have not smiled in four years.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                               4 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               December 23, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

PINDLING GOVERNMENT APPEARS UNTHREATENED DESPITE ACCUSATIONS;
DRUG TRADE IN BAHAMAS IS CREEPING INTO POLITICS

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section 4; Page 2, Column 2; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 905 words

DATELINE: NASSAU, the Bahamas


The unit of currency here, the Bahamian dollar, is precisely equal to the
American dollar but bears a picture of Queen Elizabeth II. That combination
neatly symbolizes the two influences that dominate life in these islands: 325
years of British colonial tradition, reflected in the parliamentary political
system, and the overwhelming economic power of 20th century America just 55
miles away.

The two forces were evident in a report issued last week by a royal commission
of inquiry, which said drug smuggling had damaged ''almost all strata of
Bahamian society.'' The commission said that immigration and customs officers
and at least one former Cabinet minister had taken bribes, that lawyers and
bankers had laundered drug money, while most Bahamians tended to ''wink their
eyes, or look the other way.'' Opposition leaders said the report showed that
corruption had been allowed to flourish under the Government of Lynden O.
Pindling, who has been Prime Minister for 17 years.

Tax-Free Attractions

The commission, formed to investigate allegations broadcast by NBC News in
September 1983, said Mr. Pindling's spending clearly ''far exceeded his income''
in the last seven years. But the panel said it had been unable to determine
whether he had taken bribes from drug smugglers seeking protection from United
States law enforcement authorities. One of the three commission members said, in
a separate statement, that ''the circumstances raise great suspicion.''

The report amounts to a searing indictment of Bahamian society, but its meaning
for Mr. Pindling was less clear. Asked whether it provided a basis for
prosecutions, Attorney General Paul L. Adderley said: ''I haven't the faintest
idea. The police will have to investigate to see whether a crime has been
committed.'' Mr. Adderley, a member of the Prime Minister's party, which holds
32 of the 43 seats in the House of Assembly, said he did not expect Mr. Pindling
to call an election soon.

The Bahamas has many ties to the United States. Tourism accounts for two of
every three jobs, and 80 percent of the tourists come from the United States.
Many of the large hotels and resorts are owned or managed by Americans. More
than 100 American banks and trust companies have branches in the Bahamas. Many
people and businesses shift some of their income and investments to the Bahamas,
where there are no personal or corporate income taxes.  Strategically situated
between North and South America, the islands were a base for buccaneers and
privateers in the 17th century, a way station for ships running the Union
blockade of Confederate ports in the Civil War, and a base for bootleggers
smuggling liquor into the United States during Prohibition. Today, much of the
cocaine and marijuana arriving in the United States passes through the Bahamas,
according to drug enforcement officials in Washington.  Bahamian officials
insist that they should not be held responsible, any more than the Governor of
Florida is held responsible for drugs that pass through his state. But the
commission of inquiry said that ''the whole nation must accept some
responsibility,'' because ''apathy and weak public opinion have led to the
present unhappy and undesirable state of affairs.'' Dissident members of Mr.
Pindling's Progressive Liberal Party had been expected to challenge his
leadership in October at a party convention held amid the palm groves of
Paradise Island, just north of downtown Nassau. They reasoned that he was losing
popularity because of the uproar over corruption in the Government. Arthur D.
Hanna, a longtime friend of the Prime Minister and a possible rival, resigned as
Deputy Prime Minister, warning that the party must not permit anything to ''open
a hole'' in its ''armor of integrity,'' which ''could insure the demise of the
Progressive Liberal Party as a political and moral force in the Bahamas.'' But
in the end, the party re-elected Mr. Pindling as party leader without
opposition, hailing him as a nation-builder who had led the Bahamas to full
independence in 1973 and to black majority rule. Last week, party members again
joined ranks behind him as his political opponents renewed their calls for his
resignation.

Mr. Pindling's Government has recently tried to seize the initiative in dealing
with drug abuse, and he appears to remain popular with party members, who
constitute a majority of the voting-age population. He is still celebrated for a
dramatic protest against minority rule in 1965, when he threw the Speaker's mace
out a window of Parliament. At that time, Mr. Pindling and his party denounced
the power of a group of white businessmen, the ''Bay Street boys,'' who owned
most of the shops and businesses on Nassau's Bay Street.

History has now come full circle. Mr. Pindling and his colleagues, who attacked
the local power brokers as corrupt in the mid-1960's, are now under attack.
Kendal G. Isaacs, leader of the opposition in Parliament, insists that Mr.
Pindling is surrounded by corruption and has ''lost the moral authority to
govern.''

The historical parallels are not exact. The Government today is more
representative of the people, 85 percent of whom are black. But many Bahamians
are too young to remember Mr. Pindling's early days as a nationalist leader
fighting the local oligarchy. It would not be unthinkable for them to oust the
man whom their parents saw as a national hero.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Lynden O. Pindling; photo of defense force

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                               5 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               December 23, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

Ukrainians Who Resisted

SECTION: Section 7; Page 23, Column 1; Book Review Desk

LENGTH: 319 words


To the Editor:

I was dismayed to read a broad ethnic slur in Ralph Blumenthal's review of Allan
A. Ryan Jr.'s ''Quiet Neighbors: Prosecuting Nazi War Criminals in America''
(Nov. 11). I was even more dismayed to find it in an article related to the
Holocaust, which should have sensitized us to the danger of demeaning ethnic
generalizations. Mr. Blumenthal wrote: ''While survivors of the Holocaust
remained in displaced persons camps, immigration quotas favored many of their
persecutors - Balts, Ukrainians, Poles.'' Here a number of East European
nationalities are identified wholesale as persecutors of the Jews during World
War II. Has it not occurred to Mr. Blumenthal, or the editors, that this sort of
blanket statement is of the same moral order as other, more notorious, racial
and ethnic generalizations?

Take the case of the Ukrainians, whose history in the 19th century is my
academic specialty. Some did take part in the extermination of the Jews, but the
vast majority did not. Ukrainians, after all, made up 20 percent of the leading
anti-Nazi force of the war, the Red Army. Two and a half million of them were
decorated for their military service. Many other Ukrainians fought the Nazis in
pro- and anti-Communist partisan units. Some very few Ukrainians (an example is
the late Ukrainian Marxist Roman Rosdolsky) were themselves incarcerated in
concentration camps for aiding Jews. The Ukrainian Catholic metropolitan Andrei
Sheptytsky was one of the few high-ranking Catholic hierarchs in Europe to
condemn the Holocaust while it was happening.

If nations were monolithic, it would be permissible to make the sort of
generalization Mr. Blumenthal has made. But in reality nations, including East
European ones, are composed of diverse classes and political tendencies. It is a
shame to have to remind such a forum of such an elemental truth.  JOHN-PAUL
HIMKAEdmonton, Canada

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Letter

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                               6 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              December 18, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

INQUIRY FINDS SMUGGLING HAS HURT BAHAMAS

BYLINE: By JOSEPH B. TREASTER

SECTION: Section A; Page 20, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 857 words

DATELINE: NASSAU, the Bahamas, Dec. 17


The smuggling of large amounts of drugs through the Bahamas to the United States
has damaged ''almost all strata of Bahamian society,'' corrupting policemen and
Cabinet ministers and creating countless young addicts, according to a royal
commission report issued to members of Parliament today.

The report also said that in a more than year-long investigation a panel of
three commissioners discovered immigration and customs officers taking bribes,
lawyers and bankers laundering drug money and a pervasive tendency by Bahamians
to ''wink their eyes, or look the other way.''

The commissioners - one British, one Canadian and one Bahamian - said they
believed ''the whole nation'' of some 200,000 ''must accept some
responsibility.''

But the burden of their findings were expected to fall most heavily on Prime
Minister Lynden O. Pindling, who has governed the Bahamas for the last 17 years.
The drug business has blossomed in the last decade. Opposition leaders have been
calling for Mr. Pindling's resignation and they announced on radio this morning
that they were holding a ''massive rescue-the-nation rally'' tonight.

Smuggling Said to Continue

The Prime Minister refused today, through a spokesman, to comment on the report.
He denied, however, speculation by opposition leaders that he intended to call
for new national elections that would cause the dissolution of Parliament and,
to a considerable extent, block public debate on the commission's report.

The report said the smuggling of marijuana and cocaine involving tens of
millions of dollars in illicit payments was continuing unabated throughout the
700 islands of the Bahamas, and had created a climate among the former British
subjects ''in which moral questions have been swamped by material
considerations.''

In 1983, alone, the commission said, more than $12 million in drug money flowed
through the one bank on the tiny island of Bimini, which has a population of
200.

''What is good for the people of the community has given way to how much money
can be made out of what is bad for the people of the community,'' the
commissoners wrote.

NBC Report Spurred Inquiry

Mr. Pindling launched the royal commission investigation, in an apparent attempt
to clear his reputation, a little more than a year ago after an NBC News
television report charged that the Prime Minister and his Cabinet were receiving
payments of $100,000 a month from drug dealers trying to elude American
authorities in the Bahamas.

In a 17-page section of the reported devoted exclusively to Mr. Pindling's
finances, two of the commissioners, James A. Smith, who is British and formerly
served as Chief Justice of the Bahamas, and Edwin W. Willes, a retired official
of the Royal Canadian Mounted Police, said it was clear that the Prime
Minister's spending had ''far exceeded'' his income. But they said that none of
his earnings appeared to be ''drug related.''

They said, however, that ethical questions were raised by some of the deposits
totaling nearly $3.5 million that went into bank accounts of the Prime Minister
and his wife between 1977 and 1983, at a time when Mr. Pindling's annual
government salary ranged from $77,000 to $102,900.

The commissioners said they found $230,000 in unexplained deposits in the Prime
Minister's bank accounts. They said they were unable to conclude ''whether or
not these unidentified funds were drug related.''

'Great Suspicion'

In a separate minority report, Drexel M. Gomez, the Anglican Bishop of Barbados
and the only Bahamian on the commission, said the flow of money to the Prime
Minister raised ''great suspicion.''

In one widely reported incident during the long investigation, Timothy L.
Minnig, an American convicted of smuggling drugs, testified that in an attempt
to buy safe haven in the Bahamas he had given $100,000 in an envelope to Robert
L. Vesco, the financier who is sought for crimes in the United States and who
lived here for several years. Mr. Minnig said he then watched Mr. Vesco pass the
money to Mr. Pindling. Mr. Pindling denied the incident and the commissioners
said they accepted his testimony.

Two Cabinet ministers and a Senator from the Prime Minister's ruling Progressive
Liberal Party, who were accused in the report of either dealing with
organized-crime members or accepting bribes as much as $100,000, resigned in
October.

In recent years, relations between the United States and the Bahamas have been
strained because of the drug smuggling and the reluctance of the Bahamas, one of
the world's main tax havens, to give investigators from the United States access
to bank records of suspected criminals.

During his testimony, Mr. Pindling charged that ''certain government agencies
and departments'' in the United States were conspiring to topple his Government
by attempting to portray him and his ministers as being heavily involved in the
drug traffic.

The commissioners said they had found ''insufficient evidence to support the
claim that the United States Government or its agencies conspired to destabilize
the Government of the Bahamas.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                               7 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               December 16, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

FOR MARIELITOS, A NEW SIGN OF HOPE

BYLINE: By JOSEPH MALINCONICO

SECTION: Section 11NJ; Page 1, Column 1; New Jersey Weekly Desk

LENGTH: 1339 words


WEST NEW YORK FOR MOST of the tens of thousands of Cuban refugees who came to
the United States in the 1980 boatlift, the last several years have been
especially hard.

The Marielitos, as they are called (for Mariel, their port of embarkation), have
had to cope with unemployment, poor housing, a language barrier and social
stigma.

Immigration officials estimate there are about 125,000 Marielitos in this
country, about 20,000 of them in New Jersey. Most of the latter are concentrated
in the northern part of Hudson County, the largest gathering spot for the
refugees outside Miami.

A recent change in policy by the Immigration and Naturalization Service has
opened the way for the Cubans to gain residency status and eventual citizenship,
a signal that perhaps the hard days are nearing an end.

(Agreement in principle also was reached last week by United States and Cuban
negotiators on the repatriation of ''excludables,'' the 2,500 Marielitos deemed
ineligible for permanent status here because of criminal records or mental
conditions. Most have been held in Federal penal or mental institutions since
their arrival.)

''It takes time, but in four or five years I think the Marielitos will not need
us,'' said Guillermo A. Estevez, director of the International Rescue
Committee's North Jersey offices in West New York.

The committee, which works with Marielitos to help them adjust, is one of nine
agencies in the state registering the refugees so they can apply for residency
in April.

The applications will be accepted, now that the Government has put the Cuban
Adjustment Act of 1966 back into active use. Under that act, Cuban nationals who
came to the United States after Jan. 1, 1959, can apply for permanent-resident
status one year after being in this country.

Applications had not been accepted under the act while Congress debated the
proposed Simpson-Mazzoli immigration legislation, which died this year when a
compromise could not be reached. The measure would have limited immigration and
imposed penalties on employers who hired illegal aliens.

New Jersey immigration officials estimate that about 15,000 of the Cuban
refugees in the state will apply for residency. At a chapel in Union City, where
registration began Nov. 30, several days before the Dec. 3 starting date at most
other agencies, 700 Cubans filed applications in the first 3 days.

The enthusiastic response of the refugees cannot be explained by any immediate
rewards they might get from the change in status; instead, the answer can be
found in their desire to erase the social stigma associated with Marielitos,
something that will take place more gradually.

''They have a bad feeling about that word - Marielito,'' said Mr. Estevez, an
earlier immigrant from Cuba.

''When some people find out that you're a Cuban refugee from Mariel,'' said
Manuel Lorenzo, one of three brothers who came to the United States in the
boatlift and now own an auto-repair shop in Weehawken, ''they say, 'Forget it,
I'm getting my car out of here.' ''

Part of the reason for the stigma is that about 10 percent to 20 percent of the
refugees were criminals whom President Fidel Castro of Cuba released from jail
so they could be sent to the United States. Upon arrival, they continued their
lawless ways.

In Union City, for example, the Marielitos have committed a greater percentage
of crimes than their proportion in the general population would suggest.

The recent refugees also have had problems integrating with the rest of the
Cuban population in this country. Many of the earlier refugees came to the
United States soon after the Cuban revolution in 1959.

The median age for the new refugees is 30. Thus, many were only 5 when Mr.
Castro rose to power, and they were brought up in a country where the mores were
much different than they had been before Communism.

To the new immigrants, any older man is a padre, or father, and anyone they meet
is a companero, or someone with whom they share some common goal.

For the Marielitos, the usage of these words was a natural part of their lives
in Cuba, but to the earlier immigrants, it is a sign of disrespect. It did not
help matters that many of the male Marielitos had become accustomed to making
comments to or about women they would see on the street.

In addition, the Marielitos' years under Mr. Castro dulled their initiative and
made them less likely to be innovative, industrious or to save money. None of
this helped them in making the transition to the new country and a new system.

For some, like 35-year-old Jose Alfonso, the transition continues to be a
struggle. For others, like 37-year-old Lazaro Duenas, it has been as smooth and
bright as any success story.

In Cuba, Mr. Alfonso was a guitarist who became frustrated because his music had
to be approved by the Government. Mr. Duenas had been a transportation
administrator who was later demoted to bus driver because his wife's family was
accused of feeding the rebels who continued to fight against the Government in
the early 1960's.

When the opportunity to leave Cuba came, both men seized it and soon found
themselves and their families on overcrowded boats in the stormy waters of the
Caribbean.

Mr. and Mrs. Duenas, their 9-year- old son and about 30 other people had to be
rescued when their vessel began to sink. The captain of Mr. Alfonso's boat told
him (he was traveling with his wife and their infant son) and the other
passengers how dangerous the sailing conditions were and asked if they wanted to
return.

They chose to continue.

''It was preferable to drown than to live in that condition,'' Mr. Alfonso said
through an interpreter.

Once they reached the United States, things continued to go badly for Mr.
Alfonso. Mr. Duenas was much more fortunate.

At first, Mr. Duenas ran a canteen in West New York, delivering food around the
neighborhood and then, about six months after he arrived, he bought a restaurant
that had gone bankrupt. He was able to borrow $7,000, using the collateral of
family members who already lived in the United States.

Mr. Duenas worked long, hard hours and made his business a success. By November
1981, he sold the first restaurant and bought a larger one. Since then, he has
acquired some property adjacent to his business and is converting an embroidery
factory into a social hall.

Mr. Duenas has developed a knack for business, an ability to succeed. He
continues to work in the kitchen of his restaurant. His son, Allan, who has a
home computer in his room, also helps in the restaurant, and his wife, Elcida,
is studying to become a certified public accountant.

But there have been few Marielitos whose lives in the new country have been as
successful as Mr. Duenas's. There have been many whose stories are similar to
that of Mr. Alfonso's.

Mr. Alfonso worked as a stock clerk in a store in West New York for a year until
he saved enough money to buy a van, which he hoped to use to make deliveries to
earn a living. However, his son suffered from bronchitis, and Mr. Alfonso
thought a warmer climate would help his son's condition. He moved his family to
Florida.

After three months in Miami, Mr. Alfonso could not find a job. He moved to
Tampa, but things were no better there, and after eight more months he returned
to West New York.

But jobs were still scarce, and those he found never lasted long. Mr. Alfonso
worked in a pizza factory, for a taxicab company, as a porter at the Meadowlands
Race Track and in construction. He has needed food stamps and rent subsidies to
survive. For nearly two months now, he has been unemployed.

''Here, I am very disoriented,'' he said. ''You know how one gets when one has
no job. One has nowhere to turn. I owe $177 for the electricity bill. Where am I
going to get that? If they turn the lights off, what am I going to do then?''

Mr. Alfonso said that, once he got his residency status, perhaps employers would
be less afraid to hire him; then, perhaps, life will be better.




LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Photos

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                               8 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              December 15, 1984, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. AND CUBA GAIN AN ACCORD ON REPATRIATION

BYLINE: By BERNARD WEINRAUB, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Page 1, Column 5; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 610 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Dec. 14


The United States and Cuba announced an agreement today for the repatriation of
2,746 Cuban criminals and mental patients who came here in the 1980 boatlift
from the port of Mariel.

White House officials said the agreement opened the way for the resumption of
normal immigration from Cuba to the United States, which has been largely
suspended since 1980.

Larry Speakes, the White House spokesman, emphasized that the agreement ''does
not signal any change in U.S. policy toward Cuba.''



'We're Looking for Deeds'

''We certainly are willing to talk with the Cubans should they show some signs
of being willing to re-enter the family of nations in the Western Hemisphere,''
he said. ''We're looking for deeds rather than words on the part of the Cubans
because their conduct in Central America is totally unsatisfactory in the eyes
of the United States.''

(In Miami, two prominent Cuban-Americans were reported to have reacted angrily
to the agreement, expressing fears that it would lead to better relations with
Cuba or recognition of the Castro Government.)

Although Mr. Speakes said the Cubans would be returned home ''in a phased and
orderly manner,'' it was left unclear when precisely the so- called excludables
would be leaving. A Federal court ruling is blocking their departure.  The
agreement with Cuba, which was made public late today by the White House, said
that with the adoption of the accord, ''the United States will resume issuance
of preference immigrant visas to Cuban nationals residing in Cuba up to the
number of 20,000 each year, particularly to close family relatives of United
States citizens and of Cuban permanent residents in the United States.''

In addition, the United States will admit 3,000 former political prisoners and
their families.

Mr. Speakes said the majority of the 129,000 Cubans who came to the United
States from Mariel in 1980 had ''incorporated themselves into American life and
are now being processed'' by the Immigration and Naturalization Service for
legal resident status.

A Change on Who Gets Visas


Administration officials said that since May 1980, immigrant visas had been
issued in Cuba only to the spouses, parents and unmarried minor children of
American citizens. That meant some 2,000 to 3,000 visas a year.

With the agreement, officials said, these categories of Cubans can now apply for
immigrant visas:


- The sons and daughters of American citizens, regardless of marital status.


- Brothers and sisters of American citizens.


- Spouses and unmarried sons and daughters of legal permanent residents in the
United States.


- Highly skilled artists, scientists and others with prearranged employment in
the United States as well as skilled and unskilled workers with prearranged
employment who receive a labor certification from the United States Department
of Labor.

Administration officials said most of the Cuban prisoners were being held at the
Federal penitentiary in Atlanta, where they were involved in several violent
disturbances this fall. Plans call for the return of about 100 Cubans a month,
starting in January.



Agreement Angers Some

MIAMI, Dec. 14 (UPI) - Two prominent Cuban-Americans reacted angrily today to
the immigration accord.

Ariel Remos, a prominent columnist for the Spanish-language newspaper Diario Las
Americas, said, ''I fear this is the first step of a new detente that,
unfortunately, President Reagan seems to have begun.''

Luis Lauredo, president of Cuban- American Democrats, said, ''I believe this
will culminate with some sort of diplomatic recognition'' of Cuba.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                               9 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               December 14, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

U.S.-Cuba Talks Resume

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 17, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 64 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Dec. 13


The United States and Cuba resumed immigration talks today, seeking to reach
final agreement on the return of about 2,500 ''undesirable'' Cuban refugees who
came to this country in the 1980 boatlift. In return, Cuba is seeking a
restoration of normal immigration flows to the United States. The talks resumed
at a location in New York that was kept secret for security reasons.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              10 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              December 13, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

CHINESE OFFICIAL ON VISIT TO U.S. IS FOUND HANGED

BYLINE: By JOSEPH BERGER

SECTION: Section B; Page 7, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 693 words


The body of a Chinese official on a brief working visit to New York was found
hanging yesterday morning from a cable on the roof of the Chinese Consulate
General in Manhattan, the police said.

The circumstances preceding the death were murky, with several discrepancies in
the accounts given by Federal and police authorities. The dead man had met with
United States immigration officials on Sunday and Monday, but authorities
refused to say whether he had asked for asylum.

The State Department said the Chinese Consulate considered the death a suicide.
The police said that no suicide note was found near the body and that the cause
of death was under investigation, Telephone calls to officials at the consulate
were unavailing.

Never Got on Plane


The police said the dead man - Zhang Xin, 49 years old, an official of the
Chinese Textile Ministry - met with immigration officials at Kennedy
International Airport Sunday, shortly before he was to leave with other ministry
officials for Guyana. He never left the United States, and on Monday he visited
the Manhattan office of the Immigration and Naturalization Service. He turned
over his passport to immigration officials.

The deputy district director of the Immigration Service, James Jasey, said he
could not reveal the nature of Mr. Zhang's conversations because the service
does ''not discuss applications.'' He refused to say whether Mr. Zhang had
indeed applied for asylum, and other Federal and New York police officials
declined to discuss the question.

Last April, a visiting Chinese engineer sought asylum in the United States after
he lowered himself out of a window of the Chinese Consulate with a fire hose.
The hose gave way and the man, who was 46 at the time, broke his ankle in the
fall.

Body Found on Roof


Yesterday at 7:30 A.M., the body of Mr. Zhang was found on the roof of the
consulate, a 20-story building at 520 12th Avenue, between 42d and 43d Streets,
said a police spokesman, Officer Joseph McConville.

Mr. Zhang arrived in the United States with six other officials of the Textile
Ministry on Dec. 5, Officer McConville said. Mr. Jasey said Mr. Zhang had
entered the country in San Francisco accompanied by only five ministry
officials, whom he described as engineers.

When the delegation was leaving for Guyana, Mr. Zhang contacted police officers
of the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey, which operates the airport.

Interviewed Officials


Mr. Zhang was taken to the Immigration Service's office at the airport, where
officials interviewed him, Officer McConville said.

On Monday, Mr. Jasey said, Mr. Zhang went to the service's New York office at 26
Federal Plaza, spoke to officials and left voluntarily. It was not clear whether
he turned over his passport on Sunday or Monday.

According to Officer McConville, Mr. Zhang went to the Chinese Consulate at 1
A.M. Tuesday and asked to return to China. The consulate, Office McConville
said, had arranged for Mr. Zhang to be interviewed by agents of the Federal
Bureau of Investigation at 11 A.M. yesterday, an interview that never took
place.

Question of Jurisdiction


Although the police said Mr. Zhang's body was found at 7:30 A.M., officials at
the Medical Examiner's office said Mr. Zhang was not pronounced dead until three
hours later, when an ambulance crew of the Emergency Medical Service examined
the body.

The State Department said it would not comment on the circumstances of the death
because the matter was under investigation by the police. It was unclear how
extensive an inquiry the police could conduct because police departments cannot
usually enter an embassy or consulate except at the invitation of the diplomats
there, officials said. A State Department spokesman, Vivienne Ascher, said last
night that the jurisdictional question was a ''very complicated issue.''

An F.B.I. spokesman, Joseph Valiquette, said he could not comment on the case.

The consulate building, which overlooks the Hudson River, was once operated by
the Sheraton Hotel chain and was purchased by the Chinese Government in 1979.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              11 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             December 12, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. LAW IS VIEWED AS POSSIBLE OBSTACLE TO CUBANS' RETURN

SECTION: Section A; Page 14, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 291 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Dec. 11


United States immigration law may complicate and delay efforts to return Cuban
criminals and mental patients being held in American institutions, according to
immigration lawyers in Government and private practice.

Havana has agreed in principle to take back some 2,500 Cubans who came to this
country in the ''freedom flotilla'' of 1980, Administration officials have said.

But the agreement cannot be carried out immediately, the lawyers said, because a
Federal district judge in Atlanta has set aside ''all final orders of
exclusion'' for the Cubans and has ordered the Board of Immigration Appeals to
hold a hearing to decide whether they are entitled to asylum here.

Judge Marvin H. Shoob ruled on Oct. 15 that the board had ''abused its
discretion'' in declining to review the Cubans' asylum claims. The board, he
said, used ''an erroneous and improper legal standard,'' prejudged the merits of
the case and disregarded evidence tending to show that the Cubans had a
well-founded fear of persecution in their homeland.

Barbara V. Tinsley, an assistant United States attorney in Atlanta, said today
that the Government had not yet filed notice of an appeal. The deadline for such
a notice is Thursday, she said. She said the decision was ''appealable,'' but
she could not say whether the Government would exercise its right to challenge
the ruling.

At a hearing before Judge Shoob in October, lawyers for the Cubans presented
evidence suggesting that they might be tortured or persecuted if they were sent
back to Cuba. The evidence indicated that a group of 13 Cubans who came to this
country in 1980 and voluntarily went back, to rejoin their families, were
punished by Cuba because they had taken part in the boatlift.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              12 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             December 12, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

J. M. SWING, WARTIME AIRBORNE COMMANDER

BYLINE: By JOAN COOK

SECTION: Section A; Page 29, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 428 words


Lieut. Gen. Joseph May Swing, commanding officer of the 11th Airborne Division
in World War II and later Commissioner of the Immigration and Naturalization
Service, died of pnuemonia Sunday in San Francisco, where he resided. He was 90
years old.

General Swing was a native of Jersey City and was graduated from the United
States Military Academy in 1915, a classmate of Dwight D. Eisenhower and Omar N.
Bradley. The general's military career spanned 51 years.

One of his first assignments as a second lieutenant in the Fourth Field
Artillery, Texas, was the expedition to Mexico led by Gen. John J. Pershing
against Francisco (Pancho) Villa, the Mexican revolutionary.

He fought in France as a field-artillery captain in World War I.

Commanded Airborne Unit

After years as an artillery expert, he organized the artillery units of the 82nd
Airborne Division at Fort Bragg, N.C., as the United States entered World War
II. For much of the war, he commanded the 11th Division, which was activated as
an airborne unit.

He was promoted to major general in 1943.

General Swing conducted the first mass landing of parachute and glider troops at
night with the 11th Airborne division at Camp Claiborne, La. He was transferred
to the Pacific in 1944, and his paratroopers were credited with helping to
defeat the Japanese at New Guinea and in the Phillipines.

After the Japanese surrender, his was the first United States unit to occupy
Japan.

Returning to the United States in 1949, he was commandant of the Army War
College at Fort Leavenworth, Kan., in 1950 and 1951, and later commanded the
Sixth Army at the Presidio until he retired in 1954.

Work With Immigration Service

General Swing served as Commissioner of the Immigration and Naturalization
Service from 1954 to 1962, when he retired for the second time. He believed that
the greatest accomplishment of his tenure was a sweeping reorganization in which
many of the service's functions were decentralized.

Among General Swing's medals were the Distinguished Service Cross, the
Distinguished Service Medal, the Silver Star with two oak leaf clusters, the
French Legion of Honor, the Air Medal with one cluster and the Legion of Merit.

In 1918, he married Josephine Mary March, who has died.

The general is survived by a daughter, Mary Ann Fullolove of San Francisco, a
son, Joseph March Swing of Seattle, and a grandson.

A funeral service is to be held at 1:30 P.M. Friday in the Post Chapel at the
Presidio. Interment will be at Arlington National Cemetery.



LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: OBITUARY

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              13 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              December 11, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. AND HAVANA IN TENTATIVE PACT ON RETURN OF 2,500



BYLINE: , Special to the New York Times
By BERNARD GWERTZMAN

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 6; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 1040 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Dec. 10


United States and Cuban negotiators have reached an agreement in principle on
the terms for repatriation to Cuba of some 2,500 criminals and mental patients,
Administration officials said today.

In return, they said, the United States would resume the processing of regular
emigration from Cuba to this country.

They said that the negotiators, Michael G. Kozak, deputy legal adviser of the
State Department, and Ricardo Alarcon de Quesada, the Deputy Minister of Foreign
Affairs, had concluded a third round of negotiations in New York last week with
an agreement conditional on the approval of both Governments.

If they approve, an announcement could be made as early as Thursday, the
officials said. This would be the first agreement between the two Governments
since the Reagan Administration took office, but Administration officials
stressed that it was limited strictly to immigration matters.



Litigation Called a Problem

A major problem, a State Department official said, is concern by the Justice
Department that litigation in the American courts might prevent the return of
many of the 2,500 so-called excludables, given that name because they are deemed
ineligible for permanent status in this country because of criminal records or
their mental condition. It was unclear tonight whether this might delay
announcement of the accord.

These 2,500 ''excludables'' were among the 125,000 Cubans who came to the United
States in the boatlift from the Cuban port of Mariel in 1980. The vast majority
of the Marielitos, as they are known, have integrated into American life, mostly
in the Miami area. But President Jimmy Carter, and later the Reagan
Administration, tried to persuade the Cuban Government to take back the 2,500,
most of whom were in Federal penal or mental institutions.

In 1983, the Reagan Administration told Cuba that until it agreed to the return
of the unwanted 2,500, the United States would halt admission of Cubans to this
country except for immediate familiy members of American citizens or of
permanent American residents.



Limit on Talks Sought

This meant that thousands of Cubans normally eligible for visas to the United
States, as well as some 3,000 political prisoners previously promised a haven in
this country, were left without entry to the United States unless they could
somehow make their way to third countries.

Initially, the United States wanted to limit the negotiations to the return of
the ''excludables,'' American officials said. But the Cubans always rejected the
idea of just talking about that single category and insisted on widening the
talks to include ''normal migratory procedures,'' they said.

The Cubans have wanted for some time to get the United States to take the former
political prisoners as well as those relatives of Cubans already in the United
States because as a group they were a nuisance to the Cuban Government, American
officials said.



Cuba Agrees to Talks

After months of diplomatic exchanges between the two countries, Cuba agreed last
May to hold negotiations on the questions of migration between two countries,
but suggested that they not be held until after the November elections. After
the Rev. Jesse Jackson's trip to Havana last June, however, the Cubans agreed to
hold the talks before November.

Mr. Kozak and Mr. Alarcon met for the first time in New York on July 12 and 13
and the next round of talks was held from July 31 to Aug. 2. Last week, the
State Department announced that the two negotiators had held their longest
session to date, from Nov. 28 to Dec. 5.

The department said they had discussed ''emigration issues, including the return
to Cuba of those persons from the 1980 Mariel boatlift who are ineligible for
substantive reasons to remain in the United States.''

''As we have indicated, the issues concern the return to Cuba of the Mariel
'excludables,' and resumption of normal immigration from Cuba to the United
States which was suspended after the Mariel boatlift in 1980.''

Talks Called Businesslike

The statement said that ''the tenor of the talks was businesslike.''

''Some progress was made,'' it said. ''Another round of discussions is
foreseen.''

An Administration official said that under the terms of the accord, the Cubans
would take 100 to 150 ''excludables'' a month and the United States would begin
regular processing that could lead to as many as 20,000 to 30,000 Cubans a year
coming to this country, in addition to the 3,000 political prisoners.

The concern of the Justice Department is that legal problems already being
raised in American courts by those Cubans in detention who want to be released
might make it difficult to send the ''excludables'' back to Cuba.

But a White House official said he believed the agreement would be approved and
the announcement made on Thursday. He said the Justice Department was being
''very legalistic'' about this.

Alan C. Nelson, Commissioner of Immigration and Naturalization, said that
''overall we have been pleased with the progress'' made in the negotiations with
Cuba. ''Progress has been made,'' he said. ''We are hopeful the matter will be
resolved soon.'' He indicated that the results of the negotiations to date were
to be reviewed ''at high levels of this Government, above me.''

1,500 Seek to Remain

Mr. Nelson, reached at a conference of senior immigration service officials in
Charleston, S.C., said the Cubans being held in detention by the United States
Government were involved in litigation before Federal District Judge Marvin H.
Shoob in Atlanta.

The litigation, he said, is ''an underlying factor'' that must be considered by
officials from the Departments of State and Justice.

Any agreement to repatriate the Cubans would obviously affect the litigation.
But Mr. Nelson said, ''We are satisfied we have the legal bases to transfer them
out of this country when and if an agreement is reached, subject to a court's
review of the cases.''

In the case before Judge Shoob, a group of 1,500 to 1,600 Cubans who came to the
United States in the ''freedom flotilla'' are seeking two things: release from
detention and asylum, that is, the right to remain in the United States.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              14 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              December 6, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

TINY ISLANDS OFF FLORIDA FEED STREAM OF ILLEGAL ALIENS INTO U.S.

BYLINE: By JON NORDHEIMER

SECTION: Section A; Page 18, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 1220 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, Dec. 3


The detention camp is on a desolate piece of ground on the edge of the
Everglades, 9,000 miles from where Mohammad Ahamad began his journey to the
United States.

Mr. Ahamad, a 32-year-old laborer, says he boarded a jetliner in New Delhi five
weeks ago, flew to London, changed planes, crossed the Atlantic to Nassau in the
Bahamas and made his way to the Biminis, a tiny chain of islands 50 miles off
the Florida coast. By nightfall he and 11 other Indians were being smuggled into
Miami aboard a small Bahamian fishing boat.

Mr. Ahamad, who was caught by the Coast Guard when the boat ran out of fuel 25
miles from Miami, was part of a stream of illegal aliens from the Indian
subcontinent who are paying thousands of dollars to make a dash across the Gulf
Stream through what the Immigration and Naturalization Service calls the
''Bimini Pipeline.''

They have traveled halfway around the world to join thousands from the Caribbean
and Latin America who are making Miami the third most active gateway for illegal
immigration, after the Mexican and Canadian borders.

Effort Is Better Financed

Haitians continue to be the largest single group attempting to reach Florida by
boat. Last Friday the Coast Guard intercepted two boats loaded with 397 Haitians
in Bahama waters bound for Florida.

The Indians and Bangladeshi entering the United States by way of the Bahamas are
fewer in number and have received scant attention until recently, but the
officials said they are mounting a better financed and organized assault on
American borders than the more numerous Hatians.

''There's no telling how many illegally enter the U.S. through the pipeline from
Bimini,'' said Ken Powers, supervisor of deportation for the Immigration and
Naturalization Service in Miami.

''My personal feeling,'' he said, ''is that we catch very few of them.''

And many of those who are apprehended eventually lose themselves in American
society, said Perry Rivkind, the service's district director in Miami.

An immigration service survey conducted from June to September showed that about
three out of four illegal aliens failed to appear after they were released in
Miami on bond to await deportation or exclusion hearings, and those from the
Indian subcontinent had even worse records.

''Eighty-three percent of the Indians absconded and 100 percent of the
Bangladeshis during this period,'' Mr. Rivkind said.

Bonds Are Forfeited

Bonds of $3,000 to $5,000 have been forfeited, suggesting that the aliens, who
come from some of the poorest countries in the world, are being financed by
groups who find it profitable to import cheap labor, Mr. Powers said.

''It's funny how these aliens are all bonded out by the same local attorneys
working with surety companies in California,'' Mr. Powers said.

''Most of these people are men in their prime working years, between the ages of
25 and 45,'' he said. ''It has n't been documented, but the suspicion is that
their trip here is paid for by a ring or in some cases by family members, and
they work years like indentured servants to pay it off.''

Eighteen Indians and Bangladeshis are being held at the immigration service
detention center west of Miami, down from 50 or 60 only a few months ago,
according to Gunther O. Wagner, the center's director of operations. But many of
those apprehended on the open sea are forced to fly back to India from the
Bahamas instead of coming to Florida for processing.

Travelers holding Commonweath passports, including Indians and Bangladeshis, are
permitted to enter the Bahamas without visas as long as they possess return
tickets to the homeland, the officials said.

''The Bahamians knew the purpose of their travel to Nassau and Bimini but
they're doing absolutely nothing about it,'' Mr. Powers said.

Government Is Limited

A spokesman for the Bahamian Government said United States officials raised the
issue last year through official channels and British and West German airline
charter operators were requested to monitor the sales of tickets to Commonwealth
passport holders arranging travel to Nassau from Europe.

''We are very concerned about stopping illegal immigration coming into the
Bahamas,'' the spokesman, William Kalis, said. ''But there is a limit to what a
democracy can do to stop legal travelers from coming in.''

However, immigration service and Coast Guard officers said privately that the
Bahamian authorities had been less than vigilant in prosecuting Bahamians caught
by the United States Coast Guard in the act of smuggling aliens into Florida.

Five of those aboard the boat with Mr. Ahamad were put on planes in Nassau to
return home. The rest, because of complications involving their passports or
plane tickets, were transported to Miami. There they were processed at the
immigration service's dentention center.

A total of 512 aliens from 33 different nations were being held at the detention
center one day recently. More than half were Haitians who had attempted in
recent months to enter Florida direct from Haiti or via the Bahamas.

Increased Patrols at Sea

A recent increase in patrols by the Coast Guard and the Navy looking for drug
smugglers in the waters off Florida may have prompted some aliens, especially
those from the Indian subcontinent, to avoid the pipeline and try some other way
to enter the United States, immigration officials said.

Recently, seated on an outdoor bench at the detention center, Mr. Ahamad was
vague about how he had been able to ''borrow'' the $2,500 that enabled him to
reach these shores. In India, he said, he made $50 a month ''if you worked very
hard.''

He tried without success to apply for a visa to work in the United States.
''People like me who try never get visa,'' he said in halting English.

Three bearded Sikhs who sat with him said they were farmers. Through an
interpreter they said they left India four days after the assassination of Prime
Minister Indira Gandhi and, as Sikhs, feared discrimination if forced to return.

They, too, said they had ''borrowed'' money from ''friends'' in the United
States to pay for the $1,200 round-trip ticket and the $1,000 they said they had
given the Bahamian smuggler.

Another alien in the group, Nurul Islam, 59 years old, said he first got into
the United States by jumping ship in New Orleans.

He said he worked as a painter in Brooklyn and married a United States citizen.
He said that they had become separated and he had been apprehended and deported
but that the political situation had worsened in Bangladesh and he had decided
to re-enter the United States with his son and a young friend. His 26-year old
son, Mastaba, displayed a hip wound that he said had been caused by a police
bullet in a political disturbance in Bangladesh.

''All my money I am lose,'' said Mr. Islam said. He said he could not find his
American wife to come and claim him.

Shammul Haque, a Bangladesh native, has been in the detention center since
April. He said he worked for five years in West Germany and then took up the
government's offer to foreign workers to leave the country in return for a cash
settlement. ''They have a worker problem now and we are not needed,'' said Mr.
Haque, a university graduate who worked in an automobile factory.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Mohammad Ahamad

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              15 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              December 5, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

371 HAITIANS ARE SEIZED AT SEA

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 4, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 290 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, Dec. 4


United States officials seized 371 Haitians on two ships heading toward Florida
on Sunday and Monday, and the Coast Guard sank one of the boats because the
authorities said it was a health hazard.

The Haitians were put aboard Coast Guard cutters pending questioning by
immigration officials, the authorities said.

One group, 340 Haitians crammed aboard a 60-foot sailboat, was detected by a
Coast Guard jet Monday night, about 60 miles off the Florida coast, said Dan
Waldschmidt, a Coast Guard petty officer. He said that group had been put aboard
the cutter Seahawk and their sailboat had been sunk.

A second group of 31 Haitians was seen aboard a 50-foot freighter eight miles
southeast of Miami on Sunday evening, he said.

Officials of the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service
interviewed the 31 Haitians and determined they were illegal aliens, the
authorities said. The group seized Sunday and any from the other group who are
deemed illegal aliens will be sent home by Wednesday, officials said.

Immigration officials were on their way this morning for a rendezvous with the
Seahawk, about 40 miles east of Fort Lauderdale in international waters between
the Bahamian islands of Bimini and Great Isaac, he said.

''Haitians found with no legal reason to enter the United States will be
returned to Haiti,'' a Coast Guard news release said.

Both vessels were found in the waters between the string of Bahamian islands
closest to southern Florida.

Haitian immigrants, fleeing a repressive regime in the poorest nation in the
Western Hemisphere, travel from one Caribbean island to another seeking to reach
the United States. The Bahamas are usually the last stop before refugees board
boats for Florida.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              16 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              December 1, 1984, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

NEW CITIZENS: A SENSE OF BELONGING SPICED WITH OPPORTUNITY

BYLINE: By JUDITH CUMMINGS

SECTION: Section 1; Page 8, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1479 words

DATELINE: LOS ANGELES, Nov. 30


They met no gracious Lady Liberty at America's Pacific shore, no grim Ellis
Island as a gateway to a brighter world. But by air and over land, from the
nations of the globe, 2,000 immigrants who had come to California today claimed
a place as new American citizens.

They are part of a rush of legal immigrants preparing for citizenship that has
led the Immigration and Naturalization Service to increase the number of
naturalization ceremonies to an almost monthly schedule in Los Angeles, and to
expand similar ceremonies around the country.

A half-dozen selected at random from the group sworn in today were interviewed
over the last few days about their lives and their hopes in their new identities
as man, woman, American.

No More Green Cards

They were among 2,000 people who assembled in the halls of the Los Angeles Music
Center, the place where Hollywood bestows its Academy Awards. With the surrender
of their green cards, which have been both the medal and the brand of their
identities as permanent resident aliens, they swore an oath administered by a
Federal judge that made them citizens of the United States.

In the years they have already been in the United States, including the five
years they had to wait to apply for naturalization and the two to three years
many said they waited for approval, they have established themselves throughout
the sprawling Los Angeles region.

The Chengs

Fifty years ago, other newcomers from the Middle Western plains and delta fields
and industrial enclaves of the United States came to California and organized
state clubs, teams and picnics that preserved their link to the old life and
celebrated their welcome of the new.

In exactly the same fashion, Yea Min Cheng takes his wife and two sons from
their suburban home in Cerritos, at the Orange County line, to cheer basketball
games between teams of fellow immigrants from their native Taiwan.

Seven thousand people attended one recent annual game at the Los Angeles Sports
Arena, the Chengs said.

Mr. Cheng is a 36-year-old electrical engineer whose parents left Shanghai for
Taiwan after the Chinese communist revolution. He works for the Tatung Company
of America, an division of a large manufacturing company he called ''the General
Motors of Taiwan.'' Jenny Cheng, his wife, works for the Minnesota Mining and
Manufacturing Company and, like her husband, goes to school at night at one of
California's low-cost public colleges.

Both came from comfortable backgrounds and faced bright futures before they left
Taiwan. But the chance for a more advanced technological education in America,
combined with the competitive pressures of their highly populated homeland,
brought them to California in 1976, they said.

They represent the growing proportion of Asians among immigrants to the United
States. Throughout this century, the percentage of immigrants from Latin America
and Canda has also increased while the proportion of immigrants from Europe has
decreased.

'More Opportunity Here'

''We feel if you work hard and study hard, you usually can get what you want,''
Mrs. Cheng said. ''Because there is more opportunity here.''

Already they have become like the majority of American couples, with the wife
working to contribute to the family's income that pays for their ranch- style
house on a quiet, sunny street. In Taiwan, despite her own desires, Mrs. Cheng
said, that would not have been so. A woman in Taiwan who did not hold a serious
job before marriage has little chance of getting one afterward, ''and I have my
own dreams,'' she said. Her husband added, ''She is also ambitious.''

Mr. Cheng decided to immigrate after a business trip to California. Because Mrs.
Cheng had a sister who immigrated earlier, they easily quickly gained entry
under immigration rules giving preference to the relatives of people already
here.

They speak fluent English, having studied it since junior high school as is
mandatory in westernized Taiwan, an important American trading partner. Their
sons, Johnny and Tommy, attend a local elementary school and Chinese school on
Saturdays in the hope, the Chengs said, they will retain certain Chinese
traditions, particularly respect for parental authority, as they grow up as
Americans.

''We hope to combine the best of both cultures,'' Mr. Cheng said. ''That is our
dream.''

Rima Butros

Rima Butros, a Palestinian, immigrated to Los Angeles with her family as a
teen-ager from Lebanon in 1976. They were refugees from warfare in the Middle
East where the family's apartment and Miss Butros's high school had been
shelled. Now she works in a bank in a downtown Los Angeles skyscraper.

''You want to live in a stable country,'' she said. ''Here, you have your rights
and you can do whatever you want. In the Middle East, you never know what's
going to happen the next day.''

She speaks English with barely a trace of an accent. The 26-year-old immigrant,
who now lives in Pasadena, expects to receive a degree by attending college at
night while working in the bank's international division.

Her parents left Palestine in 1948 when Israel was created and moved throughout
the Middle East. War broke out after they settled in Beirut.

''You couldn't go out on the street,'' she said. ''You never knew if a rocket
was going to hit your house. Our house was hit. We didn't have electricity for
five days, water for two days, we didn't have food.''

The swearing-in ceremony relieved her of the burden of bureaucratic questions
about her status as a resident alien, she said. ''You finally belong someplace.
You're an American citizen.''


Jose Eduardo Estrada

Jose Eduardo Estrada also sees citizenship as the bridge to what he is certain
will be a solid economic future for himself in the United States.

''In the field I want to go into, electronics,'' the Guatemalan native said, ''a
lot of companies have government contracts. You have to be a U.S. citizen to
work for them. I don't want anything to hold me back.''

Apparently, nothing else is. A self- proclaimed ''California boy,'' Mr. Estrada,
27 years old, displays the confidence and bearing of an Olympic athlete, even if
he is wearing a Hawaiian shirt and tennis shoes for his job as a waiter at a
popular Marina del Rey restaurant.

Mr. Estrada, who has lived in California since he was 2 years old, is studying
electronic communications at a technical institute where a brother is also a
student. Their mother was born in Mexico and their father in Guatemala, but both
parents had become permanent American residents at the time of a trip to see
relatives in Guatemala, when Jose was born.

Now his father is an American citizen and his mother has begun studying for her
own naturalization. ''She wants a better-paying job,'' Mr. Estrada said. ''They
just bought a new house, and she wants to be more secure.''


Verjouhi Dermijian

Verjouhi Dermijian and her family have become part of the fast-growing Armenian
community in California, a community that gave the state its first
Armenian-American governor, George Deukmejian.

Her husband, George, immigrated to this country 15 years ago. For a wife, he
turned to the ethnic Armenian community in Syria. When she was 16, Three weeks
after she and her family met Mr. Dermijian, the couple was married in Aleppo,
Mrs. Dermijian said.

The Dermijians immigrated through New York and lived for almost five years in
Flushing, Queens. But the cold weather drove them to California, where they live
in the San Fernando Valley near his job as a car body repairman.

The oldest two of their three children attend a private Armenian school. Mrs.
Dermijian takes care of the family home. American citizenship was a logical next
step, which to her needs no explaining.

''I have everything,'' she says simply. ''I have my kids, I have my house. Our
life is good.''

Kumiko Wood

Kumiko Wood, the bride 24 years ago in Japan of an American marine sergeant,
says she considers herself an American now and that Japan is ''just to see, just
to visit.''

At 49 years old, she devotes her life to her family, including three sons, and
has moved completely, and with apparent ease, into her husband's American
lifestyle in the Orange County city of Santa Ana. She has few ties with other
Japanese here. ''I didn't feel the need to see other Japanese people,'' she
said.

Instead, she has gained the status of a kind of Mom-of-the-Year, and not only in
her own household. After dozens of trips to the local high school playing fields
to follow the athletic careers of her sons, she said she became expert in
football and baseball. One year the three boys were playing on three different
teams and she attended every game, at home and away. She was given an award by
Saddleback High School in Santa Ana, for being the first mother to accomplish
such a feat.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photos of new citizens

TYPE: INTERVIEW

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              17 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              November 29, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
U.S. Is Helping Bring Deported Woman Back

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section A; Page 18, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 159 words

DATELINE: LOS ANGELES, Nov. 28


Immigration officials said today that they were working to bring back to the
United States a pregnant Filipino deported to Manila 12 days ago, and the
woman's husband hopes to have her home by Christmas.

Eleanore Parnes, 29 years old, was put on a plane for the Philippines by agents
of the Immigration and Naturalization Service on Nov. 17.

The officials said Mrs. Parnes had lived in Los Angeles illegally since she left
her job as a housekeeper to the Philippine consul general in 1974. But Hiram
Kwan, Mrs. Parnes's attorney, said her marriage to an American citizen this year
made her eligible for legal residence.

Mr. Kwan filed a new visa petition today to allow Mrs. Parnes to re-enter the
United States. Orville Charles, assistant district director for the immigration
service in Los Angeles, said it should ''just be a matter of weeks'' before Mrs.
Parnes returned.

Mr. Parnes, 31, said his wife is expecting a baby in late March.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              18 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               November 25, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

SANDINISTAS' OPPONENTS TELL OF OBSTACLES TO TRAVEL

BYLINE: By STEPHEN KINZER

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 16, Column 3; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 1179 words

DATELINE: MANAGUA, Nicaragua, Nov. 24


Miriam Arg"uello was planning to travel to Costa Rica for a wedding this week,
but when she arrived to pick up her passport from immigration officials, she
said she was told it had inadvertantly been sent to a remote part of the
country.

Juan Ramon Aviles said that he wanted to make a business trip, but that the
authorities told him he would be granted an exit visa only after a
newly-discovered irregularity about his date of birth was resolved.

Enrique Bolanos Geyer made it all the way to the Managua airport, but as he
passed through document control, he said, an official examined his passport in
private and then announced that it was missing a page and therefore was not
valid. Mr. Bolanos said it was intact when he presented it.

Mrs. Arg"uello, Mr. Aviles and Mr. Bolanos are leaders of anti-Sandinista
political and business groups. They and about a dozen other opposition figures
say that for the last three weeks, since the national election that the
Sandinista Front won overwhelmingly, they have found an array of obstacles in
their way as they try to go out of the country.



No New Policy Announced

The Sandinista Government has not announced any new policy on travel by
opposition figures, but one appears to be in effect. Senior Government officials
did not respond to requests for interviews on the subject.

Lieut. Miguel Necochea, spokesman for the Interior Ministry, said Friday night
that the Government had no list of people to be prevented from leaving the
country. ''We have no policy of denying visas to anyone,'' Lieutenant Nicochea
said.


As far as could be determined, all of the opposition leaders currently unable to
travel have ties to the Democratic Coordinator, a coalition of political
parties, labor unions and business groups that incurred the wrath of the
Sandinista Front when it refused to take part in the recent electoral campaign.
The coalition nominated Arturo Jose Cruz, an economist, for President, but then
refused to register his name on the ground the Government was not allowing
political rivals enough freedom.

At times in the past the Government has temporarily restricted travel for some
opposition leaders, but no such restrictions are known to have been imposed in
the last year. Under emergency powers adopted after the outbreak of civil strife
three years ago the Government has some powers to restrict travel by Nicaraguan
citizens, but it has not invoked them.

A Tradition of Travel


Travel among Central American countries is common, and many businesses rely on
commerce within the isthmus. In addition, Nicaraguan opposition leaders, like
the Sandinistas themselves, often travel in search of international support for
their political positions.

Some of those who have been unable to leave Nicaragua said they suspected that
the Government's motive was to prevent them from denouncing the Sandinistas in
foreign countries. Others speculated that because the Government fears an
imminent invasion from the United States, it may want to be sure opposition
leaders are in the country when it comes and are not able to escape its
consequences.

''Perhaps they would use us as hostages if anything were to happen in the
country,'' suggested Mr. Aviles, a lawyer who works for the Superior Council of
Private Enterprise, Nicaragua's main business federation.

Business Group Leaders


Several leaders of the council, which is known as Cosep, are among those who
have had trouble leaving the country. Mr. Bolanos, who now carries his mutilated
passport as a conversation piece, is the group's president. His brother Nicolas,
president of the Union of Nicaraguan Coffee Growers, which is affiliated with
Cosep, said he had also been unable to leave for a planned trip to visit a
daughter in New Orleans.

''A military man at the immigration office told me my application was
incomplete, but he wouldn't answer questions about what was missing,'' Nicolas
Bolanos said today. ''They made me fill out a new form and told me to come back
Nov. 28.''

Francisco Javier Calderon, executive secretary of another Cosep-affiliated
group, the National Council of Professionals, told a similar story. He was
planning a trip through nearby countries to meet with sympathetic political and
civic groups. As is the custom in Nicaragua, he submitted his passport and other
required documentation to the authorities 15 days before he was to leave.

'They Said to Come Back'


''They told me to pick up the passport on Nov. 16,'' Mr. Calderon said. ''When I
got there, they said to come back three days later. When I arrived the second
time, a Sub-Lieut. Carlos Granera came out and told me that my passport had
accidentally been sent to Special Zone I and could not be found.''

Special Zone I is the northern part of isolated Zelaya Province on the Atlantic
coast of Nicaragua.

Sub-Lieutenant Granera, reached by telephone, said he was not authorized to give
any information about Government policy on travel for opposition figures. But
one of his aides, Sub-Lieut. Ruth Zepeda, said the agency ''is not preventing
anyone from leaving.''

In at least one case, an opposition leader was able to win an exit visa that was
apparently being denied to him after he appealed personally to Interior Minister
Tomas Borge. The leader, Pedro Joaquin Chamorro Barrios, an editor of the
opposition newsaper La Prensa, said he was on his way to Japan last week when
authorities at the airport told him his multiple-exit visa was no longer valid.
Mr. Chamorro missed his plane. But later, backed by a Japanese diplomat, he
spoke with Mr. Borge, obtained the visa, and was finally able to leave.

One of the first activists to encounter trouble was Mario Rapaccioli, leader of
a faction of the Conservative Party, who was turned back at the airport Nov. 12
after an immigration officer found a page of his passport disfigured. Since then
at least a dozen applications by opposition leaders for new passports, passport
renewals or exit visas have been delayed.

Mr. Rapaccioli, one of the most outspoken anti-Sandinistas remaining in
Nicaragua, said in an interview that his passport was in perfect condition when
he submitted it at the airport. Immigration officers at the Managua airport work
in opaque booths that do not allow passengers any view of what they are doing
with the travelers' documents.

No Response Received


Several other opposition leaders, such as Luis Rivas Leiva of the Social
Democratic Party, Erick Ramirez of the Social Christians and Jose Espinoza of
the Confederation for Trade Union Unity, said they had received no responses to
requests for visas, new passports or passport renewals.

''Under their emergency powers, they have the right to keep people from
leaving,'' said Mr. Aviles. ''I wish they would just publish a list and tell us
which people are forbidden to leave and for how long, so we don't go through
this charade. The immigration office is a good distance from where I work, and
gasoline is expensive in this country.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Photo of Alvin Guthrie, Nicaraguan labor leader, waiting to get an exit
visa at immigration office in Managua

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              19 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             November 21, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. TO LET 125,000 CUBANS SEEK RESIDENT STATUS

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 16, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 449 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, Nov. 20


The thousands of Cubans who arrived in the United States by sea in 1980 can
begin applying for permanent residence status next month, an immigration
official said today.

The applications will be accepted after the Government formally puts the Cuban
Adjustment Act back into active use. Applications were not accpeted under the
18-year-old act over the past three years as Congress debated a proposed
immigration bill, which failed to pass this year.

Alan C. Nelson, Commissioner of the Immigration and Naturalization Service,
indicated in January that he would apply the Cuban Adjustment Act to the Cubans
who arrived in the boatlift if the legislation failed.

Program Starts Dec. 3


Perry Rivkind, director of the immigration office in Miami, said today that he
learned Monday from Mr. Nelson that the program would be applied starting Dec. 3
to about 125,000 refugees who arrived from the port of Mariel.

Under the initial phase of the program, all Cuban nationals who entered the
United States in the boatlift, which began April 15, 1980, and continued until
Oct. 10 that year, can apply through Dec. 31 for permanent residence, Mr.
Rivkind said. Applications can continue after Dec. 31, he said, but those
applying before that date will receive priority in the processing of
application. After April 1, the immigration service will interview the
applicants, he said.

Mr. Rivkind said the program did not apply to Cubans being held in detention
with criminal records or records of mental illness.

''Permanent residence status confers most of the privileges of U.S. citizenship
and is required before citizenship can be obtained,'' Mr. Rivkind said.

100,000 Expected to Apply


He estimated that ''up to 100,000 Cubans'' would register, at least 90,000 of
whom have settled in Florida.

The registration forms will be available nationwide through several volunteer
organizations, including the International Rescue Committee, the Lutheran
Immigration and Refugee Service and the United States Catholic Conference
Immigration Refugee Service, Mr. Rivkind said. He said the immigration service
would not directly distribute the forms.

Under the Cuban Adjustment Act, any Cuban national who came to the United States
after Jan. 1, 1959, could apply for permanent residence status a year after
being in the United States. But applications were not accepted under the act for
three years as Congress debated a proposed immigration bill. Separate versions
of the bill passed the House and the Senate last year but died when a compromise
could not be reached.

The bills would have granted amnesty to many illegal aliens already in the
United States.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              20 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               November 19, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
Wife of U.S. Citizen Deported to Philippines

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 18, Column 5; National Desk

LENGTH: 191 words

DATELINE: LOS ANGELES, Nov. 18


A woman who married a United States citizen earlier this year and is five months
pregnant has been deported to her native Philippines because she lived here
illegally for nearly 10 years and ignored early deportation orders.

Although her lawyer contends her marriage makes her eligible for legal residence
here, the woman, Eleanor Parnes, 29 years old, was put on a plane Thursday after
Immigration Judge Jay Segal lifted an order barring the Immigration and
Naturalization Service from deporting her.

Her husband, Richard Parnes, said, ''I couldn't even say goodbye.''

Judge Segal said Mrs. Parnes could not apply to re-enter for five years.

Immigration officials said she lived in Los Angeles illegally since leaving her
job as a housekeeper to the Philippine consul general in 1974.

Judge Segal said he based his decision on Mrs. Parnes's failure to comply with
previous deportation orders, which he said ''overcomes the favorable factor of
her marriage.''

He also refused to let her leave voluntarily, which would have allowed her to
apply immediately to return.

It was Judge Segal who originally ordered her deported in 1979.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              21 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               November 11, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

Prelate Accused of Nazi Past Said to Fight Lisbon Ouster

BYLINE: Reuters

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 16, Column 2; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 165 words

DATELINE: LISBON, Nov. 10


Archbishop Valerian Trifa, a 70-year-old Rumanian Orthodox prelate whom Portugal
has declared undesirable, has told the police he will appeal to the Supreme
Administrative Court a ruling denying him residence here, the news agency
Noticias de Portugal reported.

The Archbishop was deported from the United States last August after admitting
lying to immigration authorities to cover up his fascist sympathies when he
entered the country 32 years before. He was accused of being connected with
Rumania's Iron Guard, a fascist group held responsible for the murders of
hundreds of Jews and Christians in World War II, and of being connected with
anti-Jewish rioting in 1941 in which hundreds died.

Archbishop Trifa entered Portugal in August on a temporary visa that officials
said was granted without knowledge of his background. The Interior Ministry said
this week it was against Portugal's interests for Archbishop Trifa to live here
and he must leave as soon as possible.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              22 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               November 11, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition
                              Correction Appended

ALLEN GINSBERG: INTIMATIONS OF MORTALITY

BYLINE: By Francis X. Clines; Francis X. Clines covers the White House for The
Times.

SECTION: Section 6; Page 68, Column 1; Magazine Desk

LENGTH: 5163 words


HEY FATHER DEATH, I'M FLYING home,'' sounds the voice of the bald, gray-bearded
poet singing to his dead sire. The song threads through the cobwebbed corridors
of the abandoned Ellis Island immigration center, the haunting relic of a past
age of hope that seems a perfect setting for the latest in Allen Ginsberg's
endless experimenting with words and emotion and time.

Ginsberg is performing his poetry for the music video camera, happily tinkering
with the newest twist in message- bearing. A witness, sensing the riverbound
borough of Manhattan teeming at the horizon beyond the sad lyric hall, can
easily imagine that a preceding literary eccentric, Walt Whitman, might also
have rushed to play himself on music video if the chance had been his. For Allen
Ginsberg, the poet laureate of protest, here is a new audience, another chance
to sing of death, the subject that gives peace to his life.



''Genius Death your art is done/ Lover Death your body's gone/ Father Death I'm
coming home,'' sings Ginsberg, his voice slow and deep against a reedy musical
background that sends a sweet grief through the spiritual catacombs where the
nation's lifeblood once washed in.

A few actors are in the foreground, dressed as anxious peasants at their meal of
passage into the New Land. Ginsberg, a modern American rebel born of that
immigrant tide, walks ghostlike among them with his poetry. He seems far from
his Beat Generation roots of shaggy youth. He is modestly barbered and bears his
words before the camera dressed in a dark business suit straight from the
middle-class shadows that still limn his soul despite all the years of Bohemian
flight and labor. The day, reflected in the city's harbor, is aglow beyond the
dim building with the same brilliance of nature that ignited Whitman's voice.
Ginsberg seems at peace and his nostalgia is as blue-chip as ever: he is
sporting the necktie of his beloved father, Louis Ginsberg, New Jersey
schoolteacher and poet.

''Father Breath once more farewell/ Birth you gave was no thing ill/ My heart is
still, as time will tell.''

The stanza becomes a take. As the camera crew moves on to another setting,
Ginsberg waits and looks around at dusty past details. He is the celebrity poet
who once piped a flood of hippie humanity into Golden Gate Park in the 1960's on
the strength of ''flower power.'' He is the poet of resistance who once could
rile authorities with the single syllable ''om,'' his mantra chant against the
Vietnam War sounding through the Chicago tear gas of '68. He is the symbol of
social iconoclasm and doctored mind expansion, one of the first to sing brazenly
beyond the closet of homosexuality.

He is also getting old, he says. He stands quietly on Ellis Island in suitcoat
and tie and lapses into the meditation of the Buddhist ritual that now provides
daily comfort and exercise to him. He spies a cracked old songbook left from the
immigrant past and he reads, then sings, to no one in particular verses from
''Go Down Moses'' and ''Love's Old Sweet Song.'' The poet smiles like a newborn,
showing none of the doubt, uncertainty and anger of his own lyrics.

As relentless as it is, Ginsberg's intimation of mortality is not joyless. He
will talk death casually while walking confidently on streets strewn with
garbage and junkies on the Lower East Side where he lives and writes. He will
talk death against the mountains out at his serene literary retreat in Boulder,
Colo., the Naropa Institute, where each summer he teaches poetry and Buddhist
meditation to a new generation of the aspiring avant-garde. Right now, as he is
in China for a two-month visit to teach poetry, his yearning each sunrise
undoubtedly is to fully sense life's fact of flight on a new edge of the Earth
and find peace in the melancholy transaction. He calls this ''the dearness of
the vanishing moment,'' the heart of all his work.

From this perpetual concession to death's advent, Allen Ginsberg has fashioned
an elemental, efficient literary engine that has driven him far beyond the
stereotypical days of his hippiedom. Along the way, he has steadily produced
poetry, journals, political writings and letters - a ''lifelong poem,'' as he
calls this continuing effort, and one that is about to provide a sturdier stake
for him than he has ever had. Harper & Row will publish 33 years of his
collected poems shortly in a single hardcover edition, the first time he has
ever ventured beyond such pioneer alternative publishers as City Lights Books,
the San Francisco haven of his friend Lawrence Ferlinghetti, who helped find the
early audiences for Ginsberg. He continues composing, most recently producing
''White Shroud'' (facing page), in which he finds himself still concerned with
the theme of reconciliation with death. It is the title poem of another
collection, to be published by Harper & Row in 1986.

The more-than-800-page collected poems is hardly a comment on the legitimization
of Allen Ginsberg. He will still reside in a $260-a-month slum walkup and toss a
visitor the key to the steel shielded main door in a balled-up sock. On any
morning after his contemplative exercise and hot tea and lemon, he is still
capable of bounding down to a fresh cause in that nomadic, Hasidic way of his
that Kenneth Rexroth once described as ''in the direct line of the nabis, those
wild men of the hills, bearded and barefoot, who periodically descended on
Jerusalem, denounced king and priesthood, and recalled the Chosen People to the
Covenant.''

The Harper publication is rated by Ginsberg mostly as the means to a larger
worldwide audience and to some needed funds, a sum surprising to him - $160,000
for six books across four years - but relatively modest in an age given to
celebrity millionaires. As a poet, Ginsberg long ago moved closer to the
literary mainstream, even if the general public's impression still has him
ossified in time as a dope-headed, peace-chanting caricature of the
self-indulgent artist. He carefully claims no large place in American
literature, but his labor and style alone, regardless of the esthetic judgments
of later generations, currently put him as a major working writer in the
nonclassical tradition of Walt Whitman and William Carlos Williams. The latter
is a key figure, because Ginsberg was raised in the same Paterson, N.J., area
where Williams worked as poet and physician, conceiving innovations of American
prosody - the use of the daily working language to build a more natural meter
and verse that early delighted Ginsberg for seeming closer to ancient poetry.

At the age of 58, Ginsberg is a gentle, thoughtful man who works hard at his
obligations to writing, to his family and to what remains of the rambunctious
community of free souls who first helped him find flight. He now is energized by
his daily meditations, not the marijuana and LSD of his past. In the 60's,
Ginsberg regularly enraged college administrators, public-morals officials and
parents with his advocacy of the legalization of marijuana and his
experimentation with psychedelics as an aid to writing, the latter a total of 30
times over 15 years, according to his own Congressional testimony. Some critics
said the result was predictable in the frequent appearance of obscenities in his
poems and graphic sexual narrative. For him, these are devices for working
toward an eventual, overall human lyricism; his confessional poems can be
coarse, but Ginsberg was no less coarse and graphic in denouncing the Vietnam
War. As a counterculture celebrity, he came to be courted as much as condemned
by some publicity-minded authorities. He played this role with irony, once
testifying before Congress that psychedelics at least gave him the power to stop
hating President Lyndon B. Johnson and start praying for him.

Ginsberg still studies Whitman, but, nearing three score years, he is intrigued
by the house in Camden, N.J., that was Whitman's old-age retreat. He seems to
identify with Whitman's planning his own tomb from the sketches of William
Blake. A running plot line in Ginsberg's dreams and talk is his yearning for a
happy place to die and a loving soul to give him his final bowls of soup. Yet,
morbid is not the word for Ginsberg, for he can peel down to the humor in almost
any fact.

He remains a busy poet who has been taken as something far more serious than a
coffee-house versifier ever since 1956, when his first important poem, ''Howl,''
appeared. Its opening line crashed against the gray complacency of the
Eisenhower years:

I saw the best minds of my generation destroyed by madness, starving hysterical
naked, dragging themselves through the negro streets at dawn looking for an
angry fix, angelheaded hipsters burning for the ancient heavenly connection to
the starry dynamo in the machinery of the night

That poem, which is widely anthologized these days, was begun in a moment of
freedom and sadness, Ginsberg recalls. Freedom in having despaired at that point
of ever succeeding as a poet; thus he finally lost the inhibitions and
pretentions that stood in the way of a personal style. Sadness in thinking of
the lost lives of self-destructive friends in the Beat Generation and, more
obliquely, of his mother, Naomi. She was a Russian emigre who began in this
country as a Marxist idealist of great enthusiasm and ended as a tragic, raving
paranoid, tortured in the world by her own ideas and in institutions by
electric- shock treatments and a lobotomy.

Ginsberg grew up in New Jersey as a leftist, Jewish atheist, a gifted student
who used his Y.M.H.A scholarship at Columbia University to fall into the life of
a happy literary bum with his young friend Jack Kerouac, the prose voice of the
Beat Generation. Allen had spent a miserable youth helping to shepherd his
mother to sanitariums, but her death occurred as he was finding full-fledged
freedom in San Francisco as a young poet and a homosexual finally out in the
open, almost 30 years ago. Among other things, ''Howl'' was a pounding release
of disguised sympathy for Naomi as Ginsberg finally hit upon a powerful,
strophic style to call his own. After that came another of his most popular
poems, ''Kaddish,'' in which he grieved openly for Naomi's lost life, asking:
''It is only the sun that shines once for the mind, only the flash of existence,
that none ever was?''

The poet-son wept for his mother:

Ai! Ai! we do worse! We are in a fix! And you're out, Death let you out, Death
had the Mercy, you're done with your century, done with God, done with the path
thru it - Done with yourself at last - Pure -Back to the Babe dark before your
Father, before us all - before the world - There rest. With such words already
on paper, Ginsberg need hardly elaborate as he smiles gently and answers the
foolish, necessary question of whether he is happy: ''Like everybody else, I'm
miserable.'' He looks down and adds, ''But misery and happiness are one taste.''

This is as good a description as any of his own peripatetic, experimental,
heartfelt, bardic life. The main events in his life involve imagination -
mystical visions, he says, in describing the blinding sense in 1948 of having
William Blake's poetry upon his tongue. He says it was a sensation not at all
heightened by drugs, but rather a sudden sense of a ''beatific'' universe that
eventually frightened him. Similarly, the late paintings of Cezanne, with their
spare use of white space and juxtaposed color swatches, left him ''shuddering''
years ago and sensing a similar power in juxtaposed words to force the mind to
invent ''the sensation of existence.''

Like Whitman, Ginsberg's sense of self-celebrity makes him veer toward the orbit
of other pop figures such as Bob Dylan, the folk-song versifier, or Ginsberg's
New Wave buddies in such rock groups as the Clash. Ginsberg has sung with both.
His delight with on-the-spot expressionist art dates back to the earliest
writings of Kerouac and to the Beats' pleasure with the work habits of jazz
musicians and blues singers.

All his years of freedom and complaint have left Ginsberg with a look veering
somewhere between the world-weariness of a shopkeeper and the netherworld
bemusement of a Talmudic scholar. Working quietly one recent morning, Ginsberg
sat in his apartment down the street from Mary Help of Christians convent and
wrote in the journal that feeds his literary life. The day's jotting is about
his latest visit to the sick and dying, to his Uncle Abe, bedridden at the age
of 87 in the Daughters of Israel Geriatric Center in West Orange, N.J., to old
Aunt Clara in a different old-folks home, and to Julian Beck, his old friend and
Bohemian soulmate from the Living Theater, who is weakened by cancer but still
sits up to discuss the arts with Ginsberg.

''Actually I was just learning from them,'' Ginsberg says of his visits to the
sick. ''It was very edifying. It's not that tough. It's life. It's poignant.
It's grief. Some tears, not many. Abe was the black sheep. Now he's the
survivor, finally grown up. And he's the wisest, lying there.''

Ginsberg has the same deep voice in conversation as he does in reading poetry,
and his thoughts often come uninhibited, not merely with the multifarious sexual
vulgarity he helped pioneer in modern culture, but more impressively with
emotional openness. The only chance for meaning and success in a life, he says,
is ''to the extent you get beyond yourself and serve others.'' That is the
meaning of the old people he visits, he says. ''Create some pocket of beauty,
something that will make it more bearable to ease the pain and suffering of
others and of yourself.'' His personal horror, accordingly, is that his life
will have been ''an egotistical monument'' of waste out of which ''there might
only have been 10 moments of something useful to others.''

''I wished I had spent more time visiting my uncles and aunts rather than
spending so much time on abstractions,'' says Ginsberg. He has had to review all
his life's work for the Harper's book, and he is speaking of his poetry in the
60's in particular: ''Politically obsessed, ephemeral, too much anger, not
enough family, not enough of my personal loves.''

Ginsberg is happy to say he has had a number of loves, beginning when he was 20
years old with Neal Cassady, who as Dean Moriarty is a character in Kerouac's
picaresque novel ''On the Road.'' Cassady eventually died of a drug overdose, as
Kerouac died of alcoholism. William Burroughs, the drug-addicted novelist, was
another of Ginsberg's old loves, and now he is a frequent visitor to the Jack
Kerouac School of Disembodied Poetics, the summer institute Ginsberg helped
found at the Naropa Institute. There the two of them talk nostalgically of
younger days of writing, and Allen shows old films and is a host of seminars on
the Beats, protectively summoning their spirit back for each new summer's crop
of young writers.

Ginsberg is grateful for all his loves, and the most important in his life has
been Peter Orlovsky, a quiet-spoken, husky man who first moved in with Allen 30
years ago this Christmas. Orlovsky is primarily heterosexual, Ginsberg says, but
he still has had a happy life across the years with Allen, with their
relationship waxing and waning but surviving. Just recently, Orlovsky decided he
wanted to raise children, so he is living next door to Ginsberg in the East
Village with a woman he loves. The two men remain close and seem like the most
well adjusted of sundered couples.

''Allen encouraged me,'' says Peter. ''Life is constantly changing. It's full of
surprises.''

''It's a great idea for him,'' Ginsberg says. ''He has no erotic or family
future with me.'' The poet who worries so about death rejected a reproductive
reach beyond his time in once writing, ''Between me and oblivion an unknown
woman stands.'' She will remain unknown.

The parting sounds complicated as Ginsberg discusses it, but not for the decades
of emotional ties the two men are reweaving. Instead, the complications are of a
most worldly order - how to stay together and finance an extended family on the
basis of Ginsberg's limited income; how to prepare for children, yet attend to
the elderly in both the Orlovsky and Ginsberg families. It is startling to
witness this mundane anxiety in two of the surviving souls of the Beats, the
artists who were so refreshing in thumbing their nose at the materialist
preoccupation of post-war America.

Jerry Aronson, a film maker who has been shadowing Ginsberg for two years at
work on a documentary on the poet's life, says it is charming to hear Ginsberg
and Burroughs exchange tales of their ailments like two old pensioners. Aronson
recognizes this as more an aspect of Ginsberg's gift for listening to
everything, to being an omnivorous archivist of the ever fading life: ''He
listens and makes you feel what you're saying is important. He wants to hear
you.''

Ginsberg, for all the earlier doctoring of his mind with drugs, is among the
least preoccupied with material life among successful American writers. He took
vows of penury when he made Buddhism the center of his life. He uses what money
he earns in readings and his writing to keep moving around the world, visiting
and observing and writing. Over the years, his annual income has never been
higher than the low tens- of-thousands, he estimates, and friends note that a
decent part of this has gone into a foundation, the Committee on Poetry, that he
created years ago as a device to funnel bits of charity to needy writers and
friends. In this way, he aided his friend, Imamu Amiri Baraka, the black poet,
when he was embattled in lengthy, expensive court cases in New Jersey. Friends
say Ginsberg is always creative in his generosity, as with, for example, his
donation of the ''Kaddish'' manuscript to Julian Beck when he had his own court
battles in New York to finance.

IN THE MIDDLE-CLASS way of the world, young Allen Ginsberg, the product of a
tragic marriage of leftward intellectuals, studied literature at Columbia,
appreciating a few teachers and delighting in the flare of genius in Kerouac, a
fellow student. For himself, he wondered whether he might work with words in
some conventional way in television or at Time magazine. He underwent eight
months of psychiatric care during that period and was pleased to be pronounced
by the doctors as neither psychotic nor schizophrenic, but ''just an average
neurotic.'' ''That was helpful,'' he says. ''I had been eccentric and wondered
whether it was my own madness or the world around me.''

Much as Whitman was a wandering printer and writer, Ginsberg, the literature
major, learned the new trade of marketing research, which he found to be the
manipulation of public opinion through the use of ''hand- tooled phrases.'' He
says he savors the latest Reagan slogans with the same professional ear he once
applied to the Ipana toothpaste account in his 52d-floor office in the Empire
State Building, measuring whether ''sparkling'' or ''glamorous'' was the more
manipulative adjective to attract the masses. ''I was writing already then,'' he
says. ''I knew what I was doing, getting right into the middle of the
mass-communications movement. I got great experience in the way language is
artifacted.''

In this period he created such poems as ''The Green Automobile,'' a vivid cross-
country tour of lyrical experience: ''we can see together/ the beauty of souls/
hidden like diamonds/ in the clock of the world.''

Ginsberg's marketplace trade gave him the freedom to break away to San Francisco
and greater independence, but there he was taunted by the dream of dropping his
business-suited life in the office for that of full-time poet and open
homosexual. A psychiatrist told him to do it because that was what he really
wanted. The simple wisdom of that advice still amazes Ginsberg, but,
characteristically, he has a motherly way of worrying yet about its full
implications and its effect on his quest for a peaceful place to expire.

''I asked him, 'But what will happen when I'm older and stained and nobody
visits me, with no source of income or honor in the community?' '' Ginsberg
recalls with a big smile. ''He said, 'Don't worry about it now. You're an
interesting guy. You'll have friends later.' ''

Ginsberg followed the advice, and says he quickly discovered the end of much
restraint, some personal happiness, and ''a burst of imaginative energy'' for
his writing. ''I began seeing life more as a Charlie Chaplin movie than a horror
movie,'' he says, describing the great change in going more deeply into the
world of imagination. ''I could get up in the middle of the night and write down
a dream without worrying about getting up in the morning.''

In that world of imagination, he finds, ''There's no bar to us proclaiming our
delight, and that's the strength of poetry.''

He is referring there to a beautiful poem, ''Rain,'' by his mentor, William
Carlos Williams, which measures love's endless passage through the physical
world and half-laments:

Unworldly love that has no hope of the world  and that cannot change the world
to its delight.

Ginsberg concedes that hard fact, but says the important thing is to not
hesitate to express ''the actuality of our desire.'' It is enough, he says, that
it exists ''in the area where we all live, in our imaginations,'' and is
concerned with ''everything that's impractical, everything we want that we can't
have but still remains as a residue of desire because it's genuine.'' His own
life seems quietly summoned up as he speaks of this point: ''What we really
want, as distinct from what we dare ask for, once you say what you really want,
maybe it's not that impossible.''

''What else do we have?'' he asks, edging as he often does toward the world of
politics to make a point about poetry. ''We have our imaginal world, whether
it's me or Kissinger. His world is no more real than mine. He has this vision of
Russia and I have this vision of my mother. We're all entangled in our own
projections. The people that realize they're entangled are at a little better
advantage than those who don't and go around thinking that their own projections
are the absolute realpolitik reality.''

Ginsberg's long avocation with politics is visible in his old file cabinets in
his East Village apartment: ''Late 60's CIA/FBI/Dope.'' Knowing drugs from the
streets, he still amasses information on the Government's role in drug policing,
with what he sees as its pernicious problem of official corruption and with what
he long has contended is an international scale of conspiracies. Ginsberg speaks
as a one-time celebrant of such psychedelics as LSD, fed from the hand of his
old friend, Timothy Leary, in describing how avidly the Government used its
drug-busting machinery against protesters of the Vietnam War.

More mind-boggling than any drug he ingested, he says, was the level of
Government ''evidence'' justifying his classification as a security risk that
Ginsberg discovered when he finally obtained his personal dossier from the
Federal Bureau of Investigation. In a celebrated May Day incident in 1965,
Ginsberg was elected Kral Majales (King of May) at a festival of 100,000 young
people in Prague. The Government of Czechoslovakia felt so scandalized by the
gesture that it quickly expelled Ginsberg as ''a bearded American fairy dope
poet.'' Ginsberg earlier had been expelled from Cuba for protesting the Castro
regime's repression of homosexuals, and he took both censurings as blithe merit
badges. But later he discovered in his F.B.I. file that American authorities had
cited the Czechoslovak condemnation of him as a ''narcomane and an alcoholic''
as a proof of his unworthiness as an American. ''They were backing the
Commies!'' the poet cries out, arguing that police bureaucracies have more in
common than not.

Through such incidents, the public may have missed the point that Ginsberg has
long warned against such addictive drugs as heroin, and as early as ''Howl'' he
grieved for addict-friends like the writer Herbert Huncke slipping away into the
criminal life. At the same time, Ginsberg says that the Government's
manipulation of the problem, and the public's fear of it, makes it easier not
for a ''police state'' to flourish, but for a ''surveillance state'' to quietly
accrete. ''First you create a class called 'fiends,' and you need to have more
cops, then more cops when these expert cops tell how big the problem is, and the
thing grows,'' he says, recalling official warnings about marijuana as ''reefer
madness'' in his youth. ''No one now believes pot drives you crazy,'' says the
poet who helped popularize it in the middle-class.

In recent years, Ginsberg's political energy has been directed against nuclear
weapons, and he has declaimed with demonstrators outside the Rocky Flats
plutonium works north of Denver. ''Plutonian Ode'' was composed for the occasion
and shows a blend of Ginsberg's old 60's vehemence with his Buddhist
breath-control regimen as a way of pacifying the world. He implores the bomb
makers:

Take this wheel of syllables in hand, these vowels and consonants to breath's
end take this inhalation of black poison to your heart, breathe out this
blessing from your breast on our creation, ''enrich this Plutonian Ode to
explode its empty thunder through earthen thought-worlds Magnetize this howl
with heartless compassion, destroy this mountain of Plutonium with ordinary mind
and body speech

In becoming a poet, Allen Ginsberg turned almost 40 years ago to Dr. Williams,
his fellow New Jerseyan who was not then fully appreciated, but even so was
quietly watching and re- imagining their town in his epic poem ''Paterson,'' and
working on his great love poem ''Asphodel.'' ''He was considered a crank back
then, a local eccentric, nowhere near the heavyweight he is now,'' Ginsberg
says.

From Williams, Ginsberg discovered most clearly that he had to ''stop writing
poetry'' - recombining the existing literary imageries of the past - and start
paying attention to life and jotting down his plain observations.

He remembers Williams's making the point best by taking out his physician's
prescription pad to show something he had heard spoken that day by a Polish
workman on his block: ''I'll kick yuh eye.'' The words defied iambic pentameter
and the other basic meters taught then as the classical method of poetry. But
they had syncopation rooted in honest speech idioms, and Williams was excited to
use them in a poem. Thus was Ginsberg quickly beguiled by Williams's use of the
''American measure,'' the study of people's living speech patterns, rather than
a few textbook measures, for the basic rhythms upon which to create poems.
Ginsberg embraced this approach, which already was being separately championed
by some poets across the river in New York City and others out in San Francisco.

''Rather than fake something which sounds arty, it should be our own speech
intensified, not anthology speech synthesized,'' Ginsberg says, summarizing what
is well accepted now.

For years, Ginsberg has been taking photographs of everyone he cherishes. His
early pictures of Kerouac, Burroughs, Gregory Corso, Robert Creeley, Anne
Waldman and numerous other writers are basic archival material now, and his
technique is appreciated enough to merit a gallery show of Ginsberg's photos
next year in New York. The picture-taking reinforces another tenet of Ginsberg's
writing technique, the description of ''epiphanous moments,'' a kind of freeze-
framing in words of a witnessed moment ''under the aspect of eternity'' that
artists crave. Seeking that aspect, Ginsberg writes to capture ''the dearness of
the vanishing moment and the realization that the show, life, lasts a limited
number of years.''

''I'm 58 and it becomes more and more poignant as it goes along,'' he says. ''In
my poetry, I would show that.'' This seems the challenge he finds most pressing
in such poets as Whitman. He is fascinated with Whitman's witnessing of Lincoln
and of Lincoln's suffering as what Ginsberg calls a ''poignant moment'' that
existed more than a century ago for those two men, yet survives now in Whitman's
writing. ''Whitman's basic tone toward Lincoln was tenderness,'' says Ginsberg,
who makes the point that accuracy through subjective witnessing, not applied
emotion, must bear the artist into the future: ''And Whitman's tenderness comes
not from an arbitrary infusion of good will, but from the very circumstances of
suffering.''

Ginsberg always gets back to suffering. ''Some sense of sympathy is the ultimate
social reality,'' he says. He remains ultimately in touch with suffering through
the life, witnessed and imagined, of Naomi Ginsberg, the mother who died crazed
and suffering as he strove to be a poet. She was alive when he thought of her
and created ''Howl'' 28 years ago, and he symbolically sent a copy to her, a
mute patient in a madhouse, never expecting a reply. She shocked him by
responding with a letter of eerie clarity that was written, he estimates, no
more than a day before she suddenly died from a stroke. When Ginsberg later
wrote ''Kaddish'' for her, he ended with her strange but welcome words of
concern from the letter: ''The key is in the window, the key is in the sunlight
in the window - I have the key - Get married Allen don't take drugs - the key is
in the bars, in the sunlight in the window. Love, your mother.''

Ginsberg recently returned to his mother through the imaginal world of his
poetry. A year ago, he relates, he had a vivid dream of wandering the Bronx,
looking for his ever-elusive place for a happy death, and in the dream his
mother appeared in an alley as a shopping-bag lady ''habiting this old city-edge
corner, older than I knew her before her life disappeared.'' She was still poor
and in need of care, but she was finally able, beyond all the incoherent
shrieking years of madness, to talk with her son so they could reconcile. She
asked for help and Allen was relieved to stay with her and shop for her and cook
for her. And next to her shopping-bag station was a vacant apartment for an
aging poet. Ginsberg awoke from the dream ''in tears and in peace'' and
immediately began writing ''White Shroud.''

''At long long last, my search was ended in this pleasant way,/ time to care for
her before death, long way to go yet,'' he wrote, as if simple shelter itself
was that time-defying aspect of eternity sought by poets.

''It gave me a chance to go back again and have a conversation with her,''
Ginsberg says so gratefully, making it clearer than ever that the world of
imagination is his final shelter. ''Now that I'm 58, I'm able to envision
something in my heart that's perhaps larger than I was able to do when she died.
I'm able to envision a world a little bit more open. How open our imaginations
are! The reality of it is amazing and overwhelming.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

CORRECTION-DATE: November 25, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

CORRECTION:
In The New York Times Magazine of Nov. 11, the middle name of John Holmes was
misspelled in a caption on page 71. His middle name is Clellon.

GRAPHIC: photo of Neal Cassady and Jack Kerouac (page 94); photo of Allen
Ginsberg (page 88); photo of Allen Ginsberg with Peter Orlovsky, Lawrence
Ferlinghetti, William Burroughs, Gregory Corso, John Clennon Holmes, Carl
Solomon and Robert Frank (page 71); photo of Allen Ginsberg (page 69); photo of
William Burroughs, Peter Orlovsky, Gregory Corso and Allen Ginsberg

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              23 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               November 11, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

GIVING NAZIS A BREAK

BYLINE: By Ralph Blumenthal

SECTION: Section 7; Page 31, Column 1; Book Review Desk

LENGTH: 759 words


Ralph Blumenthal is a reporter for the Metropolitan Desk of The New York Times.
QUIET NEIGHBORS

Prosecuting Nazi War Criminals in America.  By Allan A. Ryan Jr.  Illustrated.
386 pp. San Diego: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich.  $15.95.

No one will ever know just how many Nazi war criminals found their way into the
United States after World War II. But Allan A. Ryan Jr., who ran the Justice
Department's war crimes investigations office from 1979 to 1983, estimates the
number at perhaps 2.5 percent - or about 10,000 - of the nearly 400,000
immigrants admitted under the Displaced Persons Act between 1948 and 1952. To
the question of how these ''model citizens and quiet neighbors'' got here, he
has a simple answer - ''We invited them in'' by immigration policies that
favored them at the expense of their victims.

America's doors were immediately thrown open, for example, to more than 100
German rocket experts. Among them was Arthur Rudolph, who went on to direct
NASA's Saturn V moon- rocket project and who was recently unmasked as production
manager of the underground Nazi rocket factory at the Dora concentration camp,
where slave laborers were worked to death building flying bombs. Mr. Rudolph did
not contest the charges against him and earlier this year left the United States
for West Germany, after which he surrendered his American citizenship.

Mr. Ryan argues persuasively that elaborate conspiracies by American
intelligence agencies were not needed to smuggle in Nazi war criminals for
anti-Communist spy work. The case involving Klaus Barbie, ''The Butcher of
Lyons,'' was an exception - American intelligence officials smuggled him from
Italy to Latin America after using him as a paid intelligence source. There may
have been other, similar cases (although Ryan is skeptical), but official
American policy more than sufficed to permit the postwar influx of concentration
camp guards, police officials and bureaucratic ''desk murderers.''

While survivors of the Holocaust remained in displaced persons camps,
immigration quotas favored many of their persecutors - Balts, Ukranians, Poles
and Volksdeutsche, ethnic Germans who had left their homelands to assist in
fighting Hitler's war. The discrimination was no accident. It was the product of
anti-Communism and anti-Semitism. Mr. Ryan quotes former Senator Alexander Wiley
of Wisconsin, chairman of the Senate Judiciary Committee, as urging the nation
to ''seek 'good blood' and keep out the 'rats': 'We've got enough of them
already.' '' A colleague, Senator William Chapman Revercomb of West Virginia,
was less subtle: ''We could solve this DP problem all right if we could work out
some bill that would keep out the Jews.''

Yet in its summation, Mr. Ryan's indictment seems excessively broad. The
Immigration and Naturalization Service failed to bar Nazi war criminals, he
concludes, ''because we as a nation failed'' to provide the necessary political
direction, either as leaders or as the electorate. And Mr. Ryan treats the
intelligence establishment gingerly. He reveals that Otto von Bolschwing, the
former Nazi security chief in Bucharest and the author of a 1930's plan to
''purge Germany of the Jews,'' worked for ''a United States government
intelligence operation'' before coming here in 1954. Yet he does not name the
agency involved.


MR. RYAN is at his best narrating some of the harrowing cases prosecuted by the
Office of Special Investigations - John Demjanjuk, who operated the gas chambers
at the Treblinka death camp; Viorel Trifa, a Rumanian Orthodox bishop and former
Iron Guardist in profascist Rumania who fomented a pogrom in which Jews were
slaughtered and hung on meat hooks; Andrija Artukovic, the former Interior
Minister of Nazi-controlled Croatia, who entered the United States under a false
name in 1948 and with the help of powerful friends has succeeded to this day in
stymieing fitful attempts to deport him. The account of legal maneuverings in
this case and others provides an extraordinary insight into the staunch
protections afforded even malefactors by American legal process.

There is, moreover, a fascinating chapter on Mr. Ryan's mission to Moscow in
1980, when he and aides got Soviet officials to subscribe to American legal
practice in providing witnesses in war crimes cases. It's too bad no video
cameras were there to record the Americans instructing the First Deputy
Procurator General of the Soviet Union in the evolution of Anglo-American
jurisprudence since Magna Carta. B


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Review

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              24 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               November 6, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

SIMPSON-MAZZOLI WOULD NOT HAVE CREATED A 'FREEDOM DAY'

SECTION: Section A; Page 24, Column 4; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 465 words


To the Editor:


The Oct. 18 editorial ''The Death of a Humane Idea'' expressed only one side of
the argument on immigration reform.

First of all, the Simpson-Mazzoli bill contained no amnesty program. It
contained a complex, two-tier legalization program. There were approximately 32
grounds for exclusion in that program, and it was up to the discretion of the
Immigration and Naturalization Service (I.N.S.) to determine who met certain
criteria for legalization. In the eyes of the undocumented, that's like putting
the fox in charge of the chicken coop.

In addition, a liberal estimate of the number of people that would have been
admitted under the legalization program in Simpson-Mazzoli is perhaps 25
percent. What would happen to the remaining 75 percent of the undocumented
community living in this country? It is unrealistic to believe that employer
sanctions would immediately force them out of their jobs and back to their
native countries.

A 1982 General Accounting Office report on sanctions being used by 19 countries
and Hong Kong stated that frequently not enough resources were given to the
government agency in charge of enforcing them, thereby limiting their
effectiveness. There is no reason to believe that the situation with I.N.S.
would be any different.  Another conclusion of the G.A.O. study was that most
governments show a reluctance to enforce sanctions. I doubt the U.S. Government
would be more willing to enforce sanctions against small and medium-size
businesses, particularly if criminal penalities were involved. Yet, there is no
doubt that sanctions, even if partly applied, would be discriminatory.  Further,
the $1 billion a year reimbursement for four years for state and local
governments would have been inadequate. Many of the newly legalized individuals
would have been ineligible for Federal assistance under the bill. That meant
that state governments could have been forced to provide for these individuals.
The White House knew this, yet threatened to veto any bill that was properly
funded. How sincere was it about immigration reform?

Simpson-Mazzoli would not have created a ''Freedom Day,'' any more than it would
have realistically curbed undocumented immigration. It put the burden of
immigration reform on the backs of small businesses and Hispanics. What I want,
what all responsible Hispanics want, is a bill that is realistic and just.

Your editorial reminds me of a passage from ''Alice in Wonderland'': '' 'I'll be
judge, I'll be jury,' said cunning old Fury, 'I'll try the whole cause and
condemn you to death.' '' I wish that before you condemned those of us who
opposed the bill you would have at least ''tried the whole cause.''

ROBERT GARCIA Member of Congress, 18th Dist., N.Y.  Washington, Nov. 2, 1984

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Letter

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              25 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              October 31, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. TO GIVE VISA TO FO, CONTROVERSIAL WRITER

BYLINE: By MEL GUSSOW

SECTION: Section C; Page 19, Column 1; Cultural Desk

LENGTH: 753 words


After twice barring him from the United States in the last four years, the State
Department yesterday agreed to give a visa to Dario Fo, the controversial
Italian dramatist whose play ''Accidental Death of an Anarchist'' opens on
Broadway on Nov. 15. A senior State Department official confirmed the
department's decision and said a public announcement would be made this morning.

In addition, the producers of ''Accidental Death of an Anarchist'' have received
a work permit for Mr. Fo from the Immigration and Naturalization Service. The
permit referred to Mr. Fo as ''an alien of distinguished merit and ability.''

The first two visa applications by Mr. Fo - one of Italy's leading playwrights,
an actor in his own work and a political gadfly - were rejected by the State
Department, apparently because of Mr. Fo's leftist political beliefs.



Press Briefing Scheduled

The senior State Department official, who spoke only on the condition he not be
identified, said yesterday he could not explain why Mr. Fo had been admitted
this time. He said the question may be answered at a State Department press
briefing at noon today.

''We're delighted,'' said Alexander H. Cohen, a co-producer of ''Accidental
Death of an Anarchist.'' ''We look forward to welcoming Mr. Fo and we're certain
he'll be here by Friday for the first preview.''

Mr. Fo had been invited to come to New York to attend rehearsals of ''Accidental
Death of an Anarchist.'' Mr. Cohen, who is producing the play with Hildy Parks,
wanted the author to help ''tune'' the play ''to the sensibility and the 'ear'
of the New York audience.''

Mr. Cohen and Steven Shapiro, an attorney representing the American Civil
Liberties Union, sent letters seeking a visa for Mr. Fo to Secretary of State
George Schultz and Attorney General William French Smith. Organizations
including the Dramatists Guild, the New York Bar Association and the Association
of Theatrical Managers and Press Agents sent petitions supporting Mr. Fo to the
State Department.



Soccorso Rosso

Mr. Fo's two previous requests for visas were turned down on the basis of a
section of the Immigration and Nationality Act that excludes aliens who are
members of or who support anarchist, communist or terrorist organizations. The
visa was apparently denied because of the playwright's activity in Soccorso
Rosso, a leftist Italian organization.

In 1980 Mr. Fo and his wife, Franca Rame, were scheduled to appear at Town Hall
in works written by the two of them, as part of a festival of Italian theater.
When Mr. Fo and Miss Rame were unable to come, a number of American writers and
directors staged ''An Evening Without Dario Fo.'' Last year, Joseph Papp asked
the couple to perform at the New York Shakespeare Festival, and again entry was
denied. Both rejections were followed by protests from the New York theater
community.

Last month Mr. Fo and Miss Rame were invited to be in Washington at a conference
entitled Free Trade in Ideas. They were to be on a panel along with Regis
Debray, Dennis Brutus and others. Because they were denied entry, they - along
with novelist Gabriel Garcia Marquez - addressed the group on closed circuit
television from Toronto.

Although the playwright has not been in the United states, his plays are
performed throughout the country - in regional theaters from the Yale Repertory
Company in New Haven to the Mark Taper Forum in Los Angeles, and Off Broadway,
where ''We Won't Pay, We Won't Pay'' had a long run in 1980. ''Accidental
Death'' will mark Mr. Fo's Broadway debut.



A Hit in London

The play arrives in New York 14 years after it was first produced in Italy, and
four years after it became a London hit. It is a savage farce based on the case
of an Italian railway worker who was arrested and was pushed - or fell - from a
window of a police station. Last year the comedy was presented at the Arena
Stage in Washington, with an adaptation by Richard Nelson and direction by
Douglas C. Wager. Both Mr. Nelson and Mr. Wager will repeat their assignments in
New York, where the new cast is headed by Jonathan Pryce (as a madman who
impersonates an officer), Bill Irwin and Patti LuPone.

Commenting on the play's success in Italy, Mr. Fo wrote that it produced ''a
violent reaction in the centers of power.'' He added, ''We were subjected to
provocation and persecution of all kinds, sometimes more grotesque and comical
in their repressive stupidity than the very farce which we were performing.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Dario Fo

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              26 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               October 30, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

MUSICAL: JEWISH JOURNEY

BYLINE: By RICHARD F. SHEPARD

SECTION: Section C; Page 14, Column 1; Cultural Desk

LENGTH: 636 words


'' THE GOLDEN LAND,'' which will be playing weekends at the Norman Thomas
Theater on East 33d Street, is a new and buoyant musical, a cavalcade that
retraces through 50 songs of the various periods the path of Jewish immigrants
from Yiddish-speaking Eastern Europe. This is a familiar route but this
English-Yiddish production romps through it so delightfully that even dej a vu
takes on a freshness that turns it into love at first sight.

It doesn't need more of a plot than the story of immigration itself and it spins
its tale with no more than a song, a dance, a joke, a skit, a nice sense of
humor for what is funny and a deep sentiment for what was not. The songs are
great - most of them you have probably never heard - such as ''Ikh Bin a Border
Bay Mayn Vayb'' (''I'm a Boarder at My Wife's''), ''Amerike, Hurrah for Onkl
Sem'' and ''Levine and His Flying Machine.'' If your sun is over the yardarm,
you may just remember the ''Joe and Paul's'' commercial for men's garments on
WEVD and may resonate retroactively with ''Brother Can You Spare a Dime?'



Zalmen Mlotek and Moishe Rosenfeld, creators of ''The Golden Land,'' have
assembled a show that must appeal to all sensibilities. The English and Yiddish
are charmingly mixed, so there is not a moment when either faction will feel
left out of things. In one delicious interlude featuring a quick and comic
survey of great Yiddish theater, ''Macbeth'' is heard in Yiddish, with English
subtitles on screen. When we hear an enactment of something in English, the
titles are in Yiddish.

''The Golden Land'' may recall such other lively look-backs in English as
''Vagabond Stars'' a season or so ago, or the earlier acclaimed ''Tintypes.''
But it is its own full-blown self, bringing a zesty Yiddish flavor to a work
staged in the best fashion of a stylish, modern production in the general
theater world.



A quintet of highly energetic, versatile and talented performers, directed by
Howard Rossen, do so many things with such consummate teamwork that it would be
impossible to say who was best at anything. They are Bruce Adler, Phyllis Berk,
Joanne Borts, Avi Hoffman and Betty Silberman. With brilliance, they evoke Lower
East Side peddlers, Menasha Skulnik, the mother of a Triangle Fire victim,
Italian workers, a family greeting the Sabbath, Jacob Adler. Particularly
enjoyable was the re-creation of Aaron Lebedeff's classic rapid-fire ebullient
paean to Rumania, a Yiddish patter song that has been known to tie tongues.

The seven-piece Golden Land Klezmer Orchestra romps lustily through a mass of
musical styles, ranging from liturgical and Yiddish throb to ragtime and jazz,
including even a somewhat moody, Celtic-like workers' song. The highly
imaginative and minimalist settings of Abe Lubelski, abetted by good use of
slides and projections, and Natasha Landau's costumes designed for quick change
to match the march of time, along with Victor En Yu Tan's sympathetic lighting,
are indispensable assets to the production.

''The Golden Land'' represents careful musical research, but let's not bury it
with academic eulogies. The show has the sparkle and oomph of seltzer right from
the nozzle.


Sparkling Seltzer

THE GOLDEN LAND, created by Zalmen Mlotek and Moishe Rosenfeld; staged and
directed by Howard Rossen; set designer, Abe Lubelski; costume designer, Natasha
Landau; lighting designer, Victor En Yu Tan; orchestrations by Peter Sokolow;
sound designer, Tom Gould; production stage manager, Doug Laidlaw; musical
arrangements and musical direction by Mr. Mlotek; orchestra conducted by Mr.
Mlotek. Presented by Art D'Lugoff and Moishe Rosenfeld. At the Norman Thomas
Theater, 111 East 33d Street. WITH: Bruce Adler, Phyllis Berk, Joanne Borts, Avi
Hoffman and Betty Silberman.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Photo of Avi Hoffman and Betty Silberman

TYPE: REVIEW

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              27 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               October 28, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

ILLEGAL ALIENS DESCRIBE LIFE IN SOCIETY'S SHADOWS

BYLINE: By WAYNE KING

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 26, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 1172 words

DATELINE: HOUSTON, Oct. 27


To Hector and Maria, the major immigration bill that failed in Congress earlier
this month was of little concern because their arrival in the United States was
too recent to qualify them for its amnesty provisions.

Whatever Congress decided, they knew, they and their two children would have
only two choices: return to Mexico or continue a furtive, fearful existence.
Like some six million others in the United States, the latest working estimate,
they are ''undocumented'' aliens.

If illegal aliens were considered a minority group, they would be the
third-largest in the United States, behind black and Hispanic people.  But they
are officially invisible.

For perhaps three million of them, the immigration bill would have meant a new
life in the open and eventually, if all conditions were met, full citizenship.
But when Congress went home without approving the measure they faced, as before,
an indefinite future.

Unlike citizens, the ''undocumented'' have no papers to prove their identity, at
least none that are legitimate. They have no birth certificates, no resident
alien cards, no passports, no Social Security numbers. They usually have no
fixed address and no bank account. Many have no driver's license, no credit
card, no charge account and no medical record, not even names that are their
own.

The accounts that follow tell of real ''illegals,'' but because their lives are
clouded by the fear of apprehension and deportation, they have sometimes used
names they chose to match their fraudulent papers.



Hector became an illegal alien in March 1981, when he was 29 years old. He
slipped across the border at Laredo and paid smugglers $350 to take him to
Houston. Hector and 84 others made the trip in a horse van.

Several months later he paid $850 to have Maria and their children, then 4 and 8
years old, join him. Since then they have made a shaky but better life for
themselves, living in a rented house trailer, paying $225 a month, and equipping
it with a color television set and other appliances.

Hector earns $4.12 an hour as a church janitor and is looking for a second job
as a painter. Maria earns $30 a day as a maid.

This spring Hector returned to Mexico for his mother's funeral. His
mother-in-law came back with him, floating in an inner tube as he swam the Rio
Grande. They paid smugglers $1,000 to take them to Houston. Hector borrowed the
money from friends and is still repaying it.

Despite the problems of living in secret, Hector and Maria say their life here
is a world apart from the unrelenting poverty they knew in Mexico, where bare
necessities often seemed a luxury and there was often too little to eat.

''When we were living there,'' said Hector, ''sometimes my kids' shoes, they are
awful. I have to save before I can buy some new shoes for them. Now, when they
say they need shoes, I say, 'O.K., let's go buy them.' ''

Because of the fear of deportation, Hector has often been exploited by
employers, working 90-hour weeks for $225 as a trash collector for a private
company. He also avoids places where other Hispanic people congregate for fear
of an immigration raid. He tells friends he is an American citizen from
California.

For some time he hoped that would become the truth. Now he knows is impossible,
at least for some time.

His only hope, he admits, is to lie, to find fraudulent documents saying he is a
legal resident.

''For my children to go to college here,'' he said in halting English, ''I will
try all ways to be legal.''



Sierra Lopez, who slipped across the border and came to Houston eight years ago,
when he was 16, had high hopes for the bill sponsored by Senator Alan K. Simpson
and Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, which would probably have offered him
temporary legal status and an eventual chance for citizenship.

Mr. Lopez, who is knowledgeable, was not concerned about the bill's requirement
that, to become a citizen, he would have to demonstrate that he was proficient
in English or was learning it and had or was acquiring a fundamental
understanding of American history and government.

He is fiercely eager for special training.

Mr. Lopez, who had worked as a construction laborer, has been blind since
February 1980, when two men in a passing car, possibly because of some perceived
affront in traffic, fired several shots at an automobile in which he was riding.
One of the bullets hit Mr. Lopez in the right eye and severed an optic nerve,
blinding him.

Since then he has sought help in vain, living with the assistance of charties
and church groups.

''The thing I want most is job training,'' he said. But because he acknowledges
he was an illegal alien, he has been refused admission to publicly financed
programs for the blind. Under the provisions of the Simpson-Mazzoli bill, he
would probably have qualified for vocational training.

But even without such help, he said, ''I can't return to Mexico.'' ''A sighted
person can't make it,'' he said. ''A blind person is considered as a piece of
meat to be sent into the streets begging.''



Phillipe, who is 25 years old and says he has lived in Houston for eight years,
expresses little fear of being apprehended and deported.''I can run,'' he says.
But he concedes he has had bad work experiences with employers because, as an
illegal worker, he has no channel to complain of abuses.

''They tell you they pay $3 an hour,'' he said. ''At the end of the week they
tell you, 'I'm only going to pay you $2 an hour. Take it if you want.' '' He
once worked a week for an employer who refused to pay him at all, he said.

Like many other illegal residents, Phillipe, who earns $3.50 an hour as a
painter, sends money to his family in Mexico, and he flies to Mexico City each
year to visit, recrossing the border on foot at Laredo or Brownsville.

Last year, he said, he sent only $300 home. ''My family needs money,'' he said,
''but you need money here, too.''



Jose, 30, is one of four illegal aliens cramped into a three-room apartment in
North Houston. The rent for the apartment, one of four in an old two- story
house, is $60 a week. Three of the men work as housepainters, and the fourth is
looking for a job. None speak English.

Jose, a painter, makes $7 an hour and says his life here is good.

Through an interpreter, Jose said he had been in this country eight years,
entering on a student visa to study electronics. When the visa expired, he
stayed on.

Jose said he would like legal status but hopes someday to return to Mexico,
which he regards as home. He sends $400 a month to his family there, but has
returned to Mexico only once, for a week.

Jose has no car and no driver's license. He has usually lived in rooms or
apartments provided by his employers, and he has no rent or utility receipts. He
does have some hospital bills, he remembers, because he was badly beaten shortly
after he arrived, and employment insurance paid for his treatment. Beyond that,
his past is invisible.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of illegal aliens in Houston

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              28 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               October 26, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

Federal Agents Arrest Ex-Grenada Official

SECTION: Section A; Page 6, Column 2; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 210 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Oct. 25


Grenada's former delegate to the Organization of American States was arrested
here by the Federal immigration police after giving a speech critical of United
States policy toward that Caribbean nation.

Dessima Williams, who represented the Government of Prime Minister Maurice
Bishop at the O.A.S. between 1979 and 1983, was forced into a car by three armed
men identifying themselves as Federal agents, according to witnesses.

A spokesman for the Immigration and Naturalization Service confirmed the arrest.
Gregory Leo, the spokesman, said Miss Williams was charged with being in the
United States without legal status.

Mr. Leo called the arrest ''routine,'' and said that the agency had been seeking
Miss Williams for some time. ''We have known that she was out of status but we
were unable to locate her,'' he said.

''We came across the flyer that gave the location of her speech, and so the
timing is immaterial, just a coincidence,'' he said.

Miss Williams had just addressed the closing session of a conference at Howard
University on Latin America and the Caribbean.

Catherine Sunshine, director of Epica, an institute that organized the
conference, said Miss Williams had spoken about deteriorating economic
conditions in Grenada.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              29 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              October 20, 1984, Saturday, Late City Final Edition
                              Correction Appended

COAST CASE CREATES ANXIETY OVER SPIES AMONG REFUGEES

BYLINE: By Judith Cummings

SECTION: Section 1; Page 48, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 2453 words

DATELINE: LOS ANGELES, Oct. 19


An espionage indictment here is creating questions about whether the Soviet
Union has taken advantage of the American immigration system to filter spies
into this country.

According to the Immigration and Naturalization Service, the indicted Russian
immigrants, Nikolay and Svetlana Malutina Ogorodnikov, entered the United States
in 1973 as Jewish refugees.

The couple were arrested here by the Federal Bureau of Investigation on Oct. 2
on charges that they conspired to pay Richard W. Miller, an F.B.I. agent,
$65,000 for secret documents on American counterespionage activities.

'Detailed Picture' Seen

The indictment says Mr. Miller turned over one 25-page document to the
Ogorodnikovs, which they passed on to the Soviet authorities. The F.B.I. said
the document could give the K.G.B., the Soviet intelligence agency, ''a detailed
picture of F.B.I. and U.S. intelligence activities, techniques and
requirements.''

As a result of the Ogorodnikov case, the F.B.I. is investigating the Los Angeles
office, officials said this week.

Neither the indictment nor the Federal investigators have made clear whether the
two are suspected of being agents for the K.G.B. or of being just immigrants who
stumbled into a profitable opportunity. Further, if they are suspected of being
Soviet agents all along, it is not clear why the United States failed to block
their entry. It is also not clear that either Ogorodnikov is Jewish.

Doubts on U.S. Scrutiny

The circumstances of the couple's entry raise questions how well American
security agencies are able to scrutinize tens of thousands of Soviet emigrants,
mostly Jews and Armenians, who have come to the United States since the late
1960's.

The Immigration Service, which is responsible for confirming applicants'
assertions of persecution at home and, in this case, that they are Jewish, said
the couple were resettled in the United States with the aid of agencies that
help Soviet Jews. The agencies, the Jewish Family Service of Los Angeles and
Hias Jewish migration agency in New York, would not comment on the case, saying
their files were confidential.

Apart from the espionage charge, the Russian couple have been involved in legal
disputes since coming to this country. They initiated several personal injury
lawsuits and collected $23,000. They were also involved in a dispute and
countersuit with another Russian family over a plan to transfer funds inside the
Soviet Union in return for payment here.

Not Guilty Plea AwaitedThe Ogorodnikovs and Mr. Miller were charged in a Federal
grand jury indictment last week with conspiracy to violate American espionage
laws, an offense that carries a possible life sentence. They are expeced to
plead not guilty at their arraignment.

Robert C. Bonner, the United States Attorney in Los Angeles, acknowledged that
the grand jury indictment did not charge that the Ogorodnikovs were K.G.B.
agents. ''You'll have to draw your own conclusion,'' Mr. Bonner said.

Officials of the F.B.I. have said they believe the Ogorodnikovs were agents of
the K.G.B. They said Mrs. Ogorodnikov, who is 34 years old, apparently operated
as a double agent, giving information to the bureau while working to get
counterespionage secrets from Mr. Miller, with whom officials believe she had a
sexual relationship.

According to the indictment, Mrs. Ogorodnikov went shopping with Mr. Miller last
month and bought him a $675 trench coat for a meeting planned with Soviet
operatives in Europe.

The Ogorodnikovs are in jail and have not been available for an interview. But
people who knew them in Los Angeles portray them as artless opportunists, little
schooled but increasingly adept at manipulating the system, animated by the
manuevering room afforded by an open society.

An examination of public records does little to contradict this.

Routine Procedure Cited

Vern Jervis, a spokesman for the Immigration Service in Washington, said the
Ogorodnikovs were processed under a routine procedure in which ''their names are
sent past American security agencies to see if there is any information on them
that should bar their coming to the U.S.''

No bar was found. The couple arrived in New York on Sept. 5, 1973, Mr. Jervis
said. They were approved for entry to the United States and classified as Soviet
Jews ''probably because one was Jewish,'' he said, adding that he had little
detailed information.

Nothing specifies that either Ogorodnikov is Jewish; the F.B.I. said only that
Mr. Ogorodnikov also went by the name Nikolay Wolfson. Mrs. Ogorodnikov
frequented a Russian Orthodox church in Los Angeles and their 13- year-old son,
Matthew, at one time attended the church school.

They Got Permit in Rome

Mr. Jervis said the Ogorodnikovs were granted conditional entrance status at the
United States Consulate in Rome on July 30, 1973. They were later changed to a
special parole status under authority of the United States Attorney General, a
procedure he said was commonly used in the 1970's to permit the immigration of
the thousands of Soviet Jews in excess of immigration limits.

Mr. Jervis said the Ogorodnikovs were sponsored by the Jewish Family Service of
Los Angeles. They obtained permanent resident status in June 1977.

He said the Immigration Service routinely sent the names of prospective Soviet
immigrants ''to the various security agencies,'' and they then notified the
Immigration Service ''whether they have any negative information.''

Mr. Jervis said this was not a foolproof. ''How are you going to make a security
check on somebody in Russia?'' he asked. ''If you get a negative, it doesn't
mean all that much. It just means we don't have any information.''

Israeli Papers Are Used

According to the National Conference on Soviet Jewry, 264,342 people with
Israeli immigration papers were allowed to leave the Soviet Union from 1968 to
last month. Of that, 163,153 were reported to have settled in Israel, and most
of the rest went to the United States. A smaller number of ethnic Germans and
Armenians were also allowed to leave the Soviet Union in the period, and
thousands of Armenians have ended up here.

Practically nobody else has been allowed to leave, with the exception of some
political figures such as the novelist Aleksandr I. Solzhenitsyn. And in the
last few years the Soviet authorities have cut off the flow again.

Arnold Saltzman, executive director of the Jewish Family Service of Los Angeles,
said his agency played no role in security screening.

Carl Zuckerman, the executive vice president of the Hias agency in New York,
said the same. This society, through an office in Rome, assists Soviet Jews in
preparing United States applications for refugee status, but Mr. Zuckerman said
he could not confirm whether the Ogorodnikovs had been their clients.

She Is Noted by F.B.I.

Justice Department documents indicate that the Ogorodikovs came to F.B.I.
attention as early as February 1980. At that time, according to a bureau
affidavit, Mrs. Ogorodnikov was identified to an agent of the bureau by ''a
Soviet citizen seeking political asylum'' as one of two women who had urged her
to return to the Soviet Union and who had introduced her to two people said to
be from the Soviet Consulate in San Francisco. The bureau did not identify the
other woman.

In Washington, bureau officials said Mr. Miller met the Ogorodnikovs through his
work. He had been assigned to participate in the bureau's routine questioning of
Soviet emigres. Later, when Mrs. Ogorodnikov came under Federal surveillance
because of her dealing with the Soviet Consulate, she was seen meeting Mr.
Miller, a bureau official in Washington said. These meetings aroused suspicion
because Mr. Miller had no justifiable reason for further unauthorized contact
with her. He was then put under surveillance.

Bureau officials also said they found spy paraphernalia in the Ogorodnikovs'
apartment here, including code books, microfilm and writing implements.

The Ogorodnikovs purportedly had frequent contact with consular officials,
including conversations with Alexandr Grishin, a Soviet vice consul, who was
named by the grand jury as an unindicted co-conspirator.

The couple have been involved in a number of legal matters since they came to
the United States.

Suits Over Auto Injury

Barry J. Krasner, a Los Angeles lawyer, successfully represented the
Ogorodnikovs in two personal injury civil suits in 1978. He said in an interview
these netted the couple $22,750 in out-of- court settlements, $22,500 of it from
a rear-end automobile crash case of a type that Mr. Krasner said was usually
easier for a defendant's insurance company to settle than to pursue. In the
court records, the defendant, a Los Angeles woman, said the Ogorodnikovs had
backed into her car.

Mr. Krasner said a woman known to him as Nina Thomas, who was a friend of the
Ogorodnikovs and was in their car, also received $7,000 to $8,000 in the
out-of-court settlement.

''She has the brains,'' Mr. Krasner said. ''She's an interpreter. She came back
and forth between Russia and the U.S. with ease and frequency.''

Mr. Krasner said he was frustrated and angry over his efforts in recent days to
tell the F.B.I. what he knows about the Ogorodnikovs. He said he had called the
office of P. Bryce Christensen, the head of the counterespionage unit of the
bureau's Los Angeles office, on Oct. 4 and 5 and had been told Mr. Christensen
was ''too busy.''

''I'm a busy man myself, I have a law practice to pursue,'' Mr. Krasner said.
''I just gave up.''

She Worked in Tie Factory

Mr. Krasner said that Mr. Ogorodnikov had said he had been a cab driver in Kiev
before coming to the United States. Although Mrs. Ogorodnikov was described by
the bureau as ''a nurse,'' Mr. Krasner said that the only employment he was
aware of was for a men's tie manufacturer. That company, Hollywood Ties, listed
in court records, is apparently now defunct.

''She didn't have the brains to be a nurse,'' he said. ''They don't have the
brains to be what they're portrayed to be by the F.B.I. After having represented
them for several years, they don't have the mental capacity to be K.G.B. agents,
although they may know people who are.''

In 1978, Mrs. Ogorodnikov filed a civil suit against Dr. Jung Jo Kim, charging
dental malpractice. That case was also settled out of court and she was awarded
$250, Mr. Krasner said. ''People learn fast when there's money involved,'' Mr.
Krasner said.

In an earlier case, in 1976, Mr. Ogorodnikov sued two Los Angeles men seeking
damages for an injury he claimed from a collision on a freeway ramp. The
defendants demanded a jury trial and the suit was dismissed after Mr.
Ogorodnikov failed to submit certain papers. Mr. Ogorodnikov's lawyer in that
case, Lewis Graham, did not return telephone calls over three days.

Fight With Another Family

A year later, in 1977, the Ogorodnikovs, again represented by Mr. Graham,
initiated a damage suit against another Soviet immigrant family from their
neighborhood in West Hollywood. The defendant, Mikhail Zlobinsky, countersued,
giving rise to a bizarre set of cross-charges.

The Ogorodnikovs accused Mikhail and Sonya Zlobinsky of going to their apartment
in January 1977 and beating Mrs. Ogorodnikov and threatening family members here
and in the Soviet Union.

The Zlobinskys then sued the Ogorodnikovs for breach of contract and fraud. The
charge said that the Zlobinskys had had 15,000 rubles in the Soviet Union that
they had not been permitted to take out; that the Ogorodnikovs had said that
they had associates in the Soviet Union and that if the Zlobinskys gave the
15,000 rubles to the associates, the Ogorodnikovs would give the Zlobinskys
$5,000 in Los Angeles. The Zlobinskys charged that the Ogorodnikovs had the
rubles picked up but had not paid the Zlobinskys $5,000. The Ogorodnikovs denied
this, but offered to drop their charge of a beating.

Demand for Their Answers

The outcome was unclear. The Zlobinskys in late 1977 filed a demand with the
California Superior Court in Los Angeles that the Ogorodnikovs answer a number
of questions, including whether a Soviet trip had been made by Nina Thomas in
1977 and whether they had had any contacts ''with anyone in a consulate of the
Soviet Union during the past 24 months.''

Until his arrest, Mr. Ogorodnikov worked for eight years at the Hoffman Brothers
Meat Packing Company as a packer. Julius Hoffman, the company's owner, said he
had been a good worker and presented no problems.

Fellow workers at the plant in the industrial town of Vernon southeast of Los
Angeles said Mr. Ogorodnikov was very friendly, ''happy all the time,'' sang
Russian songs while he worked and seemed so happy at his work that he sometimes
had to be instructed to go home at the end of his shift.

The only time Mr. Ogorodnikov seemed troubled, according to Armando Haros, a
fellow worker, came last spring when he said Mr. Ogorodnikov told him he was
getting a divorce. He said Mr. Ogorodnikov had told him ''that his wife liked to
drink.'' ''He was worried about his kid,'' Mr. Haros said.

He Praised Life in Russia

Several workers said Mr. Ogorodnikov talked often about how good things were in
Russia and that he would rather be there, but they said they took it in the
spirit of good-natured grousing, the way they themselves spoke of Mexico.

They said that he followed news events closely and admonished them to, and that
he would become serious in warning of the danger of a clash between the United
States and the Soviet Union.

''He was looking for peace,'' said Jerry Herrejon, a Hoffman Brothers worker.
''He was against the United States because of what the Reagan Administration is
doing right now. He said Russia was looking for peace and the United States
didn't want it.''

Mr. Haros said: ''He was no spy, he was too dumb. He was a dupe, or stooge or
something.''

Separation in 1982 Reported

According to Mrs. Ogorodnikov, the couple were married in 1971 in Moscow.
According to county records, they separated in September 1982. Mrs. Ogorodnikov
received welfare benefits and food stamps worth $314 a month in 1983 and 1984.
These payments are now under investigation by the district attorney at the
request of the Los Angeles county supervisors.

The county filed suit last March against Mr. Ogorodnikov to attach $234.60 a
month of his wages for child support.

Two months ago, the district attorney's office said, the wage attachment and
welfare payments were stopped at the request of Mrs. Ogorodnikov, who notified
officials that she and her husband had reconciled and were living together
again.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

CORRECTION-DATE: November 23, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

CORRECTION:
EDITORS' NOTE

Under this heading, The Times amplifies articles or rectifies what the editors
consider significant lapses of fairness, balance or perspective.

A dispatch from Los Angeles on Oct. 20 described the case of Nikolay and
Svetlana Ogorodnikov, immigrants from the Soviet Union who have been indicted
for espionage.

In discussing the couple's background, the article quoted a lawyer, Barry J.
Krasner, as saying that he had represented the Ogorodnikovs in an accident case
and that they were friends of an interpreter, Nina Thomas, whom he also
represented in the case.

The juxtaposition of the information in the article may have implied to some
that Miss Thomas was involved in espionage. She was not accused of any illegal
activity, and there was no evidence of any connection with spying.


GRAPHIC: Photo of Nikolay and Svetlana Ogorodnikov

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              30 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              October 18, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

The Death of a Humane Idea

SECTION: Section A; Page 26, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 652 words


This is an obituary, not for the Simpson-Mazzoli immigration reform bill, which
died when Congress quit last week, but for a remarkable idea that died with it.

Freedom Day, it might have been called, and it would have been a great moment in
the history of this Nation of Immigrants. One day early next year, hundreds of
thousands of aliens, most of them Hispanic, would have lined up in church
basements and county courthouses from Amarillo to Brooklyn, eager to come in
from the cold of illegality and accept America's humane offer of amnesty.

For years, many have suffered exploitation by landlords and bosses . . . have
watched as Social Security was deducted from their pay even though it was money
down the drain . . . have so feared deportation that they avoided the police
even when robbed or raped.

The legalization provisions of the Simpson-Mazzoli bill would have turned these
fearful and furtive residents into full members of American society. That would
be reason enough to applaud the battered sponsors, Senator Alan Simpson, Wyoming
Republican, and Representative Romano Mazzoli, Tennessee Democrat. Special
commendation is due Representative Charles Schumer, Brooklyn Democrat, for an
audacious and sleepless effort that almost rescued the bill at graveside.

The bill had plenty of enemies, including growers and the Chamber of Commerce.
But none inflicted wounds more grievous than Hispanic leaders and lobbyists.


What an astonishingly liberal idea amnesty was in this era of conservatism. All
sides had agreed that aliens who could prove residence since 1981 would be
eligible. More, Washington would guarantee $4 billion over four years to offset
any added costs to local governments. Why would the Administration buy all this?
Because like many others in both parties, it was willing to pay that price to
close an enormous loophole in present immigration law, the Texas Proviso of
1952.

For an undocumented worker to take a job in this country is absolutely illegal,
it says sternly. But is it equally illegal for an employer to hire an illegal
alien? No. Thus the message to employers is, ''Hire all the illegals you want
to; the risk is all theirs.'' To poor Mexicans, the message is, ''If you're
willing to sneak in, come get much higher wages than you can dream of finding at
home.'' And to a country increasingly concerned about illegal immigration, it
says: ''Forget about controlling the border.''

To be fair, and firm, the country has to undo the Texas Proviso, and the best
remedy is employer sanctions - making it as illegal to hire as to be hired, with
painful penalties. Employer sanctions were at the heart of the Simpson-Mazzoli
bill. But it also contained something more: amnesty.

One reason for including it was to attract Congressmen uneasy about employer
sanctions. Another was that, in the present climate, amnesty standing alone
would not have a prayer. This linkage, a brilliant conception, finally failed in
both directions. Conservatives who would have cheerfully voted for sanctions
alone opposed the bill because of amnesty. Hispanic legislators, though they
wanted amnesty, opposed the bill because of sanctions. So instead of gaining
votes, the linkage probably lost some.

The Hispanic lobbyists who celebrated their role in killing the bill see no
tragedy. Yet even they must know that when the new Congress convenes, there'll
be another bill, simpler this time, calling for sanctions without amnesty -
justice without mercy - and to judge by the voting this fall, it will pass.

Perhaps leaders like Representative William Richardson of New Mexico, new
chairman of the Congressional Hispanic caucus, can respond in time to the
reality of reaction. Otherwise, the loss for Hispanic Americans is monumental.
They could have had what their spokesmen regard as the bitter with the sweet.
The forecast now is just the bitter.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: EDITORIAL

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              31 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              October 17, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

COSTS OF IMMIGRATION REFORM, MEASURED AND UNKNOWN, DROWNED 1984 BILL

BYLINE: By WAYNE KING

SECTION: Section A; Page 16, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1230 words


The efforts of three successive Administrations to reform the nation's
immigration policy collapsed last week on the critical question of cost.

The White House insisted on a billion- dollar spending limit as a condition for
accepting the latest bill, which would have been the most sweeping reform of
immigration policy in three decades. Key Congressional backers of the measure,
sponsored by Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Arizona, and Romano L.
Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky, wanted a flexible spending limit.

Implicit in the debate and the stalemate that left the bill to die when Congress
adjourned was a recognition that the cost of immigration reform would be high,
although no one knew how high.

Without reform, though, the presence of what may be six million illegal aliens
in this country exacts an economic and social toll. No one knows how high that
toll is, either, or how much of it is offset by the advantages society gains
from a low-wage work force that cannot receive benefits available to citizens.

Cost Grows With Arrivals

There is no question that the growing number of illegal aliens living here puts
a strain on some social services or that the cost grows with each new arrival.

Adding to the bill are the costs created by the rising number of illegal aliens
whose United States-born children are entitled to all the benefits given any
other citizen.

Those who watch immigration patterns agree that while earlier waves of illegal
arrivals were predominantly single males, there is an increasing tendency among
such men to stay here and marry, as well as a growing incidence of illegal
immigration by entire families, the man often arriving first and the wife and
children joining him after he has found a job and a places to live. Because they
are most often young, these families continue to grow.

Last Resort for Care

They are much in evidence at Los Angeles County-University of Southern
California Medical Center, a dull, worn facility near downtown Los Angeles that
from the outside looks more like a factory than a general hospital.

For tens of thousands of poor people in southern California, it is the last
resort for medical care, and increasingly its patients are illegal aliens. They
do to the medical center in great numbers, and their unpaid bills cost the
county $99.8 million last year.

Those bills are part of the burden borne by Federal, state and local
governments, which provide anything from financial aid to emergency medical care
to education to routine city services, such as police and fire protection, not
only for citizens but also for illegal aliens, some of whom obtain services
fraudulently.

Estimate by Federal Agency

The Immigration and Naturalization Service estimates that Federal, state and
local governments probably lose $1.26 billion annually for each million illegal
residents.

That calculation assumes a tax contribution of $995 million from each million
illegal aliens, offset by a total cost to government of just under $2.25
billion. This cost is based on an analysis last fall of cost data in job
displacement, education, unemployment, welfare, health and crime.

It is a matter of unusual complexity, and the illegal aliens themselves are only
a part of the equation.

On a recent evening inside the Los Angeles medical center, for example, a very
young woman who gave her name as Ana Teresa Cruz jumped up regularly to chase
her 20-month-old son, Roberto, a rambunctious infant dappled with the chocolate
bar he had been eating.

Her Child Is a Citizen

Mrs. Cruz is from Tijuana and has been in the United States illegally for two
years. Roberto was born in the Los Angeles hospital, and regardless of his
parents' status he is a United States citizen.

Last year 18,813 children, one of every 200 of the estimated 3.6 million births
nationwide, were born to illegal aliens in three public hospitals in Los Angeles
County alone. The births cost Los Angeles County $20.1 million in unpaid
maternity bills.

And while children born here to illegal aliens are costly because they are
entitled to all the benefits of citizenship, they present a special moral and
legal problem. Deporting their parents would mean either breaking up families or
in effect deporting children who are American citizens.

Charts Under Different Names


Mrs. Cruz says that because Roberto is a citizen - she says it with a clear note
of pride - she does not fear seeking medical care for him. But not for herself.
''I am well,'' she says.

Those who do seek care create medical as well as fiscal problems because they
often use false names. ''We've got patients floating around here with three and
four charts under different names,'' said Dr. John Gunning, associate chairman
and chief of gynecology at another of the county's hospitals, Harbor-U.C.L.A.

Some Hispanic organizations, bolstered by several studies in the late 1970's,
have suggested that illegal aliens in this country put as much into the economy
as they take out. What is lost at the state and local level, the argument goes,
is offset by a tax windfall to the Federal Government in payroll deductions the
illegal residents never recoup because they are afraid to file for refunds or
benefits.

Later studies, including the 1983 immigration service finding, dispute that
argument, suggesting that illegal aliens avail themselves of public services to
a greater degree than was previously believed.

Small Displacement Role Seen

A study for the Urban Institute published this year concluded that a typical
illegal Mexican family in southern California absorbed $2,000 more in various
services than it paid in taxes, and cited low wages as a reason. It also said
illegal aliens actually displaced few, if any, American workers.

In general, programs supported wholly or in part by the Federal Government deny
benefits to illegal aliens, although some states provide benefits, generally
such aid as hospital insurance and workers' compensation, but not unemployment
insurance.

A 1982 survey by the Federation for American Immigration Reform, a private group
pushing for immigration control, reported that illegal aliens were not eligible
for general assistance in most states, but were in Maine, Maryland,
Massachusetts, Michigan, Minnesota, New Jersey, North Carolina, Ohio, Washington
and Wisconsin.

Catherine C. Randlett, director of the State of New Jersey's Washington office,
said that state regulations specifically made illegal aliens eligible for
benefits from New Jersey's General Assistance program and the Federal
Government's Aid to Families with Dependent Children program, half of whose
costs are paid by the state.

All Estimates Are Guesses

Any estimate of how many illegal aliens use those programs, she said, is only
''a guess.'' Using a ballpark figure of 74,000 illegal aliens in the state, and
assuming that 5 percent got assistance at a per capita cost of $2,800 a year,
she said, ''We're dealing with a dollar figure of not less than $10.4 million.''

Another question is the cost of education. The Supreme Court has ruled that all
children living in the United States, regardless of citizenship, have the right
to free public education. Officials estimate that this now costs $85 million a
year in Texas alone.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              32 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               October 15, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

RIO GRANDE BORDER GUARDS ADOPTING NEW TACTIC

BYLINE: By WAYNE KING

SECTION: Section A; Page 12, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 1616 words

DATELINE: HOUSTON, Oct. 12


As the most sweeping immigration legislation in three decades died in Congress
this week, the tide of aliens crossing the Mexican border illegally continued to
swell, and the Border Patrol began shifting its emphasis north, hoping to
prevent the illegal entrants from melting into society.

Larry Richardson, chief of the patrol's El Paso sector, once said the death of
immigration change would be ''a real disaster.'' But he now says that new
tactics and recently authorized increases in the number of patrol agents can
stop thousands who stream across the border daily from going farther inland,
disappearing into America's cities and becoming a permanent illegal second
society.

The patrol caught 1,034,142 illegal aliens along the Mexican border in the
fiscal year 1983 and 1,056,905 in the fiscal year 1984, despite unusually cold
weather that slowed traffic. And immigration officials concede that they did not
catch most of those who entered the country illegally and indeed decline to
estimate how many people do so.

New Efforts Expected

Those officials and Hispanic leaders agree that, despite the failure of Congress
to approve the measure, sponsored by Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of
Arizona, and Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky, there would
be renewed efforts to amend or replace what they see as the country's outmoded
and unworkable immigration laws.

''We've developed a great mass of information that will help us shape
legislation that will be more passable,'' said Lionel J. Castillo, Commissioner
of Immigration and Naturalization in the Carter Administration and now president
of Houston International University.

Mr. Castillo said he favored a gradual shift in immigration laws rather than the
wholesale change represented by the Simpson-Mazzoli bill.

Similarly, Arnoldo S. Torres, national executive director of the League of
United Latin American Citizens, predicted that Hispanic groups would fight for
change next year, adding that he favored a gradual program over three to four
years.

Paul O'Neill, director of the Immigration and Naturalization Service in Houston,
also suggested the amendment of existing laws.

Use of 1952 Act Recommended

He said, for example, that the immigration act of 1952 offered amnesty, or legal
status, to illegal aliens who entered the country before 1948. He termed the
amnesty provision in the Simpson-Mazzoli bill too liberal but suggested that the
1952 legislation could be amended to provide a later date, perhaps 1965.

He also said existing legislation providing for the importation of farm laborers
could be revised to allow for more ''guest workers'' in agriculture and possibly
other industries.

The immigration service, Mr. O'Neill maintained, is badly understaffed. He said
he would have to triple his complement of agents even to begin discovering and
deporting the 500,000 illegal aliens estimated to be living in Houston alone. In
three recent days of raids in the city, 731 illegal aliens were taken into
custody, but Mr. O'Neill said ''that didn't make a dent.''

But Mr. Richardson, the El Paso sector chief, said the 850 officers who had been
authorized to join the 3,000 working on the Mexican border and at interior
checkpoints will ease the problem.

''We've got a pretty good reprieve,'' he said.

Record Set in El Paso

El Paso, the busiest border sector after Chula Vista, Calif., set a record in
the fiscal year ended Sept. 30, with the capture of 212,000 illegal aliens. It
will get 158 new officers, but it will be a year before they are trained and
ready for duty.

''We look at a point a year from now,'' Mr. Richardson said. ''We'll be able to
accomplish what we've been trying to do all along, and that's keep anybody from
loading up a load of wetbacks here in El Paso and successfully driving them to
Denver. I won't be able to keep them out of El Paso, but I'll be able to keep
them from getting out of the border area.

''It's not a new tactic. It's one we're admitting. It's just a very practical
look at a situation where you've got God only knows how many people in a year's
time going to jump across the fence on you anywhere in 2,000 miles. You've got
to look at what you can do to keep them from going to Denver or Chicago or
wherever. What it reflects is us finally being willing to admit that we may miss
a maid working locally as she's crossing the river because we're doing something
that's probably better.''

Mostly Arrive on Foot

The illegal aliens come mostly on foot. Some wade across the shallow Rio Grande
or for a small fee are carried across by strong young men. Others traverse dusty
sandhills and desert wastes that support little except rattlesnakes and cactus.

There are thousands of places to cross the 1,952-mile border, and the Mexicans,
joined lately by Guatemalans and Salvadorans, come by the millions. Some of the
Mexicans work for a day as field hands, maids or yardmen, roam the streets
picking rags, earn a few dollars at the bloodbanks that line the border and
return home in the evening. These are the ''day crossers,'' who account for
about two-thirds of the illegal traffic.

The other third of the illegal people stay longer, hopping freights at the El
Paso railroad yard, meeting smugglers who may charge as much as $1,500 for
clandestine trips north in vans, boarding buses, hitchhiking or sometimes flying
to Houston, Los Angeles, Denver, Chicago or dozens of other cities. Perhaps six
million illegal residents live in varying degrees of secrecy in cities away from
the border.

Knots Along 2 or 3 Miles

As dawn broke on a recent morning in El Paso, a small drama that is played out
each day unfolded as usual. On one side of the Rio Grande, 200 to 300 men, women
and children, some carrying lunches and personal belongings, gathered in knots
along two or three miles of border. Slowly, in pairs or small groups, they waded
or were carried across.

Once on the United States side, but still outside a chain-link fence, they
gathered in larger groups, one of which numbered perhaps a hundred. This is what
Border Patrol officers call ''the buildup.''

As 8 A.M. approached, large and small groups peeled off from the mass and darted
for holes in the fence. Waiting for them were no more than a half dozen agents.

Officer David Wineland sat in a cramped cubicle in an administration building
watching 11 television monitors connected to cameras at strategic points along
10 miles of border.

On the monitors, the illegal aliens were tiny dots that resolved into human
figures as the cameras zoomed. They waded the river, clambered up the bank and
ran for cover.

'We Can See All Right'

Officer Wineland saw it all, barking locations by radio to waiting officers.
''We can see them all right,'' he said, ''the problem is having enough men to
catch them.''

As officers chased one group, others spun away across a highway and a railyard
to blend in and disappear.

This day as usual, those who were caught were simply returned to Mexico. Most
tried to cross again within hours.

''I've caught the same person three times in one day,'' said the senior Border
Patrol officer, Eldon Hurst, who has chased illegal aliens for 11 years.

''It's a game,'' said Officer Hurst, a stoic man. ''It's a frustrating and
futile job. You don't have a lot of job satisfaction, but you do have fun. You
can't take this too seriously.''

Increasingly, the object of the game is to keep those who have crossed the
border from continuing north. Mr. Richardson calls it ''a strategy of
containment.''

Importance of Freight Yards

It involves checkpoints on major highways, at bus stations and airports, and the
freight yards. From there, the Santa Fe wheels to Albuquerque and points east
and west, the Southern Pacific goes to Tucson and Los Angeles, to San Antonio,
Dallas and Chicago.

''With train changes, you can go anywere from here,'' Officer Hurst said. ''And
they do.''

It is a dangerous trip. The aliens hide on top of boxcars and tank cars and
between the wheels of trailers lashed onto piggy-back cars. ''About once a
month,'' said Officer Hurst, ''someone falls under the wheels.''

At a long grade eight miles out of town where the trains slow to about 10 miles
an hour, a half dozen agents gathered to await two Southern Pacific container
freights that were to appear within 20 minutes of each other, each with two
agents aboard.

At the search point, agents ranged down the tracks, playing flashlights between
the wheels of the trailers.

4 Leap From the Train

Suddenly, four figures emerged, leaped from the train and fled into the brush.
Two agents were waiting.

As the four were put into vans, the lights along the track flashed across two
men crouched between the wheels of a container trailer.

Racing along loose gravel beside the churning wheels of the flat car, Officers
Dennis Quint and Michael Patrick threw themselves aboard.

''Vengase!'' one shouted. ''Come here!''

''Bajese!'' ''Come down!''

As the two aliens were marched to a van, others were flushed from hiding spots
atop cars or under loaded containers.

Seven men aged 18 to 30 were taken from the first train, 11 from the other. It
was a slow night, Officer Bud Dudley said. ''We've been averaging between 30 and
45 a night.''

But it is impossible to check all the trains, and no one knows how many aliens
tumble from the freights to the barrios and alleys of Los Angeles and Houston
and Chicago.

''We're in a time-buying situation,'' said Mr, Richardson. ''Maybe next year
they'll address it again politically.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photos of border police

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              33 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              October 13, 1984, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION AGENTS VISIT OFFICES OF SPANISH-LANGUAGE NEWSPAPER

BYLINE: By JESUS RANGEL

SECTION: Section 1; Page 31, Column 5; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 487 words


Agents of the Immigration and Naturalization Service visited the offices of the
Spanish-language newspaper El Diario this week to check the immigration papers
of three reporters and an editor.

The agents, who visited the newspaper offices on Varick Street in lower
Manhattan twice, said they were acting on information that the staff members
were in this country illegally.

James A. Jasey, deputy regional director of the service, said yesterday that the
visits were a ''routine operation.''

''The agents checked, were satisfied they were lawfully here in the United
States and the case was closed,'' he said.

Editor Denounces Visits


The paper's editor charged, however, that the visits were in retaliation for a
series of articles on conditions at a detention center operated by the
Immigration Service and its editorial positions against an immigration bill that
died in the session of Congress that ended yesterday.

''I don't accept their excuse for coming in here,'' said the editor, Manuel de
Dios Unanue. ''It was too much of a coincidence that three of the people they
wanted to talk to wrote the articles on Hispanics confined by the I.N.S.''

In an editorial yesterday, Mr. de Dios denounced the visits as ''militaristic
and fascist,'' and said they were an intrusion on the rights of a free press.

''Persecution and intimidating tactics do not scare us,'' the editorial said in
Spanish. ''Neither will they impede us from fulfillng our proper jounalistic
role.''

Two immigration agents had visited the offices Tuesday but none of the employees
was there, Mr. de Dios said. The editor said they returned Thursday and obtained
permission from an office staff member to check the status of the employees.

One Employee Out of Country


Mr. de Dios said he had learned of the return of the agents too late to deny
them permission to check the papers of three of the employees. A fourth, Susana
Pasternak, an assistant features editor and a native of Argentina, was out of
the country.

''If we hadn't gotten permisssion, we wouldn't go inside,'' said Mr. Jasey of
the immigation service.

Mr. de Dios, however, said the agents threatened to return to look at the
newspaper's personnel records to check on the status of other employees.

Two of the employees, Javier Martinez, a reporter and features editor, and
Carlos Perellon, a reporter and an assistant metropolitan editor, are from
Spain. Carlos Diaz, a reporter, is from the Dominican Republic. According to Mr.
de Dios, those three and Mrs. Pasternak all have spouses who are United States
citizens.

El Diario, with a circulation of about 60,000, is published every day but
Saturday. It has frequently published editorials against the legislation
designed to curb illegal immigration sponsored by Senator Alan K. Simpson,
Republican of Wyoming, and Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of
Kentucky.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              34 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               October 12, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

AMID CHARGES, IMMIGRATION BILL DIES

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section A; Page 16, Column 4; National Desk

LENGTH: 1284 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Oct. 11


Congress today failed in its three-year struggle to shape the most important
change in immigration law in three decades.

As Congress neared adjournment today, supporters of the legislation conceded it
was dead. They said they would continue their efforts next year, when
legislative action would have to start all over again.

Democrats and Republicans blamed one another. Republicans said the Democratic
House leadership had delayed the bill so it would perish in the maelstrom at the
session's end. Democrats said the Reagan Administration had helped kill the
measure by balking at its cost.

Representative Charles E. Schumer, a Brooklyn Democrat who supported the bill,
said: ''Its death is a classic symptom of the problem with our politics. The
special interest prevails over the general interest.''

But opponents said the authors of the bill had tried to accommodate too many
interests and had gone too far in too many directions. The measure would have
been the most sweeping revision of immigration law in three decades. A leaner,
less ambitious bill, the critics said, would have had an easier time than the
omnibus legislation sponsored by Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming,
and Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky.

Divisions Over Particulars

While there was a consensus on the need to do something about illegal
immigration, there were deep divisions in the House over the merits of this
particular bill. It would have established fines and prison terms for employers
who knowingly hired illegal aliens, offered legal status to at least two million
such aliens and increased the number of temporary foreign workers in the United
States.

Representative Henry J. Hyde, Republican of Illinois, said: ''The legislative
process worked. But there was an ambivalence that could not produce the
necessary consensus for any version of the bill. Too many people, for different
reasons, did not want a bill.''

The legislation was pronounced dead on several occasions, only to be resurrected
again and again. As one lawmaker said, ''The bill looks dead, but it moves every
time you beat it with a stick.''

It appeared to have died last October, when the Speaker of the House, Thomas P.
O'Neill Jr., blocked action at the request of the Congressional Hispanic Caucus.
After being denounced by supporters of the bill, Mr. O'Neill allowed it to come
to the floor in June. There were seven days of impassioned debate before the
House approved it, 216 to 211.

Again on Sept. 26, the measure was pronounced dead when House and Senate
conferees adjourned in disagreement over how to prevent job discrimination
against legal aliens. Mr. Schumer drafted a compromise on this issue, which the
conferees approved this week, 15 to 8. But immediately they became deadlocked on
another matter: whether to impose a limit on Federal payments to states for
welfare benefits to illegal aliens who would gain legal status under the bill.
That was the deadlock the legislators could not break.

Many supporters of the bill expressed reservations about one element or another.
Representative Bill McCollum, a Florida Republican, said he had ''bent over to
the point almost of breaking in order to have a bill.'' Seventy-seven
representatives who voted for the bill on final passage also supported Mr.
McCollum's proposal to delete the amnesty for illegal aliens.

Insistence on Civil Rights

House Democrats, led by Representative Barney Frank of Massachusetts, insisted
on strong civil rights protections for legal aliens. Mr. Simpson finally
accepted those guarantees while expressing ''the gravest reservations.''

Perhaps the clearest symbol of the problem was the fact that groups representing
employers, such as the American Farm Bureau Federation, and groups representing
employees, such as the United Farm Workers of America, preferred the status quo
to the bill drafted by the conferees. Farmers said the measure did not
adequately address their need for workers to harvest perishable commodities. But
Ray Denison, chief lobbyist for the A.F.L.-C.I.O., said the bill was ''overly
generous to agribusiness'' and ''moves toward legal peonage in America's
fields.''

The Reagan Administration, although publicly committed to the measure, was
lukewarm in its support. Mr. Simpson insisted that ''this is not an
Administration bill,'' and he said the Administration sometimes seemed to be
''one of the toughest adversaries.''

The Administration had three concerns. David A. Stockman, director of the Office
of Management and Budget, was worried about the cost. Californians at the White
House and Agriculture Department officials sympathized with California farmers
who have historically depended on illegal aliens to perform field work. Other
conservatives in the Administration disliked the bill because they believed it
would impose new burdens on business and expand the role of Government in
regulating the economy, the migration of people and their right to work.

At the same time, many liberals opposed the bill as a possible threat to the
civil rights of Hispanic-Americans and other minority groups. Libertarians on
the left and right feared that the bill might be a first step toward a national
identification system, since employers would have had to ask all job applicants
for documents to verify that they were citizens or aliens authorized to work in
the United States.

The White House became even more cautious when immigration emerged as an issue
in the Presidential campaign. Walter F. Mondale, the Democratic nominee,
denounced the measure as discriminatory. Republican strategists had no desire to
highlight the difference on this issue between Mr. Mondale and Mr. Reagan, who
had promised to sign the bill.

Tactical Error Seen

Lawmakers said that Mr. Mazzoli may have made a tactical error by not working
more closely with the chairman of the House Judiciary Committee, Representative
Peter W. Rodino Jr., Democrat of New Jersey. Mr. Rodino, whose father was born
in Italy, has fought against discriminatory immigration policies and sought to
end the exploitation of aliens throughout his 36 years in Congress.

Congress twice passed Mr. Rodino's bill to outlaw the hiring of illegal aliens,
in 1972 and 1973, but each time it died in the Senate. Mr. Rodino insisted this
year that a bill to halt the influx of illegal aliens should not restrict legal
immigration or abridge the rights of legal aliens. The basic goal of legal
immigration, he noted, is to reunify families.

Some conferees said employers should be able to hire citizens in preference to
legal aliens. Mr. Rodino rejected that notion, saying an employer should not be
allowed to discriminate against an individual because of his citizenship or
immigration status. The United States, he said, welcomes refugees and immigrants
and requires them to work, so any impediment to work would be contrary to basic
immigration policy.

The immigration bill would have forbidden employers to hire illegal aliens. The
legislation's sponsors said they did not intend to encourage discrimination
against legal aliens. But they had great difficulty in devising a formula to
prevent such discrimination. The bill would inevitably have made employers more
sensitive to the citizenship status of job applicants.

When the bill died, there was sorrow, but also relief. The conference report
faced a possible filibuster in the Senate. Because the bill came so close to
passing, supporters of the bill had reason to hope that with some slight
rearrangement of the bill's components, they could muster the support needed to
pass it in the next Congress.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Alan Simpson and Romano Mazzoli

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              35 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               October 12, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

MESSAGE OF IMMIGRATION BILL IS DISPUTED

BYLINE: By WALTER GOODMAN

SECTION: Section A; Page 17, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1074 words


This year's failed immigration bill, students of United States immigration
policies agree, was in the American tradition of welcoming newcomers while
keeping the ''golden door'' from opening too wide. The students disagree,
however, on whether the principal message of the bill, which died when Congress
adjourned yesterday without approving it, was ''come in'' or ''keep out.''

Oscar Handlin, Carl H. Pforzheimer professor at Harvard University, an authority
on the history of immigration, called the bill ''a more liberal measure than any
we've had in 90 years.'' Although it would have cracked down on the entry of
illegal aliens, he said it was ''liberalizing'' in every other regard. ''I can't
conceive of this happening even 30 years ago,'' Professor Handlin said.

But Richard Wade, a professor of history at the City University Graduate Center,
found the bill, in essence, ''identical with the restrictive legislation of the
1920's, when we were trying to keep certain groups out of the country.'' ''Now
we are trying to 'control our borders,' which amounts to keeping out low-income
Mexicans,'' he said.

'Part of the Ebb and Flow'


The Rev. Andrew M. Greeley, director of the Center for the Study of American
Pluralism at the University of Chicago, saw the measure as ''part of the ebb and
flow of America's attitudes to newcomers.'' He reviewed the history: ''The
Founding Fathers worried about the Germans and the Irish; the Germans and the
Irish worried about the Poles and the Italians; now, the Poles and the Italians
worry about the Hispanics and the Asians. I don't think anything is different.''

Father Greeley summed up 200 years of what he called ''our national
ambivalence'' toward newcomers: ''We don't like to let people in and could never
permit unrestricted immigration, but we can't adopt the sort of restrictions
that other countries impose. That would go against American ideals.''

History supports that view. In the first century of the Republic, settlers and
laborers were needed, and immigration, mainly from northern and western Europe,
was encouraged. Although the influx from Ireland after the potato crop failures
of the 1840's aroused anti-Catholic feelings, no measures were taken to restrict
entry.

In the 1870's, however, an economic depression brought calls by labor leaders,
particularly in the West, for a clampdown on the entry of Chinese workers.
Conspicuously different from most Americans and without political power since
they were not permitted citizenship, the Chinese made easy targets, and the
Chinese Exclusion Acts of the 1880's barred their entry. The Japanese were kept
out by a ''gentlemen's agreement'' between Tokyo and Washington in the early
1900's.

Others on Not-Wanted List

Restrictions on most Asians were retained in a 1917 codification of immigration
laws. They were joined on the not-wanted list by the Italians and Jews who had
been coming to the United States in large numbers and who, some Americans
feared, would prove ''unassimilable.'' A provision of the new bill, aimed
specifically at them, added illiteracy to the reasons for keeping people out.

This group was also a main target of the restrictive 1924 National Origins Act,
the most important immigration measure up to that time and for decades
afterward. It set a quota for each nationality based on the number of its
members already in the United States, as well as an overall ceiling of 150,000
immigrants a year. Most Asians were barred entirely.

The quota system, frankly designed to favor immigration from western and
northern Europe at the expense of most other areas, remained the law until after
World War II.

Although restrictions were eased as the war ended, particularly to admit
''displaced persons'' from Germany, Italy and Austria, the national origins
quota was retained in the first major postwar revision of immigration law, the
McCarren-Walter Act. It became law in 1952 over the veto of President Truman.

Race as Bar Eliminated

The 1952 law did, however, eliminate race as a bar to citizenship; for the first
time in American history, Asians were permitted to become citizens.

Not until 1965 was the national origins quota system, which had been
passionately attacked over the years, scrapped. The key passage of the new law
reflected profound changes in national attitudes: ''No person shall receive any
preference or priority or be discriminated against in the issuance of an
immigration visa because of his race, sex, nationality, place of birth or place
of residence.''

Overall limits on immigration were retained, however, and a preference system
was set up that gave priority to relatives of United States residents and to
immigrants with needed talents and skills. Each country in the Eastern
hemisphere was allowed 20,000 places, a welcome step to Italians and Greeks.

In another major change, an effort to hold down the entrance of Mexicans, the
1965 law placed a ceiling of 120,000 on immigration from the Western Hemisphere.
Some students date to this legislation the flow of ''illegals'' that would soon
become a source of national concern and in time would lead to this year's bill,
sponsored by Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky, and Alan K. Simpson,
Republican of Wyoming.

Economic Times Became Bad

Although newcomers from countries in this hemisphere had been exempt from
quotas, and Mexicans in particular were often welcomed as cheap labor, the
welcome wore out when times turned bad.

In the Depression of the 1930's, 500,000 people of Mexican descent, most of them
United States citizens, were ''repatriated'' to Mexico by Federal immigration
officials. In World War II, when the United States needed workers, Mexicans were
again welcomed, only to be expelled in the 1950's in a Government campaign.

The heavily publicized entry of hundreds of thousands of ''undocumented
aliens,'' mostly from Mexico, brought demands in the 1970's to ''stem the
tide.'' Congress responded in 1976 with an amendment to the Immigration and
Nationality Act that, for the first time, imposed an annual limit of 20,000
immigrants on each country in this hemisphere and subjected them to the
preference system in effect for other nations.

The immediate effect was to cut in half the legal immigrants from Mexico, who
had been running at far over 20,000 for a decade. But the illegal immigrants
kept coming.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              36 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               October 12, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

MUSEUM HIGHLIGHTS AND WEEKEND EVENTS

SECTION: Section C; Page 36, Column 1; Weekend Desk

LENGTH: 720 words


Etchings of Pennsylvania coal miners and their families from 1930 to the 40's by
Nicholas Bervinchak will be displayed tomorrow through Nov. 4 at the Ukrainian
Museum, 203 Second Avenue. The show is part of the museum's photographic
exhibition, ''To Preserve a Heritage, the Story of the Ukrainian Immigration in
the United States.'' Weekend hours are 1 to 5 P.M. Admission: adults, $1;
students and the elderly, 50 cents; children under 16, free. Information: 228-
0110.

Robert Kushner's ''Paintings on Paper,'' an exhibition of 38 works completed
over the last 12 years, is at the Whitney Museum of American Art, Madison Avenue
and 75th Street, through Dec. 9. Weekend hours, today and tomorrow, 11 A.M. to 5
P.M.; Sunday, noon to 6 P.M. (Through Dec. 9.) Admission: $3; elderly, $1.50;
students with I.D. cards and those under 12 accompanied by adults, free.
Information: 570-3633.

''Horst Antes: Votives,'' an exhibition of 38 sculptures by Mr. Antes, opens
today and continues until Nov. 25 at the Solomon R. Guggenheim Museum, 1071
Fifth Avenue. Weekend hours, today through Sunday, 11 A.M. to 5 P.M. Admission:
$3; elderly and students with identification, $1.75; children under 7 and
members, free. Information: 360-3500.

Children 6 to 11 years old will have the opportunity to participate in a
''Sandbox Excavation,'' by handling archeological tools and unearthing objects
in a sandbox, at the Jewish Museum, 1109 Fifth Avenue at 92d Street, on Sunday,
at 1 P.M. or 3 P.M. Information: 860-1888.

''Ansel Adams: Twenty-Five Master Prints,'' a collection of the photographer's
favorite works, runs through Nov. 4 at the International Center of Photography,
1130 Fifth Avenue at 94th Street. A major retrospective of the fashion
photographer Horst is also on display. Weekend hours, today, noon to 5 P.M.;
tomorrow and Sunday, 11 A.M. to 6 P.M. Admission: $2; elderly and students, $1.
Information: 860-1783.

''Her Voice Was Heard: Women and Politics in America,'' an exhibition tracing
the political role of women, is at the New-York Historical Society, 170 Central
Park West. Broadsides, sheet music, manuscripts, pictures and other items from
the 18th and 19th centuries are included in the display, which runs through Dec.
2. Weekend hours are 11 A.M. to 5 P.M. today; 10 A.M. to 5 P.M. tomorrow, and 1
to 5 P.M. on Sunday. Admission: $2; children under 12, 75 cents. Information:
873- 3400.

An audition record made by Grace Kelly at the age of 17 and other memorabilia
are among the items in an exhibition marking the centennial of the American
Academy of Dramatic Arts, at the Museum of the City of New York, Fifth Avenue
and 103d Street. The show features costumes and photographs of the school's
alumni, who include Cecil B. De Mille, Edward G. Robinson, Rosalind Russell,
Jason Robards, Robert Redford and Anne Bancroft. It is on view through Oct. 28.
Weekend hours are 10 A.M. to 5 P.M. today and tomorrow and 1 to 5 P.M. on
Sunday. Admission is free. Information: 686-9244.

Contemporary native American masks by Marvin Oliver, a Quinault carver, are
featured in ''Faces Out of the Mist,'' which runs through Jan. 20 at the Museum
of the American Indian, Broadway and 155th Street. Weekend hours are 10 A.M. to
5 P.M. today and tomorrow and 1 to 5 P.M. on Sunday. Admission: adults, $2;
elderly and students with identification, $1. Information: 283-2420.

A retrospective by the ceramic artist Eva Zeisel is displayed at the Brooklyn
Museum, Eastern Parkway, in the Crown Heights section. More than 150 pieces of
tableware, dating from 1925 to the present, will be on view through Nov. 16.
Weekend hours, 10 A.M. to 5 P.M. today; 11 A.M. to 6 P.M. tomorrow, and 1 to 6
P.M. on Sunday. Suggested contribution: $2; students, $1; elderly, children
under 12 accompanied by adults and members, free. Information: (718) 638-5000.

The Queens Museum will be host to a free workshop on Sunday, at 1:30 and 3 P.M.,
where participants can create paper sculptures using the workshop walls as part
of the art work. The workshop is an outgrowth of a current exhibition at the
museum called ''Activated Walls,'' where the walls are part of the artists'
works. Weekend hours, 10 A.M. to 5 P.M. today and tomorrow and 1 to 5 P.M. on
Sunday. Admission is by contribution. Information: (718) 592-2405.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              37 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              October 10, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

CONFEREES ON ALIEN BILL AGAIN FAIL TO COMPROMISE

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section A; Page 22, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 992 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Oct. 9


House and Senate conferees drafting a comprehensive immigration bill met again
today but failed to reach agreement on a compromise they could recommend to the
two chambers.

By a vote of 15 to 13, the conferees rejected a proposal to establish a
statutory limit of $1 billion a year for four years on the cost of providing
welfare, medical assitance and other social services to illegal aliens who would
gain legal status under the bill.

Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming, said President Reagan ''will
veto the bill'' if it did not include the statutory limit on costs.

The vote apparently brought an end to four weeks of efforts to resolve
differences between the versions of the bill passed by the Senate and the House
of Representatives.

Slight Possibility Remains

There still remained a slight possibility that the conferees might be able to
agree on a compromise. But as today's session ended, Representatvie Peter W.
Rodino Jr., Democrat of New Jersey, the chairman of the conference said, ''We
are in complete disagreement.''

Some Democrats said that Mr. Reagan's insistence on limiting costs was the
reason for the conferees' failure to reach agreement. But Represenatitve Dan
Lungrun, Republican of California, said, ''Let's not start laying political
blame at the White House.''

The bill had been given up for dead when the conferees adjourned Sept. 26 in
disagreement over the question of how to prevent job discrimination against
aliens legally present in the United States.

Then Representative Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of Brooklyn, drafted a
compromise in an attempt to rescue the bill.

Rights Accord Reached

The conferees today reached agreement on Mr. Schumer's antidiscrimination
proposal. But the financing issue presented a new obstacle they could not
overcome.

If the conferees reached agreement, the measure would still be subject to final
approval in the Senate and the House of Representatives and would have to be
presented to President Reagan for his signature before it could become law.

Mr. Schumer's proposal would prohibit employers from discriminating against a
specific group of legal aliens: those who signed a ''declaration of intention to
become a citizen.''

The bill's civil rights guarantees would apply to permanent resident aliens,
refugees and illegal aliens who obtained legal status under the bill, provided
that they had signed such a declaration within six months.

The Schumer proposal was a revision of one offered by Representative Barney
Frank, Democrat of Massachusetts, The House approved Mr. Frank's proposal by a
vote of 404 to 9 in June, but there was no comparable provision in the bill
passed by the Senate in May 1983.

The other provisions of the compromise bill were worked out by the conferees in
30 hours of negotiations over a period of nine days. The measure would establish
fines and prison terms for employers who knowingly hired illegal aliens. It
would offer legal status to at least two million illegal aliens who entered the
United States before Jan. 1, 1981 and had lived in the country continuously
since then.

The conference report would go first to the Senate, where John Tower, Republican
of Texas, has threatened a filibuster. Senator Alan Cranston, Democrat of
California, has indicated that he would participate in a filibuster.

In the House, which passed the bill by a five-vote margin in June, the bill
faces opposition from conservative Republicans, who object to the amnesty for
illegal aliens, and from liberal Democrats, who believe it could lead to an
increase in job discrimination against Hispanic Americans.

Farm Groups Opposed

Farm groups and labor unions have also urged members of Congress to defeat the
bill if it came to the floor. But the sponsors of the bill, Senator Alan K.
Simpson, Republican of Wyoming, and Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat
of Kentucky, have been mobilizing support, with the argument that three years of
hard work should not be thrown away.

Senator Howard M. Metzenbaum, Democrt of Ohio, exhorted the conferees to finish
work on the bill today, saying that ''the overall good is better than the
overall bad'' in the legislation.

The House conferees adopted Mr. Schumer's proposal on employment discrimination
by a vote of 15 to 8.

Under the proposal, a legal alien could file a charge of employment
discrimination with a new Justice Department agency, the United States
Immigration Board. The board's special counsel would have 120 days to
investigate the allegations. If the special counsel did not file a complaint
with the board, the alien worker could do so.

The worker's complaint would be accepted by the board only if it alleged ''a
knowing and intentional discriminatory act or a pattern or practice of
discriminatory activity.''

The board could then order an employer to halt his discriminatory practices and
to hire specific victims of discrimination, with or without back pay. The
employer would be subject to a civil penalty of up to $2,000 ''for each
individual discriminated against.''

Senator Simpson, on behalf of the Senate conferees, accepted the Schumer
proposal. But he expressed ''the gravest reservations'' about the creation of
new civil rights and a new government agency to investigate complaints of job
discrimination.

Senator Simpson said the White House had insisted that the bill include a limit
of $1 billion a year on Federal payments to the states for welfare, medical
assistance and social services to illegal aliens who gained legal status.  The
limit would have applied for four years.

The Office of Management and Budget, he said, had told the President that the
cost of the bill might otherwise run as high as $10 billion or $12 billion over
several years. Mr. Simpson said he did not agree with those estimates, but
nevertheless he said it was necessary for the conferees to adopt the limit.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              38 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               October 9, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

GOOD IMMIGRANT BILL

BYLINE: By Lawrence H. Fuchs ;
Lawrence H. Fuchs, professor of American civilization and politics at Brandeis
University, was executive director of the Select Commission on Immigration and
Refugee Policy.

SECTION: Section A; Page 33, Column 2; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 684 words

DATELINE: WALTHAM, MASS.


In a minor miracle, a conference committee has reached a tentative compromise on
the Senate and House versions of the Simpson-Mazzoli immigration bill. Months of
bitter debate have produced a sound bill that deserves final approval. Even so,
we are likely to hear again that the measure is racist and anti-family, that its
legalization provision will open the immigration floodgates, that its employer-
sanction measure will be ineffective and discriminatory.

The bill is not racist. The employer- sanction provision, which will penalize
employers who knowingly hire illegal aliens, is designed also to protect
everyone eligible to work - brown and black Americans and resident aliens alike.
There was a concern that employers would use their fear of sanctions as a cover
for discrimination against lawfully resident aliens. In fact, the bill provides
for new mechanisms - including a new special counsel to investigate complaints -
that will help protect aliens against such discrimination.

The bill is not anti-family. It emphasizes family reunification exactly as does
present law. The crucial provision legalizing the status of undocumented aliens
who have lived in America before 1981 will strengthen family reunification by
allowing newly legalized aliens married to resident aliens to emerge from the
shadows under the full protection of the law.

Nor will this provision open the floodgates to immigration. Even the most
dramatic forecasts do not predict that more than two million will apply for
legalization. Overall, the Simpson-Mazzoli bill will affect only marginally the
total number of immigrants lawfully admitted in the years ahead, while bringing
an exploitable underclass into more open participation in American life and also
deterring future illegal immigration in a more effective way than the dangerous
cops-and-robbers game

that we call border enforcement.  How will Simpson-Mazzoli start us toward
effective enforcement? Short term, the flow of illegal aliens will not be cut
drastically. Employers will need time to move to a workforce that is
substantially lawful. And it will take seven to 10 years to develop a
universally secure system to validate those who can work and who can't. But by
that time, the incentive to enter the country illegally will have been removed.
The main reason for starting now is to prevent the growth of a larger underclass
and to protect us from the terrible divisiveness that would result from
large-scale illegal migration in the future.  Simpson-Mazzoli will not work
miracles. But it does do several important things. At one point, for example,
efforts were made by restrictionist elements in Congress to make refugees (for
example, those in Southeast Asia) compete with immigrants under an absolute
ceiling. By repudiating these efforts, the bill keeps alive a humanitarian
policy of accepting people who come here not with the primary purpose of seeking
jobs but to escape persecution. It also makes more expeditious our method of
deciding who is entitled to asylum (persons already in this country who fear
persecution if deported). To that end, it provides an improved judicial system
that will reduce delays and provide for greater uniformity in asylum cases. And
it will reduce the underclass of illegal aliens in our midst through
legalization while deterring the flow of illegal aliens through what eventually
will become an effective mechanism of providing employment only to those who are
lawfully permitted to work.  For various reasons, the bill is an improvement
over earlier versions. It greatly strengthens the Senate's provisions against
discrimination; it eliminates an ill-conceived House effort to allow up to a
half million foreign workers to enter this country temporarily each year; it
eliminates the Senate's absolute cap on the number of immigrants who can be
reunited with their families; its legalization provisions cover more people than
authorized by the Senate but are less costly than provisions proposed by the
House. Simpson-Mazzoli deserves to triumph over wildly inaccurate rhetoric. B

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: OP-ED

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              39 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               October 9, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

MORE THAN A 'MOLEHILL' IN IMMIGRATION REFORM

SECTION: Section A; Page 32, Column 4; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 610 words


To the Editor:


Which page of The New York Times do you believe?

Your Sept. 28 news story regarding the Simpson-Mazzoli immigration bill reports
that the impasse between the House and Senate conferees resulting from the House
provision to forbid employment discrimination against permanent resident aliens
involves ''profound issues: . . . a question of whether aliens should enjoy the
full protection of the nation's laws, and how best to prevent job discrimination
against . . . citizens of Hispanic origin.'' In your Sept. 28 editorial on the
subject, you describe the issue as a ''molehill'' and say that the
''discrimination problem . . . seems mostly theoretical.'' The issue is neither
a molehill nor is it theoretical. Read the testimony of Luis Velarde Jr.,
Southwest regional director of the United States Catholic Conference, before the
House Judiciary Committee in 1971: ''We have some factories in El Paso that, so
they won't be bothered with the problem of perhaps hiring an illegal, all they
do is hire citizens, and I don't think it is correct.'' Read what happened when
the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, agreeing with Mr. Velarde, ruled
that discrimination against legal aliens was barred by the Civil Rights Act of
1964, which forbade discrimination upon the basis of ''national origin.'' In
1973, the Supreme Court reversed that decision, holding that ''national origin''
is not equivalent to alienage and that discrimination against aliens is not
forbidden by that statute.

The molehill started rising, The Times says, after the House-Senate conferees
''patiently reconciled sharp differences.'' But the very core of the debate over
employer sanctions has been the House conferees' fear that the bill would
encourage employers to refuse jobs to anyone who

looks

 foreign, whether illegal or not.

If the issue is a ''molehill,'' it has been present since the inception of the
legislation and has been the subject of testimony before the House and Senate
Judiciary Committees, as well as before the Civil Rights Commission, which twice
urged that employer- sanction legislation be rejected for this very reason.

Two months before the House-Senate conference, the House adopted the Frank
amendment by a vote of 404 to 9 to forbid discrimination against aliens and to
provide a means of redress. If the ''molehill'' suddenly became a ''mountain,''
it was created by persons who apparently are oblivious of the rights of aliens
in the United States.

Those who believe that it is ''acceptable'' to prohibit discrimination against
legal resident aliens and, more, that it is required, in the words of the
editorial, for a ''national immigration policy based on honesty and fairness
instead of hypocrisy and piety,'' cannot be legitimately charged with ''looking
for a molehill big enough to hide behind'' when they insist upon the enactment
of the Frank amendment.

Is it wise, you ask, to forbid employers to discriminate in favor of American
citizens as well as against aliens and ''would it be politically tenable?''

The Supreme Court has held repeatedly that it is unconstitutional for the states
to impose bars against aliens in obtaining employment. If it is unconstitutional
for a state to enact laws discriminating against resident aliens, can it be
''extreme and extravagant'' for the Congress to prohibit such discrimination?
The Times surely cannot believe that it would be ''noble'' to surrender the
rights of aliens to political nativism.

DAVID CARLINER Washington, Sept. 29, 1984

The writer is a member of the American Bar Association's Coordinating Committee
on Immigration.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Letter

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              40 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                October 7, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

LOUISIANIANS WAIT FOR ALIEN CENTER



BYLINE:
By FRANCES FRANK MARCUS

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 28, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 891 words

DATELINE: OAKDALE, La.


North of Louisiana's depressed oil patch and west of its struggling World's
Fair, not far from Mamou and well south of Shreveport, in the state's flat dusty
center, the small city of Oakdale is coping with euphoria.

Down a bumpy dirt road at Oakdale's edge, near where Cajun country ends, workers
are preparing the silty soil, known locally as crawfish clay, for the largest
alien detention center in the country. It would be the first to be built and run
jointly by the Federal Bureau of Prisons and the Immigration and Naturalization
Service.

If construction goes as scheduled and opposition outside Oakdale fades, the
aliens will begin arriving in Allen Parish in little more than a year, 1,000 to
be housed in secure dormitories and up to 5,000 more in a tent city on the
grounds should the need arise.

It cannot happen soon enough for Oakdale.

They Fought for Opportunity

While other communities have balked at taking in society's rejects, Oakdale
fought hard for the privilege.

''The alien center is the economic rebirth of Allen Parish and Oakdale,'' said
Mayor George B. Mowad, a family physician, on a tour of the city for the benefit
of a visitor. ''With all the jobs it's going to create and the spinoff, it's
going to turn this place around.''

In recent years, Oakdale's unemployment rate has edged above 31 percent because
its timber-based economy has been in a depression. More than 1,000 jobs have
been lost since 1975, with the closing of a papermill, a bag plant and a
furniture parts factory.

The new $17.5 million alien detention center will create 325 full-time jobs,
with 75 percent to be filled locally. There will be security guards, cooks,
janitors, eight immigration judges, 16 trial lawyers and others to take care of
the thousands of aliens to be housed annually, part of the influx of aliens who
cross this country's borders illegally and are caught. Two million were detained
last year.

'Recession-Proof Industry'

The new alien center ''will bring in 150 families to Oakdale, which means we're
going to have the biggest house- building boom in the history of this town,''
the Mayor said, ''and with that many people it means new excitement, new ideas.
We have a recession-proof industry here now, the alien center.''

Undaunted by a lawsuit failed in July by the American Civil Liberties Union and
the Lawyers Committee for International Rights opposing the center's placement
in Oakdale, citizens of the town, population 7,000, have been ringing the phones
at the Mayor's home and office, seeking jobs.

The A.C.L.U. and the lawyers' committee have sued the Government to stop
construction of the detention center, charging that its ''remote'' location
would deprive the aliens of legal representation.

The plaintiffs include aliens from Afghanistan, Iran and Central America, 16
lawyers and representatives of 12 legal aid groups from around alien centers in
Florida, California, Texas, Arizona and New York.

The lawsuit says there are only 12 lawyers practicing in Oakdale and that there
are no legal groups organized to offer free legal services.

The Federal Government has not yet responded to the suit but Oakdale has, with
the same verve it employed in persuading Federal officials to put the center in
the middle of Louisiana, 200 miles west of New Orleans, about the same distance
from Houston and near no major airports.

Other Lawyers Around, He Says

There are actually more than 700 lawyers within 50 miles of Oakdale, says James
Sandefur, an optometrist who is chairman of the local industrial development
board.

And as far as the lawsuit's outcome goes, he said, ''the smart money ought to be
on the little guys in Oakdale.''

Town leaders say it was ''perseverence, perseverence, perseverence'' that got
the alien center here.

Influential citizens met with ministers, who made their pitch for the aliens
from the pulpit. An intensive media campaign led by Pat R. Jones, editor of The
Oakdale Journal, did not hurt.

And when two Immigration and Naturalization Service officials turned up in town
to test the terrain, recalls Mrs. Jones, more than 800 townspeople turned up at
a public meeting ''with nothing on their faces but hope.''

'Dinners for 20, 30 and 40'

Louisiana's Congressional delegation pitched in. There were hundreds of
telegrams to Washington, thousands of dollars in phone calls and two all-night
community prayer vigils, not to mention what the Mayor calls ''the little
personal touch, dinners for 20, 30 and 40'' at his house. These honored Federal
officials and were prepared the Mayor's wife, Dolores. ''We fed them
shishkabob,'' the Mayor recalls. ''We killed them with kindness.''

In New Orleans, the immigration service's district director, David Lambert, said
Oakdale had been chosen in part because ''they wanted us and that's a big
factor.''

''Why should the Government come in and impose something on a community they
don't want?'' he asked.

Most of Oakdale's aliens will stay only three or four days, he said, while
arrangements are made for their return home and those seeking asylum will be
processed in ''about a month.''

The Mayor says: ''We're not resting on our laurels with just the alien center.
We're trying to get a state prison for the south end of the parish.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              41 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               October 6, 1984, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

NEGOTIALTORS REPORT A COMPROMISE THAT MAY REVIVES IMMIGRATION BILL

BYLINE: By STEPHEN ENGELBERG

SECTION: Section 1; Page 10, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 625 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Oct. 5


House and Senate negotiators said today that they had reached a last-minute
compromise that could revive the comprehensive immigration bill.

Supporters of the measure say that if the Senate remains in session next week
for more than a day they may have enough time to complete a four- year effort to
rewrite immigration law. Congress hopes to adjourn for the year by sometime next
week.

But an aide to a Democratic Senator closely involved in the immigration issue
said the bill still faced almost insurmountable obstacles. ''The clock really
works against this,'' he said. ''It would take a miracle to get the thing
through. I think this is more an effort by the House to avoid getting its
fingerprints on killing the bill.''

It was unclear whether the House leadership would allow the bill to proceed
under the expedited rules necessary. Christopher J. Matthews, a spokesman for
House Speaker Thomas P. O'Neill Jr., said there had been no change in the
Massachusetts Democrat's position that the measure will go forward only if
President Reagan says publicly he will not veto it. Mr. Reagan has made no such
promise.

Brooklyn Representative's Efforts

The compromise was brought about by Representative Charles E. Schumer, a
Democrat of Brooklyn, who had not previously played a major role in the
legislation.

Mr. Schumer said today that he began what he called ''shuttle diplomacy'' on
Monday, six days after a House- Senate conference committee broke up in
disagreement over whether aliens were entitled to new protections from
employment discrimination that were proposed in the bill.

''When I went home on Friday after it had fallen apart, I felt it would be a
shame if this went down after so much work,'' he said.

To achieve the compromise, Mr. Schumer worked with the chief sponsors from the
House and Senate, and with Representative Barney Frank, Democrat of
Massachusetts, who had sponsored a provision on discrimination.

One of the bill's major provisions would make it a crime to knowingly hire
aliens who are in this country illegally.

The House had passed an amendment that would forbid discrimination by employers
against legal aliens. It would give those who say they are victims of such
discrimination the right to file complaints with a new agency of the Justice
Department.

Opponents of the bill, particularly Hispanic groups, have voiced fears that the
sanctions against employers who hire illegal aliens could lead to discrimination
against members of ethnic minorities who are citizens or are in this country
legally.

Senator Alan K. Simpson, a Wyoming Republican who sponsored the measure, had
told the conferees he could not accept the House provision on discrimination
because it gave aliens rights not available to citizens. He had also opposed
creating the new enforcement agency.

Accord on Bias Complaints

Mr. Schumer's compromise would allow aliens to file actions before the special
counsel to the United States Immigration Board, but only if they signed
statement that they intended to become citizens.

Civil penalties of up to $1,000 per alien would be levied for each initial
instance of discrimination, and repeat violators could be assessed fines up to
$2,000 per alien.

Mr. Schumer also secured an agreement that would limit to $1 billion a year the
amount that states could receive as reimbursement for services to aliens granted
legal status under the bill.

The conference plans to reconvene Tuesday, and Representative Romano L. Mazzoli,
Democrat of Kentucky, who sponsored the House bill, said he and Senator Simpson
have assurances of sufficient votes to win approval by the conferees, clearing
the way to proceed on final Congressional action.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              42 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               October 2, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition
                              Correction Appended

RIVERSIDE CHURCH GIVES SANCTUARY

BYLINE: By KENNETH A. BRIGGS

SECTION: Section A; Page 29, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 671 words


A couple who fled Guatemala with their infant son were officially granted
sanctuary by Riverside Church last night.

According to Joan Baccus, a member of the church staff, the couple, given the
aliases Ana and Frederico, left their native country with their son, whose alias
is Carlo, after their community-organizing activities ran them afoul of
government authorities. Their arrival at the church was the result of a decision
by the congregation on June 10 to join the movement in protest against United
States immigration policy.

The family was officially welcomed at a service last night, and sustained
applause greeted the refugees as they made their way down the center aisle.

The Rev. William Sloane Coffin Jr., senior pastor of the church, at Riverside
Drive and 120th Street, told the congregation that granting the family sanctuary
was a move in support of ''our fellow human beings all over Central America who
are asking us to help them.''

Hundreds Given Sanctuary

Mr. Coffin warned churches and synagogues ''to realize what German churches
learned too late some 40 years ago: It is not enough to resist with confession,
we must confess with resistance.''

Mr. Coffin noted that Riverside had joined 160 houses of worship nationwide that
have taken in illegal aliens. Hundreds of people who have escaped Central
American violence have taken shelter in these institutions under the sanctuary
concept, which since ancient times has held that centers of worship are places
of refuge.

The religious groups contend that those they grant sanctuary to are political
refugees whose forced return to their countries by the United States would
threaten their lives. The Reagan Administration, maintaining that most actually
fled to seek better economic conditions, has deported thousands of refugees,
most of whom came from El Salvador.

The Immigration and Naturalization Service has thus far taken no action against
those taken in under the sanctuary principle. The penalty for harboring illegal
aliens can be up to a $2,000 fine and five years in prison, but the Government
has not acted against any individuals or groups who have granted sanctuary.

Family Uses Meeting Room

The three newcomers to Riverside are Roman Catholics whose church in Guatemala
encouraged the kind of community organization in which the parents were engaged.
Riverside has joint affiliation with the American Baptist Churches and the
United Church of Christ.

The family moved into Riverside three weeks ago, taking up residence in a
refurbished meeting room. They have been given use of one of the church kitchens
and bathrooms.

For three months before reaching Riverside, they were sheltered by the Chicago
Religious Task Force, one of the most active groups in the sanctuary movement.

Riverside's decision in June followed a meeting and vote of the congregation.
More than two-thirds of the 350 members voted to become part of the protest
movement. The Chicago task force chose the family.

Support From Clergy

The action drew wide support from New York's religious leaders. Bishop Paul
Moore Jr., Episcopal Bishop of New York, called the move ''absolutely vital in
our day'' and applauded the ''courage of Riverside Church.'' Rabbi Balfour
Brickner of the Stephen Wise Free Synagogue called it a ''spiritually motivated
outreach to those in need.''

Among others who have stated support for Riverside's action are Bishop Emerson
J. Moore, auxiliary bishop of the Roman Catholic Archdiocese of New York, who
said it was ''incumbent upon church people of whatever religious persuasion to
take the lead in this effort.'' He added that he hoped the action would help
make others ''aware of the injustices being perpetrated against the people of
Guatemala and Central America.''

Others who said they supported the church's action are the Rev. Carl E.
Flemister of the American Baptist Churches of Metropolitan New York, and the
Rev. James E. Andrews, Stated Clerk of the Presbyterian Church (U.S.A.).


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

CORRECTION-DATE: October 16, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

CORRECTION:
An article in Metropolitan Report on Oct. 2 about the harboring of Guatemalan
refugees at Riverside Church incorrectly described the United States
Government's response to sanctuary for illegal aliens. In several cases the
Government has prosecuted those who provided it.


                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              43 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               October 2, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION AND THE RANDOMNESS OF ETHNIC MIX

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section A; Page 28, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 1234 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Oct. 1


Immigration to the United States from Asia was severely restricted for 80 years,
starting with the Chinese Exclusion Act in 1882. From 1820 to 1979, only 6
percent of all immigrants came from Asia.

But last year there were 282,724 immigrants from Asia, representing half of all
legal immigration to the United States. The six largest sources of legal
immigrants, after Mexico, were all Asian countries.

The new statistics indicate how a change in immigration law and policy can
affect the ethnic mix of the American population. And behind the statistics is a
story of how no one, not even those in Washington who decree the change, can
predict the consequences.

In recent weeks, Congressional debate on a comprehensive immigration bill has
focused national attention on the issue. Most of the debate concerns immigrants
from Latin America, who join the nation's rapidly growing Hispanic population.
But statistics collected by the Immigration and Naturalization Service also show
remarkable growth in the number of Asians coming to this country.

'A Browning of America'


In fact, Lawrence H. Fuchs of Brandeis University, an expert on immigration and
ethnic history, says ''a browning of America'' may occur within six or seven
generations in which a growing proportion of the population will be nonwhite.

''Such trends do not alarm me,'' he hastened to add, ''because I believe that
immigrants and their children will commit themselves to American ideals and
values,'' just as previous generations of immigrants did.

Both houses of Congress have adopted legislation to curtail the influx of
illegal aliens. It is not intended to restrict or alter the flow of legal
immigrants. But history suggests that immigration laws often have unforeseen
consequences, and no one is sure precisely what will happen if Congress finally
adopts the measure. A House-Senate conference has resolved most differences
between the two versions of the bill, but members said today it appeared highly
unlikely that the measure would pass before Congress adjourns for this year.

From 1924 to 1965, the United States had immigration quotas, based on national
origin, that were designed to ''preserve the ethnic and racial composition of
the United States'' as it existed in 1920. Since repeal of those quotas in 1965,
there has been a gradual increase in immigration from Asia and a decline in
immigration from Europe. People who were barred under the old laws now enter in
large numbers. Last year there were more Asian immigrants than in the three
decades from 1931 to 1960.

'From Exclusion to Inclusion'


David M. Reimers, a professor of history at New York University, said American
policy toward Asian immigrants had shifted ''from exclusion to inclusion.''

Congress, he said, did not foresee the results that occurred after it repealed
the national origin quotas and established a ceiling of 20,000 immigrants for
each country (not counting refugees or immediate relatives of American
citizens). When Congress made the change in 1965, Representative Emanuel Celler,
a Brooklyn Democrat, told his colleagues, ''There will not be, comparatively,
many Asians or Africans entering this country.''

More generally, Mr. Reimers said, most immigrants to the United States now come
from third world countries. Europe accounted for 80 percent of all immigrants to
this country from 1820 to 1965. But now, Mr. Reimers said, ''Hispanics, South
and East Asians, Middle Easterners and non-Hispanic Caribbean migrants dominate
the immigration statistics.''

The largest number of legal immigrants last year came from Mexico, which sent
59,298, according to the immigration service. China, Hong Kong and Taiwan
together sent a total of 48,668. The next largest sources were the Philippines,
which sent 41,725; Vietnam, 39,821; Korea, 33,453; India, 25,535, and Laos,
23,917.

These countries are likely to dominate immigration in the future, since 1.1
million of their people have applied for immigrant visas and received
preliminary approval at the first stage of review.

Immigrants include people who received visas overseas, as well as refugees and
other aliens who obtain permanent resident status after entering this country.
Most of the Vietnamese and Laotians were admitted as refugees.

Four Agencies Involved


The immigration laws are administered by a small group of specialists from four
Federal agencies: the Justice Department, which has overall responsibility; the
State Department, which issues visas through embassies and consulates around the
world; the Labor Department, which certifies the need for alien workers; and the
Department of Health and Human Services, which provides aid to refugees who
resettle in this country.

The officials operate in the shadows except at times of crisis when the
immigration law becomes an instrument of foreign policy. President Carter, for
example, in 1980 imposed visa restrictions on Iranian students in this country
after the seizure of the American Embassy in Teheran.

Immigration officials do not have the power to increase or reduce immigration
quotas. Only Congress has that power. But the President and the Attorney General
do have the power, after consulting with Congress, to set the number of refugees
who will be admitted from a particular country.

In Washington, ethnic minority groups, which once had little influence on
immigration policy, now play an important role by lobbying against restrictions.

Laura Chin, executive director of the Organization of Chinese Americans, said:
''Some people might feel there are too many Asians coming into the United
States. They should remember that, for many years, Asians were excluded from
this country solely because of their race. The restrictive policies ended only
20 years ago.''

Affecting the Ethnic Mix


Asia, with 2.8 billion people, has nearly 60 percent of the world's population.
So, in numerical terms, it is perhaps not surprising that Asians account for
nearly half of immigration to the United States.

The new immigrants are bound to affect the ethnic mix of America. In the 1980
census, only 3.5 million people, or 1.5 percent of the population, described
themselves as Asian. The Census Bureau estimated there were 15.9 million
Hispanic Americans in 1983, accounting for 6.8 percent of the population. Both
groups are growing because of immigration as well as births.

The bureau estimates that legal immigration accounted for 25 percent of the
United States population growth last year. If illegal immigrants were included,
the proportion would be larger, officials say. The Government has no reliable
way to measure illegal immigration or to count the number of illegal aliens in
the country.

Mr. Fuchs, who served as executive director of the Select Commission on
Immigration and Refugee Policy, a Federal advisory panel, from 1979 to 1981,
said: ''We are probably going to have a browning of America over time. It will
take six or seven generations, but ultimately, I believe, a majority of the
population will be nonwhite. That is likely to occur because of immigration and
increasing rates of intermarriage between darker-skinned people and whites. But
concepts of color and race will probably change, and it's possible that
questions about color won't even be asked in the census 150 years from now.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: drawing

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              44 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                October 1, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
7 Refused Citizenship For Inadequate English

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 14, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 128 words

DATELINE: ORLANDO, Fla., Sept. 30


A Federal district judge has refused to swear in seven people as United States
citizens because they could not speak adequate English, even though they
apparently were exempt from the language requirement, an immigration official
says.

Judge Kendall Sharp told the Immigration and Naturalization Service that he had
refused to grant citizenship to the seven because he did not believe in a law
that waives the English-language requirement for immigrants at least 50 years
old who have lived in the United States for at least 20 years, according to
George Waldroup, an I.N.S. spokesman in Miami.

Other immigrants must be able to speak and write English to become citizens. The
seven who were denied citizenship will get another hearing, Mr. Waldroup said.



LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              45 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 30, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

MAJOR NEWS IN SUMMARY ;
Congress StalledOn Immigration,Other Disputes

SECTION: Section 4; Page 1, Column 1; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 478 words


With most members of Congress eager to adjourn and get back to their
campaigning, possibly irreconcilable differences over the civil rights of aliens
last week threatened to shunt the long-pending immigration bill off onto a
legislative siding.

After several days of surprisingly fast-paced and productive give and take,
House and Senate conferees deadlocked when Alan K. Simpson, prime sponsor of the
Senate bill, balked at language in the House's version that forbids job
discrimination on the basis of alien status. The conferees earlier agreed to
fines and perhaps prison for employers who knowingly hired illegal aliens and to
granting legal status to aliens who could prove that they had lived in this
country continuously since Jan. 1, 1981, and hadn't broken any laws.

But Senator Simpson, a Wyoming Republican, said the job-discrimination provision
was unacceptable, partly because it would create a new bureaucracy and might
give legal aliens greater protections than citizens. Representative Peter W.
Rodino Jr., Democrat of New Jersey and chairman of the Judiciary Committee,
noted that the House had approved the provision 404 to 9, and said eliminating
it ''would be a practical invitation to discriminate.''

In the Senate, controversy over another civil rights matter delayed action on an
emergency spending bill needed to keep the Federal Government in business when
the new fiscal year dawns tomorrow. At issue was a conservative filibuster
against legislation that would overturn the Supreme Court ruling, known as Grove
City, that a law banning sex discrimination at colleges that receive Federal aid
applied only to the specific program receiving the aid. Kept in the Capitol for
a rare weekend session, the Senators yesterday voted, 92 to 4, to limit the
debate.

Supporters of the rights bill want to attach it to the omnibus spending measure,
because they have been unable to bring it to the floor separately. On the House
side, there have been attachments too. When the Representatives took up their
version of the emergency spending bill earlier in the week, they tacked on an
authorization for more than 300 public works projects of the sort that please
constituents. And through fear of being cast on the wrong side of an election
year issue, House Democrats helped House Republicans also append several
elements of President Reagan's anticrime package.

Enter the White House, late Friday. Mr. Reagan, who has said he would veto any
catchall spending bill that he thought was too expensive, offered to forgo the
crime-fighting package so as to get a rider-free measure. After voting to limit
the rights debate, the Senate passed a resolution postponing the spending
deadline for 48 hours. A similar move is under way in the House, to give the
legislators a little more breathing - and calculating and re- calculating -
time.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Senator Alan K. Simpson

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              46 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 28, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

SENATE TO TAKE UP ANTI-BIAS MEASURE BEFORE DEPARTING

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1269 words


Although backers said they hoped to revive the immigration bill, opponents said
it was dead. Page A16.




By JONATHAN FUERBRINGER

WASHINGTON, Sept. 27 - With a deadline Monday for approving money to keep the
Government running, the Senate got entangled today in debate over a civil rights
controversy.

It voted 51 to 48 to consider an amendment designed to reverse a Supreme Court
decision this year narrowing the scope of Federal laws against discrimination.
There were 39 Democrats and 12 Republicans in favor of considering the
amendment, while 6 Democrats and 42 Republicans voted against.

The emergency spending bill to which the amendment was offered was approved
Tuesday by the House, which added its own major amendment, a crime-fighting
measure passed earlier by the Senate.

If the catchall measure is not on the President's desk by Monday night, or if he
decides to veto the bill, some Government departments could be shut down. Monday
is the first day of the new fiscal year.



Moving Toward Resolution

Right after the vote, the Senate Republican leadership began working to find a
way to remove the obstacles to approval of a catchall bill that could be
accepted by the White House. About an hour later, the majority leader, Howard H.
Baker Jr., Republican of Tennessee, said he was ''near some agreements but not
there yet.'' Adding that it would better for senators to ''cool off until
tomorrow,'' he recessed the Senate until Friday morning.

The catchall resolution to continue spending is necessary because Congress has
not yet approved separate appropriations for most Government agencies. To date,
the Congress has approved 4 of its usual 13 appropriations.

Because emergency spending bills are needed to keep the Government running,
representatives and senators have seen them as vehicles for programs they could
not get through the normal legislative process.



Senate Blockade Seen

A similar version of the civil rights measure has been passed by the House.
Senate supporters contend that Senator Orrin G. Hatch, Republican of Utah, has
blocked their efforts to get a bill out of the Labor and Human Resources
Committee, of which he is chairman.

It was not immediately clear if the vote to allow the amendment to be offered
also meant that supporters had the votes to pass the legislation.  There are 63
co-sponsors in the Senate, but Senator Bob Packwood, Republican of Oregon, who
is sponsor of the bill, said on the floor, ''It is clear that we do not have the
votes this session.'' He apparently meant that he did not have to votes to
overcome all the obstacles opponents could put in the way of passage in the
waning days of the Congressional session. Congress plans to adjourn by the end
of next week.

Thirteen of the Republican co-sponsors of the civil rights bill voted against
allowing the amendment to be offered because of the Republican leadership's
opposition to using a catchall bill as a vehicle for everyone's favorite
project. The amendment was offered under a parliamentary procedure that could
prevent a showdown vote before Saturday.

After the vote, Senator Baker and Senator Mark O. Hatfield, chairman of the
Appropriations Committee, pleaded with senators not to propose more amendments.

Mr. Hatfield, an Oregon Republican, said that if he had to ''accept everything
that comes along, we are heading for a veto.'' The alternative, he said, is
''return to reason and decide not to use the continuing resolution for the
entire unfinished legislative agenda.''

The House passed its catchall appropriation Tuesday. Both it and the version now
before the Senate already face the threat of a veto from President Reagan
because both include money for new water projects he opposes. The House and the
Senate are expected to work all weekend to pass a bill in time.

Millions for Water Projects

The House included $119 million for start-up costs for 53 water projects and
added an $18 billion authorization for new water projects. The Senate
Appropriations Committee approved $82.1 million for 26 water projects.

The House also approved increased financing for other domestic programs. And in
an effort to make the package palatable to Mr. Reagan, the House, in a surprise
vote, added the an ticrime package the President has urged Congress to approve.

Administration officials said today that the Government would start shutting
down Monday if it did not appear that an acceptable catchall appropriation would
get to the President by the end of the day.

In such a case, an official said, many employees would be told to leave work
within three hours after arrival. Other employees, however, including law
enforcers, diplomats, doctors, soldiers and others, would not be affected.

Last Shutdown in 1981

If the Government is shut down, it would be the first time since November 1981,
when President Reagan vetoed a catchall appropriation.

The Supreme Court ruling on discrimination that the amendment is intended to
counter was handed down in February. In it, the Court ruled 6 to 3 that the
prohibitions against sex discrimination under Title IX of the Education
Amendments of 1972 apply only to programs getting direct Federal aid, not to an
entire institution. The decision, Grove City College v. Bell, was based on the
interpretation of the words ''program or activity.''

Civil rights and other groups attacked the decision, saying that it narrowed
Federal discrimination laws and would allow some schools to discriminate in
certain activities while still receiving Federal funds for a program in which
they did not discriminate.

These groups also said the court decision would also narrow other Federal laws
prohibiting discrimination on the basis of age, race, national orgin and
handicap, including the Civil Rights Act of 1964, the Rehabilitation Act of 1973
and the Age Discrimination Act of 1975. All three also contain the same
''program or activity'' language.

Dispute Over Law's Meaning

The civil rights legislation now under consideration, offered as an amendment by
Senator Robert C. Byrd of West Virginia, the Democratic leader, would substitute
the word ''recipient'' for ''program and activity'' in all four laws. The aim of
the change is to restore the broad coverage that many Congressmen believed had
been in effect before the Supreme Court said otherwise.

Opponents of the amendment have argued all year that the new language goes
beyond the existing laws.

Mr. Baker met with his committee chairmen and then the rest of the Republicans
today in an effort to get an agreement to resist all amendments that are not
related to appropriations.

But he failed to get such an agreement. After the last meeting, Senator Pete V.
Domenici, Republican of New Mexico, who is chairman of the Budget Committee,
said, ''It is up in the air now how you might get the cleanest one possible.''
He said senators wanted a chance to get their projects on because the bill ''is
too garbled already.''

The Senate leadership tried to block the offering of the Grove City amendment by
challenging it on a point of order, arguing that Rule 16 of the Senate did not
allow legislation to be added to an appropriation bill.

Senator Packwood agreed that using the catchall bill as a vehicle did damage to
the Senate process. ''With all my heart I support this bill,'' he said, ''but I
cannot support this procedure.'' However, he decided to vote to allow the
amendment to be offered, he said, because the bill was already filled with so
many unrelated pieces of legislation.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              47 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 28, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

Man-Made Mountain on the Border There's a molehill growing on Capitol Hill. It's
called ''alienage,'' and it's growing so fast that unless somebody does
something today, it will crush the bipartisan Simpson-Mazzoli immigration reform
bill. If so, the country will lose the chance of a generation to end the
lawlessness on its borders, leaving the public, in as much suspicion as sadness,
to ask why.

SECTION: Section A; Page 30, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 573 words


The reform effort stretches back to Peter Rodino's initiatives in the House a
decade ago. Present law says to illegal aliens: No sir, we don't let people like
you into this country. But present practice says: That's just talk. If you can
sneak past the Border Patrol, before long some employer will be glad to hire
you.

The remedy is to forbid hiring illegal aliens. But that takes courage because
the present hypocrisy has many supporters, right and left. That made a
bipartisan effort all the more necessary, and Alan Simpson, a Republican, has
been the champion in the Senate, and Romano Mazzoli, a Democrat, in the House.

In the last two weeks, after years of travail, the land of Canaan finally came
into sight. The bill made it to a House-Senate conference, and conferees have
patiently reconciled sharp differences.

But that's when the molehill starting rising. The House conferees expressed
fears that the bill would encourage employers to refuse jobs to anyone who looks
foreign, whether illegal or not. As a corrective, the House proposed to forbid
employers to discriminate against someone because he is an alien.

At first, that sounds familiar and acceptable, like prohibiting discrimination
on the basis of race, religion or national origin. But then one realizes that
such legislation would forbid employers to discriminate in favor of American
citizens as well as against aliens, a proposition nowhere examined in all the
hearings on the bill.

Would that be wise? And even if wise, would it be politically tenable? (One can
just hear a candidate somewhere declaiming: ''Do you know that So- and-So voted
to let foreigners use United States courts to sue United States companies for
hiring United States citizens?'')

The conferees soon locked themselves into an impasse on this issue, and unless
they can unlock it quickly, perhaps even today, the Simpson-Mazzoli bill will be
killed by the clock, as Congress rushes to adjourn next week.

This is a genuine molehill. The discrimination problem posed here seems mostly
theoretical. Employers have no incentive to discriminate now because low-skill
labor is already in short supply. Simpson-Mazzoli would reduce it more, giving
them even less reason to discriminate. And the alienage solution need not be
framed in extreme or extravagant terms. Surely conferees who have already
reconciled harder issues can find words to bridge this one.

If they can't, for this issue suddenly to become such a mountain invites the
suspicion that somebody's looking for a molehill big enough to hide behind.
Indeed, some people intimate that the Democrats want to kill the bill to win
favor for Walter Mondale among Hispanic groups; and that the Republicans want to
kill it because they think it will end up costing too much.

No single piece of legislation can do more than improve life and law a little.
This bill, though battered and battle-scarred, would surely do that: create, at
last, a national immigration policy based on honesty and fairness instead of
hypocrisy and piety. That's why the title Simpson-Mazzoli has denoted energetic,
even noble bipartisanship.

But now, unless the conferees can agree on language that turns the molehill back
into a molehill, this bill that has survived through so much will die, a foot
from the finish line. And names like Simpson, Mazzoli, Rodino and O'Neill will
end up denoting nothing more noble than surrender.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: editorial

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              48 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 28, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

CONGRESSIONAL OPINIONS DIFFER ON CHANCES FOR BILL ON IMMIGRATION

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section A; Page 16, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 806 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Sept. 27


The sponsors of a comprehensive immigration bill said today that they still
hoped to rescue the legislation, but some opponents said it was dead.

The Senate and the House of Representatives approved different versions of the
legislation. Lawmakers failed to resolve all their of differences in nine days
of negotiations, making final passage of the bill unlikely. The conferees did
manage to resolve most of the major differences in the two bills.

'There Is an Opportunity'

Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming, the chief Senate negotiator,
said in an interview: ''There is still honestly an opportunity. We all know what
we are looking for, but it is tough to get there. Time is short.''

Congress is tentatively scheduled to adjourn Oct. 4 or 5.

Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky, said he and his staff
were still trying to break the deadlock over a provision of the House bill that
would prohibit discrimination against refugees, permanent-resident aliens and
illegal aliens who obtain legal status under the bill.

''We are less far apart, from a technical and philosophical standpoint, than you
would think from watching us,'' said Mr. Mazzoli, the sponsor of the
House-passed bill. ''Finding the right language may be less difficult than
selling it'' to members of the House-Senate conference, who need a face-saving
way to extricate themselves from the current impasse, Mr. Mazzoli said.

Senator Alan Cranston of California, the Democratic whip, who said two months
ago that the bill was dead, added today, ''It now looks like rigor mortis has
finally set in.'' He said that the House-Senate conference was ''doomed to
fail'' because the bill's basic provision, civil and criminal penalties for
employers who knowingly hire illegal aliens, was ''inherently inconsistent with
protecting the rights of either employers or workers.''

But Hispanic groups continued lobbying against the bill on Capitol Hill. ''I
never operate on the assumption that it's dead,'' said Arnoldo S. Torres,
executive director of the League of United Latin American Citizens. ''Anybody
who has really watched this bill could never operate on that assumption.''

Simpson Made an Offer


The Senate bill did not prohibit employement discrimination against aliens.
However, Senator Simpson offered an antidiscrimination proposal in the
conference. The House conferees rejected it. But aides to Representative
Hamilton Fish Jr., Republican of Upstate New York, said he might offer a motion
on the floor of the House next week to instruct the House conferees to accept
the Simpson offer.

Senator Simpson's proposal would have strengthened existing laws that prohibit
job discrimination on the basis national origin.

The impasse involves profound issues: The difference between citizens and
aliens, and the question of whether aliens should enjoy the full protection of
the nation's laws, and how best to prevent job discrimination against United
States citizens of Hispanic origin.

Mr. Simpson and Mr. Mazzoli have always said that their bill was not nativist,
racist or mean. But some immigration specialists detected a tinge of nativism in
the final days of debate, when several conferees said that employers should be
able to hire American citizens in preference to aliens.

Charles D. Smith, associate editor of Interpreter Releases, a weekly publication
on immigration law, said that some of the comments appeared to fit the
dictionary definition of nativism: prejudice in favor of natives against
strangers; the practice or policy of protecting the interests of the native
residents against those of immigrants.

At one point in the conference, he recalled, Mr. Mazzoli said that people were
being encouraged to ''buy American'' and to ''build American'' and should be
able to ''hire American'' without being accused of employment discrimination.

'It's at Least Understandable'


Mr. Simpson, at another point in the conference, said, ''It's proper, or at
least understandable, that an employer may prefer to give a job to an American
citizen rather than to a citizen of another country who is here with work
authority.''

Senator Simpson said today that he ''did not sense any nativist or racist tone''
in any of the negotiations, and Mr. Mazzoli agreed. Both said that aliens should
be able to work in this country, free from discrimination.

Dale Frederick Swartz, president of the National Immigration, Refugee and
Citizenship Forum, a private group that closely followed the Simpson-Mazzoli
bill, said the legislation still had a 10 percent chance of being adopted.

''The bill,'' he said, ''is dead unless Simpson and the Republicans are willing
to accept substantial protections against discrimination for all persons
lawfully in this country.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              49 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             September 27, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

NO MEETINGS SEEN ON ALIENS MEASURE

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section B; Page 10, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1128 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Sept. 26


Congressional efforts to draft a comprehensive immigration bill broke down today
over the question of job protection for legal aliens, and lawmakers from both
parties said they saw no way to resolve the impasse.

In the absence of agreement the bill, representing the most sweeping change in
immigration law in years, would die with this Congress, which is tentatively
scheduled to adjourn Oct. 4 or 5.

Conferees from the two houses of Congress adjourned this evening after nine days
of negotiations that resolved most differences between the bills passed by the
Senate in May 1983 and by the House of Representatives in June of this year.

The negotiators could reconvene before Congress adjourns, but there was no plan
for another meeting and lawmakers indicated that the bill was moribund.

All pending legislation dies at the end of a Congress, which lasts for two
years. Efforts to overhaul the immigration law would have to start again next
year after the election if members wanted to continue the effort.

'Pretty Close' to Dead

Asked whether the bill was dead, Representative E. (Kika) de la Garza, Democrat
of Texas, said tonight, ''You never know in the legislative process, but I would
say it's pretty close.''

Senator Alan K. Simpson, the Wyoming Republican who was chief sponsor of the
Senate bill, said the negotiations were at ''the end of the line,'' and he
added: ''We have reached a standoff, a true sticking point. I regret that we
could not or have not reached an accommodation here.''

The conferees had already agreed on the core of the bill, which would for the
first time have established fines and prison terms for employers who knowingly
hired illegal aliens. The bill would also have offered legal status to illegal
aliens who entered the United States before Jan. 1, 1981, and have lived here
continuously since then.

The deadlock was over the question of how to prevent employers from
discriminating against legal aliens, including immigrants, refugees and illegal
aliens who obtained legal status under the bill.

'Unprecedented Course'


By a vote of 404 to 9, the House in June approved a provision that would have
outlawed such discrimination and permitted victims to file complaints against
employers before a new Justice Department agency, the United States Immigration
Board.

A majority of the House conferees stood fast in support of that provision,
originally offered by Representative Barney Frank, a Massachusetts Democrat.
However, Senator Simpson said the Senate conferees could not accept it because
it would ''chart an unprecedented course in civil rights law,'' granting greater
protection to aliens, in his view, than citizens have. The Reagan Administration
did not publicly take a position on the provision, but privately expressed
objections to it while supporting the overall bill.

The House conferees voted 14 to 9 tonight to offer the Senate a revised version
of Mr. Frank's amendment, designed to protect the civil rights of legal aliens
and citizens of Hispanic origin. The revision was proposed by Representative
Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky, the chief sponsor of the House bill.
All 14 aye votes were cast by Democrats. Eight Republicans and one Democrat
voted against the proposal.

Senator Simpson said the Senate ''does not concur'' in the proposal.
Representative Hamilton Fish Jr., Republican of upstate New York, said: ''This
is the most overblown issue in the conference. In the scale of societal values,
it is just not that important.''

Growing Opposition Seen


But Representative Peter W. Rodino Jr., the New Jersey Democrat who is chairman
of the conference, said in an interview: ''This is a core issue. It goes to the
heart of employer sanctions. How inconsistent would it be to legalize these
illegal aliens, but then tell them they could not work in this country? In
addition, we have 500,000 legal immigrants come into the country each year. What
about their rights?''

The Simpson-Mazzoli bill would make the most significant changes in immigration
law in more than three decades. In the midst of the debate over the rights of
legal aliens, Roger L. Conner, executive director of the Federation for American
Immigration Reform, which organized support for the bill, said: ''It would be a
shame for a ship as big as this to founder on a rock as small as this. The
conferees have resolved issues of far greater seriousness.''

In the last few days, however, there was growing opposition to other elements of
the package approved by the conferees. Farmers, labor unions and the National
Association of Counties joined Hispanic groups in expressing opposition to the
bill this week for various reasons. The county officials contended that the bill
did not provide enough money to pay the costs of health, education and welfare
benefits for illegal aliens who would have gained legal status.

The final compromise offered by Mr. Mazzoli would have revised an 1870 civil
rights statute to prohibit discrimination in employment contracts. The 1870 law,
like the 14th Amendment to the Constitution, provides civil rights guarantees
not just for citizens, but for ''all persons'' in the United States. The Supreme
Court said in 1971 that ''the protection of this statute has been held to extend
to aliens as well as to citizens.''

Attempts to Avoid Blame


Mr. Mazzoli said Congress could make clear, by statute, that ''all persons''
included aliens and refugees for their first seven years of legal residence in
the United States. Republican conferees said they could not accept the proposal
because it would have created a new Government bureaucracy to enforce newly
created civil rights for legal aliens. ''This is almost indefensible as far as
the average person is concerned,'' Mr. Fish said.

Republicans and Democrats alike sought to avoid blame for the failure of the
conference to reach agreement. Mr. Simpson said ''the record ought to show''
that he originally supported the idea of extending civil rights laws, like the
1870 statute, to prevent discrimination under the employer sanctions authorized
by his bill. But, he said, he could not accept the new bureaucratic apparatus
envisioned by Mr. Frank and Mr. Mazzoli.

Democrats said that they had done nothing to stall or obstruct the work of the
conference, which held its first meeting Sept. 13.

The immigration bill culminates more than a decade of efforts to curtail illegal
immigration and to prevent the exploitation of alien workers. The House twice
approved employer sanctions in the early 1970's, only to see the bills die in
the Senate. An earlier version of the Simpson-Mazzoli bill died on the floor of
the House in December 1982.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Peter Rodino Jr. and Garner Cline

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              50 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             September 26, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

Five Bills for the Eleventh Hour As the days dwindle down, Congress always
leaves unfinished business, and that's never so painful as in an election year.
It means legislation must start all over again next year. There's no chance, for
instance, that Congress can finish a big bill to rewrite Federal banking
regulation. The Simpson- Mazzoli immigration reform bill, which died in the 97th
Congress, may yet cross the finish line in time and do honor to the 98th. If
not, it too will have to begin again.

SECTION: Section A; Page 22, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 41 words


But there's precious little time left, with Congress planning to leave Oct. 4,
just eight or nine legislative days from now. There are at least five pieces of
legislation that, practically speaking, can be finished and richly deserve to
be:


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: editorial

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              51 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             September 26, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRANTS BILL CONFERENCE DEADLOCKS ON ALIEN'S RIGHTS

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section A; Page 20, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 700 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Sept 25


House and Senate negotiators drafting a comprehensive immigration bill broke up
tonight without reaching agreement on the last outstanding issue, involving the
civil rights of legal aliens.

The conferees, in their eighth day of work on the legislation, voted on two
separate proposals designed to prevent employers from discriminating against
aliens who are legally present in the United States.

By a vote of 13 to 10, the House conferees adopted a proposal offered by
Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky, the chief sponsor of the
House bill. But the chief negotiator for the Senate, Alan K. Simpson, Republican
of Wyoming, said that Mr. Mazzoli's proposal was unacceptable to the Senate.

Senator Simpson then offered a proposal of his own, which the House conferees
rejected by a vote of 14 to 9. Thus, the conference committee adjourned this
evening in a stalemate, with plans to reconvene on Wednesday.

Hispanic Critics' Position

Critics of the bill, led by Hispanic members of Congress, have asserted that
discrimination by employers was likely to occur because the bill would for the
first time authorize the Government to impose fines and prison terms on
employers who knowingly hire illegal aliens.

Senator Simpson told the conferees that although he had been working on the
problem of illegal aliens for six years, he said he would prefer to have no bill
than one that gave aliens an advantage over citizens in seeking jobs.

Mr. Simpson said the Senate could not accept a provision of the House bill that
would forbid employers to discriminate against legal aliens and give the victims
of such discrimination a right to file complaints with a new agency in the
Justice Department. In June, the House adopted that provision, proposed by
Representative Barney Frank, a Massachusetts Democrat.

The disagreement over this issue has been evident virtually from the beginning
of the conference.

Effort to Break Deadline


Representative Mazzoli offered a compromise proposal today that he said would
guarantee civil rights for legal aliens while putting ''reasonable limits'' on
their ability to file complaints of job discrimination.

Mr. Mazzoli's proposal would prohibit employers from discriminating against
permanent resident aliens, refugees and illegal aliens who obtain legal status
udner the bill. It would not protect foreign students or tourists from other
countries.

Under Mr. Mazzoli's proposal, a citizen could file a complaint charging that he
had been denied a job in favor of an alien, just as a legal alien could file a
complaint charging discrimination in favor of a citizen.

The allegations would be investigated by the special counsel to a new Justice
Department agency, the United States Immigration Board.

Senator Simpson's Plan


Under Mr. Mazzoli's proposal, the Immigration Board could order an employer to
stop discriminatory practices and could award victims of discrimination up to
two years' back pay. Aliens could not file class actions as a group.

Mr. Simpson's proposal, also designed to prevent employment discrimination,
would have reinforced existing laws that forbid discrimination on the basis of
race, national origin and religion.

Senator Simpson, in a somber, rueful tone, asked his colleagues: ''Is there any
historical support or any kind of considered, contemporary record to support
this kind of amendment? This proposal charts for us an unprecedented course in
civil rights law. This is not a civil rights bill.''

Meanwhile, Jane O'Grady, a lobbyist for the American Federation of Labor and
Congress of Industrial Organizations, said that organized labor could not
support the bill as it now stands because a provision that would make it easier
for farmers to bring aliens into the country for agricultural labor did not
provide enough protection for domestic workers.

Representative Sid Morrison, a Republican from Washington State who supported
the compromise on foreign workers last week, said today that he would probably
vote against the bill on final passage because it did not adequately address the
needs of agricultural employers in his state.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              52 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             September 26, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION BILL STALEMATE

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 3; Foreign Desk

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: House and Senate conferees before start of session at which they failed
to reach a compromise on the issue involving employment of legal aliens. From
left: Senator Alan K. Simpson, Representatives Romano L.  Mazzoli, E. (Kika) de
la Garza and Peter W. Rodino Jr. Page A20.  The New York Times/George Tames

TYPE: caption

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              53 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 25, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

CONFEREES APPROVE A REPRIEVE FOR FARMERS ON END OF HIRING ALIENS

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section A; Page 18, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 809 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Sept. 24


House and Senate conferees, nearing final agreement on a comprehensive
immigration bill, decided today to give farmers three years longer than other
employers to discontinue hiring illegal aliens.

The negotiators also adopted a statement of principle saying that illegal aliens
who come forward to obtain legal status should not be subject to penalties for
back taxes owed to the Federal Government. Some members of Congress had
expressed concern that the Internal Revenue Service might try to collect back
taxes and penalties from such aliens, as well as from businesses that failed to
withhold taxes from their wages.

The conferees said they expected to finish work on the immigration bill Tuesday
but still have one major issue to resolve: how to prevent job discrimination
against legal aliens and United States citizens of Hispanic origin.

Critics of the bill have said such discrimination might occur because the
measure would make employers subject for the first time to penalties for hiring
illegal aliens. The critics contend that, to avoid the penalties, employers
might shun job applicants with a foreign accent or dark skin, even if they were
legal aliens or citizens.

Frank and Simpson Negotiating

The House in June approved an amendment offered by Representative Barney Frank,
a Massachusetts Democrat, to prohibit discrimination against legal aliens.
Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming, the chief sponsor of the Senate
bill, has resisted the amendment, saying there was no need or precedent for it.
He and Mr. Frank, who was in Massachusetts today, said they were still
discussing the issue.

The provision that conferees agreed on today would set up an ''agricultural
labor transition program'' giving farmers three years to adjust to the ban on
employment of illegal aliens. If the bill becomes law, the transition program
would start after six months. In the first year, farmers could employ the same
number of illegal aliens as in the past. They would have to reduce the number of
alien workers by a third each year and would have to discontinue use of such
workers after three years.

Nonagricultural employers, after a six-month education period, could be fined or
imprisoned for hiring illegal aliens.

On Friday, the conferees approved a separate proposal to assist farmers and
ranchers, especially West Coast growers of fruit and vegetables. The proposal
would make it easier for farmers to bring aliens into the United States for
seasonal work harvesting produce.

A Race Against the Clock


Representative Howard L. Berman, a California Democrat who fought this proposal
unsuccessfully on Friday, said today that he would continue the fight on the
floor of the House if the bill came up. The proposal, he said, would create ''a
Government-sponsored union-busting program.''

Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, a Kentucky Democrat who is the chief sponsor
of the House bill, said the proposal on seasonal workers was a compromise
accommodating the interests of growers and organized labor.

The bill now faces a race against the clock, since Congress is scheduled to
adjourn Oct. 4 or 5. The House Speaker, Thomas P. O'Neill Jr., said he would
bring the bill to the floor if a conference agreement got clearance from the
House Rules Committee. The bill needs a special rule granting immunity from
points of order because, technically, the conference report goes beyond the area
of disagreement between the two houses concerning temporary foreign workers.

Farm Group Announces Opposi

tion


Despite the special provisions for agricultural employers, the American Farm
Bureau Federation, which describes itself as the nation's largest farm
organization, with 3.3 million members, today announced its opposition to the
legislation.

Bureau officials said they would try to defeat the measure because it did not
adequately address the needs of producers of perishable commodities. They also
criticized the conferees for rejecting a House provision that said employer
sanctions would not apply to employers of three or fewer workers.

Senator Simpson has assured Speaker O'Neill that he would not ask the House to
act on the conference report without first getting a promise from President
Reagan to sign the legislation. Administration officials met today with David A.
Stockman, director of the Office of Management and Budget, to determine whether
the costs of the bill were acceptable.

Mr. Simpson estimated that the bill would cost $6.4 billion over four years.
That includes $4 billion in social service benefits for illegal aliens who
obtain legal status under the legislation. He estimated it would cost $2.4
billion is for enforcement activities and for administration of a program to
grant legal status to many illegal aliens who are already here.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Rep. Peter Rodino Jr.

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              54 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 24, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION ARTERIOSCLEROSIS

BYLINE: By Peter H. Schuck ;
Peter H. Schuck is a professor at the Yale Law School.

SECTION: Section A; Page 19, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 706 words

DATELINE: NEW HAVEN


With the Simpson- Mazzoli immigration bill temporarily on hold, it is time for
Congress to confront a fundamental dilemma. Strengthening immigration
enforcement without building up the rest of the administrative system would be a
perverse ''reform.'' By increasing the already large number of aliens who
languish in overcrowded prisons for long periods of time, more arrests would
simply shift the problem somewhere else.

Immigration enforcement is like a giant funnel. However large its mouth, a
funnel's capacity is limited by the size of its throat, through which the
material must eventually pass. Strengthened immigration enforcement is pouring
more and more aliens into an already overburdened funnel whose mouth and throat
remain essentially unchanged in size.

Immigration and Naturalization Service arrests have risen dramatically, from
910,361 in 1980 to 1.25 million in 1983. Simpson-Mazzoli's keystone, employer
sanctions, would add enforcement by private firms to the I.N.S.'s own efforts.
Even if they deterred some illegal aliens from entering this country, employer
sanctions would pour more apprehended aliens into the system. More important,
the I.N.S.'s new budget would increase the Border Patrol by almost one- third,
producing about 450,000 more apprehensions a year.

This enhanced enforcement capability seems like an impressive way to regain
control of our borders - until one considers how the system would handle the
nearly 1.7 million aliens who would enter it. Its holding capacity - the number
of apprehended aliens it can seek to deport - depends upon two factors: the
I.N.S.'s ability to ''detain'' (impris

on) them pending disposition of their cases and its willingness to release them
during that period.  I.N.S. detention facilities are makeshift, short-term units
whose living conditions have been severely criticized by Federal courts and
other observers. These facilities often are filled beyond capacity. Of the
aliens detained, 7 percent have been held for more than four months and some far
longer. The I.N.S. estimates that 100,000 more aliens captured each year by an
enlarged Border Patrol would have to be detained. If even a modest fraction of
these applied for asylum, which can take years to resolve, the detention period
would continue to lengthen.

This torrent must flow through immigration courts, which adjudicate each
exclusion and deportation case. They consist of 57 judges, increasing next year
to only 62. They will have received more than 125,000 applications this year, a
large increase over previous years. Although they can dispose of many cases
quickly, the growing caseload insures that already serious processing delays
will worsen. The I.N.S. can release some aliens pending hearings, but many
cannot make bond and some who are released would disappear into the population
or change by their status by, say, marrying a citizen, thus preventing their
deportation.  Two new developments could worsen the bottleneck. First, more
aliens might apply to judges for asylum; merely applying can delay deportation
proceedings for years. In the first half of 1984, such applications rose 50
percent. Second, more apprehended aliens could seek to remain by invoking
procedural rights rather than agreeing - as 98 percent do - to ''voluntary
departure,'' under which they can leave without formal proceedings. If even a
small fraction of those who accept voluntary departure asked for deportation
hearings, claimed asylum or applied for amnesty under Simpson-Mazzoli, the
funnel's throat would further constrict, collapsing the enforcement system. The
result would be mass, costly imprisonment, with immense suffering, or mass
release of aliens pending long- delayed hearings, with adverse effects on
immigration control.  Congress can no longer hope to enforce immigration law on
the cheap. It should not increase enforcement through employer sanctions and a
beefed up Border Patrol without also expanding immigration courts' capacity.
Congress must also face squarely the human implications of transforming the
I.N.S. into a long- term jailer of noncriminals whose values most Americans
admire. Otherwise, we shall see yet another example of ''reform'' gone awry.B

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: drawing

TYPE: OP-ED

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              55 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             September 22, 1984, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION BILL CONFEREES REACH A MAJOR COMPROMISE

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section 1; Page 6, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 896 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Sept. 21


House and Senate negotiators, trying to resolve differences on immigration
legislation, today approved a major compromise that would make it easier for
farmers to import foreign workers. The action virtually assures that the
conferees can agree on a comprehensive immigration bill.

By a vote of 16 to 9, the House negotiators agreed to accept the compromise on
temporary foreign workers proposed by Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of
Wyoming, the chief negotiator on behalf of the Senate.

Supporters and opponents of the legislation said that acceptance of the
compromise substantially improved the prospects for a successful House- Senate
conference and for final passage of the legislation. The question of temporary
foreign workers was the most divisive issue in the bill, pitting organized labor
against agricultural interests.

Representative Peter W. Rodino Jr., Democrat of New Jersey, the chairman of the
conference, said the negotiators would meet again Monday. At that time, they may
be able to finish work on the legislation, which would have to be approved by
both houses of Congress and go to the President before it could become law.

Opponents Plan Strategy

Opponents of the legislation were already planning strategy to block or defeat
the bill on the floor of the House, where the original legislation was passed in
June by a five-vote margin. Congress is scheduled to adjourn Oct. 4 or 5.

Senator Simpson said he expected President Reagan to sign the bill if it got to
his desk, because the conferees had kept the costs within limits specified by
the White House. The bill, as shaped in six days of negotiations, would
establish fines and prison terms for employers who knowingly hired illegal
aliens and would offer legal status to several million aliens who illegally
entered the United States before Jan. 1, 1981.

The conferees today abandoned a provision of the House-passed bill that would
have created a program allowing farmers to import aliens for up to 11 months a
year to harvest perishable fruits and vegetables. The Senate bill would have
made it easier for farmers to import workers but it did not create a special
program for producers of perishable crops.

The compromise would liberalize the existing law that governs issuance of visas
to foreign workers. It would allow an alien worker to have a contract with a
specific employer or association of agricultural producers. The employer would
first have to try to recruit workers in this country. The State Department would
not issue a visa unless the farmer filed a petition with the Labor Department
asserting that the use of aliens ''will not adversely affect the wages and
working conditions'' of domestic workers.

In cases where farmers had a ''critical need,'' the Secretary of Labor would
have to rule on their petitions within 72 hours and could waive the requirement
for recruiting domestic workers.

Unions Say Protections Weakened

Supporters of the compromise said it retained most of the labor standards and
safeguards in current law, but labor unions said it weakened protections for
workers.

The foreign worker program in the House bill was designed by Representatives
Leon E. Panetta, Democrat of California, and Sid Morrison, Republican of
Washington, both of whom supported the compromise offered by Senator Simpson.

Mr. Panetta said: ''This is not a good compromise if you are opposed to the
bill, if you want no bill so you can continue to exploit illegal aliens. There
are no regulations, no safeguards, no rights now.'' Referring to the situation
of illegal aliens, Mr. Panetta said: ''There is slavery right now with nothing
to protect these people. I want a bill because I want an end to the abuse and
exploitation of illegal aliens.''

The conferees broke another deadlock today by voting to authorize Federal
payments of $1 billion a year to cover the costs of providing health, education
and other social-service benefits to illegal aliens who obtain legal status
under the bill. The vote among the House conferees was 19 to 7. The newly legal
aliens would be ineligible for food stamps and the main Federal welfare program,
but could receive school meals, job training and maternal and child health
services subsidized by the Federal Government.

Momentum Is Regained

With today's action, supporters of the bill regained momentum they had lost in
the last two days.

Patrick H. Quinn, executive vice president of the National Council of
Agricultural Employers, a trade association, said, ''The compromise is a
significant improvement over existing law and will accommodate the needs of East
Coast growers, but it falls far short of meeting the needs of Western
agriculture and will be unacceptable to large numbers of West Coast growers.''

Dolores C. Huerta, vice president of the United Farm Workers of America, said
the compromise adopted today would have ''a disastrous effect on farm workers.''
She predicted that many employers would be unwilling to sign contracts with her
union because they could import foreign workers at lower wages with fewer fringe
benefits.

However, Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky, chief sponsor
of the House bill, said the compromise ''represents a good-faith effort to
accommodate the competing interests of agricultural labor and growers.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Romano Mazzoli, Peter Rodino and Alan Simpson

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              56 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             September 20, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION BILL IS AT AN IMPASSE

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section A; Page 23, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 672 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Sept 19


House and Senate conferees who are drafting a comprehensive immigration bill
broke up this evening in disagreement over how to prevent job discrimination
against legal aliens and United States citizens of Hispanic origin.

After making progress in three days of negotiations on the bill, the conference
committee reached an impasse on the discrimination issue and adjourned this
evening until Thursday, when they will resume deliberations.

Led by Representative Peter W. Rodino Jr., Democrat of New Jersey, the House
negotiators remained steadfast in support of a provision in the House bill that
would, for the first time, prohibit employers from discriminating against legal
aliens in the hiring or recruitment of workers.

The chief negotiator on behalf of the Senate, Alan K. Simpson, Republican of
Wyoming, objected to the provision, saying it would break new ground for which
there was no precedent in civil rights law.

Issue of Seasonal Workers


Another major issue, seasonal workers, also remained unresolved when the
conferees adjourned.

Representative Leon E. Panetta, a California Democrat, said that in private
negotiations with sponsors of the legislation, he had not reached any agreement
on his proposal to establish a program to bring aliens into the United States to
do seasonal work harvesting perishable fruit and vegetables. The House approved
the proposal by 228 to 172 in June, but the Senate-passed bill contains no such
program.

The cooperative spirit evident in the first three days of negotiations has
encouraged supporters of the bill to believe it might be finally adopted before
the Congressional adjournment, tentatively scheduled for Oct. 4 or 5.

But Mr. Panetta said: ''There are a lot of land mines out there between this
conference and the end of the Congressional session. There are new land mines
being planted every day, even though the conferees are all working in good
faith.''

If the bill became law, it would make the most sweeping changes in immigration
law since 1952. The Senate bill, sponsored by Senator Simpson, was passed by a
vote of 76 to 18 in May 1983. The House bill, introduced by Representative
Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky, was approved by 216 to 211 in June. The
purpose of the conference is to reconcile differences between the two versions.

Key Provision on Employers


The conferees deadlocked on a provision of the House bill that would, for the
first time, prohibit employers from discriminating against legal aliens in the
hiring or recruitment of workers. The bill would create a special office within
the Justice Department to investigate complaints that a person had suffered
discrimination because he was an alien or because of his national origin.

Hispanic groups and many Democrats have said there was an increased potential
for such discrimination because, under another section of the bill, employers
who hire illegal aliens would be subject to fines and prison terms.

Representative Barney Frank, the sponsor of the antidiscrimination proposal,
said, ''People who are in the United States legally ought to be able to compete
for jobs on equal terms,'' whether they are citizens or legal aliens.

''This,'' he said, ''was never a controversial issue until some big-business
groups got upset about it'' after the House approved his proposal. The House
adopted the proposal by a vote of 404 to 9, with 150 Republicans supporting it.
The Senate rejected a similar proposal.

Mr. Simpson objected to Mr. Frank's proposal. Under the proposal, he said, if an
employer chose to hire a citizen over a permanent resident alien, the employer
would be subject to a complaint of discrimination. ''I cannot sell that in
Wyoming,'' the Senator said. ''Indeed, I can't sell that anywhere.''

Mr. Mazzoli, while supporting the idea of a special counsel to investigate
complaints of job discrimination, said Mr. Frank's proposal went too far. He
said it would give legal aliens more rights than citizens had.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              57 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 18, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

ACCORD IN CONGRESS SETS '81 CUTOFF DATE FOR ALIEN AMNESTY

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 883 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Sept. 17


House and Senate negotiators drafting a comprehensive immigration bill agreed
today to offer legal status to illegal aliens who entered the United States
before Jan. 1, 1981, and have lived here continuously since then.

The agreement split the difference between the House and Senate on one of the
most sensitive questions in the bill. The House's version of the bill had set
the date at Jan. 1, 1982. The Senate had specified Jan. 1, 1980.

Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming, chief sponsor of the Senate
bill, said the ''legalization is an extraordinary act of grace, unprecedented in
our law.''

The agreement came on the third day of negotiations on the immigration bill.
Participants and observers have expressed surprise at the progress being made in
the negotiations, despite the political volatility of the issue in an election
year.

The key elements of the bill, including the legalization program and penalties
against employers who knowingly hire illegal aliens, are now in place. But the
bill cannot become law unless it is approved in the same form by both houses of
Congress and signed by the President.

Immigration officials estimated that two million to three million illegal aliens
might be eligible for the program approved by the conferees today. But estimates
of the illegal alien population are notoriously unreliable.  Under the
conference agreement, illegal aliens who entered the United States before Jan.
1, 1977, and have lived here continuously since then could become lawful
permanent resident aliens. They could apply for citizenship after five years as
lawful permanent residents.

Illegal aliens who entered this country from Jan. 1, 1977, through Dec. 31,
1980, would qualify for temporary resident status.

Knowledge of United States


After two years as temporary residents, they could apply for permanent resident
status. To become permanent residents, they would have to demonstrate a
''minimal understanding of ordinary English and a knowledge and understanding of
the history and government of the United States,'' or they would have to show
that they were enrolled in courses to achieve such knowledge in all three areas.
The course of study would have to be one approved by the Attorney General.

Aliens could offer rent receipts, paycheck stubs and other such documents as
evidence of continuous residence in the United States. They could also submit
affidavits as ''independent corroboration'' of the documents.

Senator Simpson and others expressed concern that some illegal aliens might use
forged or counterfeit documents to show they were entitled to legal status. The
Government could ask for additional evidence when there was doubt about the
documents.

One Level of Review


The conferees agreed that an illegal alien who applied unsuccessfully for legal
status could appeal to an administrative review board in the Justice Department,
but there would be only one level of review. Senator Simpson said it was
important to prevent the long series of appeals that have, in recent years,
delayed the expulsion of some aliens seeking asylum in the United States.

Representative Bill McCollum, a Florida Republican, said the eligibility date
for aliens seeking legal status was, politically, the most important element in
the bill.

Representative Carlos J. Moorhead, a California Republican, said, ''Our local
officials are frightened to death of what will happen if a 1982 date is picked,
because of the cost to local government.'' More aliens could have qualified for
legal status under the 1982 date of the House bill, which passed by a five-vote
margin, than under the date of the Senate bill.

'Harshness and Generosity'


But Representative Barney Frank, a Massachusetts Democrat, said in support of
the 1982 date in the House bill, said: ''We seek a balance of harshness and
generosity that will be properly humane and effective. It's not healthy to have
these people hanging around here with no legal way to earn a living and
disbarred from welfare.''

Hispanic groups said the legalization program was surrounded with many
restrictions and requirements that would discourage illegal aliens from taking
advantage of it.

''It's a sham,'' said Charles Kamasaki, a policy analyst for the National
Council of La Raza, a Hispanic civil rights organization. The 1981 eligibility
date, the English-language requirement and the distinction between temporary and
permanent residents would all reduce the effectiveness of the program, he said.

Joe M. Trevino of the League of United Latin American Citizens said the 1981
eligibility date was ''a clear indication that Congress is trying to restrict
the number of eligible participants.'' As a result, he said, a sizable ''shadow
population'' of illegal aliens would remain even if the bill passed.

In other action today, the conferees agreed to drop a section of the Senate bill
expressing the sense of Congress that ''English is the official language of the
United States.''

The conferees also dropped a section of the House bill expressing the sense of
Congress that Salvadorans facing deportation should be allowed to remain in this
country until the situation in their homeland changed so as to permit them to
return safely.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              58 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 18, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

9,706 NEW CITIZENS HEAR BUSH

BYLINE: By JANE PERLEZ

SECTION: Section B; Page 7, Column 4; National Desk

LENGTH: 342 words

DATELINE: FORT LAUDERDALE, Fla., Sept. 17


Vice President Bush attended a mass swearing-in of new citizens in the Orange
Bowl in Miami today, saying he had come on ''a nonpartisan mission in a fairly
partisan time.''

After Mr. Bush walked into the stadium for what the Immigration and
Naturalization Service called the largest single swearing-in of new citizens,
chants of ''Four More Years'' rose from the crowd. The service said 9,706 new
citizens were present, most of them Cuban-Americans.

In his brief speech Mr. Bush did not mention the Presidential campaign
specifically. But he told the new citizens in the crowd, which filled one- third
of the large outdoor stadium, to treasure their right to vote.

''I hope you will teach your childen how important the vote is,'' he said, ''for
with the vote, American citizens influence those who occupy powerful office to
use its power justly and for purposes of freedom.''

Passage From Reagan Speech


He then recited a passage from President Reagan's acceptance speech at the
Republican National Convention, in which Mr. Reagan had referred to the United
States as having a ''rich mixture of races, creeds and nationalities.''

Mr. Bush's press secretary, Peter Teeley, said the naturalization ceremony was a
''good event for us,'' adding, ''You know when they register they're going to be
voting for Reagan- Bush.''

In a state that the Republicans expect to carry without any trouble, Mr. Teeley
said that by Oct. 6 the Dade County Republicans expected to have registered
70,000 new Republican voters since the beginning of the year, bringing the tally
of registered Republicans in the county to 210,000.

At a news conference at Miami airport after arriving from Washington on Air
Force Two, Mr. Bush said the Democrats running for office were trying to avoid
association with Walter F. Mondale, the Democratic Presidential nominee.

The Vice President said that after Mr. Mondale pledged to raise taxes, ''All
Democrats running with him are going over the hill with their tails in the air
like antelope.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              59 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 17, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

ILLEGAL ALIENS: IMPACT IN CITY IS UNCERTAIN

BYLINE: By ELAINE SCIOLINO

SECTION: Section B; Page 1, Column 5; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 2009 words


Most of the illegal aliens in New York City have jobs and earn as much as legal
aliens, and most pay Social Security taxes and some income taxes, according to
many immigration specialists.

Researchers also believe that the presence of a vast illegal population in New
York tends to keep wages low and working conditions poor and that many illegal
aliens have successfully and fraudulently enrolled in public-assistance
programs.

As a result, the role of illegal aliens in the city's economy is a mixture of
often-conflicting benefits and drains that has defied systematic analysis by
economists and immigration experts.

Most government agencies, sensitive to charges of discrimination, are reluctant
to single out particular ethnic and racial groups and, therefore, data based on
national origins or even places of birth is not readily available.

'A Child Is a Child'


The Board of Education, probably the agency most used by illegal aliens, asks
for birth certificates only as proof of a child's age. The board gets state aid
for illegal aliens, as it does for all students.

''A child is a child, and we don't investigate whether he is here illegally or
not,'' a board spokesman, Gloria Lesser, said. ''It's not an issue.''

A four-year-old suit by the city and state against the Census Bureau contends
that minority groups, including illegal aliens, were undercounted in the 1980
Census, depriving the city and state of a rightful share of Congressional
representation and Federal revenue sharing. A decision is expected in Federal
court by the end of the year.

There is no agreement on the number of illegal aliens in the city. There are
200,000 according to one analysis of the 1980 Census, 500,000 according to many
academicians and the New York district office of the Immigration and
Naturalization Service, and 750,000 according to the City Planning Commission.

The Census Bureau has said that if there was undercounting, at least $9.40 in
revenue sharing would be lost for each person not counted. The city and state
argue that the estimate should be more than doubled.

Loss of $2.8 Million a Year

Even if the immigration service estimate is correct and the city's is too high,
an undercounting of 300,000 would mean that New York is losing a minimum of $2.8
million a year in revenue sharing.

To help identify trends among all foreign- born people in New York - legal as
well as illegal - the Planning Commission began a study a year ago that it
expects to complete next year.

A Planning Commission memo last March on the status of the study highlights the
difficulties of the task.

''City agencies do not seem to have standardized policies about reporting
illegals to the I.N.S., and there is no consistency in how these issues are
handled,'' it said. ''Similarly, the I.N.S. has no hard and fast policy on the
types of cases it will prosecute and those it will ignore.''

Last July, Mayor Koch created an Office of Immigrant Affairs at the Planning
Commission to complete the study and coordinate services for immigrants. The
head of the office, Elizabeth Bogen, said: ''There's been a laissez-faire
attitude to studying illegal aliens, because people in the power structure tend
to believe they don't cause much of a problem and because the issue is such a
political hot potato that discussing it would cause more harm than good. That's
why we've decided to study the impact of all aliens, without getting hung up on
the issue of illegals per se.''

Despite the absence of a comprehensive survey, several conclusions about the
cost-benefit ratio of illegal aliens can be made, according to immigration
specialists.

Comparison With Other Workers


A recent Gallup poll found that most Americans believed illegal aliens ended up
on welfare and raised tax burdens. That view is disputed by almost all
immigration specialists, who say most illegal aliens have jobs.

A study by New York University in 1981 on immigrants from the Dominican Republic
in three city neighborhoods found that almost all legal and illegal immigrants
worked and that they found jobs within a week after they started to look for
them.

The study also found that there was almost no difference in job experience or
income levels of aliens based on legal status and that most aliens earned at
least the minimum wage.

''Illegals are generally working people, and the notion that they cost society a
great deal is a myth,'' said Glauco Perez, a Ph.D. candidate in political
science at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology and executive assistant for
policy and program development at the New York City Human Resources
Adminstration.

Wages in Restaurants


Other academics say that well over half the illegal population pays Social
Security and Federal, state and local income taxes. They say that although
illegal aliens are helping to pay for Social Security, most will never receive
the benefits.

A study this year by Thomas Bailey, a research associate at Columbia University,
based on interviews with 90 New York restaurant owners and managers, found
legality made little difference in what immigrant restaurant workers were paid,
although they were ''willing to take restaurant work at wages well below those
that would be acceptable to large numbers of native- born adult male blacks.''

Some economists say that low wages keep labor costs and retail prices down,
which in turn allow industries facing severe competition to survive. They say
that without low-wage immigrant labor, the garment industry, for example, would
have to move many of its operations overseas to remain competitive, and dozens
of ethnic restaurants would have to go out of business.

Because illegal aliens are willing to work hard and not complain, the economists
said, they tend to be a favored work force in a number of industries.

'Willingness to Work'


In a study of Southern California in the 1970's, Thomas Muller, an economist
with the Urban Institute, a nonprofit research organization in Washington that
studies social and political issues, found that employers preferred undocumented
workers for their ''willingness to work under poorer conditions to those
acceptable to most Americans, low absenteeism and solid work habits.''

It is generally accepted that illegal aliens have to work more for less,
especially if their employers are aware of their illegal status.

''I have a good boss, I work hard, I don't complain and I don't have any
problems,'' said a 23-year-old Salvadoran man who packs vegetables for the
minimum wage, $3.35 an hour, in Brooklyn.

Many illegal aliens function just like citizens - not only working and paying
taxes, but also getting promotions.

One 26-year-old woman from India, who arrived here in 1979 and paid an American
man $3,000 to marry her, has been living in the United States illegally ever
since the Immigration Service discovered her fraudulent marriage.

She has used a valid Social Security card - issued to her only for the purpose
of opening a bank account - to get a variety of jobs, including a clerk in a
jewelry store, a laundry worker, a dishwasher in a bakery and a counter person
at McDonald's and Burger King. Some of her employers paid her as little as $2 an
hour. Many aliens misuse their cards in this way.

'Grateful for America'


She now does word processing at a New York brokerage concern for $16,000 a year.

''Every year I file my tax return, just like everyone else,'' she said. ''I'm
grateful for America, for giving me the chance to stand on my own two feet.''

She used her own name, Social Security number and her file number for an
application for permanent residence status that she received when she and her
husband were first interviewed by the Immigration Service. Neither the
Immigration Service nor the I.R.S. has made cases like hers a top priority. No
effort is now being made to deport her.

Illegal aliens cannot avoid sales taxes or indirect property taxes, such as
those figured in rental charges. But many are paid their salaries in cash ''off
the books'' and never pay income tax.  ''Living in New York takes big money,''
said a 32-year-old South Korean graduate student, who cannot legally work on his
student visa. He supplements money he receives from his family by working at an
Oriental publication for $4 an hour in cash.

''I feel guilty working and not paying taxes, but morally I have the right to
exist and work while I'm studying in New York,'' he said.

Illegal aliens are ineligible for public assistance programs, and only sketchy
estimates of their fraudulent use exist.

Effect on Assistance


In a study based on interviews with nearly 800 apprehended illegal aliens, David
S. North, a political scientist with the New TransCentury Foundation in
Washington, said that illegal aliens made substantial but below- average use of
tax-supported programs and that legal immigrants made average use of them.

It is somewhat easier for illegal aliens to receive unemployment benefits than
public assistance. Most workers whose employers pay them legally are covered by
unemployment insurance, and many aliens belong to unions that help them in
applying for unemployment.

Illegal aliens have the greatest impact on the health-care and education
systems. They try to avoid going to private doctors because of the expense and
tend to rely on public hospitals, particularly emergency and delivery rooms, for
care. The City Health and Hospitals Corporation estimates that unreimbursed
inpatient care of illegal aliens in New York costs $28 million a year.

''I try never to get sick,'' said the young woman from India. ''When I need
medical care, I ask a friend who's married to a doctor to get a prescription for
me.''

Competition for Resources


Voluntary agencies said there was little they could do to help aliens. ''Once in
a while, we can help with a doctor or even an operation, but there's nothing we
can do if the alien needs $400 a day inpatient hospital care,'' said the Rev.
Peter Zendzian of the Catholic Migration and Refugee Office of the Diocese of
Brooklyn.

A 1979 study by the Federal Labor Department that is often cited by the
Immigration Service estimated that one in five jobs held by illegal aliens -
among a total of 1.2 million jobs - could be filled by unemployed Americans.

''Illegal aliens detract from the city because they are competing for jobs and
benefits and putting a drain on social services,'' said Lawrence Paretta,
assistant director for investigations of the Immigration Service's New York
office. ''I've never bought the argument that that no one else will do the work
- if the wages and conditions are good.''

In the last 10 months, through various investigations, the district office said,
it has saved more than $5 million in fraudulent unemployment, student loan,
Medicaid and public-housing payments.

To prevent social-service payments to illegal aliens, the Immigration Service
last year began Project SAVE - which stands for Systematic Alien Verification
for Entitlement - in Colorado, Illinois and California.

It is a cooperative, computerized effort between the Immigration Service, other
Federal organizations and state agencies. So far, the three states have sought
to uncover only unemployment fraud, by carefully checking all aliens applying
for aid to make sure they are eligible.

New York will be among the next five states to join the program.

When all 50 states are in the program, the Immigration Service predicts a
combined saving of $10.7 billion at the end of two years, an estimate that most
immigration researchers feel is too high.

Researchers also believe that as long as the economy is expanding and illegal
aliens can get jobs, undocumented workers will continue to pour into New York.

''This is our country's version of Europe's guest-worker policy,'' Mr. Muller
said. ''Not only the supply is here, but the demand, too.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Elizabeth Bogen (page B7)

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              60 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 16, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

India to Proceed With Fence On Border With Bangladesh

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 3, Column 3; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 132 words

DATELINE: NEW DELHI, Sept. 15


India will soon resume construction of a 1,365-mile barbed-wire fence along its
border with Bangladesh in an effort to prevent illegal immigration, the United
News of India reported Friday.

Quoting unidentified official sources, the news agency said the project would
not be abandoned despite protests by the Bangladesh Government.

Bangladesh contends that the fence violates a 1974 agreement banning the
construction of ''defense structures'' in the border region. India says the
fence is being built in its own territory.

Student activists in the Indian state of Assam have been demanding the expulsion
of more than one million people who they assert are illegal aliens from
Bangladesh. About 4,000 people have been killed in violence associated with the
movement since 1979.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              61 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 16, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

RESETTLEMENT OF 455,000 IN U.S. VIEWED AS SUCCESS

BYLINE: By JUDITH CUMMINGS

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 12, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 1468 words

DATELINE: SANTA ANA, Calif., Sept. 14


Smiling Vietnamese teen-agers pour out of Valley High School in this prosperous
commercial center among the suburbs near Disneyland. In the adjacent town of
Westminster, dozens of Vietnamese businesses form a bustling, colorful Little
Saigon.

The early experiences of Vietnamese refugees in American resettlement camps,
just after the Communists gained control of the country in 1975, led to concern
over the future of the humanitarian venture. Nearly a decade later, that concern
has largely given way to a sense that the refugees are well on the road to
self-sufficiency.

Most ethnic groups established themselves in the United States through a small
vanguard before the major waves of immigration. Not so the Vietnamese, and this
cultural upheaval was regarded by many social service officials as singular in
the American experience.

About 455,000 refugees have come from Vietnam in the past decade. More are
arriving - 23,000 alone in the year ended Sept. 30, 1983, according to the
publication Refugee Reports.

The United States Government, at the urging of the American religious
establishment and others, has admitted the mixed-race children of American
servicemen and Vietnamese women. The State Department announced an agreement
last week to accept the immigration of thousands of additional Amerasian
children and political prisoners from Vietnam.

Most Are in California

California has by far the largest concentration of Southeast Asian refugees in
the nation, 256,000, according to statistics kept by the Federal Government.
Many of them migrated here after first being settled elsewhere in the United
States, drawn by the state's reputation for a mild climate and liberal welfare
benefits. One of the few reservations expressed by Federal officials and some
social service specialists, in fact, concerns the high rate of welfare
dependency among the refugees in California, the causes of which are still in
dispute.

Texas, with 56,800 Southeast Asian refugees, has the next largest population,
followed by Washington and Illinois. New York is ranked with Pennsylvania at
fifth place, with 24,200 each.

For refugees such as Van Xuan Phan, a former United States Embassy employee in
Saigon who recently left an accounting job at Rockwell International in Santa
Ana, establishing themselves in America has been aided by hard work but also by
the advantages of skills, status and the mutual aid of their social peers. Many
came from families of education and position in Vietnam, an urban elite that
transferred its advantages to a new land.

Waiting for Citizenship

Mr. Van, one of whose first jobs was operating a forklift in the California
farming belt, recounted in an interview how his superior there soon came to him
and said, ''You have a good background; I'll try to get you something better.''
Mr. Van said he believed that ''a good background'' could not be ignored and
that it had worked that way for him. At the age of 44, he is awaiting approval
of his American citizenship.

But for another class of Vietnamese refugee from the poor country villages, the
fishermen and farmers, the resettlement has been rockier. Attempting to resume
old ways in a new land, the rural people have come into conflict with Americans
in California, Texas, Florida and the Northeast over fishing rights, over the
killing of wildlife, and over adjustment to an urbanized society. Despite these
problems, the experience of the majority of Vietnamese across the country has
been one of relative economic success, considering the short time of their
assimilation.

A study conducted last fall by the Office of Refugee Resettlement, in the
Federal Department of Health and Human Services, indicated that Vietnamese
unemployment, while high immediately after arrival, drops dramatically with
longer residency. The study of 1,239 households included all Southeast Asian
refugees, including Cambodians and Laotians. But Federal officials estimated
that Vietnamese make up nearly two-thirds of that group.

Last September, when the national unemployment rate stood at 8 percent, the rate
for all Southeast Asian adults in was 18 percent, according to the study. Among
refugees who arrived in 1983, the rate was 55 percent. But among those who
arrived in 1975, it was only 12 percent.

Fewer Have White-Collar Jobs

With their immigration to the United States, the refugees experienced a
significant shift of employment from sales and clerical white-collar jobs into
skilled blue-collar work.

The Office of Refugee Resettlement found in its employment study that 56.5
percent held white-collar jobs and 21.4 percent blue-collar while in Vietnam.
Comparable figures for those working in the United States were 27.1 percent
white-collar and 49.1 percent blue-collar. Only 1.8 percent found work as
farmers and fishermen here, as against 15.9 percent at home.

The reasons given for this success are varied. Among the social service agencies
leading the task of bringing or resettling the refugees here, some attribute the
comparatively rapid transition primarily to the Vietnamese's own hard work.
Others maintain that the Vietnamese have a skill, surpassing that of other
Southeast Asians, at using the available fruits of the American system.

''There's a particular approach to getting along, to doing business, it doesn't
matter what economic system they're operating in,'' said Richard Walden,
director of Operation California, an organization involved in arranging the
departure of the refugees and particularly the Amerasian children.

''Word gets out,'' he said. ''When people first come here, they'll tend to stick
them all over the country. But they will tend to move to the warmer climates and
states with more public benefits. The mail to Saigon says, 'For Christ's sake,
if you're gonna leave, don't head for Montana.' It'll say, 'Tell a kid, if he's
18, say he's 17; doctor the birth certificate.'

''That game is played really well by Vietnamese,'' Mr. Walden said. ''They 're
much more savvy at it than Cambodians or Laotians.''

Reputation for Hard Work

In New York, Lelieu Browne, director of the New York City Refugee Empolyment
Project, said Vietnamese were the refugees easiest to place in jobs and
attributed it to their reputation for hard work.

''They are willing to work at entry- level jobs, willing to accept low-paying
jobs, and they usually remain at the same job longer than other people do,'' she
said. ''Employers pay special attention to Vietnamese job applicants because of
this trust in them.''

Others, however, while agreeing there is a willingness among Vietnamese to work
hard, say that Vietnamese refugees, because of their culture, are reluctant to
start at the bottom. Some say that that contributes to a high rate of dependency
on welfare in states like California, where such benefits are high.

''In Vietnam and other Southeast Asian countries, once you take a job, that's it
for life,'' said Alicia Cooper, director of the International Rescue Committee
in Santa Ana. ''Although we tell them, in America you start at the bottom and
work up, they don't believe it.'' For that reason, she said, Vietnamese refugees
often attend school as long as possible, while supporting themselves on the
available income benefits.

High Rate of Dependency

Federal officials say they consider California a particular problem.

According to Debra Pontisso, executive assistant to the director of the Federal
Office of Refugee Resettlement, the rate of dependency of Southeast Asian
refugees in California on general welfare benefits during the first three years
of resettlement is 89 percent. The average for all other states is 34 percent,
she said.

Miss Pontisso said that California's welfare benefit payments average 60 percent
higher than other states'.

Tony Smith, head of California's Office of Refugee Services, defended the
program in view of the higher cost of living in this state. He said also that
the dependency rate was misleading on the ground that Federal officials, in
their accounting, failed to record the large number of refugees migrating here
from other states.

In New York State, where more than 24,000 Vietnamese have been resettled, social
service officials praise their rapid assimilation. Housing is sometimes a
problem, they acknowledge, because the refugees tend to have large families. But
even then, acording to Lang Ngan, a case worker for the International Rescue
Committee in Manhattan, housing oficials sometimes make an extra effort to place
Vietnamese in apartments because the refugees are known to pay their rent on
time, she said.

''They are an excellent group, they 're working hard,'' Miss Ngan said. ''They
realize that they are lucky to be here.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Van Xuan Phan and his family

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              62 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 16, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
Crew of Marooned Ship Gets San Francisco Tour

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 26, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 124 words

DATELINE: SAN FRANCISCO, Sept. 15


The crew of a Taiwanese freighter, marooned at sea aboard their debt-ridden ship
since mid-summer, set foot on land today for the first time in nearly three
months.

The Immigration and Naturalization Service agreed Friday to place the 27 crew
members in the custody of Mayor Dianne Feinstein for the weekend, and the Mayor
promised them dinner in Chinatown and a tour of the city.

The crew of the 700-foot Panamax, loaded with coal, has been kept aboard the
vessel by Federal agents in a legal battle over possession of the ship for
nonpayment of bills.

The Panamax docked at Pier 96 Thursday after being stranded 45 days in
international waters by the owner, the Way Wiser Navigation Company of Taiwan,
to avoid seizure by creditors.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              63 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 16, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

THE NATION

BYLINE: By Carol Rand Herron, Carlyle C. Douglas, and Michael Wright

SECTION: Section 4; Page 2, Column 1; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 400 words


Outlook Less

Gloomy for

Aliens Bill

With time running out on Capitol Hill, the prospects for an overhaul of the
immigration laws seemed to improve a bit last week.

Conferees, belatedly turning to the many differences between bills approved by
the House and Senate, agreed to make it illegal for an employer to hire any
alien known to have entered the United States illegally. Any number of
controversial issues are still to be dealt with, including a proposal for a
temporary foreign worker program that would allow aliens into the country to
help harvest crops.

Further complicating matters is President Reagan's position that he would be
comfortable only with the Senate's version. Walter F. Mondale opposes both
bills, saying they would adversely affect Hispanic Americans and other
minorities. Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming and a principal
sponsor of the legislation, predicted a compromise bill would make its way
through Congress before adjournment early next month. But Senator Edward M.
Kennedy, Democrat of Massachusetts, told the committee it was ''difficult to
think we could reach a compromise.'' A candidate for the legislative scrapheap
may be the treaty - 35 years old and still not ratified by the Senate - making
genocide a crime. Last week, the Foreign Relations Committee postponed action
after Jesse Helms, Republican of North Carolina, insisted that changes were
needed to, among other things, keep Americans from facing false charges in
international courts. The panel may yet take up the treaty, which has been
approved by 95 other countries, but it might not reach the Senate floor by
adjournment day.

The prognosis for a constitutional amendment requiring a balanced budget also
seemed bleak. The Republican-run Senate Judiciary Committee approved the
measure, which is wholeheartedly endorsed by the President.

But the Democrats who control the House have refused to make room for it on
their agenda, and last week the amendment's supporters conceded that the
calendar was working against them.

Congress managed to wrap up work on a few measures. The House sent to the White
House a bill that would set aside 1.8 million acres of California forest as a
protected wilderness preserve. The House also gave final Congressional approval
to a measure requiring that Federal polling places be accessible to the
handicapped.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Senator Alan K. Simpson with representative Romano L. Mazzoli

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              64 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             September 15, 1984, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

PANEL PROGRESSES ON IMMIGRATION BILL

SECTION: Section 1; Page 8, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 895 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Sept. 14


House and Senate conferees made substantial progress in negotiations on a
comprehensive immigration bill today, but they could not agree on how to prevent
job discrimination against United States citizens and aliens legally in the
country.

The conferees did agree to eliminate an important provision of the Senate-
passed bill that would have established an overall limit on legal immigration
and revised the system for distributing visas to aliens.

Representative Peter W. Rodino Jr., Democrat of New Jersey, chairman of the
conference committee, insisted that nothing should be done to restrict the
present flow of legal immigrants or to reduce the availability of visas for
aliens whose brothers and sisters were citizens of the United States. The Senate
conferees acceded to his wishes on this issue.

Prison Penalty Approved

The House and Senate conferees have already agreed to authorize fines and prison
terms for employers who knowingly hire illegal aliens. The purpose of this
provision is to discourage illegal migration to this country. Many Democrats and
Hispanic leaders contend that the penalties would increase the likelihood of job
discrimination against legal aliens and citizens of Hispanic origin. They assert
that employers, to avoid the penalties in the bill, would shun job applicants
with dark skin or a foreign accent.

The House of Representatives overwhelmingly approved an amendment, 404 to 9, in
June that would prohibit employers from discriminating against legal aliens in
hiring or recruiting workers. The amendment would also give United States
citizens protection against discrimination on the basis of national origin.

Senate conferees strenuously objected to this provision today. Senator Alan K.
Simpson, Republican of Wyoming, chief sponsor of the Senate bill, said the
amendment charts ''an entirely new course in civil rights law,'' and he
declared, ''I don't see why an American employer should not be able to select a
U.S. citizen over a citizen of another country who is here as an alien
legally.''

Senate Rejected Amendment

In 1983, the Senate, by a vote of 59 to 29, rejected an amendment similar to
that in the House bill.

Representative Barney Frank, sponsor of the antidiscrimination proposal, said
today, ''Any substantial weakening of this amendment would, in my judgment,
leave us without a bill that could pass in the House.'' Mr. Frank, Democrat of
Massachusetts, noted that the House passed the bill in June by the narrow margin
of 216 to 211.

The Senate passed its version of the legislation by a vote of 76 to 18 in May
1983. The purpose of the conference is to resolve differences between the two
versions of the legislation. A compromise would become law only if approved by
both houses of Congress and signed by the President.

The Administration has opposed Mr. Frank's amendment. Senator Simpson said the
Justice Department had estimated that it would need 1,000 additional employees
to handle discrimination complaints that would be filed with a new
administrative agency to be known as the United States Immigration Board. Mr.
Simpson noted that the maximum penalty proposed for discrimination, a $4,000
fine, was twice the maximum penalty approved for hiring an illegal alien.

Mr. Frank and Mr. Simpson plan to meet Monday in an effort to work out an
agreement, but Mr. Frank said he believed it would be difficult to achieve a
compromise.

Representative Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of Brooklyn, said, ''If the Frank
amendment is deleted, it would cause real problems for many of us who voted for
the bill.''

Senator Edward M. Kennedy, Democrat of Massachusetts, said that when aliens were
allowed to come legally to the United States, ''then they are entitled to the
protections of the Constitution.''

The House and Senate bills would both offer legal status to aliens who illegally
entered the United States before a certain date. However, the conferees have not
yet chosen the date. The House bill is more generous to illegal aliens, offering
legal status to those who arrived before Jan. 1, 1982, and have lived here
continuously since then. The comparable date in the Senate is Jan. 1, 1980.

Status for Cubans and Haitians

Whatever date is ultimately chosen, the conferees agreed to offer permanent
resident status to Cubans and Haitians who entered the United States before Jan.
1, 1982. Many of the Cubans have been living in Florida in an uncertain legal
status since they came here in boats from the Cuban port of Mariel in 1980.
Representative Lawrence J. Smith, Democrat of Florida, said the Cuban ''boat
people'' had ''become part of the fabric of society'' in the Miami area and
deserved special consideration.

Under the bill being drafted by the conference committee, employers would have
to ask all job applicants for identification documents to verify that they were
citizens or aliens authorized to work in the United States.

The conferees dropped a portion of the Senate bill that directed the President,
within three years, to develop ''a secure system to determine employment
eligibility in the United States.'' But the conferees agreed to establish a
maximum penalty of two years in prison and a $5,000 fine for anyone who used
false identification documents to show that he was eligible to work in the
United States.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              65 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 14, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

CONFEREES AGREE ON SANCTIONS IN IMMIGRATION BILL

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section B; Page 4, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 888 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Sept. 13


House and Senate conferees began negotiations today on a comprehensive
immigration bill and promptly agreed to authorize punishment for employers who
knowingly hire illegal aliens.

The voice vote approving penalties for such employers followed a half- hour of
impassioned debate in which opponents of the bill warned that its prohibition on
employment of illegal aliens could lead to an increase in job discrimination
against Hispanic Americans.

''The employer sanctions provision makes this legislation unacceptable,'' said
Senator Edward M. Kennedy, Democrat of Massachusetts. Representative Edward R.
Roybal, Democrat of California, asserted that the new penalties would adversely
affect Asian-Americans as well as United States citizens of Hispanic descent.

But Senator Alan K. Simpson, the Wyoming Republican who was chief sponsor of the
Senate bill, said the question of employer sanctions was not really subject to
debate in the conference because such penalties were contained in both the
Senate and House bills.

The Senate approved its version of the legislation, 76 to 18, in May 1983. The
House of Representatives passed its version, 216 to 211, in June this year. The
purpose of the conference is to iron out scores of major and minor differences
between the two versions.

First Conference Meeting


The conferees met today for the first time, in the hearing room of the House
Judiciary Committee. Twenty-nine of the conferees come from the House and seven
come from the Senate. Twenty- three are Democrats and 13 are Republicans.

Any agreement reached by the conferees would go first to the House and then to
the Senate for approval. If both chambers approved the legislation in the same
form, it would be be presented to President Reagan for his approval.

The House and Senate bills would both outlaw the hiring of illegal aliens, but
they established different systems of penalties, with no criminal sanctions in
the House bill. The conferees adopted a compromise between the two versions, but
have not yet drafted the precise legislative language.

Under the compromise, there would be an education period for six months after
the bill became law. During that period, employers would not be punished for
hiring illegal aliens. In the next two years, an employer would receive a
citation or warning if he hired illegal aliens.

Then, after this transition period totaling two and a half years, employers
would be subject to the full range of penalties established by the bill. The
employer would be subject to a $1,000 civil penalty for each illegal alien hired
on the first offense and a $2,000 penalty for each illegal alien hired on the
second offense.

The conferees agreed to a Senate provision that would establish criminal
penalties of six months in prison and a $1,000 fine for an employer who engaged
in a ''pattern or practice'' of violations.

However, at any time, the Justice Department could go to court and seek an
injunction to halt flagrant violations, the conferees said.

The compromise on this issue was proposed by Representative Romano L. Mazzoli,
Democrat of Kentucky, the chief sponsor of the House bill.

The vote on this issue was noteworthy because, as Mr. Roybal said, ''employer
sanctions are the heart of the bill.''

Under the conference agreement, employers would have to ask all job applicants
for identification documents to verify that they were citizens or aliens
authorized to work in the United States. But the conferees accepted a House
provision stating that nothing in the bill ''shall be construed to authorize,
directly or indirectly, the issuance or use of national identification cards or
the establishment or administration of a national identification card or
system.''

One of the most contentious issues related to employer sanctions was whether the
penalties should apply to small employers. The House in June adopted an
amendment exempting employers with three or fewer employees. But the House
conferees did not insist on this amendment today and agreed to the Senate
provision, which forbids even small employers from hiring illegal aliens.

Exemption is Assailed

Senator Simpson said the House amendment, proposed by Representative Sam B. Hall
Jr., Democrat of Texas, was ''one of the most outrageous exemptions in the
bill.'' He said it would benefit affluent people who employed an illegal alien
as a maid or a gardener.

Mr. Hall said: ''We must show some degree of understanding and not make this
apply to every single human being in the United States. We should not make it
such a heavy-handed piece of legislation.''

Democrats and Republicans alike expressed caution as they went into the
conference. Neither party wants to be accused of stalling the bill, they said,
but both want to preserve an escape route permitting them to deny responsibility
if the conference report proves unpalatable to voters in this election year.

The Reagan Administration has supported the Senate bill as a way to halt the
flow of illegal aliens into the United States. The Democratic Presidential
nominee, Walter F. Mondale, and his running mate, Geraldine A. Ferraro, have
spoken out against the Senate and House bills on the ground that they would
adversely affect Hispanic Americans and other ethnic minorities.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of members of House and Senate Conference

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              66 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             September 13, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION BILL BEFORE CONFEREES

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section B; Page 13, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 745 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Sept. 12


Seven Senators and 29 Representatives plan to meet Thursday in an effort to
begin drafting a comprehensive immigration bill passed in different forms by the
two houses of Congress.

The first meeting of the conference committee comes 12 weeks after the House
passed the bill, 216 to 211. The Senate approved its version of the legislation
by a vote of 76 to 18 in May 1983.

The Senate and House versions would both prohibit employment of illegal aliens
and offer legal status to many illegal aliens already in the country. They
differ on the penalties for employers who knowingly hire illegal aliens and on
the terms of the amnesty, which are more restrictive in the Senate bill.

The Reagan Administration strongly supports the Senate bill, but has described
some of the House amendments as unacceptable. Administration officials contend
that the House version would be too costly because the Federal Government might
have to reimburse states for the costs of providing welfare and social services
to aliens who gained legal status.

Hispanic leaders, who believe that the employer sanctions would increase
discrimination against Hispanic workers, stepped up lobbying against the bill
this week. They met Tuesday with the House majority leader, Representative Jim
Wright, Democrat of Texas, who voted for the bill when it passed on June 20.


'The Prospects Are Bleak'

Mr. Wright said today, ''The prospects are bleak for passage of any immigration
legislation this year.''

Hispanic said Congress could conceivably finish work on the bill before
adjournment.

Following is a summary of major issues facing the conference:

Employer Sanctions: The Senate and House bills would both require employers to
ask all job applicants for documents to verify that they were citizens or aliens
authorized to work in the United States. Both bills contain an exemption for
employers with three or fewer employees.

Under the Senate bill, after a one- year transition period, the Government could
assess a civil penalty of $1,000 against an employer for each illegal alien
hired. If there was a second offense, the employer would be subject to a $2,000
penalty for each illegal alien, and for a ''pattern or practice'' of violations,
the employer could be fined $1,000 and imprisoned six months.

The House bill has no criminal penalties. After a six-month transition period,
an employer would receive a citation or warning for the first offense. For a
second offense, the employer would be subject to a civil penalty of $1,000 for
each illegal alien hired. In any subsequent offense, the employer would be
subject to a civil penalty of $2,000 for each illegal alien hired.

Amnesty: The House bill offers legal status to illegal aliens who entered the
United States before Jan. 1, 1982, and have lived here continuously since that
date. The comparable date in the Senate bill is Jan. 1, 1980.

The House bill provides that illegal aliens would first have to become ''lawful
temporary residents.'' After one year, the aliens could seek permanent resident
status if they were studying the English language and the history and government
of the United States.

The Senate bill offers immediate permanent resident status to illegal aliens who
arrived before Jan. 1, 1977. It offers temporary status to those who arrived
from Jan. 1, 1977, to Dec. 31, 1979, and after three years in that status, they
could become permanent residents.

Legalization Costs: The House bill says that the Federal Government ''shall
provide reimbursement to each state'' for 100 percent of the costs of cash and
medical assistance to aliens who gain legal status. Congress could later limit
outlays if it wished. The Senate bill would establish a Federal grant for
assistance to the states, but does not specify the amount.

Foreign Workers: Both bills would make it easier for employers to bring aliens
into the country as temporary foreign workers, tied to a specific place of
employment. The House bill would, in addition, create a special program for
farmers who need help harvesting perishable fruit and vegetables.

Discrimination: The House bill would prohibit employers from discriminating
against legal aliens in hiring or recruiting workers.

The Senate bill has no comparable provisions, but would require the General
Accounting Office to determine whether employer sanctions led to a ''pattern of
discrimination.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              67 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             September 12, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

Mondale Asked to Follow Up On Vow to Fight Bill on Aliens

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section B; Page 8, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 116 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Sept. 11


Mayor Henry Cisneros of San Antonio and other Hispanic leaders said today that
they would put all the pressure they could on Walter F. Mondale and
Congressional leaders to kill a sweeping immigration bill in a House-Senate
conference this week.

''The promises they made in San Francisco are now due,'' Mr. Cisneros said in a
news conference at the Third Hispanic Conference on Immigration Reform.

Mr. Cisneros, who was on Mr. Mondale's list of possible Vice-Presidential
candidates, said he had ''no doubt whatsoever'' that Mr. Mondale would follow
through on his promises at the Democratic National Convention in San Francisco
to do everything he could to defeat the bill.




LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              68 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 10, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

THE CALENDAR

BYLINE: By Barbara Gamarekian

SECTION: Section A; Page 18, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 753 words


Monday

The city is overrun this week with all manner of business groups, educators and
environmentalists gathered for symposiums, conferences and panels. Capitol Hill
will be busy as well with a number of hearings and legislative reviews.

Countdown: With four weeks left in this Congressional session, there is work to
be done, not least of which are 9 of the 13 spending bills awaiting action. In
the Senate, a vote is scheduled this afternoon on whether to end debate on the
banking bill. And, although there is only faint hope of reconciling differences,
this is the week that House and Senate conferees are expected to meet on the
immigration bill.

Political Wanderings: President Reagan will be campaigning in upstate New York
and Tennessee on Wednesday and Thursday; Walter F. Mondale presents his
deficit-reduction plan in Philadelphia today and will tour the Middle West and
South later in the week.

New Team: The Department of Health and Human Services, operating without an
Under Secretary since December 1982, will alter that situation with the
swearing-in of Charles D. Baker in a 4 P.M. ceremony. Humphrey Building.
Tuesday

The House Ways and Means Committee meets on Social Security cost- of-living
adjustments. The adjustments are pegged to the rate of inflation, which has not
been high enough this year to result in an increase in benefits. But the Senate
has already passed a measure guaranteeing higher benefits, and the bill is
expected to sail through the House. Margaret M. Heckler, Secretary of Health and
Human Services, and Senator Daniel Patrick Moynihan, Democrat of New York, are
expected to testify. 2 P.M., Room 1100, Longworth Office Building.

Quiet Talk: Richard W. Murphy, an Assistant Secretary of State, testifies in
closed hearings before the Senate Foreign Relations Committee on recent
developments in the Middle East and South Asia. 4 P.M., Room S116, Capitol.

Seems Like Old Times: Former President Gerald R. Ford and his wife, Betty, are
back in town as honorary chairmen of a black-tie dinner tonight at the Mayflower
Hotel commemorating the 10th anniverary of the signing of changes in the pension
laws. And the family of Hubert H. Humphrey will receive a Congressional gold
medal in his memory from President Reagan in a White House ceremony today.

Top Drawer: Secretary of State George P. Shultz goes to Capitol Hill for the
annual Cabinet-level briefing of Congress on immigration quotas and the Reagan
Administration's refugee plans for the next year. He meets with House Judiciary
Committee members in a closed session at 9 A.M. and with Senate Judiciary
Committee members at 10 A.M. in an open session. Room 124, Dirksen Senate Office
Building.

Clean Up Your Act: The National Association of Manufacturers sponsors a two-day
conference on such environmental issues as acid rain control, hazardous waste
management, Clean Air Act changes and compensation of victims. Among the
speakers will be William D. Ruckelshaus, Administrator of the Environmental
Protectional Agency. Washington Marriott Hotel.

The American Business Conference, made up of the chief executive officers of 100
middle-sized, high-growth companies, is in town for a two-day meeting with such
Washington notables as Paul A. Volcker, chairman of the Federal Reserve Board,
and Treasury Secretary Donald T. Regan. Four Seasons Hotel.

Wednesday

The American Land Alliance, a coalition representing half a million people from
14 Western states, holds a two-day conference on the use of America's lands and
resources. 9 A.M. Room 106, Dirksen Senate Office Building.

Popcorn Watch: The Agriculture Department's September crop report will indicate
whether the August drought will trigger a rise in the price of corn.

Thursday

Lord Carrington of Britain, the new Secretary General of NATO, who is in town
meeting with President Reagan, is scheduled to address a National Press Club
luncheon today on the state of the Atlantic alliance. Noon.

Head Start: The House Ways and Means Committee takes a look at the continuing
Medicare financing crisis, expected to be one of next year's big legislative
issues. 10 A.M., Room 1100, Longworth Office Building.

Friday

Producer price indexes for August, released today, are expected to show that
inflation continues at a moderate pace.

The National Water Alliance, a bipartisan group originally organized by eight
members of Congress, holds an all-day symposium on national water policy.
Auditorium, Dirksen Senate Office Building.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Schedule

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              69 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 6, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
Judge Considers Plea Of Refugee Worker

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section A; Page 16, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 67 words

DATELINE: CORPUS CHRISTI, Tex., Sept. 5


Jack Elder, director of a Roman Catholic-sponsored refugee center, believed two
Salvadorans were fleeing a war zone and he had no intention of violating
immigration laws when he drove them to a Texas border bus station, an attorney
argued in court Tuesday.

Mr. Elder, 40 years old, whose center is near the Texas-Mexico border, is facing
charges of conspiracy and transporting illegal aliens.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              70 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 4, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
Immigration Unit Sued On Custody of Children

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 14, Column 5; National Desk

LENGTH: 241 words

DATELINE: SAN DIEGO, Sept. 3


A class action lawsuit was filed Friday accusing the Federal Immigration and
Naturalization Service of trying to lure undocumented workers out of hiding by
holding their children.

But immigration officials say it would be wrong for them to release the children
to anyone but their parents.

At the center of the controversy is Orlando Ramirez, a 4-year-old boy who left
El Salvador for the United States on Aug. 5. The child's father was killed the
year before, and his mother was already in Los Angeles, working as a domestic.
The boy and other Salvadorans were intercepted, and Orlando has been in custody
for more than two weeks.

The lawsuit, filed in Federal District Court here, contends that the service, as
a matter of policy, seeks to use Orlando and 200 other youngsters as
''hostages.'' The suit was filed by the National Center for Immigrants' Rights
and El Rescate, a legal service center.

''They charge that we are being inhumane, but can you imagine what they would
charge if we were to release the children to someone irresponsible?'' said
Martin Soblick, a lawyer for the immigration service.

Last week, the Board of Immigration Appeals upheld the rule requiring a parent
to pick up a child.

''We have no objection to that,'' said Peter Schey of the center for immigrants'
rights. ''What we do object to is that the I.N.S. insists she be subjected to
interrogation and give up her constitutional right to remain silent.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              71 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               August 30, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

BRIEFING;
Shultz's Travels

BYLINE: By James F. Clarity and Warren Weaver Jr.

SECTION: Section B; Page 10, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 224 words


Partly to avoid Congressional

criticism and partly in the interests of good government, Secretary of State
George P. Shultz plans to make a trip to Capitol Hill Sept. 11 to discuss
immigration quotas with House and Senate subcommittee members.

The Secretary was scheduled to make such a visit at about this time last year
but sent several subordinates in his place, explaining that he was busy at the
opening of the United Nations General Assembly. This nettled at least one
powerful Republican Senator, Alan K. Simpson of Wyoming, chairman of the
subcommittee on immigration and refugee policy. As one of the Capitol's abler
needlers, the Senator wondered aloud whether the Secretary of State was
seriously interested in fulfillng the provisions of the Refugee Act of 1980,
according to a State Department aide. That Act says the Secretary of State
should annually submit to the House and Senate his department's report on how
many immigrants should be admitted to the United States in the forthcoming
fiscal year. The Congressional committees and the department then discuss the
numbers and promulgate the quotas for the next year.

In the first year of the Act, 1980, Secretary of State Cyrus R. Vance appeared
before the committees, but department deputies and assistants have made the
appearances for the Reagan Administration.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              72 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               August 16, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

Fredrik Mundale, Dominick Ferraro The Democratic Party proclaims its devotion to
fairness, and it's in the name of social justice that its nominees, who proudly
proclaim their immigrant lineage, assail the Simpson-Mazzoli immigration reform
bill. Unfairness is more like it. Where is the social justice in championing the
cause only of gate-crashers?

SECTION: Section A; Page 22, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 435 words


One investigation after another has shown that the borders are out of control.
Anyone determined to enter the United States can steal in, and it's
inconceivable that this open society will ever hire enough guards or uncoil
enough barbed wire to stop them. But there is another way. Turn off the magnets
that pull people across the border - the jobs, however menial, that pay, to
foreigners' reckoning, a fortune.

That's what the Simpson-Mazzoli bill would do. It has long been a crime for
illegal aliens to take jobs here. This bill, which has passed the House and
Senate and awaits reconciliation in a conference committee, would finally make
it illegal for employers to hire them. That, more than patrols in the night,
would help control the borders.

Maybe, some Hispanic spokesmen say, but only by causing intolerable
discrimination. Employers, anxious to avoid any brush with the Immigration
Service, would stay away from anyone even arguably illegal, and would thus
refuse to hire legal Hispanic residents.

That argument might make sense in the abstract but it makes none in the real
world. Employ- ers in border states already have a hard time finding enough
people to hire. If Simpson-Mazzoli were law, the job market would be even
tighter and they would have to be less, not more fussy. In any case, the law's
identification system would deny bigoted employers this pretext for
discrimination.  Meanwhile, the reform bill would restore - to get back to that
Democratic slogan - fairness. Because it's now so easy to sneak into the
country, many Americans are growing uneasy about the number of illegal aliens.
Impatience with the back- door flood has made people ready to slam the front
door. There is rising sentiment in Congress to slap stern limits even on legal
immigration.  That means there's increasing danger that people from all over the
world who have been waiting patiently to enter the United States legally will
suffer. People like Fredrik Mundale, Walter Mondale's great-grandfather, who
came to Minnesota from Norway in 1856. People like Dominick Ferraro, Geraldine
Ferraro's father, who came to New York from Italy about 1918.  There's obvious
humane and political appeal in speaking for poor, brave - illegal - migrants
from Mexico. But where's the fairness in it? If the Democratic candidates speak
only for undocumented Mexicans, who will speak for the Norwegians and Italians,
Somalis and Ethiopians, Salvadorans and Filipinos from all over the world? They,
too, are descendants of Fredrik Mundale and Dominick Ferraro and they, too,
deserve fairness.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: editorial

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              73 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              August 15, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
2 Illegal Aliens Told To Return to Mexico

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 18, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 130 words

DATELINE: KANSAS CITY, Mo., Aug. 14


An illegal alien couple found by immigration officials when their picture was
published because they won a house in a charity drawing were ordered today to
return to Mexico within four months.

O. John Brahos, an immigration judge in Chicago, ruled that Jose Carmona, 29
years old, and his wife, Silvia, 24, were subject to deportation. But despite
the objections of a Government attorney, he granted their request to be allowed
to leave the United States voluntarily rather than be deported and gave them
until Dec. 14.

By avoiding deportation, the couple remain eligible to seek a visa to return to
the United States.

Mr. Carmona, a roofer whose four young children are United States citizens, said
after the hearing: ''I just feel terrible. It's a bad day for us.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              74 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                August 12, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. Detains 79 Tongans

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section 5; Page 8, Column 6; Sports Desk

LENGTH: 113 words

DATELINE: LOS ANGELES, Aug. 11


Immigration agents have detained 79 people from Tonga who said they planned to
attend the Los Angeles Olympics but were really trying to slip into the country
illegally, the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service said today.

Harold Ezell, regional director of the service, said the tour operator, Sipa
Sekona, had receipts for apartments that had not been rented.

Officials said the visitors had six-month visas, but were told they could stay
longer. Sekona was being held in lieu of $25,000 bond on charges of conspiracy
to smuggle aliens into the United States, the officials said. Many of the Tongan
visitors were released after posting $1,000 bond.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              75 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               August 9, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

REAGAN RAISES NEW OBSTACLE TO HOUSE BILL ON IMMIGRATION

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section D; Page 23, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 886 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Aug. 8


The Reagan Administration has raised a new objection to the House version of a
comprehensive immigration bill, saying it goes too far in protecting the rights
of legal aliens and Hispanic workers.

Senator Alan K. Simpson, a Wyoming Republican who is the chief sponsor of the
Senate bill, said Attorney General William French Smith had objected to a
provision of the House bill that would, for the first time, prohibit employers
from discriminating against legal aliens in hiring or recruiting workers.

Representative Barney Frank, a Massachusetts Democrat who proposed this section
of the bill, said it was ''a thoughtful and very practical scheme to protect
potential victims of discrimination.'' Hispanic groups contend that such
discrimination is likely to arise from another section of the bill that forbids
employers to hire illegal aliens and penalizes those who knowingly do so.

The Administration's objection creates a new obstacle for the immigration bill,
which is already in trouble because of opposition from Hispanic groups and many
Democrats, including Walter F. Mondale, the party's Presidential nominee.

A New Bureaucratic Entity

Administration officials contend that the House bill would create a costly,
unnecessary bureaucratic entity within the Justice Department to investigate
complaints of job discrimination.

In June the House approved Mr. Frank's proposal by an overwhelming margin, 404
to 9, with 150 Republicans supporting it. The House then passed the entire
immigration bill by a narrow margin, 216 to 211. The Senate passed a similar
bill but, by a vote of 59 to 29, rejected the sort of remedies for
discrimination approved by the House.

On Tuesday the Senate asked for a House-Senate conference to reconcile
differences between the two bills. The Senate appointed seven conferees, and the
Speaker of the House, Thomas P. O'Neill Jr., said he would try to appoint the
House conferees by Thursday.

William Bradford Reynolds, Assistant Attorney General for civil rights,
expressed ''serious reservations'' about the antidiscrimination provision,
saying it ''charts an unprecedented course in civil rights law.''

A Preference for Citizens


Mr. Reynolds said the existing statutes enforced by his office did not prohibit
''discrimination in hiring on the basis of alienage.'' Further, he said, ''It is
understandable that some private employers might prefer to provide employment
for United States citizens rather than for citizens of other countries who come
here to work.''

Lobbyists for business organizations, including the National Association of
Manufacturers and the Chamber of Commerce of the United States, expressed
similar concerns.

In 1980, the last year for which the Immigration and Naturalization Service has
complete data, there were 5.4 million legal aliens in the United States,
including 4.5 million permanent resident aliens. Permanent resident aliens have
most of the rights of citizens except the right to vote.

The House bill would create a new enforcement apparatus within the Justice
Department to investigate complaints of employment discrimination based on
either national origin or ''alienage.'' Employers who violated the ban on
discrimination would be subject to civil penalties of up to ''$4,000 for each
individual discriminated against.'' That is twice the maximum penalty that could
be imposed on employers who knowingly hired illegal aliens.

Powers of Immigration Board


An employer accused of discrimination would be entitled to a hearing before an
administrative law judge working for a new Justice Department agency known as
the United States Immigration Board. The board could award back pay to victims
of discrimination and could order employers to ''cease and desist'' from
discriminatory hiring practices.

Individual employees could file complaints directly with the board if the
agency's special counsel failed to do so after an investigation lasting 30 days.

Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 forbids employers to discriminate on
the basis of race, color, religion, sex or national origin. But it does not
cover employers with fewer than 15 employees. And the Supreme Court has held
that ''nothing in the act makes it illegal to discriminate on the basis of
citizenship or alienage.''

The House bill, with Mr. Frank's proposal, would cover employers with four or
more employees.

Representative Peter W. Rodino Jr., a New Jersey Democrat who is chairman of the
House Judiciary Committee, assured his colleagues that he would fight to
preserve the safeguards against discrimination.

But aides to Senator Simpson said that on this issue he tended to agree with the
Administration and opposed the idea of creating a new legal remedy, or ''private
right of action,'' for employees charging discrimination.

However, the measure drew support from many conservatives, including
Representative Steve Bartlett, a Texas Republican, who said, ''What the Frank
amendment does is to state specifically and categorically that discrimination
will not be tolerated.''

In a speech to a Hispanic group last month, Vice President Bush said President
Reagan ''will not sign any legislation that would permit employers to
discriminate against Hispanics or anyone else.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              76 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               August 8, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

Conferees on Alien Bill Named

SECTION: Section A; Page 12, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 160 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Aug. 7


The Senate tonight appointed seven members to serve on a conference committee to
reconcile differences with the House on a comprehensive immigration bill.

The House was not in session today and has yet to appoint its conferees.

Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming, said he hoped the conference
committee could meet once this week. On Friday or Saturday, the Senate plans to
begin a recess that will last through the Republican National Convention. It is
scheduled to reconvene Sept. 5.

The Senate conferees include four Republicans: Strom Thurmond of South Carolina,
Charles McC. Mathias Jr. of Maryland, Charles E. Grassley of Iowa and Mr.
Simpson. The Democrats are Edward M. Kennedy of Massachusetts, Howard M.
Metzenbaum of Ohio and Patrick J. Leahy of Vermont.

The bill would prohibit employment of illegal aliens, penalize employers who
hired such aliens and offer legal status to many illegal aliens already in the
United States.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              77 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                August 7, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

LIVING ILLEGALLY IN NEW YORK IS SAID TO BE EASY FOR ALIENS

BYLINE: By ELAINE SCIOLINO

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 2149 words


Thousands of illegal aliens in the New York area are living relatively normal
lives by buying bogus documents, using the names of legal residents or simply
relying on the inability of the Government to enforce the law, according to
government officials and immigration specialists.

They can rent apartments, open bank accounts, send their children to school,
join unions, collect unemployment payments, get driver's licenses and pay taxes.

Whether they get into the country with the help of smuggling networks or with
temporary visitor's visas, they often settle down quietly in jobs and homes. A
few - no one knows just how many - even manage to get various kinds of public
assistance.

''Once aliens get here, they can move around fairly freely,'' said Milton D.
Kramer, chairman of the New York chapter of the American Immigrant Lawyers'
Association. ''I wouldn't get out the crying towel for them.''

Marguerite Aumoithe, 41 years old, came to the United States from Haiti in 1971
on a visitor's visa. She is still here, illegally.

Soon after her arrival, she was able to get a valid Social Security card. She
was married in New York's City Hall, bore a son, who is a United States citizen,
and divorced. She joined the capmaker's union Local 2, held a number of jobs and
completed a $1,500 beautician's course. She received workers' compensation when
she was ill and unemployment benefits when she was laid off.

She banks at the Village Bank of New Jersey, drives a car on a New Jersey
driver's license and pays taxes.

Illegal aliens have a constant fear that they can be found out and deported at
any time, but Mrs. Aumoithe was willing to be quoted by name because she expects
the Immigration and Naturalization Service to approve a petition for permanent
residence filed in her behalf by her mother, who is already a permanent
resident.  ''I know I illegal, but I not afraid,'' she said. ''Everybody has
problems. I young. I never take the welfare. I pay taxes because everybody's
supposed to pay taxes, even the President.''

Agency's Resources Limited


Immigration officials say limited resources preclude the investigative unit of
the New York district office from pursuing these cases of law-abiding aliens
whose documents are not in order.

Instead, the unit has created a team of senior investigators who focus on
smugglers and document vendors. Officials say the trade in bogus documents will
greatly increase if immigration legislation now pending in Congress is passed.

''We don't have the manpower or the funds to pursue that individual alien,''
said Robert McByrne, a supervisory investigator at the immigration service.
''Our thrust is to go after the large- scale perpetrators.''

Investigators recently cracked an alien- and drug-smuggling ring they said was
operating out of San Juan Travel Inc., a travel agency on the West Side of
Manhattan. The arrests followed a one-year investigation by immigration agents
who pretended to take bribes to expedite the safe entry of Dominicans and
cocaine into the United States.

Over that year, authorities said, the ring smuggled in 72 aliens by passing them
through Canada on Puerto Rican birth certificates or by bypassing inspection,
with the help of the immigration agents, at Kennedy International Airport.

Smuggling rings that operate from abroad and offer aliens expensive package
deals that include passports, visas and plane tickets are much harder to
penetrate, and foreigners who have access to these rings are generally more
sophisticated than the aliens who cross the border from Mexico, immigration
officials said.

''Everyone knows you have to go to a consulate to get a visa, and not to a back
alley,'' said Duke Austin, a spokesman for the immigration service in
Washington.

Passport and Ticket for $3,000


Four years ago, 24-year-old Abdul Rasoul, a Mujaheddin guerrilla, fled
Afghanistan for Karachi, Pakistan, where smuggling rings are particularly
active, according to immigration specialists.

There, with the help of the Mujaheddin, he said, he paid an ''agent'' in a hotel
lobby $3,000 for a ticket to New York and an Afghan passport stamped with a
false American business visa. He breezed through the immigration check in New
York and a month later applied for political asylum, which was eventually
granted.

A nephew followed the same route, using a German passport that was probably
stolen, and was granted asylum after nine months in detention.

Then a month and a half ago, Mr. Rasoul's 30-year-old brother, Gholam, who had
been wounded in a gun battle with Soviet troops in Afghanistan, fled to the
United States with his wife and handicapped child on false Pakistani passports.
He admitted to immigration officials that the passports were false and applied
for asylum. His case is pending.

The State Department considers all refugee applications on a case-by-case basis.
But since the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979, the great majority of
Afghans who come here have received either political asylum or what is termed
''temporary withholding of deportation.''

The Rasouls feel their investment in forged passports was worthwhile, even
though they all now live in a cramped one-bedroom apartment in Flushing, Queens.

''You can't wait for the American Embassy to give you a visa,'' said Abdul
Rasoul, who drives a taxicab. ''I had no passport, no documents. If it's going
to save your life, you don't worry about the money to pay for passports.''

Once aliens get settled, they quickly discover that both counterfeit and real
documents are widely available in New York. ''People come up with the doggonest
documents,'' said Charles C. Sava, director of the immigration service for the
New York district. ''Some of them have been voting for years.''

Among the most available counterfeit documents are Social Security cards, voter
registration cards and an obsolete but still valid form of the alien
registration card, or ''green card,'' immigration specialists said.

Market May Grow

Last year, immigration investigators raided a storefront mom-and-pop printing
shop on Columbus Avenue and found thousands of counterfeit documents and
letterheads, from Puerto Rican birth certificates to Queens College diplomas,
the lithograph negatives to reproduce them, and a variety of dyes, seals and
stamps. The potential street value was more than $1 million, they said.

The pending immigration legislation would create a broad new market for such
documents, according to immigration specialists.

The legislation would require aliens applying for amnesty to prove that they had
lived in the country for a certain length of time, and immigration officials
believe that a wide variety of everyday documents, from children's report cards
to telephone bills and rent receipts, would be acceptable evidence. And all,
they say, are easily forged.

The legislation would also impose sanctions on employers who knowingly hire
illegal aliens.  That would increase the value of counterfeit Social Security
cards, work authorization stamps and green cards.

Using another person's name, though, often makes false documents unnecessary.

In one case described by the immigration service, a 75-year-old South American
man who had the right to a green card because a close relative was a permanent
resident of the United States allowed a middle-aged friend to impersonate him
and come to the United States. All the friend had to do in return was to
petition for the admittance of the man's seven grown children.

One by one the children came to the United States, and now, as the result of the
one impersonation, more than 40 family members have legal status.

It is also possible to impersonate a United States citizen. Copies of New York
birth certificates of both living and deceased citizens can be ordered by mail
for $4 with as little information as a name, date and place of birth, mother's
maiden name and father's name.

A birth certificate and two other pieces of identification are the only
requirements for obtaining a driver's license and Social Security card.

Another document that can be obtained legally and then misused is the card
issued by the Social Security Administration to foreign students and visitors
who need to open bank accounts; a Social Security number is required to open
such accounts.

Even though cards issued since February 1982 state ''Not valid for employment,''
some visitors successfully use the nine-digit number for work purposes.

Catching up with an abuser can take months or even years, Social Security
officials say. By that time, the alien may have moved, changed jobs, adjusted
his legal status or left the country.

Immigration officials concede that corruption within the Immigration and
Naturalization Service is not unheard of, and that documents legalizing an
alien's status have at times been sold by immigration employees.

Last year, for example, Anthony Viceroy, a deputy clerk assigned to the
immigration court, was convicted of accepting five bribes of between $400 and
$2,000 to expedite applications and create phony citizenship papers.

The officials say, however, that such cases are relatively infrequent.

Functioning Without Documents


Some aliens prefer to function with no documents at all. One 32-year-old
Peruvian, for example, who arrived in the United States 11 months ago, says he
has had little difficulty finding jobs at the minimum wage in New York.

''Whenever a boss asked for my card, I said, 'Oh no, I forgot it,' and gave him
a number I made up in my head,'' he said.

Now, he says, using an alias on a borrowed Social Security card, he works as a
dishwasher-cook-night watchman at a Manhattan restaurant for the minimum wage.
He manages to send his wife and four sons $500 a month.

He said he does not want to buy phony documents. ''It's too dangerous,'' he
said. ''I don't want to go to jail.''

Aliens who are white and speak English have a much easier time, the aliens say.
A 35-year-old Irishman who was living illegally in Toronto said he came across
the Canadian border at Buffalo in 1978 by using a Canadian friend's birth
certificate, and he has managed to live and work in the United States with only
minor problems.

He said an employment agency representative gave him what he called a ''dead''
Social Security number, which he has used ever since.

Immigration investigators said they were unsure of the origin of the number, but
speculated that it most likely had belonged to someone who had recently died.

The employment agent ''told me to claim nine dependents so I wouldn't have to
pay taxes, and to go to Times Square if I wanted to get a phony card,'' said the
blue-eyed, blond-haired Irishman. In his cut-off jeans and running shoes, no one
would suspect he was not American.

In 1981 he went home for a five-week vacation, he said, and returned on a
five-year work visa that he received from the United States Consulate in Dublin
after presenting false letters and pay stubs showing that he worked for an Irish
company that would be doing business in the United States.

When he went to work at his current job as a bartender and needed a bartender's
license, he said, he went to the Police Department in Hoboken, N.J., gave them
his Social Security number and got the license.

''If I had been Cuban or Salvadoran, they never would have let it go through,''
he said.

He has had some close calls, however, and marvels at his good fortune. Once, the
Brooklyn factory he was working in got raided, and he stood frozen while the
officials, thinking he was legal, chased only the Hispanic employees.

He shares the common fear among aliens living outside the law that no matter how
well they maneuver, they may be arrested or called upon to produce
identification. They can be blackmailed by unscrupulous landlords or difficult
bosses. They can be taken in by fast-talking fixers who promise them green cards
for a fee.

''I lie low, pay cash for everything, don't drive, don't carry any
identification,'' he said. ''I don't smoke in the subways.

''I don't know how I've gotten away with it.''

A tiny percentage of illegal aliens has managed to tap public assistance funds,
immigration investigators say, fraudulently obtaining welfare benefits, food
stamps, Federal housing subsidies and even student loans.

One case that is pending involves two Nigerian fugitives who are charged with
using forged documents to persuade bank officers that they were American
students and to get nearly $32,000 in fraudulent student loans.

But most illegal aliens work hard to keep a low profile and stay out of trouble.
''All they want to do is rent an apartment, buy a used car, work 40 hours a week
and have a barbecue on the weekend,'' said Philip J. Kleiner, an immigration
lawyer.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Photo of James King, immigration inspector, studying suspect travel
documents

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              78 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                August 5, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. and Cuba End a Round Of Talks About Immigration

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 14, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 135 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Aug. 4


The United States and Cuba have concluded a second round of talks on immigration
issues and have agreed to continue the talks later, the State Department said
Friday.

The department's deputy spokesman, Alan D. Romberg, said that the tenor of the
talks, held Tuesday through Thursday at a secret location in New York, was
''serious'' but that no agreements on ending differences had been reached.

The United States wants to deport thousands of Cuban refugees who are ineligible
to remain in this country because of criminal records or health problems. These
Cubans were among the 125,000 who came here from the Cuban port of Mariel four
years ago.

Cuba is seeking to reopen normal immigration from Cuba, which was suspended
after the Mariel boatlift.

The first round of talks was held in mid-July.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              79 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               August 4, 1984, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

BOOKS OF THE TIMES;
THE RUSSIANS ARE HERE

BYLINE: By Walter Goodman

SECTION: Section 1; Page 12, Column 1; Cultural Desk

LENGTH: 777 words


FROM MOSCOW TO MAIN STREET. Among the Russian Emigres. By Victor Ripp.  247
pages. Little, Brown and Company.  $16.95.

A HUNDRED-THOUSAND Russians have come to this country during the last decade, in
what is known as the third wave of Russian immigration. (The first was after the
Russian Revolution; the second after World War II.) Some of the latest
immigrants are political dissidents; many more are Jews simply in search of
better opportunities than were open to them at home. Despite the title of Victor
Ripp's report on these new Americans, not many have settled on Main Street;
their favored neighborhood is Brighton Beach in Brooklyn.

As a teacher of Russian literature, Mr. Ripp is drawn to writers and other
members of the emigre intelligentsia. They make an articulate, if not always an
ingratiating, group. A lawyer and a doctor offer interesting perspectives on the
practice of law and medicine in this country: the lawyer thinks our criminals
are uncontrolled; the doctor finds our doctors uncultured. A journalist remarks,
''When Hemingway spoke of money, we naturally assumed it was meant symbolically.
But now we see that when Americans speak of money, they mean money.''

Most of the intellectuals seem to be at least slightly disdainful of their new
land. ''We are losing our souls here,'' says a theatrical director who has put
on a Russian-language version of ''A Streetcar Named Desire,'' in which Blanche
DuBois represented the Russian spirit and Stanley Kowalski represented America.


Like intellectuals everywhere, these Russians are full of opinions. Though they
have their internecine feuds, they seem to agree on at least two points: First,
that they understand America better than Americans do, and second, that
Americans do not understand Russia at all.

This country is too soft, they feel, both internally and in its relations with
Moscow. ''America is in trouble, believe me,'' says Efraim Sevela, a writer. ''I
have come to see that the only thing that may save it is a takeover by the
military, government by a strong man.''

Mr. Ripp, whose parents were first- wave Russian emigres, is a knowing if
sometimes wordy guide; he is sympathetic toward his subjects without
sentimentalizing them. One of the more striking chapters shows Russian-American
teen-agers gobbling up the junk food of American culture and rising in their
classroom to defend the tyrannies from which their parents fled. ''A strong
leader can be good,'' says one young fellow. ''Think of Stalin.''

Sighing over such indulgence in the worst of both worlds, Mr. Ripp observes:
''The emigres' past is filled with cruel and oppressive events, elements which
distort the human spirit, but it is theirs.''


The liveliest passages have to do not with intellectuals but with businessmen
and workers. Many of the Russians who have made their way here say they were
engineers at home - and are now driving taxicabs. Yuri Radzievsky, whom Mr. Ripp
says is the first third-wave emigre to make a million dollars, observes, ''For a
Russian newcomer to America there are traditionally two occupations - taxi
driver and translator. Those who fail their driver's test go into translation.''
Mr. Radzievsky is now chairman of a company that specializes in adapting
American advertising to foreign locales.

Despite frequent references to the Slavic soul, the newcomers appear to be at
least as materialistic as their hosts. Having been starved of goods for so long,
they can't seem to get enough of them. Mr. Ripp shows us people buying hard,
working hard, drinking hard and doing a little hustling on the side. Dealing
with the official bureaucracy back home appears to have been good training for
getting as much as can be gotten from the social services here - and complaining
all the way.

The soul of many a Russian is, of course, nourished by vodka. In one choice
glimpse of life back in the Soviet Union, a man named Dimitry explains that
while exported vodka is put in bottles with grooved necks so that the cap can be
screwed on and off, for the domestic market ''the bottles are made with smooth
necks, so that once the cap is off it cannot be put back on. And really, why
bother? Can you imagine that a Russian would not finish off his vodka to the
last drop?''

The old culture and the new meet most congenially at a table at a McDonald's
where Mr. Ripp shares with a pair of emigres a large portion of french fries, a
bottle of vodka concealed in a brown bag and lots of talk. ''When we were in the
Soviet Union,'' says one of the Russians, ''we saw only the good things about
America, so perhaps it's natural that now we see mainly the bad.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Victor Ripp

TYPE: review

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              80 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               August 4, 1984, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

CHIEF SPONSER MOVES TO RESCUE IMMIGRATION BILL

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section 1; Page 24, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 629 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Aug. 3


Senator Alan K. Simpson, chief sponsor of a comprehensive immigration bill,
moved today to rescue the legislation, which Walter F. Mondale and many other
Democrats have been trying to kill. Mr. Simpson called for the appointment of a
House-Senate conference committee to develop a compromise version of the
legislation acceptable to President Reagan and to the Democratic- controlled
House. The Wyoming Republican said Mr. Reagan had given an assurance he would
sign a compromise immigration bill if it were less costly than the one passed by
the House. The White House said last week that the House version was
''unacceptable.'' Despite differences in the House and Senate versions of the
bill, both measuress would prohibit employment of illegal aliens, authorize
penalties against employers who hire illegal aliens and offer legal status to
many illegal aliens already in the United States. The House passed the bill by a
five-vote margin, 216 to 211, on June 20. The Senate approved a similar bill, 76
to 18, in May 1983. The bill has been back in the Senate for six weeks, but the
Senate has not requested a conference, the normal procedure for reconciling
differences on major legislation. Opponents of the bill said that if a
conference committee came up with a compromise measure they had enough votes to
block its approval on the floor of the House. The Democratic candidates for
President and Vice President, Mr. Mondale and Geraldine A. Ferraro, strongly
oppose the measure and have denounced it in speeches. Hispanic groups have also
stepped up efforts to kill the bill. Mr. Simpson said last week that he was
''tumbling around'' in search of a strategy to rescue the bill. He considered
urging the Senate to adopt the House version. But in view of Mr. Reagan's
objections to the House bill, Mr. Simpson has abandoned that idea. Today, the
Senator restated his promise that ''before any version of the legislation
ultimately hammered out in conference is presented to either house of Congress,
it will be placed before the President to determine whether it would receive his
signature.'' Mr. Simpson made the promise last year to allay the concern of
Representative Thomas P. O'Neill Jr., the Speaker of the House. Mr. O'Neill had
said he feared Mr. Reagan would veto the bill to curry favor with Hispanic
voters. Vice President Bush revived those fears on July 25 when he said, in a
speech to the National Council of La Raza, a Hispanic organization, ''This
President will not sign any legislation that would permit employers to
discriminate against Hispanics or anyone else.'' Hispanic groups contend that
the bill would lead to an increase in job discrimination because employers might
avoid hiring people with dark skin or with foreign accents. But supporters of
the bill say that would not occur. Senator Simpson's decision to pursue a
conference with the House increases pressure for action on the bill, but still
does not guarantee passage, according to Administration officials and
Congresisonal aides who have followed the legislation. An aide to Mr. Simpson
said the Senator decided to seek a conference after talking with Mr. Reagan by
telephone last Sunday. Mr. Simpson made the request in a letter to Senator Strom
Thurmond, Republican of South Carolina, the chairman of the Judiciary Committee.
The House amendments would offer legal status to a larger number of aliens than
would be covered by the Senate bill. The House version would also authorize 100
percent Federal reimbursement of state and local governments for the costs of
providing cash, medical or other assistance to ''legalized aliens.'' Mr. Simpson
quoted the President as saying that he had a ''deep problem'' with this section
of the House bill because its costs were unknown.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              81 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               August 2, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

NEW YORK DAY BY DAY;
Held for Deportation, A Salvadoran Marries

BYLINE: By Susan Heller Anderson and Maurice Carroll

SECTION: Section B; Page 3, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 357 words


She was denied political asylum

when she entered the United States illegally last year from El Salvador, and
faced possible deportation. When the decision by the Immigration and
Naturalization Service to deport Julia Tezpa was delivered last week, she was
immediately arrested and held at a processing center at 201 Varick Street in
lower Manhattan.

Her deportation, originally scheduled for July 20, was halted by a temporary
restraining order. The order, by Judge Whitman Knapp of Federal District Court
in Manhattan, allowed her to get married yesterday.

Miss Tezpa wed John Harris, a native of Belize and a legal permanent resident,
at the center. Both are 22 years old. They met while Mr. Harris was doing light
construction in the building in Brooklyn where Miss Tezpa lives. They had been
planning to marry for some months.

Mrs. Harris will be deported by next weekend, according to the Center for
Immigrants Rights Inc., a nonprofit advocacy organization, in Manhattan.

''I just want to get married and I just want her to stay here with me,'' the
bridegroom said on arriving at the center.

Mrs. Harris has applied for voluntary-departure status, meaning, according to
her lawyer, Anne Pilsbury, that she would still leave immediately, but pay her
fare and be allowed to return after her husband had applied for a visa for her.
Once back in the United States, she could then apply for permanent residence.

If she is denied voluntary departure, Miss Pilsbury said, she could apply for a
waiver of deportation once in El Salvador. If that is denied, her husband could
not apply for her return for five years, Miss Pilsbury said.

For the bride, Miss Pilsbury, who is affiliated with the immigrants' center,
brought a wedding bouquet of white carnations and yellow chrysanthemums and a
small wedding cake to the detention center. The flowers were allowed inside the
center, but the cake ran afoul of rules controlling food from outside.

A spokesman for the Center for Immigrants Rights, Darlene Kalke, said that Mrs.
Harris's chances of returning were good, but that she might face a 6-to-10-month
wait in El Salvador.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              82 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               August 1, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

Terrorist Suspect Halted in Canada

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section B; Page 8, Column 4; Sports Desk

LENGTH: 93 words

DATELINE: BUFFALO, July 31


United States Immigration and Naturalization Service officials here said that a
suspected Syrian terrorist had been stopped from boarding a Los Angeles- bound
airplane Sunday in Toronto, Ontario.

Sahak Kalanjian, 42 years old, was turned back because his passport had expired
and had been altered to make it appear that the document was still in effect,
the authorities said.

His name was on a list compiled by Federal agencies of suspected terrorists,
according to William H. Truesdale Jr., deputy director of the immigration
service in Buffalo.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              83 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 31, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE WORLD;
Vietnam Official Wants Talks on Amerasians

BYLINE: Reuters

SECTION: Section A; Page 5, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 157 words

DATELINE: BANGKOK, Thailand, July 30


A Vietnamese immigration official has called for direct talks with the United
States to speed the resettlement of Amerasians from Vietnam, refugee workers
said today.

But United States officials in Bangkok said they saw no need to discuss the
issue with Hanoi.

Refugee workers who recently returned from Vietnam quoted the immigration
official, Nguyen Phi Tuyen, as saying he wanted talks to resolve technical
problems that have slowed resettlement. But a United States official in Bangkok
said: ''We don't really see any necessity for talks. The orderly departure
program is the only program set up to take Vietnamese refugees, and it is
working.''

Vietnam estimates that it has 11,000 to 20,000 Amerasians, children of mixed
race fathered by United States servicemen during the Vietnam War.

The United States has taken 3,244 Amerasians and their relatives since Vietnam
first began letting them go in 1982, refugee workers said.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              84 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 31, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

10 ARE CHARGED WITH OPERATING SMUGGLING RING

BYLINE: By ARNOLD H. LUBASCH

SECTION: Section B; Page 3, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 512 words


Federal charges were announced yesterday in Manhattan against 10 people accused
of participating in a ring that smuggled cocaine and illegal aliens into the
United States.

Seven of the suspects were arrested Saturday, and the three others were being
sought. The case grew out of a one-year investigation by immigration agents who
pretended to be willing to take bribes.

Investigators seized 62 pounds of cocaine, with a street value estimated at $6
million, $80,000 in cash and records concerning the ring's operation, according
to the authorities.

The announcement was made at a news conference by United States Attorney Rudolph
W. Giuliani and the district director of the Immigration and Naturalization
Service, Charles C. Sava. They said in a statement that ''an interlocking
narcotics and alien-smuggling ring operating in the New York City area had been
cracked.''

Offer to Agents


Steps will be taken to deport more than 60 illegal aliens that the ring brought
into the country from the Dominican Republic, they added. They thanked the
Customs Service and the Drug Enforcement Administration for assisting in the
case.

The case began last year when a suspect who was being investigated by two
immigration agents told the agents they could make a lot of money by helping to
smuggle aliens, according to the prosecutor handling the charges, Steven M.
Kaplan.

With the approval of immigration supervisors, Mr. Kaplan said, the agents agreed
to go along with the arrangement, and the key agent used his official
credentials to escort small groups of aliens past immigration controls at
Kennedy International Airport.

The aliens, all from the Dominican Republic, each paid $2,000 to $3,000 to the
ring, and the supposedly corrupt agent was paid more than $25,000 in bribes, the
authorities said.

Baking Soda Substituted


Last Friday, they said, the agent carried a cardboard package with 62 pounds of
cocaine past customs at Kennedy after the package had arrived as baggage on a
flight from Colombia. The agent was supposed to deliver the cocaine to the ring
the next day, they continued, but the authorities opened the package, replaced
the cocaine with baking soda and arrested the suspects after the agent delivered
the package Saturday.

The main suspect was identified as Dulce Llavarias, 35 years old, of Queens,
operator of San Juan Travel Inc., a Manhattan travel agency. Her lawyer, Harry
C. Batchelder Jr., denied the charges.

Among the suspects were her sisters, Cecilia Ramirez, 38, of Manhattan, and
Diana Ramirez, 32, described as an illegal alien from the Dominican Republic.

Four other suspects were also arrested. They were Jose Curet, 41, of Manhattan;
Jose Anibal Henriquez, 27, of the Dominican Republic; Louis Carlos Ortiz, 25, of
Colombia, and Maria Vila Guzman, 23, of Manhattan.

The three missing suspects are Carlos Moncada Rendon, 23, of Queens; Justino
Santos, 36, of Manhattan, and Aristedes Burgos, 34, of Montreal.

The arrested suspects were arraigned in Federal District Court in Manhattan.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Rudolph Giuliani, Charles Sava and John Luksio

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              85 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 30, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

ISSUE AND DEBATE;
MEASURE TO ADMIT ALIEN FARM WORKERS

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section A; Page 11, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1357 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, July 29


Both houses of Congress have passed comprehensive immigration bills, but they
differ on whether to create a special program to admit aliens as agricultural
workers.

The House has approved a program under which foreign workers could enter the
United States for up to 11 consecutive months to perform seasonal harvesting of
perishable fruit and vegetables.  The Senate bill would make it somewhat easier
for farmers to obtain visas for temporary foreign workers but would not
authorize a special new program such as the one in the House bill.

The legislation now ''hangs by a thread,'' says its chief Senate sponsor, Alan
K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming. He says he dislikes the provisions for
foreign workers in the House bill because they could lead to ''an open-ended
guest worker program.''

The House voted to create the special program after hearing a bipartisan chorus
of appeals on behalf of farmers, particularly those in Western states who depend
on illegal aliens to help pick grapes, apples, cherries, tomatoes and other
produce. The growers said they needed a ready supply of aliens, legal or
illegal, to do the work that Americans would not.

The foreign worker program was proposed by Representatives Leon E. Panetta, a
California Democrat, and Sid Morrison, a Washington State Republican. Hispanic
groups and organized labor denounced the proposal, saying it was hypocrisy. If
Congress was passing legislation to curtail the influx of illegal aliens, they
said, it made no sense to create a special exception for one group of employers.

The Background

The bills would prohibit employment of illegal aliens but offer legal status to
many of them already in the United States. Under current law, 15,000 to 20,000
aliens enter the United States each year for seasonal farm work. The law sets no
numerical limit.  Presidents Ford, Carter and Reagan have all wanted to stem
illegal immigration.All three endorsed the same basic combination of proposals:
employer sanctions to penalize those who hire illegal aliens and amnesty to
avoid the need for a huge roundup.

A Federal study commission, headed by the Rev. Theodore M. Hesburgh, president
of the University of Notre Dame, endorsed these proposals in 1981, but it
rejected a major expansion of the existing foreign worker program.

The commission recommendations were incorporated in bills offered by Senator
Simpson and Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky. The Senate
has twice passed the legislation by more than 4 to 1, in August 1982 and May
1983. By 216 to 211, the House approved a similar bill last month. The vote to
adopt the Panetta amendment was 228 to 172, with only 15 Republicans opposed.

The debate over aliens and agriculture is filled with references to the
experience of the United States and Mexico from 1942 to 1964. Four million to
five million Mexican agricultural workers came to the United States under .
what became known as the bracero program.  each Mexican worker had a contract
with a particular employer in the United States. The Federal Government
guaranteed provisions of the contract relating to wages and transportation costs
if an employer failed to meet his obligations. Mexican workers were generally
admitted for a maximum of six months at a time.  Critics of that program said
there was much exploitation and abuse of the braceros, or laborers.

For the ProgramThe choice,'' Mr. Panetta said, ''is not whether there will be
foreign workers in this country, but whether there will be legal protection or
illegal exploitation of those workers.''

Under his proposal, Mr. Panetta said, ''domestic workers would have first
preference for available jobs'' and ''could not be undercut by cheap foreign
labor.'' But, he said, ''foreign workers would be entitled to adequate housing,
insurance against injury, decent working conditions and fair wages.''

Mr. Panetta said a ''tremendous violation of rights'' exists, and ''what we are
trying to do here is to take a step toward a legalized system that will in fact
protect rights.''

Those admitted under the new program would not be assigned to a specific
employer. They could move about in a geographical area designated by the
Attorney General. Mr. Panetta said this was another protection for the foreign
worker because he could quit a job if he was not satisfied with wages or working
conditions.

Representative Robert J. Lagomarsino, a California Republican, said that if the
immigration bill was passed without the Panetta amendment, American farmers
''will not have the labor force to harvest their crops.'' The loss of crops,
according to this argument, would result in shortages of commodities and, in
turn, higher prices to consumers.

The farmers say time is of the essence because perishable crops, are sensitive
to changing weather, ripen unpredictably and must be harvested in hours. Thus
the Panetta proposal requires the Attorney General to rule on a farmer's
application within 72 hours if ''extraordinary and unusual circumstances''
create a special demand for foreign workers. Supporters of the Panetta amendment
said the principal beneficiaries would be small farmers who could not afford a
permanent work force.

Against the ProgramOpponents said the Panetta proposal would weaken labor
protections for foreign and domestic workers, permit exploitation and lead to a
direct loss of jobs for citizens.

They said the current law permits issuing visas to aliens wishing to perform
''temporary services or labor'' in the United States. But, they said, California
growers have made scarcely any effort to take advantage of that law. Some East
Coast farmers have brought in aliens under the law for many years.

Under the law, employers must demonstrate to the Labor Department that workers
are not available domestically and using aliens would not adversely affect the
wages and working conditions of Americans in similar jobs. Critics of the
Panetta proposal said it would not require such ''labor certification.''

Representative George Miller, Democrat of California, said the new program would
depress farm wages because ''there will be no comparison'' with the domestic
agricultural labor market.

Representative Charles A. Hayes, Democrat of Illinois, said that ''previous
guest worker programs, in this country and in Europe, have tended to encourage
undocumented immigration of foreign workers who then refuse to return to their
countries.''

The Panetta proposal was called ''an enormous bailout of agribusiness'' by
Representative Howard L. Berman, a California Democrat.

Representative Henry B. Gonzalez, Democrat of Texas, called it a ''rent- a-slave
program.''

Similarly, Representative Barney Frank, a Massachusetts Democrat, said the
affected aliens would be ''hired help with no rights.'' The proposal, he said,
gives farmers ''the most extraordinary set of exemptions from economics, from
competition, from immigration laws.''

Even without the Panetta amendment, the Simpson-Mazzoli legislation would make a
special allowance for farmers, giving them three years more than other employers
to end the use of illegal aliens.

Representative Bill Richardson, a New Mexico Democrat, said foreign workers
would have no job guarantee under the Panetta move, so ''they could spend a
considerable amount of money to get here and find no jobs once they arrive.''

The OutlookIt appears unlikely that Congress would pass a bill with the Panetta
amendment in just the form the House adopted. More than 40 House members who
voted for the bill have since demanded the amendment be dropped.

If there is a House-Senate conference, Mr. Simpson has said he would try to
restrict the foreign worker program, perhaps by limiting the aliens who could
come each year.  He said the conferees might extend the agricultural transition
program for two years, so farmers would have a total of five to comply with the
ban on hiring illegal aliens.  But growers have a strong lobby, and, according
to members of Congress, they could probably block any effort to eliminate
special treatment of their industry.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              86 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 30, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

The Calendar

BYLINE: By Barbara Gamarekian

SECTION: Section A; Page 10, Column 4; National Desk

LENGTH: 523 words


Monday

Congress continues to plug away this week, but the White House will be quiet as
President Reagan is on a two- week vacation at his ranch. Secretary of State
George P. Shultz is also taking advantage of the lull before the Republican
Convention and vacationing in California.

The immigration bill, still twisting slowly in the wind, may see some
Congressional action this week that will clarify its fate. Conferees on the
military authorization bill are shooting for Wednesday as the day they hope to
resolve their differences, but that may be optimistic.

Viewpoint: The Rev. Louis Farrak han, leader of the Nation of Islam, speaks at a
National Press Club luncheon on what he considers media distortions of his
comments on Judaism and other issues. The Rev. Jesse Jackson is expected as one
of the head table guests. Noon.

Tuesday

Index of Leading Indicators for June, due out today, will give a clue as to what
is ahead for the economy.

Shape Up: The Temporary Select Committee to Study the Senate System holds its
first day of hearings today with the Senate majority leader, Howard H. Baker Jr.
of Tennessee, a supporter of Senate reorganization, as leadoff witness. A second
day of hearings will be held on Thursday. 10 A.M., Room SR301.

Sweet Talk: A National Research Council committee is to hold a public meeting
exploring the cancer-causing properties of cyclamates, the artificial food
sweeteners. The new assessment has been requested by the Food and Drug
Administration. 10 A.M., National Academy of Sciences auditorium, 2100 C Street,
N.W.

Pep Talk: As negotiations begin on a new union contract, Owen Bieber, president
of the United Automobile Workers, speaks at a National Press Club luncheon today
on the industry's comeback. Noon.

Countdown: The Senate votes today on whether to limit debate on the nomination
of Prof. J. Harvie Wilkinson 3d of the University of Virginia Law School to an
appellate court.

Wednesday

The subcommitee on International Development Institutions and Finance of the
House Committee on Banking holds a hearing on a proposal to establish an
Inter-American Investment Corporation with United States participation. 10 A.M.,
Room 2222, Rayburn Office Building.

Postal Talk: Moe Biller, president of the Amerian Postal Workers Union, and
Vincent R. Sombrotto, president of the National Association of Letter Carriers,
will discuss efforts to reach a new postal contract. National Press Club
luncheon. Noon.

Anchors Aweigh: Some 1,500 Navy women gather at a five-day national reunion of
the Waves and a celebration of its 42d anniversary. Among the participants,
Commodore Grace Hopper, U.S.N.R., oldest Navy person still on active duty.
Shoreham Hotel.

Thursday

Phi Delta Kappa International, the professional education fraternity, makes
public its 16th annual Gallup/ Phi Delta Kappa Poll of attitudes towards the
public schools. 5:30 P.M., National Press Club.

Friday

Bureau of Labor Statistics discloses latest unemployment figures. Although
unemployment has declined faster than in any recovery since World War II,
analysts expect the rate to level off soon.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: drawing

TYPE: Schedule

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              87 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 29, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

THE NATION;
IMMIGRATION BILL LOOKS LESS LIKELY

BYLINE: By Michael Wright, Carlyle C. Douglas, and Caroline Rand Herron

SECTION: Section 4; Page 4, Column 1; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 316 words


As Congress settled in for a brief between-conventions session last week, there
were mounting indications that the much-fought-over immigration bill might not
make it to President Reagan's desk after all.

The House and Senate, in their separate votes, have approved legislation
dissimilar in many respects. Because the vote in the House was a squeaker,
supporters are reluctant to give the House an opportunity to reject a compromise
that might be drafted by a conference committee. One big reason for their
caution is that the Democratic candidates for President and Vice President have
said they would do their best to rally Democratic Representatives against the
bill.

Technically, the House could be sidestepped; the Senate could simply scrap its
bill and accept the House's. But last week an Administration spokesman said the
House version was ''unacceptable,'' prompting California Senator Alan Cranston,
the Democratic whip, to say immigration legislation was beginning to look ''dead
for this session of Congress.''

Election-year considerations reared up elsewhere on Capital Hill. The Senate
voted, 86 to 3, to insure that contrary to existing guidelines Social Security
recipients get a cost- of-living increase on Jan. 1 even if inflation hasn't
risen above the 3 percent mark. In several political speeches last week,
President Reagan promised to support such action.

Earlier in the week, in one of its infrequent displays of interest in
environmental legislation, the Senate unanimously approved a bill that would
beef up Federal hazardous- waste disposal regulations. By a 74 to 19 vote, the
Senate also approved a resolution that urged President Reagan to withdraw his
nomination of Anne McGill Burford as chairman of the National Advisory Board on
Oceans and the Atmosphere. Mrs. Burford was forced to resign as head of the
Environmental Protection Agency early in 1983.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              88 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 27, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

Hang On to Immigration Reform

SECTION: Section A; Page 24, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 466 words


These are bleak days for immigration reform. The Democrats' national candidates,
pandering to Hispanic leaders, parrot the unjustified claim that the
Simpson-Mazzoli bill fosters discrimination against Mexican-Americans. Vice
President Bush, joining the panderers, promises that President Reagan wouldn't
sign anything discriminatory. The bill's sponsors have reason to fear that the
necessary compromise between Senate and House versions won't survive a second
close House vote.

But this essential reform has been pronounced dead before. America still needs
to gain control of its borders, to abandon the lures to illegal immigration and
to punish the hiring of illegal aliens. The reformers got this far by finely
balancing regional interests and subordinating partisanship. They should not
yield now to opportunism in either party.


The three contenders for the Democratic Presidential nomination outdid each
other in opposing Simpson-Mazzoli as discriminatory. The party's
Vice-Presidential candidate voted against it for opposite reasons, contending
that amnesty for millions of illegals already here was unpopular in her Queens
district.

Mere repetition will not prove the fears of discrimination. Employers who now
hire Mexican- Americans will still need to hire Mexican-Americans. All they'd
have to do is verify, by means of an ethnically neutral telephone checking
system, that a job applicant is a legal resident. Far from encouraging employers
to avoid hiring Hispanics, as is charged, the law would deny any excuse to
employers who might indeed want to discriminate.  If they focus on the merits,
the Senate and House should be able to reconcile their bills. The House's would
grant amnesty to more recently arrived illegals. But Government must, at some
point, draw a line and then control the borders. And aliens must, at some point,
be allowed out of the shadows without further fear of exploitation.  More
difficult is the House's open-ended allowance for ''guest'' workers in seasonal
jobs. But that, too, can be narrowed and made fair. Where they can show real
need, fruit and vegetable growers can be accommodated.  Both bills would
penalize illegal hiring, but the House rejected the Senate's criminal sanctions.
Reform should not founder on that difference. The important step now is to
proclaim it illegal to lure illegal migrants with job opportunities.  Senator
Alan Simpson and Representative Romano Mazzoli, the Republican and Democratic
sponsors of this measure, have already struck a great many impressive
compromises. The Hispanic leaders do not speak for a unanimous constituency.
This reform deserves to survive because it is one of those rare achievements, a
truly national response to a problem recognized by all Americans.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: editorial

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              89 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 26, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION MEASURE IS PUT IN DOUBT

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section A; Page 14, Column 4; National Desk

LENGTH: 823 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, July 25


The White House said today that the House version of a comprehensive immigration
bill was ''unacceptable,'' raising the possibility that Congress could not
complete action on the legislation this year.

Larry Speakes, the White House spokesman, said the House bill would be too
expensive. ''The Senate version is what we want,'' Mr. Speakes told reporters
flying to Texas on a campaign trip with President Reagan. ''The House version is
unacceptable.''

About three hours later Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming, the
chief sponsor of the Senate bill, issued a statement saying he had not decided
how to proceed. However, he insisted that the bill was not dead.

Mr. Simpson said he was ''tumbling around'' in search of a strategy to rescue
the bill, which has been passed twice by margins of more than 4 to 1 in the
Senate.

A Tangled Situation


The landmark legislation is now in a tangled situation. If it goes to a
conference committee, the normal way of reconciling differences between the two
chambers, it would have to be approved again by each chamber, and there is no
guarantee that the House would go along. On the other hand, if the Senate
accepted the House-passed bill, that version of the legislation would go to the
President, who, according to Mr. Speakes, could not accept it.

Mr. Simpson and other Senate leaders said Tuesday that if the White House would
accept the House version, they might urge the Senate to pass it. The House vote
approving the bill last month was 216 to 211.

Mr. Simpson and the chief sponsor of the House bill, Representative Romano L.
Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky, had assured House members that they would try to
resolve many points of disagreement in a conference committee.

House Democrats reacted angrily today when they learned of the possibility that
the Senate might accept the House bill, precluding such a conference and
avoiding the need for another vote on the bill in the House.

Mr. Simpson said he would prefer to have a Senate-House conference on the bill,
even though it was highly uncertain whether the House would now accept a
compromise negotiated in such a conference. But Mr. Simpson said he reserved the
right to take the House- passed bill to the Senate floor.

Differences in Measures


The House bill, unlike the Senate measure, would authorize a new temporary
foreign worker program, under which farmers and ranchers could bring aliens into
the United States to do seasonal work harvesting perishable fruit and
vegetables. Organized labor and Hispanic groups oppose this provision, as does
Mr. Simpson, who fears it could lead to what he calls ''an open- ended guest
worker program.''

Both bills would prohibit the employment of illegal aliens and authorize civil
penalties against employers who hired such aliens. Both bills would also offer
legal status to some illegal aliens. Under the Senate bill, the amnesty would
apply to aliens who entered the United States before Jan. 1, 1980, and have
lived here continuously since that date. The House bill sets the eligibility
date at Jan. 1, 1982, so more aliens would qualify. In addition, the House bill
would provide larger amounts of money to state and local governments to help pay
the cost of social services for aliens who gain legal status.

Reviewing today's developments, Senator Alan Cranston of California, the
Democratic whip, said, ''It's beginning to look like the Simpson-Mazzoli bill is
dead for this session of Congress at least, and that is very, very good news.''

The Democratic candidates for President and Vice President, Walter F. Mondale
and Geraldine A. Ferraro, assured Hispanic groups at the Democratic National
Convention last week that they would try to defeat the bill, which would make
the most significant changes in immigration law in more than three decades.

Mr. Simpson said today that he and Mr. Mazzoli were shocked to see ''the
pandering and posturing'' that took place at the convention. He added: ''The
raging partisan hysteria, hoopla and hype against this legislation which sprang
from the Democratic National Convention, and which continues to reverberate
through the halls of this Congress, may have seriously damaged the chance that
the House could accept any bill reported by a conference, regardless of how
skillfully it might be crafted.''

If Congress fails to pass the legislation this year, Mr. Simpson said, it might
be a decade or more before there is another serious effort to deal with the
influx of illegal aliens.

Earlier today, Representatives Kent Hance of Texas and Patricia Schroeder of
Colorado, both Democrats, announced the formation of a broad coalition to fight
the bill. It includes the Associated General Contractors, the Chamber of
Commerce of the United States, the National Grocers Association, the American
Civil Liberties Union and the League of United Latin American Citizens.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of ALan Simpson

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              90 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               July 25, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

ALIENS BILL DRAWS CRITICISM AT U.S.-MEXICO GOVERNORS' PARLEY

BYLINE: By ROBERT REINHOLD

SECTION: Section A; Page 19, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 801 words

DATELINE: TUCSON, Ariz., July 24


The Governors of the four American and six Mexican states along the 2,000-mile
border between the two countries convened here this week, and all except George
Deukmejian of California said they opposed a comprehensive immigration bill that
is now before Congress.

Their gathering, a regular meeting to discuss common problems on the permeable
border, came as Congress prepared to resume deliberations on the much-debated
bill, which is designed to stem the flow of illegal immigrants by imposing
sanctions on their American employers. Congress is attempting to resolve
differences between differing versions passed by the House and the Senate.

But the perception in Washington is far different from that along the border
where most of the migration occurs. While publicly expressing respect for the
American legislative process, the Mexican Governors uniformly reflected their
national Government's view that the bill might result in injustices to
''undocumented'' workers in this country and exacerbate Mexico's economic
troubles. The bill is sponsored by Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of
Wyoming, and Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky.

''We, Mexicans, consider that the undocumented workers have all the rights to
receive the same treatment that the Constitution and the laws of the United
States grant to its citizens regarding human and labor rights,'' said Gov.
Emilio Martinez Manautou of Tamaulipas, adding that the Mexican Government would
act to ''prevent any violation of the right inherent to their human condition as
well as that as workers.''

For different reasons, three of the United States Governors, all Democrats in
states with large Hispanic populations, also denounced the bill. Bruce Babbitt
of Arizona, the host, said he believed it would result in discrimination against
American citizens of Mexican descent trying to obtain work.

Mark White of Texas said, ''I support the need for reform of immigration policy,
but I do not believe Simpson- Mazzoli offers adequate protection of Hispanic job
seekers.'' Toney Anaya of New Mexico agreed.

Alone in dissent was Governor Deukmejian, a Republican, who asserted, ''We
really have lost control of our borders.'' The bill, he said, was not perfect,
but was the ''best vehicle'' yet devised. He disputed suggestions that
Mexican-Americans would suffer discrimination in its enforcement, asserting that
employers would have to ask all employees for proper identification.

The conference here also dealt with a wide variety of other border issues,
including trade, drug traffic, public health, pollution, border crossings and
cultural links. It was the fourth such meeting since 1980.

This year's meeting took on added significance not only because of the pending
immigration bill but because this is a Presidential election year in the United
States. Hispanic advisers to both President Reagan and his Democratic
challenger, Walter F. Mondale, were here, as was a contingent from the United
States Embassy in Mexico City.

If there was full agreement on anything, it was that the United States had a
responsiblity to help improve the Mexican economy as a means of easing migration
pressures. ''It is inconceivable that the United States should have trade
policies that discriminate against Mexico while treating better dozens of third
world countries that are only fractionally as important to us,'' said Mr.
Babbitt.

At a concluding news conference Monday night, the 10 officials agreed that their
two national Governments should negotiate a bilateral trade agreement extending
the privileges of the General Agreement on Trade and Tariffs to Mexico without
compelling Mexico to ratify the international agreement and accept its rules.
This, the Governors said, would lower barriers to the sale of Mexican products
in the United States. They also called on Congress to renew the Generalized
System of Preferences, which gives special consideration to certain Mexican
exports. The system is scheduled to expire next year.

As for immigration, Mr. Babbitt said the Mexican Governors ''graciously did not
press their case'' in the face of Mr. Deukmejian's support for the bill. But all
10 did agree on these four points:


- Because immigration is a bilateral issue involving large economic, social and
human effects, consultations should be held between the two Governments before
any policy is put into effect.


- Any new policy should be carried out in a manner that assures that there will
be no discrimination against people of Hispanic descent.


- Any policy must assure social justice, civil rights and human treatment of all
people, ''irrespective of their juridical or legal status.''


- Both nations should cooperate in research into the causes of ''undocumented
migration.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              91 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               July 25, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

SENATE MAY BE ASKED TO ACCEPT HOUSE VERSION OF IMMIGRATION BILL

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 19, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 798 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, July 24


Senate leaders said today that they were seriously considering urging the Senate
to accept the House version of a comprehensive immigration bill so the House
would not have to vote again on the legislation.

The comments by several Republican Senators reflected a widely held view that as
a result of lobbying by Hispanic groups at the Democratic National Convention in
San Francisco last week, House opposition to the bill was slightly stronger now
than it was when the House passed the bill last month by a vote of 216 to 211.

Walter F. Mondale, the Democratic candidate for President, and Geraldine A.
Ferraro, the nominee for Vice President, told Hispanic groups at the convention
that they would do everything they could to defeat the legislation.



Discussion of Strategy


The Senate passed a similar bill by a vote of 76 to 18 in May 1983.

The chief sponsor of the Senate bill, Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of
Wyoming, and the chief sponsor of the House bill, Representative Romano L.
Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky, met today to discuss their strategy.

Senator Ted Stevens, Republican of Alaska, the majority whip, said Mr. Simpson
had indicated to his colleagues that he was ''about ready'' to accept the House
bill if that was the only way to insure passage of the immigration measure this
year.



Conference Would Be Avoided


Senate acceptance of the House bill would avoid the need for a conference
committee to work out a compromise between the Senate and House versions of the
legislation.

Any compromise bill would have to be approved by both houses before it could be
sent to President Reagan for his signature. Supporters of the legislation said
they were unsure whether they could gain approval for a revised bill in the
House, which is controlled by the Democrats.

Senator Simpson opposes a provision of the House bill that would establish a
temporary foreign worker program under which aliens could enter the United
States for seasonal work harvesting perishable crops.



Limit Was Promised


Many House members voted for the bill after receiving assurances from Mr.
Mazzoli that he would try to delete this provision or to limit the number of
aliens who could take advantage of it. As approved by the House, the bill sets
no such numerical limit.

Mr. Simpson and the Reagan Administration also oppose the more liberal amnesty
provisions of the House bill. The House measure would offer legal status to
illegal aliens who entered the United States before Jan. 1, 1982, and have lived
here continuously since. The Senate bill offers legal status only to those who
entered this country before Jan. 1, 1980.

The Senate has twice approved the Simpson-Mazzoli bill by a margin of more than
4 to 1, and senators said it would probably accept the House bill if asked to do
so.

But to make such a request would be a high-risk political strategy for
Republicans and Democrats. Mr. Simpson has said he would not ask Congress to
send the White House an immigration bill without an assurance that President
Reagan would sign it.

Promise Made to O'Neill


Mr. Simpson made that promise last year to allay the concerns of the Speaker of
the House, Thomas P. O'Neill Jr., Democrat of Massachusetts, who feared Mr.
Reagan would veto the bill to curry political favor with Hispanic voters.

The House and Senate versions of the bill would both prohibit the employment of
illegal aliens and impose penalties on employers who did.

Leaders of Hispanic organizations contend that the bill would cause an increase
in discrimination against Hispanic workers; supporters of the bill deny it would
have such a result.

White House officials said Mr. Reagan would sign the Senate bill, but said he
had many reservations about the House bill. When the House approved its version
last month, Attorney General William French Smith said that ''some of its
features require substantial change.''

Speaker O'Neill, while reiterating his personal dislike for the legislation,
said today that he would promptly appoint conferees if the Senate requested a
conference with the House.

Mr. O'Neill said the margin of passage in the House had been so small that ''if
somebody in the leadership had sneezed, it would have gone the other way.''

Despite the statements by some Senators today that Mr. Simpson would ask the
Senate to accept the House bill this week, he insisted in an interview that he
had not made a decision. ''There were a lot of promises made that I would not
want to jump ship on,'' he said, without giving details.

Mrs. Ferraro voted against taking up the bill in the House, and voted against
the bill itself. People in her district in Queens did not like giving amnesty to
illegal aliens, she explained.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              92 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 23, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

CONGRESS FACING MAJOR WORKLOAD ON RETURN TODAY

BYLINE: By MARTIN TOLCHIN, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 1283 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, July 22


Congress will reconvene Monday for a three- week session between the Democratic
and the Republican national conventions facing an array of unfinished business,
including an overhaul of the immigration laws and military aid to Central
America.

Before it recessed for the Democratic convention, Congress achieved an
unexpected degree of bipartisanship on major legislative initiatives. The
question now is whether bipartisan compromises will continue or whether the
political pressures of an election year will make further legislative progress
this year impossible.

There is little optimism that the immigration and the military budget measures
leading the work list can be completed before the recess for the Republican
National Convention. Congress will return after Labor Day and is scheduled to
adjourn Oct. 4 to let its members campaign for re-election.



Keeping Government Running


Nor is Congress expected to complete work on all the 13 appropriations bills
needed to fund the Federal Government in the fiscal year beginning Oct. 1. Only
three such bills have thus far been passed.

To keep the Government running in the new fiscal year, Congress would have to
approve all 13 bills or pass a continuing resolution for spending that would
cover the agencies for which appropriations bills were not approved.

A dispute on military spending has deadlocked two measures in House- Senate
conferences, and there is little expectation of a speedy resolution. The issue
has resulted in stalemates involving both the budget resolution setting the
ceiling on spending and military authorization setting spending policy for the
new fiscal year.



Impasse on Military Ceiling


In its 1985 budget resolution, the Senate approved $299 billion in military
spending for the fiscal year 1985, for a 7.8 percent increase after taking
account of inflation. But the House approved only $285.7 billion, a 3.5 percent
increase.

The Senate Republicans rejected an offer by House Democrats that would provide
nearly $292.5 billion in military spending, for a 5 percent increase in real
growth.

Because of the impasse over military spending, the Defense Department
appropriation may have to be part of the continuing resolution.

Both the House and Senate reduced President Reagan's request for 40 MX missiles.
The Senate reduced the number to 21 and the House to 15 with conditions, and
this difference also would have to be resolved to end the stalemates.

A House-Senate conference will also seek to resolve differences in a bill that
would make sweeping changes in the nation's immigration laws. The measure
narrowly passed the House and is strongly opposed by Hispanic Americans, many
liberals and the Democrats' national standard-bearers, Walter F. Mondale and
Representative Geraldine A. Ferraro. She is to return to Washington Tuesday
after spending a day in her Queens office.  With the variety and strength of
views on the immigration measure, negotiations are expected to be
extraordinarily delicate.

Both the Senate and House measures would penalize employers who knowingly hire
illegal aliens. But the Senate bill would provide criminal as well as civil
penalties, while the House bill would impose only civil fines.

Another dispute involves a House provision for a program that could bring
several hundred thousand foreign workers into the United States annually to
harvest perishable crops. The Senate bill does not include this provision, which
is strongly opposed by many liberal and moderate lawmakers.

Renewed Bid for Aid to Rebels


The Administration is planning a renewed effort to have Congress approve $21
million in additional aid for Nicaraguan rebels. The $24 million appropriated
earlier this year has nearly been exhausted, and Congress has opposed providing
more support. Congressional Democrats vigorously opposed additional aid for the
Nicaraguan rebels and were joined in the Senate by moderate Republicans who
agreed to kill the proposal.

The Administration also has requested an additional $117 million in military aid
for El Salvador in the current fiscal year, and $132.5 million for 1985. In a
bipartisan consensus after the election of Jose Napoleon Duarte, a moderate, as
President of El Salvador, Congressional Democrats joined Republicans in
supporting an Administration request for an addition $61.7 million this year.
The question is whether Democrats will continue to support additional military
aid to the Salvadoran Government.

The lawmakers also are expected to consider another increase in the debt
ceiling. On June 29, Congress increased the Government's authority to borrow
money from $1,520 billion to $1,573 billion. But the new debt ceiling provides
only enough Government borrowing authority to last through August.

The debt ceiling issue poses political problems for Senate Republicans who
promised in election campaigns not to vote to raise the debt ceiling but who are
repeatedly persuaded to do so by their party leaders, at the behest of the White
House. In Iowa, for example, Democrats have accused Senator Roger W. Jepsen, a
Republican seeking re-election, of repeatedly breaking his 1978 campaign pledge
not to vote to increase the debt ceiling.

Religious Groups' Access


The House and Senate also disagree on whether religious groups should have the
same right to use public schools as other extracurricular organizations. The
Senate attached to a bill increasing funds for the study of mathematics and
science a provision that would negate the effect of Federal court decisions and
assure such ''equal access.''

House Speaker Thomas P. O'Neill Jr., who opposes this provision, ruled that it
was not germane to the math- science bill, which he sent to both the Judiciary
Committee and the Education and Labor Committee.

Representative Don Edwards, the California Democrat who is chairman of the
Judiciary subcommittee with jurisdiction over the bill, says he will seek to
kill the equal access provision. But Representative Carl D. Perkins, the
Kentucky Democrat who is chairman of the Education and Labor Committee, supports
it and has vowed to bring it to the House floor on Wednesday.

10 Appropriations Bills Pending


The two chambers also will work on a separate military appropriations bill, in
addition to the budget and military authorization. The military appropriations
bill is one of 10 appropriations bills that will be before the lawmakers.

The others deal with agriculture; commerce; the District of Columbia; foreign
aid; the Interior Department; the departments of Labor, Health and Human
Services, and Education; military construction; transportation, and the Treasury
and Postal Service. The three spending bills already enacted deal with energy
and water development; housing and urban development, and the legislative
branch.

In addition, House and Senate leaders have their own agendas. House leaders plan
floor action on a bill renewing the Federal program to clean up hazardous waste
dumps, a measure imposing sanctions against countries that engage in unfair
trading practices, an authorization for the Corporation for Public Broadcasting,
an intelligence authorization bill, and a measure increasing food aid, ocean
dumping legislation.

Senate leaders, meanwhile, plan to bring to the floor a highway construction
bill; a bill that would allow banks to offer a full line of real estate,
insurance and securities services; and a civil rights measure, passed by the
House, that is intended to strengthen the enforcement powers of the Civil Rights
Act in light of a recent Supreme Court decision involving Grove City College.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              93 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 23, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

CITY IMMIGRATION OFFICE CLOGGED BY CASELOAD

BYLINE: By ELAINE SCIOLINO

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 2; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 1735 words


The New York district office of the Immigration and Naturalization Service is
understaffed, buried in paper work and overwhelmed by antiquated procedures,
according to many specialists in the field. Moreover, they say, there will be a
torrent of new work if Congress approves new immigration legislation.

Despite some innovations over the last few years, the agency, which handles the
largest workload of any district office in the country, simply does not have the
resources to keep up with the volume, according to Government officials, private
experts who deal regularly with the agency and aliens themselves.

''We're slowly but surely moving into the 20th century,'' said Kathleen Shields,
supervisor of the immigration service's information unit. ''But by the time we
get there, it will be the 21st.''

This year, about three-quarters of a million aliens will pass through the doors
of the district headquarters, on 13 floors of the concrete and limestone Federal
Building in lower Manhattan.

The immigration service estimates that if the new legislation becomes law, as
many as 450,000 aliens could be eligible to apply for some sort of legal status
in the district, which covers New York City, Long Island and seven upstate
counties.

The immigration measure, the Simpson-Mazzoli immigration bill that is moving
through Congress, would grant legal status to some illegal aliens and would try
to stem further illegal immigration by penalizing employers who hire aliens who
lack proper documents.

Agency officials say that they have taken steps in the last several years to
streamline their operations and that they are making contingency plans to handle
the surge of cases that would result from passage of the immigration bill.

''You can't sit back and wring your hands or leap out the window,'' said Charles
C. Sava, director of the immigration service's New York district. ''You can't
let the large numbers scare you.''

The New York district, including its branch offices, has a staff of 800, a 20
percent decrease from five years ago, when the immigration service reshuffled
its resources to meet crises in districts with growing alien populations.

Aliens and their lawyers complain that the agency's operations are hampered by
inefficiency - from a shortage of some of the most sought-after forms to
regulations that bounce aliens from office to office. For the aliens, the sum
total is often excruciating delay.

''It's an antiquated, 19th-century bureaucracy that has suffered from long
neglect,'' said Arthur C. Helton, director of the Political Asylum Project of
the New York-based Lawyers' Committee for International Human Rights. ''Its
resources are inadequate to service such a mammoth clientele.''

Most days the agency has to tape hand-written signs in its first-floor
information room advising aliens, ''No more tickets today.'' That means anyone
who wants to do more than pick up a form will have to come back.

'I've Got to Go to Work'

''You think I got all the time to come here,'' one frustrated Nigerian man
shouted the other day after an hourlong wait in line. When he got to the head of
the line he was handed a form to fill out, one that traces the status of his
petition for a ''green card,'' a document that indicates permanent residence.

''I filled out that form four times,'' he said. ''I've got to go to work. I got
two kids. They've got to eat.''

Aliens who succeed in getting tickets from the information room can proceed to
one of the upper floors where all business is transacted.

Many aliens say they find the application process frustrating and unnecessarily
confusing. For example, one clerk told a Peruvian student who wanted to return
home to visit his sick father but also insure his return to the United States:
''The 538 you submitted has no bearing on the I-20 now. And why didn't they pull
the I-94?'' The student left in confusion.

One of the aliens' biggest complaints is the length of time it takes to get
information on the status of their various petitions. Aliens must file petitions
with the immigration service for almost all requests, such as visa extensions,
replacements of lost cards, permission to work or go to school, or for permanent
residence or citizenship.

Access to the 2.4 million files kept in the office's fourth-floor file room is
often delayed by an outdated manual filing system. The files are stored on
bookshelves instead of in filing cabinets. They have to be propped up with
bookends, which increases the risk that they can fall out and be misplaced.

To save floor space, many of the stacks have to be pushed together, blocking
access to 70 percent of the files at any given time. The stacks have to be moved
every time access to closed shelves is needed.  ''Clerks sometimes have to wait
40 minutes for a new shelf to be opened,'' said Joseph Colon, one of the file
supervisors.

Cardboard boxes and red plastic milk crates filled with files sit on the floor,
on desks and in shopping carts, and there are thousands of slips requesting
files, neatly bound in rubber bands to indicate the date of arrival.

'Off the Conveyor Belt'


''Ninety percent of the cases go through,'' said Allen E. Kaye, a former
president of the American Immigration Lawyers' Association, a 1,500- member
specialty American Bar Association group. ''It's the ones that fall off the
conveyor belt and disappear that worry me.''

One file that apparently disappeared belongs to Ashokchandra Shah, a 47-
year-old Kenyan-born sales representative, who came to the United States in 1969
and applied for suspension of deportation when his British protected- person
passport no longer gave him the right to return to Britain.

An immigration judge heard the case a year and a half ago, but Mr. Shah and his
lawyer say they have been unable to receive any information about its outcome.
Immigration officials say that while such delays occur occasionally, aliens in
such cases are usually notified in several weeks.

''Anyone who wants to defect from Russia can stay here, but what about those of
us who are already living here?'' asked Mr. Shah. ''They have no feeling for
people at that place. 'Why are you so busy?' I ask them. 'For whom are you so
busy?' ''

Files Turn Up


Immigration officials say there is no such thing as a lost file. ''People who
talk about missing files are ignorant,'' said Mr. Sava. ''There's a certain
processing time. If you're patient, it will come up.''

Replacement of documents is similarly problematic. Amrish Patel, a 32- year-old
packing supervisor from Flushing who lost his wallet in September 1980, filed
four applications for a replacement green card.

He wrote four times to the printing plant in Arlington, Tex., where green cards
are prepared, which told him his papers had never been received. Almost four
years, two lawyers and $500 later, his new green card arrived.



'You Just Fill Out New Forms'

''I never give a good word about that office,'' Mr. Patel said. ''You ask a
question but they don't hear anything when you talk. You just get your picture
taken again. You just get new fingerprints. You just fill out new forms.''

To get around what they see as problems of inefficiency and lack of access, some
immigration lawyers have taken drastic steps. One routinely sues the immigration
service when he cannot get action on a case.  Another frequently files an
application under the Freedom of Information Act to get access to a client's
file.

Perhaps the most frustrating aspect of the immigration process is the
excruciating wait that invariably comes after the forms have been filed.

When the Brooklyn branch office was reorganized a year ago, many of its
examiners were detached for retraining, and 20,000 petitions for citizenship
piled up. Aliens who inquired about the status of their claims were told their
records were packed in boxes and couldn't be opened.

A month ago, the agency borrowed 5,000 square feet of space in another Federal
building in downtown Manhattan, installed desks and shipped the files across the
river. Fifteen criminal investigators - 10 percent of the entire investigatory
staff - were assigned to the desk work. With a skeleton clerical staff, they are
working feverishly to process the backlog by Labor Day.

The immigration service says that by October, all of its files will carry bar
codes similar to the ones used on supermarket products. They will enable files
to be checked out and located electronically.

The agency plans to install more than 100 I.B.M. computer terminals to provide
instant identification of the alien, the status of his case, relevant dates and
the location of the file. But an I.B.M. competitor, charging bidding violations,
has successfully won a temporary order barring installation of the terminals.



New Center Is Opened

To increase output, three years ago the immigration service opened a Regional
Adjudications Center in St. Albans, Vt.  In many cases, the center has
dramatically cut the time needed to process various petitions. Because the files
must be transfered there, however, the risk that they will be misplaced or lost
is greatly increased.

The office has also farmed out 40 percent of its visa petitions to 16 posts on
the Canadian border. And, in the lag time between international flight
inspections, immigration officials at Kennedy International Airport now process
cases that do not require interviews.

If an immigration bill passes, the experts say, it would place a tremendous
additional burden on the office.

Contingency Plans Are Made


The bill would also penalize employers who knowingly hire illegal aliens, and
increase the workload of criminal investigators.

While it is not at all certain that the bill will pass, the agency is making
contingency plans to hire 175 more workers, some of them agency retirees, and to
set up eight satellite offices to accept legalization applications. It hopes
that voluntary agencies will play a major role in helping applicants prepare the
complicated paperwork.

But many voluntary agency officals that help aliens are worried. ''That office
is already overwhelmed,'' said the Rev. Peter Zendzian, director of the Catholic
Migration and Refugee Office of the Diocese of Brooklyn. ''It would take some
very heavy miracles to make the new law work.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Manhattan office of Immigration and Naturalization Service
(page B4); photo of worker at Immigration and Naturalization Service office

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              94 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 23, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

THE CALENDAR

BYLINE: By Barbara Gamarekian

SECTION: Section A; Page 8, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 611 words


Monday

It might seem like old times around the capital this week. Congress is back, a
number of foreign dignitaries are scheduled to arrive in town, and President
Reagan is expected to hold a news conference Tuesday evening before departing
Wednesday on a campaign swing.

The first order of business for the returned Congress will be an effort to reach
a compromise on several measures that are in conference, including the Simpson
and Mazzoli immigration bill, the budget resolution and the military
authorization bill. Both houses will also try to complete work over the next few
weeks on the remaining 10 of 13 spending bills.

As for visitors, President Jose Napoleon Duarte of El Salvador is in town and
will meet with President Reagan this morning, their second session in two
months. Foreign Minister Dante Caputo of Argentina will meet today with
Secretary of State George P. Shultz and then will speak on the international
debt problem at a 6 P.M. forum sponsored by the Foreign Policy Association.
Inter-American Development Bank, 801 17th Street N.W.

G.N.P.: Data on the growth rate for the economy in the second quarter will be
released today. According to initial estimates, the gross national product,
after adjustment for inflation, grew at an annual rate of 5.7 percent. Today's
report could change that estimate to 6 percent or more.

Tuesday

The House Subcommittee on Domestic Monetary Policy is to hold a hearing on the
impact and direction of interest rates. 10 A.M. Room 2222, Rayburn House Office
Building.

Inflation: Only a slight rise is expected in the Consumer Price Index for June
to be released by the Bureau of Labor Statistics today, another sign that
inflation remains largely in check.

Partners: The World Resources Institute is to release a business panel report on
converging environmental interests of multinational corporations in developing
countries. Noon. American Institutes of Architects Building, 1735 New York
Avenue.

Black Lobby: National black leaders are to hold a news conference on Senator
John Heinz's refusal to support anti-apartheid legislation adopted by the House
of Representatives. The measure is in conference and Mr. Heinz, the Republican
Senator from Pennsylvania, holds the swing vote. 10 A.M., 2172 Rayburn Office
Building.

Wednesday

Nicolas Ardito Barletta, the President-elect of Panama, who is a former vice
president of the World Bank for Latin America, is to meet with President Reagan
and other Government officials and is to speak today at a National Press Club
luncheon. Noon.

Campaign Trail: With the Democratic Presidential ticket in place, President
Reagan is wasting no time getting out on the hustings. Republican campaign
officials say he will be in a ''complete campaign mode'' as he leaves today on a
two-day political trip to Texas, Georgia and New Jersey.

Crime Insurance: The House subcommittee on Housing and Community Development is
to hold hearings on the crime insurance program. 9 A.M., Room 2128, Rayburn
House Office Building.

Thursday

Joseph L. Rauh Jr., the civil rights activist and lawyer, is scheduled to speak
on ''Ethics in Government'' at a luncheon meeting of the Women's National
Democratic Club. 12:15 P.M., 1526 New Hampshire Avenue.

Medical Approach: Dr. Joseph F. Boyle, the new president of the American Medical
Association, is to address the National Press Club on the rising costs of health
care and what doctors and the Government are doing about it. Noon.

Friday

Follow the Torch: President and Mrs. Reagan leave for Los Angeles for the
opening of the Olympic Games and then a two-week vacation at their ranch near
Santa Barbara.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: drawing

TYPE: Schedule

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              95 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 23, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

FOR ALIENS, RULES, FORMS AND MORE RULES

SECTION: Section B; Page 4, Column 3; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 628 words


The ''green card,'' the most important document an alien can possess, is not
green, but white with red and blue lettering.

That is just one of the many puzzles that aliens visiting and living in the
United States encounter in the world of immigration rules, forms, procedures and
options.

There are four basic classifications of aliens, each of which has its own rules.
These are the groups:

ILLEGAL ALIENS - These are foreigners who have no entry visa and enter the
country by avoiding inspection. They are deportable at any time.

NONIMMIGRANTS - These are aliens temporarily admitted for a specific purpose and
period of time that depends on the nature of the visit.

In almost all cases, they must obtain a temporary visa before arrival and carry
an ''I-94'' form, an arrival-departure record issued upon entry and endorsed to
show their status - whether student or diplomat or temporary worker or tourist.
Federal immigration regulations bar many groups from entering the United States,
including prisoners, lepers, homosexuals, polygamists, prostitutes, syphilitics
and stowaways.

It is possible to change from one nonimmigrant status to another, such as from a
student to a temporary worker, but the procedure can be complex and
time-consuming.  Among nonimmigrants who can apply for the right to work in the
United States are students who have finished school and are approved for
practical training in their field. Others, such as aliens who come to the United
States for a specific job or are engaged to a United States citizen, are
authorized to work on arrival.

IMMIGRANTS - These are aliens who have been granted permanent residence in the
United States. They can remain indefinitely, own property, work and travel
inside and outside the United States as long as they comply with the laws
relating to alien registration and change of address. They are required to carry
alien registration-receipt cards, better known as green cards, at all times.

Certain nonimmigrants may qualify for permanent residence. They include
children, brothers and sisters of citizens; spouses and children of permanent
residents; talented professionals and skilled and unskilled labor in short
supply.

The process of getting residency can be daunting. For workers, for example, an
ETA750 labor certification must be submitted by the prospective employer to the
State Labor Department to determine if the alien worker is needed.

If so, the prospective employer files visa-petition form I-140 with the
immigration service. If the worker quota is not filled, the application
proceeds. The nonimmigrant files an I-485 petition for change to immigrant
status, a biographical information form, a birth certificate, two photographs
and a fingerprint chart.

If all the paperwork is in order, an interview is scheduled for about three
months later. Permanent residency can be approved on the day of the interview.

REFUGEES - Refugees are aliens who have been granted asylum for their political
beliefs. The applications go through an entirely different screening process -
by both the immigration service and the State Department.

Refugees usually are granted the right to work in the United States. A year
later, they are called in and interviewed for permanent residency. Permanent
residents who live in the United States for five years - three if married to a
citizen - can petition for naturalization as United States citizens.

The New York district immigration office, at 26 Federal Plaza, is open Monday
through Friday, except holidays, from 7:30 A.M. to 5 P.M. Forms can be ordered
by calling (212) 349-5286. For information about immigration matters, a
selection of 48 different tapes can be heard by calling (212) 206-6500.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              96 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 23, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

Quotation of the Day

SECTION: Section B; Page 1, Column 6; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 37 words


''We're slowly but surely moving into the 20th century, but by the time we get
there, it will be the 21st.'' - Kathleen Shields, supervisor of the Immigration
and Naturalization Service's information unit. (A1:3.)

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              97 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 22, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

TALKING WITH CUBA

BYLINE: By William Watts ;
William Watts, who visited Cuba in late June and early July, heads Potomac
Associates, a policy research and issues analysis organization at the Johns
Hopkins University's School of Advanced International Studies.

SECTION: Section 4; Page 21, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 945 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON


The talks between United States and Cuban officials on immigration questions and
the possible return to Cuba of some of the ''Mariel excludables'' - Cubans who
came to the United States in the large-scale exodus from Port Mariel in early
1980 with criminal or medical records that made them ineligible for entry - were
brief and apparently unsuccessful. Nor did they suggest any lasting improvement
in relations between the two countries. But that can change if and when both
sides realize that it is in their interest to reach a compromise on the
fundamental issues dividing them.

From the United States side, the problems are clear. Cuba is seen as a virtual
surrogate of the Soviet Union, ready to carry out Moscow's bidding in Angola,
Ethiopia, Grenada and elsewhere. Beyond that, the Cuban leadership is viewed as
having taken a renewed interest in fomenting rebellion and internal insurrection
in Central America, especially El Salvador, after having played a less active
hemispheric role for some years following the death of Ernesto ''Che'' Guevara
in the mountains of Bolivia.

Cuba, on the other hand, argues that its role is one of support for

friends and like-minded activists who are struggling against political, economic
and social inequities. Cuban officials, scholars and others insist that
relations with the Soviet Union are Cuba's own business. United States
opposition to those ties and Cuban support for what Cuba sees as legitimate
revolutionary movements is just another attempt, they say, to maintain the
status quo and American hegemony.

As unbridgeable as these differences may seem, there may still be room for
maneuver. To be sure, nothing can happen if the United States insists that no
real improvement is possible without a Cuban break with the Soviet Union or if
Cuba insists on a totally free hand in the hemisphere and elsewhere. Between
those two extremes, however, there may be common ground worth exploring.  The
Cuban economy, according to recent World Bank report, is showing signs of
considerable weakness. Havana itself has a certain air of shabbiness (now being
attacked by restoration efforts in the old part of the city) and a scarcity of
consumer goods, which do not go hand in hand with vibrant development. The
United States' economic embargo means that imports are dominated by items from
the Soviet Union and elsewhere in Eastern Europe - Soviet Lada automobiles,
Czechoslovak beer, Hungarian and Rumanian wine - with Soviet freighters always
present in the Havana harbor. (All the while, vintage American automobiles
command attention, and dated items of United States manufacture - hotel room
thermostats and elevator push buttons, for example - go unrepaired for lack of
spare parts.) There are, as well, few signs of direct human contact in the
Soviet- Cuban relationship and certainly little warmth. The few Russian advisers
visible seem to stay to themselves when out in public, not mingling with their
Cuban hosts. Passengers on a Soviet charter flight that stopped over in Havana
on the way back to Moscow from what was described as a vacation fishing
excursion to Peru kept completely to themselves in the Jose Marti Airport
waiting lounge. They showed no interest in their surroundings. The sense of
distance and separation was striking.

By contrast, many Cubans seem very interested in the United States. A two-day
symposium held at the end of June at the University of Havana's Center for the
Study of the United States focused entirely on the forthcoming Presidential
election. The research on United States politics was serious and intense,
although marked by Marxist and deterministic assumptions that most American
observers would challenge.

Interestingly, as an invited lecturer I was free to make just such challenges.
United States concerns about Cuba's ties to the Soviet Union were discussed
openly and directly. I made it clear that any genuine improvement of links
between Cuba and the United States - if that is what Cuba wants - would require
Cuban authorities to make room between themselves and the Soviet Union on at
least some topics of particular interest to Washington. However contrary to
official Cuban policy my comments were, the audience did not reject them out of
hand.

Whether President Fidel Castro regards warmer relations as important enough to
warrant even the most limited display of independence from the Soviet Union is
unknown. Furthermore, any Cuban action along these lines would require a
comparably adequate response from President Reagan or his successor that might
exceed the limits of what is seen in America as politically desirable or
possible.

Political will can accomplish a great deal and can overcome political policy
inconsistencies. United States policy has steadfastly sought to limit Soviet
influence in the Western Hemisphere and to loosen the iron bonds that unite
Havana and Moscow. Yet the punitive aspects of our policy have also tended to
strengthen those very bonds that we do not like. We have offered President
Castro little in the way of temptation that might encourage the very freedom of
maneuver that we would like to see him adopt.

Although the Mariel talks appear to have proved abortive (and we do not know all
the particulars), in due course others are sure to follow in their wake. If, at
some point, actions on the Cuban side indicate significant flexibility, our own
representatives might consider the kind of larger, truly substantive response
that could provide just such a test of Mr. Castro. The United States' move would
not have to be irreversible, after all, and the results might be surprising.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Op-Ed

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              98 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 21, 1984, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

OSCURE WESTERN FARM GROUPS WON FOREIGN WORKER PROGRAM

BYLINE: By BILL KELLER

SECTION: Section 1; Page 12, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1719 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, July 20


They are not names widely known in Washington, much less held in awe: the
California Grape and Tree Fruit League, the Raisin Bargaining Association, the
Northwest Horticultural Council, the Nisei Farmers League.

Yet this summer these and similarly obscure groups of Western fruit farmers
taught Washington an advanced lesson in the art of persuasion.

Banded together as the Farm Labor Alliance, the groups won House approval of a
bitterly disputed new program that would permit foreign workers to cross the
border and harvest American crops. Now the fruit growers hope that they can hold
onto their victory, which came as an amendment to a sweeping immigration bill,
when lawmakers return next week to consider reconciling different House and
Senate versions of the immigration legislation.

On the way to their House victory last month, the fruit farmers were assisted by
a team of well-connected lobbyists, including the man who became, in the middle
of the lobbying effort, the press secretary for President Reagan's re- election
campaign, and a woman is a partner in the law firm of a former Democratic Party
chairman.



Opposition From Many Groups The farmers overcame the opposition of organized
labor and Hispanic groups. They muted the objections of the principal House
sponsor of the immigration legislation, known as the Simpson-Mazzoli bill. They
silenced the strong misgivings of officials at the Labor Department and Justice
Department.

They also withstood the initial resistance of larger farm organizations, which
told the growers in blunt terms that what they were demanding was politically
impossible.

To those who organized the lobbying crusade, it was mainly a triumph of a
meritorious case, sold with persistence and a well-plotted strategy. To
opponents, it appeared to be more a matter of money and connections. By the
reckoning of the alliance's treasurer, Harry Kubo, the growers expect the
''guest worker'' amendment to cost them more than $1 million, most of it spent
to hire two law firms with impeccable partisan credentials.

As director of their effort with Republicans, the growers employed James H.
Lake, a veteran agribusiness lobbyist who has been a top aide in three of Mr.
Reagan's campaigns. Mr. Lake said his major contribution was to help
''neutralize'' opposition to the program in the Administration. In that task, he
said, he was helped by receptive Californians in the Administration, especially
Edwin Meese 3d, the Presidential counselor, and Richard E. Lyng, the Deputy
Secretary of Agriculture.

To direct the campaign among the Democrats, the growers hired the law firm of
Robert S. Strauss, the party's former chairman, who said he had no personal
involvement in the effort. Much of the day-to-day lobbying was done by a partner
in the firm, Ruth Harkin, a former Agriculture Department lawyer. Her husband,
Representative Tom Harkin, an Iowa Democrat who is a member of the House
Agriculture Committee, is a candidate for the Senate.

Penalties for Employers

The immigration bill would establish penalties for employers who knowingly hire
illegal aliens, while granting amnesty to many illegal foreigners already in the
United States. The Senate passed its version overwhelmingly, while the House
approved its measure by a five- vote margin. The House version has far more
generous exemptions for the farming industry, including the new foreign worker
program.

Senate sponsors, in the face of mounting opposition to the whole immigration
bill, may press for a vote that would send the House bill directly to the
President, avoiding a conference committee and the bill's return to the House.

The organizer of the Farm Labor Alliance is Thomas J. Hale, a former president
of the Grape and Tree Fruit League, whose 300 members grow most of California's
table grapes, peaches, plums and pears. In the fall of 1982 Mr. Hale began
pulling together Western farm groups, and he was joined early by the Nisei
Farmers League, made up of about 1,400 second-generation Japanese-American
farmers, as well as by the raisin industry, orange growers and other Western
farm groups.

Dependence on Aliens


These growers admit they are heavily dependent on illegal immigrants to handpick
fruit. They say that once such workers receive legal status, they will refuse
jobs in the fields.

At first, Mr. Hale said, the growers were inclined to fight the immigration
bill. Instead, they made what they now say was a critical strategic decision:
They would not oppose the immigration bill, but they would demand an amendment
to suit their labor needs.

Mr. Hale, Christian Schlect, of the Northwest Horticultural Council, and others
drafted an amendment and circulated it among Western growers, who tinkered with
it until it became the guest worker program. It would authorize the Attorney
General to admit unspecified numbers of foreign workers on three days' notice to
pick crops. The workers could stay up to 11 months and move from farm to farm in
a prescribed region.

Mr. Kubo, president of the Nisei Farmers League, was assigned to raise a war
chest. The Grape and Tree Fruit League agreed to contribute up to $250,000,
which was raised through a special assessment on each of the 100 million boxes
of fruit produced by its members. Corporate farmers, such as Tenneco West Inc.
and Sun-Maid Growers of California, the raisin industry giant, gave large
contributions. The alliance also conducted a direct-mail solicitation of Western
growers that brought in hundreds of smaller donations.

Problems Outside the West


At first, farmers outside the West balked at endorsing the effort, said Patrick
H. Quinn of the National Council of Agricultural Employers. The Senate bill
already included a more limited temporary worker program and gave farmers three
years to end their use of illegal workers. Many farmers felt the guest worker
proposal was overreaching. Gradually they were won over. however.

Early last year the alliance retained two Washington law firms to advise them.

To work with the Republicans, including the Administration, the farmers retained
Heron, Burchette, Ruckert and Rothwell, a firm with a long list of California
agricultural clients. The key partner was Mr. Lake, who had successfully
represented California farmers on such issues as Federal water subsidies.

Mr. Lake led the lobbying team until October, when he moved to the Reagan
campaign committee, turning over his Farm Labor Alliance portfolio to his
brother. However, he continues to advise his law firm on strategy and, according
to the firm's records, to be paid by the growers.

''I felt I had a dual task,'' Mr. Lake said, ''to protect the Administration's
interests, by not letting them create a confrontation with an important
constituency, and to protect my client's interests.''

From the outset, the Administration was divided. Mr. Lake's job, he said, was
''getting them neutral.''

Need Is Legitimate


The Agriculture Department, and especially Mr. Lyng, former California Director
of Agriculture, agreed that the growers had a legitimate need for foreign
workers. On the other hand, Labor Department officials feared the guest worker
program would displace American farm workers and jeopardize fair labor
standards. The Justice Department felt it would be difficult to enforce.

Early last year, Mr. Lake and separate delegations of Republican lawmakers
visited Mr. Meese and came away convinced he was a supporter. Mr. Meese never
took a public stand on the foreign worker bill, but Mr. Lake said the Reagan
aide ''helped create an atmosphere where people were willing to be neutral.''

The Agriculture Department, Mr. Lake said, policed the Administration's
hands-off policy: ''Every time the Secretary of Agriculture would hear about
something the Justice Department was doing in abrogation of the neutrality, Lyng
would get on the phone to the Attorney General or the deputy attorney general or
the I.N.S. and put a stop to it. It was wonderful.''

Mr. Lyng said he could only recall one such intervention, to stifle a Justice
Department official who had been criticizing the growers' amendment

'Thumbs Up' From Republicans


''Because we had neutrality, we were able to get the Republican leadership of
the House to say 'Thumbs up,' '' Mr. Lake said. House Republicans supported the
amendment 138 to 15, more than enough to offset the Democrats, who voted 90 to
157 against the measure.

To deal with the Democrats, the grower hired Akin, Gump, Strauss, Hauer and
Feld, which assigned several lawyers to the case.

Mrs. Harkin did not return telephone messages left at her office, but other
lawyers on the grower team said she lobbied farm-state members of the House.

Representative Tony Coelho, a California Democrat who is chairman of the
Democratic Congressional Campaign Committee, helped guide the growers in their
lobbying and personally pleaded for support among Democrats.

Panetta Aided Cause


On the advice of their lawyers and Mr. Coelho, the growers sought out
Representative Leon E. Panetta, Democrat of California, to be their champion.
Mr. Panetta is a widely respected liberal and a strong candidate for a party
leadership role.

''If he put his name on it, they knew it could not be a horrible, abusive type
of program,'' said Mr. Quinn.

In the end, the growers said, their strongest opponents did not put up much of a
fight.

Labor unions, confident the amendment would lose and distracted by other issues,
did not mount a serious campaign against Mr. Panetta. Hispanic groups argued
against the measure with great emotion, but some lawmakers said the Hispanic
critics lacked credibility because they were passionately opposed to the entire
immigration bill.

One man who might have blocked the amendment was Representative Romano L.
Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky, who co-sponsored the immigration legislation with
Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming. Mr. Mazzoli, who had been flown
to California for repeated meetings with the growers, objected to the amendment,
but not strongly.

''Looking back on this,'' Mr. Hale said, ''if Mazzoli had stood up and really
opposed this thing, I know we would have lost it.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              99 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 19, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION BILL GAIN ENDS HISPANIC THREAT

SECTION: Section A; Page 17, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 317 words

DATELINE: SAN FRANCISCO, July 18


Hispanic Americans said today that their campaign to block a comprehensive
immigration bill was making substantial progress, with the Democratic National
Convention now firmly on record in opposition to the bill.

Hispanic delegates had been threatening to abstain on the first ballot of the
Presidential nominating process tonight in symbolic protest against the bill,
which was sponsored by Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming, and
Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky.

By voice vote, the caucus of Hispanic delegates decided today not to recommend a
boycott.

The Senate approved the bill in May 1983 by a 76 to 18 vote. The House of
Representatives approved a similar bill last month by 216 to 211. The two houses
will probably appoint a conference committee in the next week or two to start
reconciling their differences.

The legislation would prohibit employing illegal aliens but would offer legal
status to many already in this country.



Bias Seen as Likely

Hispanic groups strongly oppose the bill on the ground it would increase job
discrimination against people with dark skin or a foreign accent. Supporters
deny this. The platform adopted by the convention Tuesday night denounces the
legislation.  A few minutes after the vote by the Hispanic caucus, Walter F.
Mondale and Geraldine A. Ferraro, his choice for Vice President, appeared before
the Hispanic delegates and received an enthusiastic reception. Both denounced
the Simpson-Mazzoli bill. Mrs. Ferraro, who voted against the bill as a member
of the House, was much more specific in her criticism.

''The bill,'' she said, ''is wrong because it is discriminatory. The bill is
wrong because it targets in on individuals just because they are who they are.
The bill is wrong because it looks to deprive individuals of their ability to
get jobs. The bill is wrong, wrong, wrong.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Hispanic Americans

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              100 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               July 18, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

THE DEMOCRATS IN SAN FRANCISCO;
MONDALE PROMISES CAUSUS HE'LL FIGHT IMMIGRATION BILL

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section A; Page 17, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 527 words

DATELINE: SAN FRANCISCO, July 17


Walter F. Mondale pledged today to work against an immigration bill strongly
opposed by Hispanic leaders, but Hispanic delegates still threatened a boycott
of the first ballot at the Democratic National Convention.

The guerrilla movement, sponsored by delegates committed to Senator Gary Hart
and the Rev. Jesse Jackson in the Hispanic caucus continued despite efforts by
caucus leaders, including San Antonio Mayor Henry Cisneros and Representatives
Robert Garcia, Democrat of the Bronx, and Edward R. Roybal, Democrat of
California.

Leaders of the insurgency say they will continue to press the boycott issue
until Wednesday night's vote on the party's Presidential nomination.

After a one-hour meeting with Hispanic leaders, Mr. Mondale issued a statement
calling the immigration bill ''harmful'' and saying it would ''cause human
suffering.''

Representative Roybal, leader of the Hispanic Caucus, said he believed the
Mondale statement would end the threat that Hispanic delegates would withhold
their votes on the first ballot for the Presidential nomination Wednesday.

''It is good enough for the delegates and good enough for the convention,'' Mr.
Roybal told reporters.

Stormy Meeting of Delegates


At an ensuing caucus marked by stormy debate, a boycott motion by Carlos Alcala,
a California delegate, failed on a 39-to-39 vote. But Mr. Alcala said he would
bring the motion up again at another caucus Wednesday and demand a roll-call of
all Hispanic delegates and their alternates.

Mr. Mondale's statement said he had opposed the immigration legislation and
would ''communicate'' that opposition to ''the legislative leadership.''

Still an issue for the Hispanic delegates is the position of organized labor.

Hispanic leaders have met with Lane Kirkland, president of the American
Federation of Labor and Congress of Industrial Organizations, and he was
expected to issue a statement. Mr. Roybal said that Mr. Kirkland ''opposes the
bill in its present form.''

That opposition is based on a provision of the bill that would allow large
numbers of foreign agricultural workers into the country to do harvesting, a
move that labor believes would take jobs away from American workers.

A number of Hispanic leaders, including several members of Congress, as well as
the Rev. Jesse Jackson and Mr. Mondale's son, William, appeared at the caucusg
to plead for support.

Mario Obledo, president of the League of United Latin American Citizens, chief
sponsor of the boycott demand, said his organization had set a deadline for
action by both the party's leadership and organized labor to kill the
immigration bill.

Privately, some Hispanic leaders said negotiations were under way between
Hispanic leaders, House Speaker Thomas P. O'Neill Jr. , and possibly Mr.
Kirkland to work out a statement that would satisfy the Hispanic demand that the
bill be killed when it is considered again by the House after the convention.

Many of the grass-roots delegates want a specific commitment that the party
leadership will work to kill the bill when it comes out of a House-Senate
conference after Congress returns Monday.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              101 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               July 18, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

POLISH MEDALIST IN DISABLED GAMES DEFECTS TO U.S.

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section B; Page 4, Column 3; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 521 words

DATELINE: MINEOLA, L.I., July 17


A Polish amputee track star who won a gold medal at the International Games for
the Disabled last month has defected to the United States, officials said today.

The athlete - Edward Siiwinski, a 20-year-old who has one leg - defected on June
30 before his team left for home, according to Sgt. Dennis Holland of the Nassau
County Police Department.



In Protective Custody

Mr. Siiwinski ''indicated he wished political asylum and was taken into
temporary custody'' by the F.B.I., according to Ronald Mahaffey, special agent
in charge of the Nassau County office of the F.B.I.

Mr. Siiwinski is living on Long Island under protective F.B.I. custody, and has
filed papers with the Immigration and Naturalization Service and the State
Department seeking permanent asylum, Mr. Mahaffey said.

Sergeant Holland, commander of the Nassau police's special investigations squad,
said Mr. Siiwinski had won gold and silver medals in track during the two-week
competition.



Appeal for Asylum

On June 30, the day after the closing ceremonies, Mr. Siiwinski went up to a
Nassau police officer in a hallway of the Hofstra University dormitories, where
the athletes were housed during the games.

''I am a Polish competitor requesting to defect to the United States,'' he said,
according to Sergeant Holland.

Mr. Siiwinski was escorted to the Nassau police command post set up on the
campus for the competition and turned over to the F.B.I.

Shortly after Mr. Siiwinski was placed in protective custody, his room was
sealed off to protect his belongings, according to the authorities.

Charles Sava, the New York district director for the Immigration and
Naturalization Service would not comment on the case.

''All asylum claims are by law confidential in order to protect the
individual,'' he said.

Under present State Department policy, Polish defectors are not forced to return
to Poland against their will.

2,000 Athletes From 50 Nations


Mr. Mahaffey said the ''wheels are in motion'' for the State Department and the
Immigration and Naturalization Service to make a decision on the case.

He said he would not give any additional information. He said he had advised Mr.
Siiwinski not to speak to the press because ''it may jeopardize his chances.''

Nearly 2,000 athletes from more than 50 countries, including the Soviet-bloc
nations of East Germany, Hungary and Poland, took part in the games.

Two weeks before the start of the event, the Soviet Union withdrew its team of
blind athletes. No reason was given. Earlier, the Soviet Union said it would not
take part in the Olympics in Los Angeles.



Defector 'Feels Good'

The disabled games are held every four years in the same country that serves as
host of the Olympics.

A friend of Mr. Siiwinski said the defector ''feels good'' about his decision to
seek asylum in the United States.

The friend, who asked not to be identified, said officials of the Polish team
''must have gone looking for him, and when they couldn't find him, I'm sure they
figured it out right away.''

''No one saw him do it,'' the friend said.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              102 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 17, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

ALONG RIO GRANDE, THE LAW RUNS INTO REALITY: NO BARRIER

BYLINE: By ROBERT REINHOLD

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1533 words


In Matamoros, people say workers will cross the border for better pay in the
United States new law or no new law. Page B5.







BROWNSVILLE, Tex., July 12 - Probably nowhere would the immigration bill moving
through Congress have more subtle, complex and uncertain effects than in cities
like this one, where the distinction between the United States and Mexico
becomes a blur.

The economic and social fabric of this city of 89,000 people, which hugs the Rio
Grande near the point where the river flows into the Gulf of Mexico, is tightly
woven into that of its larger Mexican neighbor, Matamoros.

Neither town could survive easily without the other, or without the constant
traffic across the river, both legal and illegal. The Rio Grande is a border but
it is not a barrier.

In Brownsville, the population is 85 percent Mexican-American, English is seldom
heard on the streets and the usual laws of men and economics do not seem to
apply.

Here, it is hard to say who is an alien and who is not. As a result, the
immigration bill, which would grant legal status to some illegal aliens and
deter new ones by penalizing their employers, has brought out the most complex
of emotions in Brownsville.

''Something has to be done about the illegal aliens,'' said George E. Borrego,
36-year-old owner of the Don Quixote men's clothing shop. It is just a block
from the bridge that brought customers from Matamoros until the peso started its
fall, from 25 to a dollar two years ago to 200 today.

It's a Paradox'

''But it's hard for me to say too much bad about them,'' he went on. ''I've had
relatives who came here illegally and made their place. I am of Mexican descent.
It's my raza - my race - you're talking about. It's a paradox.''

The bill has met almost unanimous opposition here as another example of
Washington's insensitivity to the special realities of the border. ''I don't
think the Government has looked at the repercussions,'' said Kenneth J. Lieck,
the city manager.

''You are going to see elected officials going to Washington and saying it is
causing problems and seeking money,'' he said. ''We are way down here at the end
of the world. Congress does not know what's going on here.''

On the one hand, legal residents resent Mexicans who, they say, commute daily to
take jobs at lower wages and increase the tax burden by putting their children
in schools and using food stamps, medical and welfare services.

On the other hand, many of their own relatives in Matamoros do this and most of
Brownsville's middle-class families depend economically on having illegal,
live-in maids at $50 a week so both husbands and wives can work.

Vital to Farms and Shrimping

Moreover, local farmers and shrimp boat operators contend they cannot survive
without the Mexicans.

Brownsville, the nearest city to the Mexican interior, has become a major
crossing point for people seeking work, giving the city's motto, ''Crossroads of
the Hemisphere,'' an ironic if unintended aptness. However, with 6,000
unemployed, officials say most of the newcomers quickly move north for better
job opportunities.

The Brownsville economy is heavily affected by the daily legal and illegal
influx from Matamoros.

Consider, for example, Jesus Chuy, a 29-year-old caterer and bartender at the
Fort Brown Hotel. He is a Mexican citizen who holds a green card allowing him to
work and reside legally in Brownsville. However, he lives across the river in
Matamoros because it is cheaper there. His mother is a Mexican citizen, living
in Matamoros. His father, a retired mechanic, is an American citizen living in
Brownsville. A brother is a policeman in Matamoros, but his four children attend
parochial school in Brownsville.

Another brother, a carpenter, lives in Matamoros, works in Brownsville and has
three children here in parochial schools. His wife has no papers to work in the
United States. A sister was born and educated in Brownsville and is a citizen
but lives in Mexico.

One Large Community'

''The river is supposed to divide us, but we are really one large community of
500,000,'' said Mayor Emilio A. Hernandez, son of a Mexican-born father and
American-born mother.  There is disagreement on whether the daily influx of
workers from Matamoros helps or hurts Brownsville.

Thousands hold green cards and have jobs quite legally at Levi's, Haggar and
other plants. Others have crossing cards permitting them only to shop here but,
also have jobs, in downtown shops, at the port and elsewehere.

Still others, people with no credentials, simply wade the river daily, sometimes
with lunch pails, and they go home at night.

''We have illegal aliens working here and they are not unskilled braceros,''
said City Commissioner Antonio N. Zavaleta, an anthropologist who directs the
Border Research Institute at Texas Southmost College. ''They are carpenters,
welders, cabinet makers and they are taking jobs from our low-income
Mexican-American people. Money is flowing out of Brownsville and into Matamoros
and that is awful.''

John Ramirez, for example, is an American, a union electrician who has had to
leave Brownsville and his family to find work in Corpus Christi. At a union
scale of $10.50 an hour, his wife, Oralia, said, Mr. Ramirez cannot compete with
unlicensed electricians from Matamoros willing to work for less than $3.50 an
hour. ''It's not fair - my husband has been laid off for 15 months,'' she said,
echoing a complaint often heard here.

Yet Mayor Hernandez, a used car dealer and developer, says that he has never, in
nearly five years as Mayor, heard a constituent complain about losing work to
illegals.

Illegals Man the Shrimp Boats

Up to half the crew members working on shrimp boats out of Brownsville are
illegal aliens, according to David Eymard, owner of Trans Gulf Trawlers, who is
president of the Texas Shrimp Association.

The work is seasonal, he said, and a crew member can make $6,000 to $10,000 a
year. That is not enough to attract Americans but it is a small fortune to
Mexicans. ''At bumper times we do not have enough legal Americans,'' he said.
Yes, Mr. Eymard went on, the Federal authorities sometimes board the ships and
arrest the illegal aliens, but he added, ''There are many more to be had.''

Similarly, Mexican maids are an important underpinning of the Brownsville
economy. A business executive here has employed Maria for eight years, since she
was 19 years old. As a result, his wife has taken a part-time sales job. Maria
earns $60 a week plus board, and on that she helps support a large family across
the river.

Used Car Sales Important

Anyone who doubts that the welfare of Brownsville depends on Matamoros need only
talk to Mayor Hernandez. When the peso collapsed, he saw nearly three-quarters
of his used car business vanish overnight.

Similarly, Mr. Borrego had to lay off 7 of 11 employees at his clothing shop.

On the other hand, Mexicans are considered a major drain on Brownsville's public
services, particularly the schools. Under a Supreme Court ruling, local
districts must educate children of illegal residents. Raul A. Busteiro Jr.,
superintendent of the Brownsville Independent School District, notes that there
are 31,000 pupils in his schools, which serve a city of only 89,000 people,
evidence that the taxpayers are educating many illegal aliens.

Complaints of Welfare Abuse

The illegal aliens also use health, food stamp, welfare and other services to
which they are not entitled. This is particularly troublesome to people like
Celina Serrata, a legal resident who is a Cameron County employee and mother of
seven. She recalls having to go on welfare for a month when she was divorced a
few years ago, and she met Mexicans in the welfare office who had learned to get
into the system.

''I'm for charity,'' she said. ''But how much can I help without hurting my own
family.''

The ironies of the situation are summed up well by Eva Garcia. She is a
62-year-old retired garment worker who lives in the Southmost barrio, a
native-born American who speaks not a word of English.

Yet she speaks proudly of her sons in the Army and Air Force. She and her family
have paid their dues, she said, and pay high rents and utility bills while
illegal Mexicans lie to get food stamps and other services.

She believes that amnesty should be granted to those here illegally who have
established themselves and pay their taxes but that sanctions should be applied
against employers to discourage others from taking jobs from Americans like her.


Job Discrimination Feared

There is wide fear here that strict sanctions would result in job discrimination
against Mexican-Americans.

But the common view here is that the bill, if enacted, cannot be enforced. It
enforced, according to this viewpoint, it would be more damaging than helpful to
the border areas.

''The border is not going to go away - they are not going to stop coming,'' said
Professor Zavaleta. ''We've got ways to break the law more efficiently here. We
are forced into violating the law to support our economy.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of George E. Borrego (page B5); photo of people leaving
Brownsville, Tex. (page B5); map of Rio Grande

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              103 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 17, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

CAMPAIGN NOTES;
Hispanic Delegates Told To Threaten a Boycott

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 19, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 127 words

DATELINE: SAN FRANCISCO, July 16


Hispanic delegates to the Democratic convention were urged today to withhold
their votes from all Presidential candidates on the first ballot unless party
leaders agreed to seek the defeat of the immigration legislation now before
Congress.

Mario G. Obleda, president of the League of United Latin American Citizens, made
the appeal to the 343 Hispanic delegates.

Versions of the legislation have been approved by the House and Senate, which
must resolve differences in a conference committee.

The Hispanic delegates also heard from the Rev. Jesse Jackson, who asked them to
support planks to the party platform calling for affirmative action, a pledge
against first use of nuclear weapons, defense budget cuts and opposition to
runoff elections.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              104 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 15, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

CHURCH GROUP READY TO HELP IMMIGRANTS DOCUMENT RESIDENCY

BYLINE: By WAYNE KING

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 20, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 836 words

DATELINE: EL PASO


At 8 A.M. on June 21, the day after the House passed a sweeping immigration
bill, Luis Vellarde arrived at his office and found more than 150 illegal aliens
lined up outside the door.

''They didn't understand the process,'' said Mr. Vellarde, the director of the
Southwest Catholic Conference Immigration and Refugee Service. The agency serves
nine states from this border city, which is a major crossing point for
undocumented aliens from Mexico.

''All they heard is that amnesty had been approved. They wanted to know, am I
eligible, and where do I sign up.''

Help With Documentation


The aliens learned that the act was not yet law. But with a staggering number of
people looking for legal status, Mr. Vellarde's office and other private
agencies are preparing to help if and when the provisions are enacted.

Mr. Vellarde said, ''The church will be very much involved as one of the
national voluntary agencies assisting those people.''

His service would help people document how long they have lived in the United
States. It also could lessen the fears they might have if they were going
straight to the Government.

Versions of the bill have passed the House and Senate but they vary
significantly, especially about how long an alien must have resided in the
United States to apply for amnesty.

Those legislative differences must be resolved in a conference committee. Then
the measure will be considered again by both houses before going to the
President for his signature or his veto.

Network in Parishes


''We have already been planning as long as a year ago,'' said Mr. Vellarde,
''with the bishops' office in Washington to set up a diocesan structure for
legalization.

''We would help coordinate it, putting most of our efforts into the network of
the parishes, particularly where we know the illegals are living.''

The legislation attempts to regain control of the problem of illegal
immigration, essentially in two ways.

One is to make immigration less attractive by making it illegal for employers to
hire aliens without proper documentation. That would presumably remove the major
incentive for illegal entry into this country.

The other is to grant amnesty to aliens who have been in this country illegally
for a certain period.

The two bills differ in the time an alien must have resided here to qualify for
amnesty. The Senate version would require continuous residence since Jan. 1,
1980; the House, since Jan. 1, 1982.

Millions of Aliens Involved


There are possibly six million undocumented aliens in this country, and the
number ultimately eligible for amnesty would depend on what cutoff date was
adopted.

Even under the more restrictive Senate version, as many as 2.3 million people
might apply for legal status, creating a staggering backlog of cases for review.

The assistance of church groups could streamline the process, Mr. Vellarde
observed. But more importantly, in his view, it would alleviate some of the
fears of the aliens. For one thing, if initial contact were through the church,
those with inadequate documentation would not automatically be exposed to
rejection and possible deportation.

For many ''illegals,'' documention could be difficult.

Under current plans, those applying for legal residence would be able to
demonstrate the length of their stay through a variety of means. Mr. Vellarde
said his organization had been advising those who plan to apply to begin
gathering documentation.

How to Document


''They have already been told six months ago of the possibility of this thing
sailing, and we told them we strongly suggest that they get together such things
as rent and utility receipts, school records of children, things that would be
hard to alter.'' Other evidence might be dated pay stubs, medical records, even
traffic citations.

''We told them not to rely on affidavits of neighbors or friends because that
would be self-serving and very easily obtainable,'' he said.

The Immigration and Naturalization Service, which would administer the complex
amnesty program, has indicated it would consider an assortment of documentation,
perhaps rent receipts in conjunction with pay stubs.

But because they are illegal, undocumented aliens are often officially
invisible. Often they are paid and make payments in cash. And what documentation
they have might be under an assumed name, or several names.  Great numbers are
not apt to have such things as rent receipts. In Houston, for example, a
25-year-old Hispanic man said that he had been in this country illegally for
eight years and that he lived with 15 others like himself in a seven-room house,
each paying $30 a week in rent. Such transactions are almost always in cash.

Mr. Vellarde forecasts that ''it is going to be very difficult, number one, for
us to put the packets together for these people, and then there is going to be a
great deal of discretion in making a decision by the immigration service.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              105 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 15, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

THE WORLD

BYLINE: By Henry Giniger and Milt Freudenheim

SECTION: Section 4; Page 4, Column 1; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 91 words


Cuba and U.S. Talk


The Reagan Administration began its first substantive talks with Cuba last week.
The Administration played down their importance, saying they primarily concerned
the return to Cuba of more than 1,000 unwanted immigrants - mostly criminals and
mental patients - who came to the Florida by boat in 1980. The meetings at an
undisclosed place in New York may also cover other immigration issues but
American officials predicted they would not lead to ''any significant
improvement in relations at this time.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              106 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 14, 1984, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

U.S.-CUBAN PARLEY SAID TO BE NARROW

BYLINE: By PHILIP TAUBMAN

SECTION: Section 1; Page 4, Column 6; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 531 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, July 13


Talks between the United States and Cuba that began in New York on Thursday will
be limited to a narrow agenda of immigration issues and are unlikely to produce
any major improvement in relations, senior Reagan Administration officials said
today.

The talks, at an undisclosed location in Manhattan, are the first substantive
negotiations on specific issues between Washington and Havana since President
Reagan took office.

The primary subject of discussion, the officials said, would be the eventual
return to Cuba of more than 1,000 unwanted refugees who came by boat to Florida
in 1980 from the Cuban port of Mariel. These refugees, most of them criminals
and mental patients, according to American officials, were among 125,000 Cubans
who came to Florida during the boatlift.

The United States is also prepared to discuss other immigration issues,
including the resumption of a normal flow of Cubans to the United States, the
Administration officials said.

Shift in Policy Denied

They said, however, that the negotiations, which were originally expected to
begin after the election in November, did not signal any basic shift in American
policy toward Cuba.  ''These talks will not lead to broadened bilateral
relations,'' a senior Administration official said. He added, ''We see no
fundamental change in Cuban behavior that would justify a significant
improvement in relations at this time.''

The Administration has repeatedly accused Cuba of playing a key role in
advancing Soviet interests in Central America and the Caribbean, including
giving support to Nicaragua and to guerrillas in El Salvador.

Administration officials said that they have been pressing Cuba periodically for
three years to take back the unwanted refugees from the Mariel boatlift, and
that a positive response was received from Cuba in May, although Havana asked
that the talks not begin until after the United States elections in November.

Jackson Visit Is Cited

Cuba agreed to move up the talks, the officials said, after the Rev. Jesse
Jackson, a candidate for the Democratic Presidential nomination, visited Havana
in June and arranged for the release of 22 American and 26 Cuban prisoners.

United States officials said today that Fidel Castro, the Cuban leader, was
apparently hoping to maintain the momentum toward discussions begun during the
Jackson visit.

The officials said that the Cuban delegation in New York was headed by Deputy
Foreign Minister Ricardo Alarcon de Quesada. They declined to identify the
American negotiators beyond saying the delegation included officials from the
State Department and the Justice Department.

Wayne S. Smith, who was the head of the United States interests section in
Havana from 1979 to mid-1982, said today that it was a ''sheer
misrepresentation'' for the Administration to contend that Cuba, rather than the
United States, was to blame for the lack of talks about the unwanted refugees in
the last three years.

Mr. Smith, who is now a fellow at the Carnegie Endowment for International
Peace, said: ''Cuba has offered to hold these talks since 1981. It is the Reagan
Administration that stalled.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              107 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 13, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

CUBAN-U.S. MEETING ON REFUGEE MEETING IS REPORTED

BYLINE: By PETER KERR

SECTION: Section A; Page 3, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 389 words


Cuban and United States officials began discussions in New York yesterday about
immigration issues, including the possible return of 1,000 Cuban refugees who
came to the United States during the 1980 boatlift, a Reagan Administration
source said last night.

The United States had been pressing Cuba intermittently for four years to take
back criminals and mental patients among the 125,000 refugees who came by boat
to Florida in 1980. About 1,100 Cubans considered inadmissable under American
immigration law are being held at a Federal prison in Atlanta.

The secret discussions yesterday, at an undisclosed location in New York, would
apparently be the first official negotiations between the United States and Cuba
under the Reagan Administration. The discussions involved representatives of the
State Department and the Cuban Deputy Foreign Minister, Ricardo Alarcon de
Quesada, according to United Press International.

A man who answered the telephone at the Cuban Mission to the United Nations, who
identified himself as Arturo Mendos, confirmed that Mr. Alarcon de Quesada was
in New York.

Spokesmen for the State Department would not confirm last night that the
negotiations had begun. But in a press briefing earlier in the day, Alan
Romberg, a spokesman for the department, said the Cubans had indicated that they
were willing to move the timetable forward from November and that the
Administration was expecting to begin talks ''sometime soon.''

The State Department said last month that the Cuban Government had agreed to
open negotiations for normalizing relations, but at the time American officials
said they thought the Cubans would wait until after the November elections. The
officials said they believed that Havana was delaying the talks so as not to
help President Reagan's re-election.

A year ago the United States said that until Cuba agreed to the return of
unwanted refugees, the United States would not admit Cubans except for immediate
family members of American citizens or of permanent American residents.

Last month, the Rev. Jesse L. Jackson visited Havana and emerged from meetings
with Fidel Castro having secured the release of 49 prisoners held in Cuba and a
series of proposals to ease strained United States-Cuban relations, including an
early start on immigration talks.



LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              108 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 9, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

WESTERN EUROPE SEEKS TO STEM TIDE OF ILLEGAL ALIENS

BYLINE: By JAMES M. MARKHAM, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 3; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 1633 words

DATELINE: WEST BERLIN, July 8


Harried by overextended welfare budgets, fear of crime and a whiff of xenophobia
in the political atmosphere, the Governments of Western Europe are struggling to
turn back a tide of illegal immigration.

To take one example, West Berlin is swamped by waves of third-world immigrants
that include Tamil tea pickers from Sri Lanka, teen-agers smuggled out of Iran
to evade the draft, war-weary Kurds from Beirut, unemployed Ashantis from
upcountry Ghana and Pakistani drug dealers.  And Poles, Czechoslovaks and other
refugees from Eastern Europe keep arriving as well.



Package Tours to Asylum

On special discount fares from Aeroflot, the Soviet airline, and Lot, the Polish
airline, the travelers from underdeveloped third world nations fly in groups
into East Berlin's Sch"onefeld Airport and, without visas, are admitted to East
Germany.

In a matter of hours, they take the subway to West Berlin - an open city - where
they report to the police, seeking political asylum.

The thousands who reach West Berlin, with an automatic claim on the indulgence
of the West German welfare state, are but one current of a wider flow of poor,
hungry and persecuted immigrants who are crashing the gates of Western Europe.



Number of Aliens Unknown

As in the United States, the police and immigration officials have no precise
idea of how many illegal aliens filter yearly into Western Europe and take up
residence.

With the possible exception of Britain, which as an island has a certain
advantage, the countries of Western Europe have not been particularly successful
in closing the doors on illegal immigrants.

Until the European economies went into slump, cheap foreign labor had been
welcome.

''Things have changed, and what was perfectly acceptable in the past is now a
burden,'' commented Jan van Hoogstraten, who heads the Bonn office of the
Intergovernmental Committee for Migration. ''But in Europe we haven't reached
the situation in the United States. There's no comparison with that 1,000-a-day
across the southern borders of the United States.''

The main entryways to Western Europe are its airports, which yearly draw
thousands of ''tourists'' from the third world, who overstay their visas, find
menial jobs and settle into precarious existences.

Charter flights bring people in bulk. Last year, after 1,000 Iranians arrived in
one day at Madrid's airport, the Spanish Government enacted a regulation
requiring Iranians to have visas, choking off one easy entry point to Western
Europe.

A minority of illegals arrive by more exotic and arduous routes. Many Moroccan
workers start in Gibraltar and find their way north through Spain. Christian
Assyrians often flee Iraq by foot across Turkey and slip into Greece over the
Evros River. Indians sometimes jump ship in Rotterdam. Professional human
smugglers frequently slip Zairians who have landed in Brussels across the French
border at night.

Once in Western Europe, the immigrants tend to move from south to north, from
the poorer and more tolerant Mediterranean countries to more prosperous welfare
states like West Germany and France, which also happen to be the places where
the outsiders have become especially resented. In France, the 11 percent showing
of the extreme right-wing National Front in last month's European elections was
partly attributed to a growing antipathy for foreigners.

One of the easiest accesses to Western Europe is West Berlin, which is
surrounded by Communist East Germany, 110 miles from the West German frontier.
Its status as a free and open city under the protection of the United States,
France and Britain means that West Berlin cannot shut its doors to anyone coming
from East Germany.

East Germans Turn Blind Eye

Making an exception to its strict entry procedures, the East German authorities
turn a blind eye to the thousands of third world travelers who land in
Sch"onefeld en route to West Berlin, knowing they will become an extra burden on
the city's capitalist system.

By demanding asylum from political persecution, however dubious their cases may
be, the new arrivals guarantee themselves lodging in hostels, three meals a day,
pocket money and, usually, a protracted stay while the courts resolve their
claims.

''Everything is O.K. Everything is very good,'' beamed Balendran Thillaibalam, a
newly-arrived 52-year-old Tamil from Sri Lanka, taking his lunch with two
compatriots at a refugee hostel here. ''They are very kindly giving us clothes
and they are serving us very well. We like this hotel.''

Mr. Thillaibalam, who said he had worked as a printer in Jaffna, maintained that
his reason for leaving his homeland was ''political, political.'' But he had
difficulty explaining why the Sri Lanka Government's purported persecution had
not extended to his wife and three children, whom he left behind.

West Berlin's Interior Ministry, asserting that 90 percent of those seeking
political asylum make fraudulant claims, takes a dim view of its population of
18,000 asylum-seekers. Officials say that networks in places like Ghana and Sri
Lanka orchestrate the flow of immigrants seeking asylum, swelling the city's
prostitute and drug-dealing underworld.

Tighten Immigration Laws

Like other countries, West Germany has tightened its laws on political asylum
and now bans immigrants seeking asylum from obtaining work permits during their
first two years in the country. These measures produced a drop in the number of
applicants for asylum from 107,818 in 1980 to 19,773 last year, 5,198 of whom
were allowed to stay.

But court appeals, independent court rulings and a longstanding policy of not
expelling anyone from an East European Communist country mean that only about 70
percent of those denied asylum are actually deported, according to the Interior
Ministry in Bonn. The ministry estimates that some 200,000 candidates turned
down in their request for asylum now live permanently in West Germany.

In January, to the consternation of the Interior Ministry, a court in M"unster
ruled that ''collective state persecution'' of Tamils existed in Sri Lanka,
implying that none could be denied asylum. In a matter of months, some 1,200
Tamils arrived at Sch"onefeld, and took the subway to West Berlin.  From West
Berlin, officials say, immigrants seeking asylum have little difficulty
obtaining forged passports, enabling them to travel to West Germany. Once inside
West Europe, they move easily from country to country. ''There are no borders in
Europe anymore,'' said an official in France.

France Offered Amnesty

In the summer of 1981 President Francois Mitterrand's Government sought to
regulate the situation of the estimated 400,000 illegal aliens in France by
offering an amnesty to illegal immigrants.

Some 150,000 responded to the Government's offer - most of them from France's
former colonies in northern Africa - and 131,000 were accepted as legal
residents. The rest remained underground.

France requires all residents to carry identity papers with them, permitting
police to make spot checks in subways and other public places. Visitors from
northern Africa must fill out a two-page immigration document - one half to be
reurned on their departure. Fines have been stiffened from $695 to $2,780 for
companies that hire illegal immigrants.

With the toughest legislation in Western Europe and stringent airport screening
procedures, Britain has made a determined and largely successful effort to halt
illegal immigration, while at the same time stepping up deportations and
tightening entry requirements even for some of its own nationals.

Five Categories of Citizens

The British Nationality Act, which came into force last year, created five
categories of British citizen - only one of which has the automatic and
permanent right to live in the country. There are 57 million of these British
citizens, and all but two million of them are white.

Excluded from the right to settle are Hong Kong's largely nonwhite population of
2.5 million and some 1.5 million ''overseas citizens'' - Indians, Malaysians and
others - who had become United Kingdom citizens when their homelands gained
independence. A sharp crackdown last year dropped the number of immigrants
accepted for settlement to 53,500, the lowest figure since controls on
Commonwealth immigration were first imposed in 1962.

In London, Fiona Mactaggart, general secretary of the Joint Council for the
Welfare of Immigrants, said that in the last 12 months more than half of
husbands and fiances applying from the Indian subcontinent to join their wives
or future wives in Britain have been refused entry.

''You've got women and children alone without any prospects of the husbands
getting here,'' said Mrs. Mactaggart. ''And a woman from the city here would not
have much of a life chasing cows in rural India.''

Mediterranean Less Attractive

Further south, higher rates of unemployment and less generous welfare systems
have made West Europe's Mediterranean countries less attractive to illegal
immigrants. In the 1970's, for example, some 60,000 Pakistanis were thought to
be working in Greece. Officials now put the figure at no more 300.

In Italy, Ethiopians, Somalians and Tunisians predominate in an illegal alien
population thought to number between 700,000 and 800,000. But many others, like
East Europeans seeking asylum, regard the country only as a stopping place on
their way to the United States or other destinations.

Some southern European ''guest workers'' have started drifting home after years
of employment in Scandinavia and West Germany. But there have been no major
shifts - in contrast to the 100,000 Turkish ''guest workers'' who this year are
expected to take cash incentives to leave West Germany for home.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of aliens at welfare office in West Berlin (page A4)

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              109 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 9, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

NEWS SUMMARY;
 MONDAY, JULY 9, 1984 International

SECTION: Section B; Page 1, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 867 words


Greece's request for surplus aircraft will probably be turned down by the Reagan
Administration, according to State Department and Pentagon officials. They said
the Administration was near a decision to reject the request, largely in
reaction to Athens's recent handling of incidents involving terrorist activity.
Greece has been seeking to obtain 16 F-5 interceptors from Norway, which
received them free of charge from the United States a decade ago. Norway has
declared the aircraft to be surplus, but the United States retains control over
further transfers. (Page A1, Column 6.)

Illegal immigration in West Europe has reached the point where the Governments
are trying to turn the immigrants back, but they have not been particularly
successful, with the possible exception of Britain. Tamil tea pickers from Sri
Lanka, Kurds from Beirut, Ashantis from Ghana, teen- agers from Iran seeking to
avoid the draft and Pakistani drug pushers are seeking refuge. (A1:3.)

A fire in York, England, ''gutted'' one of the world's greatest cathedrals early
this morning. York Minster, the huge, 500-year-old treasure house of stained
glass, is ''now in danger of collapse,'' according to a North Yorkshire police
spokesman. (A1:1.)

Lebanese seeking missing relatives thwarted Government plans to open new
crossing points between the predominantly Moslem and Christian halves of the
Beirut. (A1:4.)

Israel's politicians are courting the nation's 250,000 Arab, Druse and Bedouin
voters for the elections later this month. Arab voters have the strength to
elect about 12 of the 120 Parliament members, and in a close election, as this
one is expected to be, their votes could be decisive. (A1:2.)

Hong Kong's future was discussed by Secretary of State George P. Shultz who met
in Hong Kong with Sir Edward Youde, Governor of the British colony. Although
Washington is not a party to negotiations between Britain and China over Hong
Kong's future after Britain's lease ends, Mr. Shultz said the United States had
a ''deep interest'' in insuring that the final agreement preserved Hong Kong's
''stability and prosperity.'' (A3:4.)

A Nigerian abducted in London might have arranged his own kidnapping to gain
international attention, a spokesman for the Nigerian Government suggested. He
said Nigeria had had nothing to do with the kidnapping of Umaru Dikko, a former
Nigerian Cabinet official. British authorities found Mr. Dikko unconscious in a
crate just before it was to be loaded on a plane bound for Nigeria. (A3:1.)

John McEnroe's victory over Jimmy Connors at Wimbledon was the most one-sided
men's final there since Don Budge, the last American to win two consecutive
Wimbledon titles, allowed Bunny Austin four games in 1938. (C1:6.) National

Coordination of a disaster-aid plan saved lives when an Amtrak train derailed
Saturday morning in Williston, Vt., according to a Federal official, who called
the response to the accident ''extraordinary.'' Vermont was divided in 1969 into
13 emergency rescue districts, and in District 3, where the wreck occurred,
rescue squads that have been holding disaster drills since the early 1970's went
to the aid of the Amtrak passengers. (A1:5.)

The Amtrak train wreck in Vermont, in which five people were killed and 153
injured, was apparently caused by the undermining of an earth embankment by
heavy rains that also washed out a stone culvert over which the train ran,
Patricia A. Goldman, of the National Transportation Safety Board, said in a
preliminary investigation report. (A14:1.)

Of the 4,000 convicts executed in the United States since 1930 two-fifths were
put to death in five states, according to a Justice Department study. The states
with the highest number of executions since 1930, when record-keeping began, are
New York, Georgia, Texas, California, and North Carolina. Each carried out more
than 250 executions. Since capital punishment was resumed by many states in
1977, after the Supreme Court's 1972 ruling on its constitutionality, the pace
of state executions has increased. (A8:2.)

Many black Republicans leaders who support President Reagan disagree sharply
with his Administration's civil rights policies and some demand the dismissal of
the Justice Department's official in charge of civil rights. Their views reflect
the concern of some black Republicans that the Administration might try to gain
support from whites by antagonizing blacks. (A10:1.) Metropolitan

Federal court calenders are crowded in New York, New Jersey and Connecticut
because of sharply higher caseloads, a shortage of judges and, in some cases,
crowded quarters. The increase in new cases has ranged from 44 percent to 140
percent from 1978 and 1983. (A1:1.)

A rapid increase in helicopter traffic in the metropolitan area by corporate
executives in surburban headquarters has led to predictions that the entire
Northeast corridor from Boston to Washington may eventually be linked by a
network of helicopters serving corporations. Officials are considering new
regulations to control the traffic as they plan for additional landing areas.
(B4:1.) Page D1

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Summary

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              110 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 6, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

THE SWISS KNOW HOW TO CONTROL BORDERS

SECTION: Section A; Page 22, Column 5; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 289 words


To the Editor:


In a recent editorial (June 22) you argued that the outlook is promising for
making the Simpson-Mazzoli immigration bill work effectively. But the experience
of Switzerland - the only Western country to control its borders successfully -
suggests your optimism is unwarranted.

Like the supporters of Simpson- Mazzoli, the Swiss have recognized the
permeability of national frontiers and the need for internal controls to deter
foreign workers from trying to cross borders undetected. Like the U.S. Congress,
they have passed laws making it illegal for employers to hire such persons. In
sharp contrast to the Americans, however, the Swiss have never sought to use
employer sanctions as the main internal instrument for regulating immigration.
Rather, as documented by M. G. Clark of Cornell University, the Swiss have
adopted a multifaceted approach in which employer sanctions are reinforced by
complementary policies, including an effective national identification system, a
computerized alien registration bank, the use of local and regional authorities
to monitor possible undocumented aliens and, on the more positive side, the
strict enforcement of fair employment standards for all workers.  Swiss
immigration controls work because they are comprehensive.  Few Americans would
want to see so broad a program here, but if we are serious about ''regaining
control of our borders,'' some of the additional policies used by the Swiss are
inevitable. In the meantime, the half-measures represented by Simpson-Mazzoli
are unlikely to reduce illegal immigration significantly.

ARTHUR A. GOLDSMITH Assistant Professor of Management University of
Massachusetts Boston, June 26, 1984

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: letter

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              111 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 4, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

'PERVERSE' OPPOSITION TO AN IMMIGRATION BILL

SECTION: Section A; Page 14, Column 6; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 149 words


To the Editor:


As an Englishman (here on a perfectly legal student visa) who has been trying,
unsuccessfully, for nearly two years to obtain a green card, I find it galling
to think that, had I come in on a tourist visa and hidden out in New York doing
odd jobs for a couple of years, I would now be eligible for United States
citizenship.

As it is, I find the idea that the Simpson-Mazzoli immigration reform bill
discriminates against those very people, mainly Hispanic, to whom it would give
citizenship, perverse and infuriating. I happen to think it is a good and
necessary bill, of unprecedented generosity.

Surely, if the bill discriminates against anyone, it is against those of us who
have respected your immigration laws, and whose task would become even more
difficult owing to new low ceilings on legal immigration.

ANTHONY D. GILES New York, June 25, 1984

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Letter

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              112 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 4, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

HISPANIC WORKERS SAY HOUSE'S IMMIGRATION BILL DEMONSTRATES INGRATITUDE

BYLINE: By JESUS RANGEL

SECTION: Section A; Page 6, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 829 words

DATELINE: SAN ANTONIO,


By his own description, Jose Rodriguez, a retired welder living in the large
West Side barrio here, ''drips pride like perspiration.''

He came to San Antonio from Mexico illegally in the 1950's and held a variety of
jobs before retiring from a job in an air-conditioner factory two years ago.
Over the years he became a naturalized citizen, reared three children, two of
whom are graduating from college, and helped numerous relatives migrate here.

Most of those relatives, like his nephew Jesus Rodriguez next door, have
established small businesses and are doing well, he said.

''We never got on welfare or had problems with the police,'' Jose Rodriguez
said. ''We've helped ourselves and the city at a time when they needed laborers
here.''

Mr. Rodriguez is among many residents in this barrio, one of the largest
concentration of Hispanic people in the United States, who said they opposed the
comprehensive immigration bill passed recently by the House of Representatives.
The Senate has passed a similar bill and a conference committee is expected to
meet to resolve the differences.

The legislation, whose chief sponsors are Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of
Wyoming, and Representaive Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky, would impose
penalties on employers who hired illegal aliens. The measure would also offer
legal status to illegal aliens who have lived continuously in this country for a
certain time. The cutoff date is still uncertain because the House and Senate
versions differ.

Mr. Rodriguez and other residents said they had contributed to building the city
and the country and viewed the immigration bill as a slap at immigrants like
themselves. They said they were particularly concerned about having to prove to
an employer that they were citizens. Beyond that, they said, the debate in the
House had revealed ingratitude toward immigrants and their contributions.

''It's not right to treat people this way,'' Mr. Rodriguez said as he repaired a
bicycle for a neighbor's child outside his modest wooden home. ''The ones who
want this law are ungrateful.''



Jesus Rodriguez, who started fixing flat tires as a living after coming to San
Antonio in the 1960's, now owns a tire store and is a citizen. He said he did
not mind a provision approved by the House requiring temporary residents with
amnesty to be studying English and United States history and government if they
sought to become permanent residents.

''That's a part that people around here don't mind because learning English and
some history is something you can encounter just by working,'' he said. ''But I
don't like penalizing employers because that means if I hire a friend of a
relative who is here illegally, I'm violating a law. In my opinion, helping a
friend is more important than where he was born.''

Down the street, at a small cabinet manufacturing company employing mostly
Mexican-Americans, three workers also said they had followed the bill's progress
through the Congress.

''Even though they say you don't have to carry identification around, the
employer will want to know where you were born and to prove it,'' said Ricardo
Y. Sanchez. ''They have no right to tell me what identification to have.''

As he talked, a co-worker joined Mr. Sanchez and the other two men for lunch in
the parking lot.

''That man, Mazzoli, he won't have to prove where he's from,'' Mr. Sanchez said
as his friends laughed. ''Why should we?''



San Antonio, with nearly 800,000 residents, is the largest city in the nation to
have a majority Hispanic population, at 55 percent, and the largest with a
Mexican-American Mayor, Henry Cisneros, a product of the West Side barrio.

Since taking office, Mr. Cisneros has enjoyed some success in making the the
city into a high-technology research and manufacturing center.

Most of the efforts have been concentrated on attracting electronics plants. Now
the city is moving to build a communications system to serve present and future
electronic companies and government offices as well.

Called the Texas Teleport, it is expected by city officials to become a major
communications center in Texas. It will link the businesses and research centers
to other parts of the United States and the world.

At first, Texas Teleport will be designed to serve communicatons and
computer-based industries in New World, which is planned as a a 3,000- acre
community of offices, research and development facilities, apartments,
condominiums and single- family homes and shopping and entertainment facilities.

It will also serve a foreign trade zone of light assembly and manufacturing,
warehouses office space and distribution facilities.

Later, it will be integrated to transmit information for state and city
government offices.

''No American city can realize its full potential in the post-industrial economy
without a sophisticated communication infrastructure,'' said Mayor Cisneros.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Jose Rodriguez tire store

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              113 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 2, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

CONGRESS;
THE IMMIGRATION BILL'S MELTING POT

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section A; Page 12, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 1247 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, July 1


The politics of immigration make strange bedfellows, and nothing better
illustrates that fact than the growing relationship between Representative Kent
Hance, a conservative Texas Democrat, and Arnoldo S. Torres, executive director
of the League of United Latin American Citizens.

The two have joined forces in a campaign to search for ways to kill the
comprehensive immigration bill now headed for a conference committee, yet they
differ on a key provision.

Mr. Hance, who was warmly received June 24 at the League of United Latin
American Citizens' 55th annual convention in El Paso, has been a tireless foe of
the section of the bill that would offer legal status to many illegal aliens. He
says this would ''legalize the theft of American jobs'' from United States
citizens.

Mr. Torres strongly opposes the bill, saying it will lead to more discrimination
against Hispanic people, but he likes the amnesty provision.

More Paradoxes


The paradoxes in the politics of immigration do not stop there. The Speaker of
the House, Thomas P. O'Neill Jr., has stressed that the immigration bill was not
a Democratic bill. And a majority of House Democrats voted against it, while a
majority of Republicans supported it. But Hispanic groups opposing the bill hold
the Democrats responsible, and they criticize Walter F. Mondale for not doing
more to stop it.

Without the amnesty provision, there can be no immigration bill. Supporters of
the bill see it as an essential corollary to the bill's ban on employment of
illegal aliens. Under this section, an employer who hired illegal aliens would
be subject to a civil penalty of up to $2,000 for each such alien.

The bill has been adopted in different forms by both houses of Congress. The
Senate vote was 76 to 18, but the margin in the House was much more narrow, 216
to 211. It appears unlikely that the conference committee of lawmakers from both
houses will make any substantial headway in reconciling the differences before
Congress returns from recess July 23, after the Democratic National Convention.

Mr. Mondale, who expects to win the Democratic Presidential nomination, has said
repeatedly that he opposed the bill on the ground that it could lead to more
employment discrimination against Hispanic Americans. The sponsors of the
legislation, Senator Alan K. Simspon, Republican of Wyoming, and Representative
Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky, deny that such discrimination would
occur.

'Unhappy With the Democrats'


But Joe M. Sanchez, a prominent Mexican-American businessman in Los Angeles,
said: ''We are very unhappy with the Democrats for not being more sensitive to
the needs of Hispanics. I was planning to hold a fund-raiser for the Democrats
and probably would have raised $25,000. I have decided not to do that.''

Mr. Sanchez was asked why Hispanic groups did not direct their wrath toward
Republicans and the Reagan Administration, which strongly supports the bill. He
replied: ''Hispanics, especially Mexican- Americans, have tended to vote
Democratic. The Republicans don't owe us anything. The people who owe us
something should pay.''

Support for the bill, like opposition, cuts across party lines. Among the
Democrats voting for the bill were Jim Wright of Texas, the majority leader;
Thomas S. Foley of Washington State, the majority whip, and Barney Frank of
Massachusetts. In debate over the bill, Democrats clashed bitterly among
themselves while Republicans were, to a remarakble degree, united under party
discipline.

Representative Newt Gingrich, a Georgia Republican, said: ''When you have
debaters as eloquent as Barney Frank attacking fellow Democrats, it makes you
feel good. Better he should attack them than us. This is not a political bill in
the traditional sense. Most of us on the Republican side genuinely believe that
if a nation cannot control its borders, it cannot defend its sovereignty. We saw
it as an issue relating to the long-term security of our country, not a short-
term political issue.''

'Splintering' the Democrats


Fernando E. C. De Baca, co-chairman of the Republican National Hispanic
Assembly, an affiliate of the Republican National Committee, said the
immigration issue was ''splintering'' the Democratic Party.

''The liberal Democratic leadership,'' he asserted, ''is out of touch with the
grass-roots Hispanic community, which includes many people who support the major
provisions of the Simpson-Mazzoli bill. The jobs that illegal aliens take are,
in many cases, jobs currently held by minorities, including Hispanic
Americans.''

The politics of immigration correlate with geography more closely than with
usual liberal-conservative or Democratic-Republican alignments. The Texas
delegation voted against the Simpson-Mazzoli bill by a margin of 23 to 3, and
the California delegation also opposed it, 33 to 12. But in Florida, which
absorbed an influx of 125,000 Cubans in 1980, there was strong support, with the
state's delegation voting 17 to 2 in favor.

Many illegal aliens in Texas and California are Mexicans who live in fear of the
law but provide those states with cheap seasonal labor, and some return to
Mexico in the off-season. But most Cubans and Haitians who would benefit from
the bill were granted provisional permission to live in the United States when
they came here, and they have remained, mostly in Florida, where they have added
to state and local costs for health, education and social services.

At the time of the 1980 census, slightly more than half the nation's Hispanic
people lived in Texas and California. They accounted for only 5.5 percent of the
nation's voting-age population, but they accounted for 17.7 percent in Texas,
16.1 percent in California and 8.5 percent in Florida. Census figures do not
distinguish between legal and illegal aliens.

Temporary Workers Program


The importance of geography was also reflected in an amendment creating a
program to provide temporary foreign workers for some fruit and vegetable
producers. The amendment, anathema to organized labor, was proposed by
Representatives Leon E. Panetta, a Democrat from California's Salinas Valley,
and Sid Morrison, a Republican from Washington's Yakima Valley. Among those who
helped the growers lobby in Congress was the law firm of Robert S. Strauss,
former chairman of the Democratic National Committee.

Republican House members overwhelmingly supported the amendment, 138 to 15, but
it also drew support from 90 Democrats.

President Reagan and other Republicans can support the Simpson- Mazzoli bill
because it is, in one sense, a law-enforcement measure, designed to crack down
on illegal immigration. But there are political crosscurrents that lead some
conservatives, in the Administration and Congress, to balk. They see the amnesty
as a reward for lawbreakers. They fear that the amnesty will increase social
welfare costs for the Government. And they see the bill as authorizing a large
new role for the Government in regulating business.

Representative Jack F. Kemp, Republican of upstate New York, gave a supply-side
economist's view of the issue, saying: ''Immigrants don't take jobs and wealth
away from Americans. Immigrants create jobs and wealth, as consumers of American
goods and services and entrepreneurs beginning small businesses, which are the
major source of new jobs for all Americans. Immigration is not a zero-sum
proposition.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: drawing

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              114 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 1, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

FEART AND SKEPTICISM ACROSS THE BORDER

BYLINE: By RICHARD J. MEISLIN

SECTION: Section 4; Page 2, Column 3; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 881 words

DATELINE: MEXICO CITY


If illegal Mexican immigrants and the people who study them are correct, the
immigration legislation now being considered by Congress would not regain
control of the United States border so much as it would offend nearly everyone
south of it. The Mexican Government has had little officially to say about the
legislation, which was approved last week by the House of Representatives. In a
statement, the Foreign Ministry merely warned that the measure could ''seriously
undercut and injure the human and labor rights of Mexican workers.'' But
business, labor and peasant organizations have been unanimous in condemning the
proposed law. It has been called racist, repressive, economically devastating
and another instance of the wealthy and omnipotent United States turning its
back on less fortunate neighbors.

The vision that has been created here is one of massive deportations, with
accompanying social and economic disarray, as illegal immigrants flood back
across the border to a country already seriously short of jobs. The president of
the Confederation of Industrial Chambers, Jacobo Zeidenweber, predicted that the
legislation ''will cause very major damage'' to Mexico's economic, political and
social systems.

Among those who study Mexico's illegal immigrants, however, and among the
immigrants themselves, the belief that the law would put an end to the flow of
undocumented workers is dismissed as politically expedient fantasy. Laws
imposing penalties against employers who knowingly hire illegal workers have
been on the books in California and several other states for years, with little
effect. Experts do not expect American citizens to replace illegal workers in
the low-paying jobs most of them would vacate. So long as the demand for cheap
labor continues, they predict, so will the flow of undocumented workers.
''There is nothing in the bill that would be different from sanctions that
already exist,'' said Dr. Jorge Bustamante, director of Mexico's Center for
Border Studies of Northern Mexico. The incentive to cross - the need to feed
oneself and one's family - has been far stronger than the legal barriers.
Mexicans of all social classes demonstrate a remarkable facility for skirting
their own country's laws when their economic interests are involved. There is
little reason to think they would cease to skirt someone else's. Unemployment is
estimated at more than 10 percent and underemployment, above 40 percent. The
minimum wage is $4.41 a day and real income is crumbling in the face of
continuing inflation. ''You're talking about one of the world's highest-wage
countries in juxtaposition with a middle-developed country that nonetheless has
one of the lowest wage scales,'' said Wayne A. Cornelius of the University of
California's Center for United States-Mexico Studies. ''There's simply no legal
or police remedy to that.'' $1 Billion ContributionMassive deportations are
unlikely, Mr. Cornelius said, since the legislation covers only the newly hired,
not illegal aliens already working in the country, and applies only to companies
with more than four employees. Nevertheless, the bill may do some damage to
Mexico, researchers said. Higher-paying job opportunities for border- violators
are likely to dry up, cutting earnings and thus the money illegal immigrants can
send or bring back to their families. They now contribute an estimated $1
billion a year, one of Mexico's largest sources of foreign currency.

Problems are also likely to increase, at least temporarily, in Mexican border
towns, as workers wait to see if the coast is clear before trying to cross.
Northern border cities have already had their resources strained by spectacular
growth and this is likely to worsen. While the growing number of ''in bond''
border assembly plants have provided jobs for some of the new arrivals, wage
scales are low, making them only a short- term alternative for most Mexicans
seeking the comparative riches available across the border.

The measure offers a major concession to illegal immigrants - amnesty for those
who can prove they have lived continuously in the United States since January
1982 but for many Mexicans this will be of little help. A large number cross
back and forth with the seasons. Dr. Bustamante estimates that there are 500,000
illegal Mexicans in the United States most of the year and that the total rises
to 1.5 million to 1.75 million for the summer and fall harvests. Also, many of
those who have been hiding from the authorities and working in the underground
economy are unlikely to have collected authentic documentary evidence of their
stay in the United States.

As the House and Senate prepare to go to conference to resolve their differences
on the legislation, the flow shows no sign of letting up. In Tijuana a few days
ago, dozens of Mexicans could be seen trekking across a parched, rock-strewn
field near the airport to a point where they would hide out until nightfall,
waiting for their chance to slip by the border patrol and into the United
States. Across the road at a little shop, a tortilla maker told a visitor he had
watched the sequence repeated nearly every day for 15 years. ''There's nothing
for them to do here,'' he said. ''They'll never stop them from going.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Mexicans waiting to cross border

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              115 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 29, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

MEXICO SEES PERILS IN PROPOSED CHANGES IN U.S. IMMIGRATION LAWS

BYLINE: By RICHARD J. MEISLIN

SECTION: Section A; Page 4, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 521 words

DATELINE: MEXICO CITY, June 28


Mexico expressed concern today that proposed changes in United States
immigration laws could ''seriously undercut and injure the human and labor
rights of Mexican workers.''

The Government said if the proposed measure was enacted, it would ''strengthen
and broaden'' its system of consular offices in the United States to ''put into
action all the resources at its disposal to protect its nationals and demand for
them the full respect for their rights.''

It also said the immigration issue would ''remain a fundamental theme in the
political and economic relations between Mexico and the United States.''

The statement, issued by the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, was the Government's
first official comment since the passage of the so-called Simpson-Mazzoli
legislation by the House of Representatives earlier this month.

Its tone was mild by comparison with recent statements by labor and peasant
organizations, which have described the proposed law as racist, repressive and
an agressive act against Mexico.

What the House Version Says

The immigration measure was put together by Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican
of Wyoming, and Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky. In the
House version, its key provisions would impose fines on companies that knowingly
employ illegal aliens and would offer amnesty to illegal residents who can
demonstrate they have lived in the United States continuously since January
1982.

The Senate has passed a similar version of the legislation, but differences
between the two would have to be worked out in conference before the bill could
become law.

The Mexican Government said President Miguel de la Madrid, during his visit to
Washington last month, underscored to President Reagan that ''migratory workers
make a real contribution to the North American economy.''

It said this contribution should be accompanied, ''for reasons of basic
equality, by just and dignified treatment'' on the part of the United States.

500,000 Live in U.S. Illegally

The House version of the immigration measure would provide for a ''guest
worker'' program that would allow farmers to bring in workers for up to 11
months to ''perform services or labor in seasonal agricultural employment.''

Such a provision is not included in the Senate measure, however, and appears to
have encountered new opposition among House members since its passage. It would
not come close, in any case, to permitting the numbers of Mexicans who currently
sneak across the border to find jobs and higher salaries in the United States.

Mexican researchers estimate that some 500,000 Mexicans live in the United
States illegally year-round, with the number rising to 1.5 million to 1.75
million during the summer and fall harvests in the southern United States.  The
Government said it would ''make an effort, although in a moment of economic
difficulty, to take full advantage in our country of these valuable human
resources.'' But with unemployment here estimated at more than 10 percent and
underemployment at 40 percent, success in this effort appears unlikely.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              116 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 28, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

MAZZOLI BILL IS NOT HELPING AT HOME

BYLINE: By JAMES BARRON

SECTION: Section A; Page 16, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 698 words

DATELINE: LOUISVILLE, Ky., June 27


One thing about a city 373 miles from the nearest foreign border is that
immigration is not a hot topic on the local cocktail circuit. So while
Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, a Democrat, has been in the news for writing
the immigration bill the House passed last week, his constituents here have been
talking about Cissy and the college degrees.

Cissy is the nickname for Elaine Musselman, a 40-year-old Republican whose
aggressive campaign against Mr. Mazzoli had attracted Democrats and women. They
did not see much value for the district in Mr. Mazzoli's immigration work, his
first major piece of legislation in 14 years in the House, and did not share his
strong antiabortion views.

But three weeks ago a television station disclosed that Miss Musselman, the head
of an insurance company who is a former president of the Louisville Chamber of
Commerce, had never received the two college degrees she had said she held.

That same week, after attending a fund-raising party in Washington, she lost
control of a rented automobile she was driving and suffered a concussion and a
neck injury.

A Lull in Campaign


With Mr. Mazzoli in Washington to shepherd the immigration bill through the
House and Miss Musselman recuperating out of town, there was a lull in the
campaign that lasted until today, when Miss Musselman came home for the first
time since the accident.

In a statement to 50 supporters at the Louisville airport, she called her
misstatements about her educational background ''a foolish and immature
mistake'' that she had made to get her first job, as a lobbyist with the
Bristol- Myers Company in Washington. She said the company had kept her on the
payroll after discovering that she did not have a bachelor of arts degree from
the University of Louisville and a masters in international relations from
American University in Washington, as she had asserted.

Saul Loeb, her campaign spokesman, said that she had not decided whether to
continue the race and that her decision would depend on her health.

''Everything that's happened has brought back Ron's basic virtues,'' said
Russell Riggs, a Louisville lawyer who is a former local Democratic chairman.
''His hard work didn't appeal to trendy people, and he'd lost some of them.''

The district hugs the Ohio River and includes this city of Louisville and the
powerful, wealthy suburbs to the east, where Democratic voters outnumber
Republicans by 3 to 1. Mr. Mazzoli, who is 51 years old, won his seat in 1970 by
running as the peace candidate in what was seen as a referendum on the Vietnam
War.

Stand on Rights Amendment


Mr. Mazzoli is a Roman Catholic and has consistently opposed abortion. But until
last year he had generally supported the proposed equal rights amendment to the
Federal Constitution. Karen Bybee, his spokesman in Washington, said he cast a
no vote last November because he disapproved of the procedures used to bring the
amendment to the floor.

''When he voted against the E.R.A., a lot of women were disturbed,'' said
Lucretia Ward, coordinator of the 1,500-member Women's Alliance, who is a member
of the Kentucky Commission on Women.

As for immigration, some of Mr. Mazzoli's constituents are not sure that the
Government can administer Mr. Mazzoli's bill. ''It sounds like it will be a real
bureaucratic wingding,'' said Betty Ann Miller, a Democrat.

His sudden national prominence has made some people in Louisville wonder whether
he is more in touch with affairs in Washington than with his district. ''I don't
care how many weekends you fly back,'' Mr. Riggs said, ''it's not like living
there.''

Miss Musselman, by contrast, had become a visible community leader and was
planning a well-financed campaign. Mr. Loeb said she had expected to raise
$500,000. Whether she can raise that much now is an open question. So is whether
she can still defeat Mr. Mazzoli.

''The public has an enormous capacity to forgive, but this is like the Tylenol
case,'' said Jessica Schikler, a partner in a Louisville advertising company who
was an early Musselman supporter. To turn something like this around takes great
skill and total honesty.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Romano L. Mazzoli; photo of Elaine Musselman

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              117 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 26, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE WORLD;
Vietnam Says U.S. Quota Delays Emigration

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section A; Page 5, Column 3; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 141 words

DATELINE: HO CHI MINH CITY, Vietnam, June 25


Vietnam said today that it had stopped issuing exit permits for resettlement in
the United States because of a backlog of nearly 30,000 cases caused by a United
States immigration quota on Amerasian refugees.

A Vietnamese official here urged Washington to take more people who want to join
American relatives, including all children fathered by Americans during the
Vietnam War. The official, Nguyen Phi Tuyen, head of consular affairs, said the
United States quota of 1,000 refugees a month, including Amerasian children, was
to blame for the backlog.

''For the U.S. alone,'' he said, ''we still have in Vietnam 28,000 to 29,000
people who have been granted exit visas but are still awaiting entry visas to
the United States. Since we have 29,000 awaiting entry visas, we hesitate to
grant more exit visas if they can't get entry visas.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              118 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 26, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

SUPREME COURT ROUNDUP;
JUSTICES DECLARE ILLEGAL ALIENS ARE PROTECTED BY LABOR LAW

SECTION: Section A; Page 9, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 846 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 25


The Supreme Court ruled today that illegal aliens are entitled to the
protections of Federal labor law.

By a vote of 7 to 2, the Court ruled that it is an unfair labor practice for an
employer to report illegal aliens to the Immigration and Naturalization Service
in retaliation against the aliens' efforts to organize a union.

The decision, written by Associate Justice Sandra Day O'Connor, upheld the key
portion of a ruling by the United States Court of Appeals for the Seventh
Circuit, in Chicago. That court, in turn, had upheld a longstanding policy of
the National Labor Relations Board that aliens, regardless of their status under
the immigration laws, are ''employees'' with all the rights of any other
employees under the National Labor Relations Act.

But the High Court's decision may have a short life if the immigration bill that
the House of Representatives passed last week becomes law. Central to the
Court's reasoning today was the fact that under current law, it is not illegal
to hire an illegal alien. ''Counterintuitive though it may be,'' Justice
O'Connor said, there is therefore ''no reason to conclude'' that a labor policy
of protecting illegal aliens conflicts with an immigration policy designed to
keep them out of the country.

Proposed Change in Law


Both the House and Senate versions of the new immigration bill make it illegal
to employ illegal aliens, a change that might well lead the Court to reach a
different conclusion.

In the case before the Court, the labor board found the owner of a Chicago
leather-processing company guilty of an unfair labor practice for asking the
Immigration and Naturalization Service to check on the immigration status of his
employees. The owner knew that almost his entire work force was composed of
illegal aliens from Mexico, but notified the authorities only after the
employees voted to join a union.

Federal immigration agents arrested the workers, who accepted voluntary
departure as a substitute for deportation.

The company, Sure-Tan Inc., argued in its Supreme Court appeal that the aliens'
''own illegal status,'' and not the company's action, was responsible for their
fate, and that in any event the company's behavior was protected by its ''First
Amendment right to petition the Government.''

The Court today rejected those arguments. Justice O'Connor said that while
reporting a violation of the law ''ordinarily should be encouraged,'' it was an
unfair labor practice when motivated by ''anti-union animus.''

However, the Court overturned the penalty that the Court of Appeals had imposed
on the company. The appeals court required the company to give each employee six
months' back pay, as well as a reinstatement offer that would remain valid for
four years.

Justice O'Connor said there was no evidence to support the back pay award or the
prolonged reinstatement period. The Court sent the case back to the labor board
for an ''appropriate'' remedy, noting that any reinstatement offer had to be
conditioned on the employees' legal re-entry into the country.

The vote in Sure-Tan v. N.L.R.B., No. 82-945, was divided. Associate Justices
Lewis F. Powell Jr. and William H. Rehnquist dissented from the conclusion that
Federal labor law covered illegal aliens, making the vote on that issue 7-to-2.
But they joined the majority on the remedy question, from which four other
Justices dissented. Those dissenting were Justices William J. Brennan Jr.,
Thurgood Marshall, Harry A. Blackmun and John Paul Stevens. The vote on the
remedy was therefore 5 to 4.

The Court also dealt with these matters today:

ImmunityThe Court unanimously ruled that public defenders are not immune from
lawsuits by their clients on charges of conspiring with state officials to
secure a conviction. The ruling, which affirmed a decision by the United States
Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit, was a narrow one. It applied only to
damage suits for ''intentional misconduct,'' as opposed to ordinary legal
malpractice, and only to allegations that the lawyer had been part of a
conspiracy with state officials. (Tower v. Glover, No. 82-1988).


DiscriminationThe Justices ruled, 8 to 0, that an employee may sue an employer
for discrimination on the basis of race or sex, even if the employer prevailed
in a previous class action lawsuit that raised similar allegations. The United
States Court of Appeals for the Fourth Circuit had barred plaintiffs who had
been part of a class action suit against the Federal Reserve Bank of Richmond
from later pursuing individual claims of discrimination against the bank. But
the High Court ruled that just because the bank had not engaged in
discrimination against a whole group did not mean it had not discriminated
against particular individuals. (Cooper v. Federal Reserve, No. 83-185).

Affirmative Action

The Court refused to hear a challenge by the teachers' union in Buffalo to a
Federal appeals court order that to some degree overrode seniority in both
layoffs and hiring. (Buffalo Teachers v. Arthur, No. 83-665).


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              119 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 26, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION BILL MAY BRING END TO LONG WAIT OF BOAT PEOPLE

BYLINE: By REGINALD STUART

SECTION: Section A; Page 8, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1082 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, June 25


For more than four years, thousands of Cubans and Haitians here have been
anxiously awaiting a decision by the United States Government on whether they
can stay in this country.

Now it appears that some final action may be coming. Major immigration
legislation that could ease their fears of deportation has been approved in
different forms by both houses of Congress. But uncertainty abounds, and many
Cubans and Haitians, while hoping for the best, are afraid things may go wrong.

They are the ''boat people'' who fled Cuba and Haiti for the United States in
1980 and 1981, the 125,000 people classified as ''Cuban/Haitian entrant (status
pending)'' by the Immigration and Naturalization Service.

'More Anxiety and Fear'


Uncertainty over how House and Senate negotiators resolve differences in their
immigration measures is ''creating more anxiety and fear because many of us feel
we will be sent back,'' said Claudio Tartabull, a 44- year-old Cuban. ''I try
not to think about it.''

There are several possibilities regarding their status.

The House passed the immigration legislation last week by a narrow margin, but
in it is a provision that was approved unanimously to legalize the boat people.
The provision, sponsored by Representative Peter W. Rodino Jr., Democrat of New
Jersey, would offer them permanent legal residency.

If the conferees from the Senate do not accept the Rodino provision, the Cubans
and Haitians would be subject to what the negotiators decide on offering amnesty
to illegal aliens in general. The House measure specifies that illegal aliens
who came to this country before Jan. 1, 1982, and who have lived here
continuously since may apply for legal status. The boat people would be
eligible.

The Senate bill specifies a cutoff date of Jan. 1, 1980, and most arrived after
that. However, like the House, the Senate took account of their uncertain
status. Its general amnesty offer would make an exception to this cutoff date
specifically for Cubans and Haitians who arrived in this country before Jan. 1,
1981. Most arrived in 1980 and would be eligible, but those who came in 1981
would not.

Concern Over Temporary Status


While the Rodino amendment would offer permanent status, the general amnesty
provisions in both the Senate and House bills call for periods of temporary
status before illegal aliens, whether they are boat people or undocumented
workers, can become permanent, legal residents. In the Senate the period is
three years, in the House two.

It is the temporary period that concerns Luis Gutierrez, who came here in May
1980 from Cuba. Mr. Gutierrez, who speaks little English, has been monitoring
the legislative action in Washington over one of the Spanish- language radio
stations here.

Although the Rodino measure would let him apply immediately for permanent legal
status, Mr. Gutierrez is worried that only a general amnesty offer will survive
Congressional negotiations.

''Under temporary residency, they can throw me out of the country any time,'' he
said. Mr. Gutierrez, 38 years old, said he needed permanent status to allow him
to travel and to bring his wife and children to the United States from Cuba.

Rekindling of Debate Feared


Mr. Tartabull, who came here on May 5, 1980, along with thousands of others who
left Cuba through the port of Mariel, said he wanted his status resolved but was
afraid a rekindling of debate about Cuban boat people could erode into a
movement to send them back. Fidel Castro declared when the refugees left that
they could not return, but in recent months there have been indications that
stance could soften.

Existing law offers Cubans permanent status after one year's residence in the
United States, but the Government has processed only a few of the applications
for this status, giving rise to litigation seeking to speed up the process.

Other suits are making their way through the Federal courts on behalf of both
Cubans and Haitians seeking to establish their constitutional rights as a way to
resolve their status. Their arguments have been embraced in part by Federal
district judges in Miami and Atlanta but rejected by appeals court judges.

Unlike the Cubans, Haitians have been routinely deported by the American
authorities despite their insistence that harm might come to them. The United
States considers them economic migrants seeking a better standard of living who
do not meet the test for asylum: that they show a well-founded fear of
persecution if they returned to their homeland.

'No Other Hope'


At the Haitian Refugee Center, a resettlement counseling center, Daniel
Geffrald, a 52-year-old tailor, said, ''I don't think the uncertainty is over,
because the law isn't passed yet.''

Marie Dieudonne, a 36-year-old housecleaner, arrived here June 15, 1980, after a
four-day journey on a small boat packed with Haitians, bringing her two
daughters with her. ''I am happy about it because I don't see no other hope,''
she said of the House measure. ''I cannot go back to Haiti.''

Rulx Jean-Bart, a Haitian-American who is a professor at Miami-Dade Community
College, said he was concerned that the House's general amnesty offer, unlike
the Senate's offer or the Rodino provision, would require those who obtain
temporary status to prove they are studying American history, government and
English before they can obtain permanent status.

''When it comes to having to understand English and American history, most of
the Haitians here don't know how to read and write,'' he said. ''There is a way
to get out, to show that you are learning it, but the Justice Department will
set the standard. We are happy with the Rodino amendment but very concerned
about the rest of the bill.''

The Administration supports the idea of legal status for the boat people but not
necessarily the specifics of the Rodino amendment, said Greg J. Leo, a spokesman
for the immigration service. He explained that the Administration generally does
not support ''nationality-specific legislation.''

Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, the Kentucky Democrat who sponsored the
immigration legislation in the House, said Sunday on a television interview
program that he hoped the Rodino provision would survive in the conference. ''We
think that's a very important provision of our bill,'' he said, ''and we would
urge the Senators to look very carefully and with a lot of fondness toward that
provision.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Luis Gutierrez

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              120 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 25, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION MOVE HARD TO ENFORCE, SPECIALISTS ASSERT

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 1641 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 24


Enforcement of comprehensive immigration legislation in Congress would present a
huge challenge to the already overburdened Immigration and Naturalization
Service, according to many specialists in the field.

Alan C. Nelson, the Commissioner of Immigration and Naturalization, said the
agency was prepared to enforce provisions of

the legislation, approved in different forms by both houses of Congress,
forbidding employment of illegal aliens.

Few people outside the agency expressed such confidence, although several
immigration lawyers said management of the agency had improved noticeably under
Mr. Nelson's leadership.



Volume of Work Cited


Sam Bernsen, a lawyer who worked at the immigration agency for 35 years in
various capacities, including general counsel and Assistant Commissioner, said:
''The Immigration and Naturalization Service is hardly able to carry out its
responsibilities under present law. This legislation would lead to a mammoth,
unprecedented increase in the volume of work. I do not think I.N.S. is up to the
challenge with the present level of manpower. A token increase in manpower would
not make it possible to do the job.''

Mr. Nelson said that ''additional resources will be necessary to carry out the
legislation,'' but he declined to say how much was needed. ''The vast majority
of American employers,'' he said, ''will want to comply and will voluntarily
carry out the law.''



Role of Government


Even a modest enforcement effort could significantly expand the role of the
Federal Government in private industry. The Reagan Administration has
consistently tried to limit or reduce the role of Government, but strongly
supports the immigration bill saying it is the only feasible way for the nation
to regain control of its borders.

The House approved the legislation Wednesday by a vote of 216 to 211. The Senate
approved a similar bill by a vote of 76 to 18 in May 1983. The two houses are
expected to appoint a conference committee to resolve their differences. The
legislation is known by the names of its chief sponsors, Senator Alan K.
Simpson, Republican of Wyoming, and Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat
of Kentucky.



New Forms for Employers


Under both versions of the bill, each employer and job applicant would have to
fill out Federal forms stating that the prospective employee was a citizen or
alien authorized to work in the United States. The employer would have to retain
the forms and make them available for inspection by officers of the immigration
service or the Labor Department.

Federal officials said they would focus initially on businesses and farmers with
a history of employing illegal aliens. The immigration service has automated
many of its files and last month awarded a $60 million contract for computer
equipment including more than 8,000 terminals. Verne Jervis, a spokesman for the
agency, said the computer system would probably store ''intelligence
information'' on employers such as the number of employees, violations of
immigration law, news articles and Labor Department data on companies.

Under present law, it is generally not illegal for an employer to hire an
illegal alien, although the alien may be deported if he is caught. There is a
law that forbids farm labor contractors to recruit or employ illegal aliens, and
some contractors have been convicted. But still, according to Representative
George Miller, Democrat of California, labor contractors are ''among the largest
suppliers of illegal aliens into this country.''

Several immigration lawyers and experts said that the conclusion of a 1980
report by the General Accounting Office, an investigative arm of Congress, was
still valid. ''The Immigration and Naturalization Service has not been able to
adequately enforce immigration laws and the prospects for its doing so are
dim,'' the study said.

Other Countries Examined


Another report by the accounting office, in 1982, examined the experience of 19
foreign countries and concluded that employer sanctions were generally ''not an
effective deterrent.'' The laws were not vigorously enforced, in part because of
government personnel shortages, and employers were ''penalized too little'' to
deter the use of illegal alien workers, the study said.

Representative Dan Lungren of California, a leading Republican supporter of the
Simpson-Mazzoli bill, said that ''employer sanctions have proven highly
successful in Hong Kong'' and that they were working in some European countries
that had recently strengthened enforcement.

The United States immigration service normally receives 1.9 million applications
and petitions for benefits and services each year, according to Janet R. Graham,
a spokesman for the agency. The agency has a backlog of 150,000 asylum
applications, including about 116,000 from Cubans who arrived in 1980.
Immigration service records indicate that as of May 1 the agency had a backlog
of 175,000 naturalization and citizenship certificate cases.

Permanent resident aliens seeking naturalization had to wait as long as 14
months to be interviewed after filing applications at offices in Brooklyn, Los
Angeles and Harlingen, Tex. However, Miss Graham said the average wait
nationally was eight months. She said Federal courts were partially responsible
for the delays, since judges sometimes failed to act on cases that were ready.

The Government says it expects perhaps 2 million illegal aliens to apply for
legal status if the Simpson-Mazzoli bill becomes law. Under the House bill, an
alien could qualify after showing that he had entered the United States before
Jan. 1, 1982, and resided here continuously since that date. In the Senate bill,
the eligibility cutoff date is Jan. 1, 1980.

Three Years of Planning


Greg J. Leo, a spokesman for the immigration service, said today: ''We have been
planning since 1981 to implement this legislation. We are confident we can do
the job. We are ready. We will start with an education program to inform
employers about the new system of employer sanctions.''

Commissioner Nelson said the immigration service had prepared draft regulations
for the employer sanctions program, budget estimates and draft guidelines for
its enforcement personnel in field offices across the country.

Immigration officials said they would probably need to increase their staff of
800 investigators.

Edwin L. Dale Jr., a spokesman for the Office of Management and Budget, said,
''It has always been known that there would be incremental costs in enforcing
the law, that additional resources would be required, and we are ready to
provide them.''

It is not clear how the Government would enforce the requirement for
''continuous'' residence. Nor is it clear how officials would monitor compliance
with a section of the House bill that says aliens seeking permanent resident
status must be ''satisfactorily pursuing a course of study'' in the English
language.

Intentions at Issue


Representative William J. Hughes, a former prosecutor in New Jersey, said he did
not think the Administration and Congress were ''really serious'' about
enforcing the present immigration law or the Simpson-Mazzoli bill.

Mr. Hughes, a Democrat, said the Government might have to evaluate millions of
applications for legal status under the amnesty provisions. But he said, ''We
have not provided enough resources to even provide the basic services that are
needed for the people in this country today under the routine immigration and
naturalization procedure.''

In its budget for the fiscal year 1985, which starts Oct. 1, the Reagan
Administration requested $574.5 million for the immigration service, an increase
of 12.5 percent over the agency's 1984 budget. The request would pay for 850
additional Border Patrol officers, bringing the total authorized number to
3,100.

The House Appropriations Committee recommended $591 million for the agency. The
House trimmed this amount last month when it approved a 4 percent cutback in
spending levels recommended for numerous law-enforcement agencies. Many members
of Congress who had supported that cutback spoke forcefully about the need to
curtail the flow of illegal aliens when the House took up the Simpson-Mazzoli
bill this month.

Fradulent Documents a Problem


Leonel J. Castillo, who served as Commissioner of Immigration and Naturalization
under President Carter, said, ''It is going to be extremely difficult to enforce
employer sanctions.'' Mr. Castillo is a member of an advisory committee on
immigration policy appointed by Gov. Mark White of Texas, a Democrat. Mr.
Castillo said that fraudulent documents posed a threat to the effectiveness of
employer sanctions.

Under the bill, an employer could establish a legal defense for himself if he
examined two identification documents presented by a job applicant. One
acceptable combination consists of a driver's license and either a Social
Security card or a birth certificate. Mr. Castillo said that Social Security
cards and birth certificates were often forged, and that almost any adult could
get a driver's license in Texas.

Ronald Ackerman, executive vice president of the National I.N.S. Council, a
union representing more than 6,000 employees, said, ''We don't think the agency
is prepared for anything that the bill will require, either enforcing sanctions
or giving out benefits.'' Under the House bill, an employer could demand a
hearing in front of an admininistrative law judge before the Government could
impose a civil penalty or even issue a citation, or warning, for a violation.

Mr. Ackerman said: ''We don't think the immigration service has enough judges to
administer the employer sanctions. They don't have enough judges to handle
deportations now.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Alan Nelson (page B10)

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              121 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 24, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

TO MEXICANS, LAW ON ALIENS IS CRUEL JOKE

BYLINE: By RICHARD J. MEISLIN

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 12, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 912 words

DATELINE: TIJUANA, Mexico, June 23


On the large, windswept plateau where dozens of Mexicans huddle each afternoon
waiting for nightfall and the chance to sneak into the United States, the
possibility of stricter immigration laws is viewed as a cruel joke.

It is cruel, they say, to them - another obstacle to be overcome, like the
Mexican police who they say shake them down when they arrive in this gritty
border city from the south, or the ''baja pollos'' who rob them as they are
trying to cross or the border patrols who catch them and turn them back. ''Baja
pollos'' means to take money from chickens.

It is also a joke, they say, on anyone who thinks it will stop them from
crossing the border to find work to feed themselves and their families.

'Trying to Mess With Us'

''They're trying to mess around with us,'' said a 33-year-old carpenter who
identified himself as Alfredo. ''But there will still be work, and as long as
there's work there will still be 'mojados.' '' Mojados is slang for illegal
aliens.

He said he had just spent a week visiting his grandparents in Zacatecas, in
southern Mexico. He sat in a blue nylon windbreaker and a 1984 Olympic baseball
cap waiting for the darkness to fall before beginning the trip back to the
United States. He said he knew where he could get six months of work on a house
in the Los Angeles area.

Nearby, a man who identified himself as Juan, 28, who said he builds furniture,
was also waiting to sneak back. He probably could find work in Mexico, he said,
but it would pay only 1,000 pesos a day - about $5.45 at official rates. On the
other side of the border, he makes $3.75 an hour, he said.

''A thousand pesos - a thousand pesos might feed your family for a day, nothing
more,'' he said.

Behind Every Bush in Sight

Late Friday afternoon about 75 others with similar stories and intentions were
milling about the plateau. Others were behind every bush in sight, waiting for
the darkness and the nightly game of hide-and-seek with the United States border
patrol.

The plateau is only a few miles from the official border crossing, but
spiritually it is light years from the border crossing's bilingual ''Welcome to
the United States'' sign.

The land here is charred from fires lit by successive waves of illegal travelers
to keep warm and to heat food during their long waits. The area is strewn with
broken bottles and cans.

Technically, the plateau itself is United States territory, which begins just
the other side of the road leading to the Tijuana airport.

But to get to settled land, one must go down a gully and take one of the dozens
of roads etched into the side of a steep rise by the feet of thousands of
travelers. The walk, according to those who make it regularly, takes about an
hour.

Source of Foreign Earnings

While the newspaper Excelsior wrote that the new immigration laws would ''close
an escape valve on the pressure cooker of developing nations,'' the Mexican
Government, like the illegal immigrants themselves, has taken a detached view
toward the Simpson- Mazzoli legislation, a version of which passed the House of
Representatives earlier this week by a close margin.

The legislation was put together by Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of
Wyoming, and Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky. It would
prohibit employment of illegal aliens and offer legal status to illegal aliens
who can show that they have been living in the United States since January 1982.

Maintaining its official position that it does not interfere with the laws or
internal affairs of another sovereign nation, the Mexican Government has
publicly stressed only the need to protect the human rights of Mexicans working
in the United States.

Privately, they are also concerned about the income they provide. ''What is
important to Mexico are the workers who go and come back,'' said one top
official, ''and who send money to their families here.''

Although official figures are impossible to calculate because of the clandestine
nature of the income, estimates of the money sent or brought back are in the
range of $1 billion a year. This would make it one of the country's largest
sources of foreign earnings, after oil and tourism.

At the University of California's Center for United States-Mexican Studies,
across the border in La Jolla, there is doubt that the new legislation will
change that much.

'What's Going to Deter Them?'

''As a practical matter,'' said Wayne A. Cornelius, the center's director,
''what's going to deter them from coming? Word from their friends and relatives
that there are no jobs.''

That is not likely, he added. Loopholes in the legislation, he predicted, would
make it possible for many employers to continue to hire illegal aliens, without
facing the penalties specified by the law.

Forged copies of many of the documents needed by the illegal aliens can be
purchased, as they are now, and even the toll-free 800 number proposed in the
House bill to check the validity of Social Security numbers seems unlikely to be
effective, since many of the cards presented by illegal aliens are borrowed from
legitimate card holders.

What is likely, Mr. Cornelius said, is that immigrants will be forced into
''lower tier'' jobs as larger - and therefore better paying - businesses close
their doors to new illegal workers to protect their reputations.

''They're not going to go back to work in Mexico,'' he predicted.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              122 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 24, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

WHOSE COUNTRY?;
THE ALIENS BILL REFLECTS A LARGER IDENTIRY CRISIS

BYLINE: By ROBERT REINHOLD

SECTION: Section 4; Page 1, Column 1; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 1116 words


HOUSTON



T AKEN in the long historical sweep of things, there is perhaps no more
contradictory theme in American life than immigration. Above all, the United
States has defined itself as a land of newcomers, a refuge for the downtrodden
and persecuted. It has welcomed wave upon wave of bedraggled migrants, if only,
sometimes, because their labor was needed. Indeed, in the case of one large
immigrant group - African blacks - the trip was nearly always involuntary.

But periodically, the Anglo-Saxon majority has rebelled against these influxes,
fearful that the American character, however defined, was being somehow
permanently altered or diluted by the strange newcomers.

It is a dialectic that has never been far from the American consciousness.
Nearly two centuries before Senator Pat McCarren complained in 1952 that the
United States was afflicted with ''hard-core indigestible blocs'' that could
leave the country ''overrun, perverted, contaminated, or destroyed,'' George
Washington remarked that, except for ''useful mechanics,'' there was ''no need
of encouragement'' for any more ethnically different immigrants to the unsettled
new country.

Last week, with the huddled masses grouped not only at the shores and borders
but also illegally within American cities, Congress made the latest attempt at
putting new controls on immigration.

The rhetoric included none of the racist dogma that governed efforts earlier to
shut out Asians and Eastern and Southern Europeans. Nonetheless, there was a
strong feeling that the country had lost control of its borders, and, by
extension, its very identity.

In what was obviously one of its most painful and reluctant acts in recent
years, the House of Representatives narrowly passed - the vote was 216 to 211 -
a bill that would curb the influx of illegal aliens by imposing sanctions on
employers, but would also grant amnesty to those who entered without authority
before 1982.

The Senate previously passed a similar version of the so-called Simpson-Mazzoli
bill, and now the two houses must try to reconcile their differences, which may
not be easy. In effect, the House version shuts the back door to immigration but
leaves open the front door for the close relatives of Americans and for
refugees, while the Senate version would place a numerical cap on legal
immigration too.

If the bill becomes law, it is sure to have profound effects on many parts of
the country. The best estimates - really just educated guesses - put the number
of illegal residents at six million. As many as 400,000 of them live in the
Houston metropolitan area, 1 million in the rest of Texas, 1.1 million in
California, and perhaps 1 million or more in the New York metropolitan area.

The largest number are Mexicans, but in New York and other cities they are of
every conceivable origin - Philippine, Yugoslav, Salvadoran, Bangladeshi, even
British and Japanese. The anguish in Congress reflects the intractability of the
issue and all the contradictions it underscores. Yet, in the view of Lawrence H.
Fuchs, the Brandeis professor of American Studies who was executive director of
the Congressionally created Select Commission on Immigration and Refugee Policy,
the bill reaffirms the abolition, in 1965, of the racial and ethnic quotas
implemented in an attempt to preserve the predominantly white Anglo-Saxon
character.

Signs of ResentmentThis is not the xenophobia of the early 1900's or even the
1930's,'' he said. ''The United States has become a very different country. It
not only celebrates ethnic identity, but is not terribly frightened that so many
new folks are Asians and Latin Americans. The problem is that so many have come
in outside of the law.''

Still, there is evidence that xenophobia - or at least a fear of alien
influences - is at work. In Dade County, the Miami area of Florida, an ordinance
prohibits the county from transacting business in any language but English. A
move is afoot to pass a constitutional amendment establishing English as the
official language. And the Simpson- Mazzoli bill would require illegal residents
given amnesty to speak some English and learn some American history to qualify
for permanent residence. Resentment against bilingual education and signs in
Spanish has cropped up in many parts of the country. But more stringent control
of immigrants also cuts against another grain of American society - resentment
of government intrusion. Speaking for the Population Council in New York,
Charles B. Keely contends that the bill says less about immigration than it does
about the nation's ''rock- bottom ambiguity'' toward the kind of government
controls that might be needed to achieve true control of the borders.

Since it does not include a system of national identity cards, Mr. Keely said,
the Simpson-Mazzoli bill lacks teeth. That is a tough issue for an
Administration pledged at once to control the borders and to get government out
of people's lives.

Part of the problem is the extraordinarily loose definition of who is an
American. The Constitution confers citizenship on anybody born in the United
States. Further, existing law allows close relatives of American residents to
immigrate.

Few other industrialized countries offer such generous terms. West Germany, for
example, determines citizenship by parentage. Children of Turkish ''guest
workers'' born in Germany, though they may be educated in German schools and
speak fluent German, are not considered German and can be expelled at any time.
Britain, too, has recently tightened its definition of nationality to limit the
number of Hong Kong Chinese and other holders of British passports taking up
residence in Britain.

Even if all illegal immigration could be cut off, the long-term prospects for
controlling the tide are not good, in the view of many experts. This is because
the law encourages what might be called ''chain migration,'' whereby immigrants
who have established residence, as would many under the amnesty provision, can
bring in their relatives.

What has made this influx all the more apparent is that it comes at a time when
American fertility is nearly as low as it has ever been, 50 percent below the
peak of the baby boom 25 years ago. This means that an increasing proportion of
American population growth, particularly in big cities, is coming not from
births but from in- migration. This is very rapidly changing the character of
places like Los Angeles and Miami, and some experts who welcome immigration
nonetheless feel that some cap on legal immigration might be needed lest a
growing backlash among native-born Americans results in more Draconian
restrictions.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of the border at El Paso

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              123 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 23, 1984, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

FARMERS RELIEVED OVER PROPOSAL FOR ALIEN WORKERS IN NEW BILL

BYLINE: By ROBERT LINDSEY

SECTION: Section 1; Page 6, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1250 words

DATELINE: FRESNO, Calif., June 21


In the fields and orchards of the Southwest, growers are letting out a muted
sigh of relief. Congress has taken a major step toward granting them something
that they had sought for 20 years, a new Federal program allowing them to import
foreign workers to harvest their crops.

Immigration legislation sponsored by Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of
Wyoming, and Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky, was
narrowly approved in the House Wednesday, with a temporary alien workers'
program added last week under pressure from agricultural interests.

Mickey George, whose family has tilled the fertile soil of California's
bountiful Central Valley for three generations, said, ''It's not a panacea by
any means for agriculture, but at least we'll have a program that provides
availability of workers for perishable crops, and that was our bottom line for
acceptance of Simpson-Mazzoli.''

'The Best We Could Get'


Another Central Valley farmer, Don Rosendahl, said the legislation might result
in higher costs to consumers for some fruits and vegetables. But he said, ''We
know that illegal immigration was getting out of hand, and the guest worker
program was probably the best we could get.''

The legislation approved would make it unlawful for employers to knowingly hire
illegal aliens, the dominant source of labor for many growers in Arizona, Texas
and California. The program growers pressed for, which was included in the House
legislation, would permit growers to import noncitizens temporarily to harvest
perishable crops on as little as three days' notice.

Although the Senate version does not provide for such a program, growers
expressed confidence that some form of it would survive a House-Senate
conference to work out differences in the two bills.

There are some indications that their optimism may be premature. Senator Simpson
has said he opposes any ''open-ended guest worker program'' in the law. As the
conference committee drafts the final language this summer it is likely to come
under heavy pressure from organized labor to delete or drastically weaken the
provision for importing alien workers.

'It's Really a Crap Shoot'


For all the satisfaction growers said they felt over having won inclusion of the
foreign worker plan in the House bill, farmers and farm labor experts
interviewed in California's prime agricultural area, said it was impossible to
predict the full impact of the legislation on agriculture and the prices
consumers would pay for their food.

''At this point, it's really a crap shoot,'' said Gary Johnston, a farm labor
specialist for the University of California, noting that much depended on what
the conference committee did and how the Federal Government decided to
administer the legislation.

One unanswered question, some analysts said, is whether there will, in fact, be
a substantial demand for foreign agricultural workers. Sweeping economic and
social changes have sometimes created a surplus of farm workers in recent years,
especially in California.

Farmers Relied on Immigrants


For generations, farmers in the Southwest have relied upon, and have often been
accused of exploiting, the cheap labor of successive generations of immigrants,
from Mexico and Central America, China, Japan, Yugoslavia, Portugal and Armenia,
as well as workers from states that were ravaged by the economic forces of the
Great Depression.

In 1942, faced with a wartime labor shortage, growers were allowed to import
thousands of Mexican field hands annually under a program that permitted them to
bring the laborers in as needed. Under pressure from organized labor, the
program was ended in 1964. The next year, Cesar Chavez began his drive to
unionize farm workers.

Although Mr. Chavez has managed since then to organize relatively few field
hands in California or any other state, the pressure to unionize has been
credited by Mr. Johnston and other researchers with having helped raise
California farm wages to a level more than 22 percent higher than the national
average. The average salary of California farm workers was $5.16 an hour in
1982.

With sales of almost $15 billion annually, California is the nation's largest
agricultural producer. It is estimated that at least half of its agricultural
field hands are illegal aliens, some of whom have been in this country many
years.

The loss of the Mexican workers and the rise in wages stimulated hurried efforts
by growers to develop labor-saving mechanical harvesters for many crops. This
has eliminated thousands of jobs since 1964 while increasing growers' needs for
a more stable, skilled labor force familiar with the new equipment.

Since 1979, California farm workers, including illegal aliens, have been
eligible for unemployment benefits in the off season as well as welfare
payments.

The availability of these benefits in the off season and the willingness of some
farmers to pay higher wages to keep a stable work force, according to
economists, have encouraged many farm workers to sink roots in the Central
Valley. Some have bought homes, drawn unemployment in the winter, and then at
harvest time commuted to local farm jobs instead of migrating from state to
state as their parents might have done.

In recent years there has been a surplus of farm labor in California, suggesting
that there might be little need for a new foreign worker plan.

In Imperial County near the Mexican border, Michael Wallman, manager of the
local Farm Bureau, said so many Mexicans commuted legally across the border,
drawing unemployment checks in the off season, that ''we have all the labor we
need without guest workers.'' A limited number of nonresident aliens are allowed
to work in the country.

''We have a city of 750,000 right next door'' in Mexico, he said.

Farm Workers Are Available


Here in the Central Valley and in farming areas farther to the North, many
growers concede they have sizable local labor forces that they can count on. But
they insist that if they are no longer able to hire illegal aliens under terms
of the immigration bill, they must have access in emergencies to foreign ''guest
workers'' on short notice because the cyclical nature of agriculture and
vagaries of the weather often produce a high demand for labor at peak periods.

''We have to be assured of a dependable supply of labor, especially for the
perishable labor-intensive crops,'' said George Lindemann, whose family will
begin harvesting some 4,000 acres of cantaloupes next week.

Roy Gabriel, an official of the California Farm Bureau, said: ''I don't think
the floodgates are automatically going to open and 5,000 guest workers are going
to come in, but some years you'll need them. It's insurance.''

Moreover, Mr. Johnson, the university researcher, pointed out, the immigration
bill could radically alter labor patterns in other ways now unforeseen. No one
knows, for example, he said, if the thousands of illegal aliens now working as
farm laborers would remain in agriculture if they are granted legal status as
the legislation would provide or whether they would move to the cities.
Conversely, he said, those now in the cities might be attracted by higher wages
in agriculture.

''For the first time ever,'' Mr. Johnson said, ''agriculture will have to be
compared with other industries. The Simpson-Mazzoli bill may be the biggest
challenge facing employers they've ever seen.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of farmer Mickey George

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              124 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 23, 1984, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

HISPANIC LEADER URGES A BOYCOTT OF CONVENTION'S FIRST VOTE

BYLINE: By JESUS RANGEL

SECTION: Section 1; Page 7, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 447 words

DATELINE: EL PASO, June 22


The president of the oldest and largest Hispanic rights group today urged
delegates to the Democratic National Convention to boycott the first-ballot vote
to protest a comprehensive immigration bill now before Congress and party rules
that he said discriminated against the Rev. Jesse Jackson.

The target of the move was Walter F. Mondale, the probable Presidential nominee,
who declined an invitation to appear before the group's 55th annual convention
here.

Standing beside Mr. Jackson, Mario Obledo, president of the League of United
Latin American Citizens, said Mr. Mondale was taking the Hispanic vote for
granted.

Mr. Obledo later predicted that members of the league would organize a boycott
against Mr. Mondale.

Mondale's Absence Noted


''His absence has raised the level of consciousness here,'' Mr. Obledo said.

The league said that Mr. Mondale had told them he was busy with other matters
when he declined their invitation. He has been interviewing prospective running
mates at his home in North Oaks. Minn.

Mr. Jackson has asserted that party rules discriminated against his candidacy
because under those rules he received a smaller proportion of convention
delegates than the percentage of popular votes he won as a candidate in
Presidential primaries.

Mr. Obledo and others here acknowledged that the request for a first-ballot
boycott was mostly symbolic because of the difficulty of persuading delegates
committed to Mr. Mondale to sit out the vote.

Ruben Bonilla, a past president of the league, said that while the attempt may
be futile, the league's delegates felt they had to send a message to the former
Vice President.

The effort underscored a high level of anger and frustration among the
approximately 2,000 delegates here because of Mr. Mondale's absence, which
delegates said they considered a snub. They were also protesting the passage of
the immigration bill Wednesday by the House of Representatives in a 216- to-211
vote.

A similar bill was passed by the Senate last year. A Senate-House conference is
scheduled to work out compromise legislation.

The bill passed by the House seeks to control illegal immigration by granting
amnesty to aliens who entered the country before 1982 and penalizing employers
who hire illegal aliens. The bill would also allow farmers to bring in foreign
workers for seasonal work.

Hispanic groups contend the proposed law would lead to discrimination against
Hispanic people and other minorities.

Mr. Bonilla called the passage of the bill ''the overriding political issue'' at
the convention. ''It was the Democrats who were responsible for the bill's
passage,'' he said.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              125 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 22, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

SECTION: Section A; Page 26, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 466 words


Still 50-50 on Immigration? For about 15 minutes, the movie ''Moscow on the
Hudson'' turns profoundly funny. A Soviet musician has just defected in New York
City, in Bloomingdale's, and who teaches him about life in this country? A young
woman sales clerk, recently arrived from Italy. A cab driver from Korea. A bus
passenger who's Iranian. A woman shopper who's Japanese. It's the modern melting
pot, barely an exaggeration of what's happened since the last immigration law
reform, in 1965.

By narrowly passing the Simpson-Mazzoli immigration bill Wednesday, the House of
Representatives took a momentous step toward protecting the melting pot. The
bill would strengthen the country's ability to protect its borders - and that,
in turn, would guard against the rising swell of pinched, exclusionist sentiment
against all immigrants, legal or not. But it's still too early to cheer.


A week ago, one of the bill's strongest supporters estimated warily that its
chances were ''no better than 50-50.'' He turned out to be uncomfortably close.
The House vote was 216 to 211. In percentage terms, that's 50.6 to 49.4, and the
bill isn't yet finally approved. There are notable differences between the House
bill and the version easily passed by the Senate. Reconciling them in a
conference isn't likely to be difficult, but then both houses must endorse the
result.  It's far from sure that the House, after narrowly voting yes once, will
do so again. The conferees are unlikely to finish until after the Democratic
Convention, where the Presidential candidates might continue their thirsty
courting of Hispanic favor by flailing at the bill some more.  Through all this
time, there will be abundant questions raised about Simpson-Mazzoli's
effectiveness. One of its provisions is amnesty for illegal aliens who have been
here for years. Amnesty acknowledges that they entered during a time when the
nation's border enforcement policy was a sham, a Big Wink. Yet if offered legal
status, will such aliens dare to come forward from the shadows and actually
claim it?  As to enforcement, will the Immigration Service be able to manage the
bill's strong new provisions? These would impose a heavy statistical burden on
the service, the same service that in the wake of the Iran hostage crisis was
unable to tell how many Iranian students there are in this country, even after
spending $3 million.  The outlook for making Simpson-Mazzoli work is promising.
The Immigration Service began to prepare for a possible legalization months ago
with a sensitive and wide-ranging program. It is adding enforcement personnel
and installling new statistical systems. The chances are good that Simpson-
Mazzoli can be made as effective as it is necessary. If the House vote stands.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: editorial

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              126 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 22, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

FINAL ACTION ON ALIEN BILL DOUBTED BEFORE RECESS

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1022 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 21


Supporters of a comprehensive immigration bill said today that they wanted swift
action to resolve differences between the House and Senate but that they did not
expect final action before next month's Democratic National Convention.

The House approved the legislation Wednesday by a vote of 216 to 211, after an
impassioned debate spanning seven days. The main purpose of the bill is to
curtail the flow of illegal aliens into the United States. The Senate approved a
similar bill in May 1983 by a vote of 76 to 18.

Hispanic groups plan demonstrations against the bill at the Democratic
convention in San Francisco July 16-19, and Hispanic leaders said they would
urge the party to take a strong stand against the bill if it had not become law
by then.

Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky, the chief sponsor of the
House bill, said he felt sure that House and Senate negotiators could achieve a
compromise, but not before the Congressional recess scheduled to begin on Friday
of next week.

''I don't think there is much chance,'' he said, noting that House and Senate

Crime is a growing problem among illegal aliens, who are victims of their
status. Page A10.

conferees had not yet been appointed. ''It would be very hard for me to see this
being pulled off by next week.'' Other members of Congress agreed with his
assessment, but conventional views on this bill have often been wrong. Congress
is scheduled to reconvene July 23, after the Democratic convention.

Officials of the Justice Department and the Immigration and Naturalization
Service met today to refine plans for two big tasks they would have under the
bill: Offering legal status to perhaps two million illegal aliens and enforcing
a prohibition on employment of illegal aliens.

Verne Jervis, spokesman for the immigration service, said officials knew that
some aliens would present counterfeit documents in applying for jobs and in
seeking amnesty. But he said the Government did not expect such document fraud
to be a ''huge problem.''

''We won't make an attempt to have employers judge the authenticity of
documents, but when they see something that is obviously phony, they'll take
action based on their own judgment,'' he added. ''They are likely to refrain
from hiring the person.''

Under the House bill, an employer would be subject to a civil penalty of up to
$2,000 for each illegal alien whom he knowingly hired.

Employers would be required to ask all job applicants for identification
documents to verify that they were citizens or aliens authorized to work in the
United States. Acceptable documents include a United States passport or a
combination of a driver's license with a Social Security card or birth
certificate. The Senate bill contains similar requirements.  Senator Alan K.
Simpson, Republican of Wyoming, the chief sponsor of the Senate bill, said he
hoped members of the two houses could start negotiations on a compromise before
the recess begins. He and Mr. Mazzoli said they expected the legislation to go
to a conference committee, where differences between the House and Senate
versions could be quickly worked out. Both chambers would then have to vote
again on final passage.

Even if House and Senate negotiators were appointed this week, they would have
only five or six legislative days to come up with an agreement before the
recess.

A 'Rocky Road' Ahead


The House Speaker, Thomas P. O'Neill Jr., said he believed final approval of the
bill would not be automatic or easy. ''It's got a rocky road in front of it,''
the Massachusetts Democrat said today. ''It's got a long, tough road ahead of
it.''

Some supporters of the bill have said they hoped to see it signed by President
Reagan on the Fourth of July. Key members of Congress and their aides said that
the rapid action needed to meet such a deadline was possible, but unlikely.

It was not clear today whether the House and Senate negotiators would meet next
week before the recess starts. Mr. Simpson said he was eager for such a meeting.
Congressional aides said the likely Senate negotiators, besides Mr. Simpson,
were Strom Thurmond of South Carolina and Charles E. Grassley of Iowa, both
Republicans, and Edward M. Kennedy of Massachusetts and Joseph R. Biden Jr. of
Delaware, both Democrats.

Representative Bill Richardson, Democrat of New Mexico, a member of the
Congressional Hispanic Caucus who opposed the Simpson-Mazzoli bill, said debate
over the bill ''will become more politicized because there will be big
demonstrations at the Democratic convention.'' A Republican supporter of the
bill said he feared the convention would be ''a forum for demagoguery'' on the
bill.

One of the key points to be resolved by House and Senate negotiators is the
eligibility date for the amnesty proposed for many illegal aliens already in
this country. Another question is how to meet the needs of farmers in Western
states who have, for many years, employed illegal aliens as seasonal workers to
harvest fruits and vegetables.

The Senate bill would offer legal status to aliens who have resided continuously
in this country since Jan. 1, 1980. The House bill would offer legal status to
those who have lived here continuously since Jan. 1, 1982.

The House bill, unlike its Senate counterpart, would create a special program to
permit farmers to bring aliens into the United States for seasonal work. Mr.
Simpson said this provision of the House bill was ''vexatious.'' He said he
believed there should be ''no open-ended guest worker program.''

As a compromise, he suggested that farmers might be given more time to comply
with the ban on hiring illegal aliens. The House and Senate bills create a
transition program, under which farmers may continue using illegal aliens if
they gradually reduce the number of such workers over a three- year period. Mr.
Simpson said the transition period might be extended by two years, to a total of
five years. Alternatively, he said, Congress might set a limit on the number of
aliens who could be brought into the country each year for farm work.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              127 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 22, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

SECTION: Section B; Page 1, Column 6; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 34 words


A House roll-call listing by The Associated Press in some editions yesterday, on
the immigration bill, misstated the vote of Representative Marty Russo, Democrat
of Illinois. He voted for the bill.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              128 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 21, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

FOR BETTER OR FOR WORSE, LAW WILL AFFECT LIVES OF MILLIONS

BYLINE: By WAYNE KING, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 4; National Desk

LENGTH: 2326 words

DATELINE: HOUSTON, June 20


Twenty-nine- year-old Maria H. and her 27-year-old husband, a laborer in a plant
nursery, have been in the United States for four years, and they have four
children.

Two of the children were born here and are thus American citizens. The other two
were born in Mexico, before the couple came here on a temporary visa. It has
expired, so they, and the two Mexican-born children, are undocumented aliens,
or, in the common parlance, ''illegals.'' The youngest child, a citizen, is
perilously ill and the family is seeking further help for her even though that
exposes the family to deportation.

There are estimated to be 400,000 like Maria H.'s family in the Houston area,
and most of them go about their daily lives much as everyone else, but in
constant fear of discovery and deportation. There are probably six million such
immigrants in the United States trying to cope with these problems, which have
evolved as a result of years of virtually uncontrolled illegal immigration.



Bill Focuses on Them


The problems of such immigrants and the response of government at all levels
have been the focus of the immigration reform bill as it has gone through
Congress.  Both critics and backers of the various forms of the bill, even as
the House voted today on its version, ask how much it will cost, whom it will
affect and ultimately whether it can be enforced. The bill, designed over four
administrations to impose some order on what President Reagan has termed a
chaotic situation, will have wide and varying effects on the immigrant millions.
There will also be an impact on United States taxpayers, on the employed and the
unemployed.  Organized labor has withdrawn its support because of the bill's
greatly expanded program to provide immigrant farm laborers; Hispanic leaders
condemn the program as ''slave labor''; there is substantial disagreement over
the cutoff date for granting amnesty. Doubts on enforcement arise because bogus
documentation is easily available; liberals and conservatives are loath to
establish ''a national identity card,'' with its overtones of a police state.

A different version of the immigration bill passed the Senate last year, and
some important differences must be reconciled before a bill can go to the
President.

Maria H. and her family illustrate one question. They came here four years ago,
in 1980, but after January of that year. In the Senate version of the bill, they
would not be eligible for amnesty and would be forced to leave this country or
remain illegal.

The House version, however, establishes January 1982 as the anmesty date. Under
that version, the family would be eligible to apply for resident status, and
because they have been here continuously, with the worker employed at the same
job the entire time, their chances of winning resident status are good.

But the House version provides that even those granted amnesty will not be
eligible for Government cash benefit programs, which Maria H.'s family needs for
the infant.

While the immigration bill will clear the shadow of deportation for millions
already in this country, it will create other problems.

Illegal aliens have formed a constantly rising tide for a decade, with captures
on the United States side of the border last year alone reaching over a million.


Wide Arc of Estimates


Estimates of the number of illegal aliens living here vary from 3 million to 12
million. But most authorities consider 6 million a working figure. The
immigrants come from scores of countries, the ''boat people'' from Haiti,
stowaways fleeing Poland, Asians who come on visas and stay on when they expire.

Most ''illegals'' are Hispanic, and more than half of all illegal immigrants are
Mexican, according to Government statistics. Some, like the Guatemalans and
Salvadorans - some estimates say 50,000 to 100,000 are in Houston alone - come
fleeing gunfire. Others, like the thousands who, unimpeded, cross the border
from Mexico every day, come seeking a better life than can be achieved in a
country with a shattered currency, staggering unemployment and wages at best of
a dollar a day.

The majority of those simply wade across the narrow Rio Grande, or slip
unnoticed through remote areas of the desert, often in daylight.

At popular crossing spots such as El Paso, strong men do a brisk business
carrying people across the shallow river. Others, particularly those hoping to
get to Houston, Denver, Los Angeles or Chicago, will hire a professional
smuggler, a ''coyote.''

Until exposure 18 months ago, companies in Texas, Florida, Illinois and Oklahoma
routinely placed orders with a Mexican-born agent who, sometimes under guard,
procured as many as 5,000 illegal workers a year at prices of $350 to $730 each
for work at low wages.

Many Do Not Remain


By no means all of those who cross the border illegally come to stay. The United
States Border Patrol, the chief enforcement arm of the Immigration Service, has
observed that tens of thousands come to work for a day or a week and return to
their homes on the other side.

One middle-aged Mexican who gave her name as Laguna Secorra, interviewed just
before she was carried across the Rio Grande at El Paso a few months ago,
acknowledged that she had crossed the river twice a day, five days a week, for
15 years, to work as a maid for a woman in El Paso.

Unless she is ultimately caught in the tighter net that the Border Patrol will
spread after the new law goes into effect, a prospect even the border guards
concede is not certain, the law will have little or no effect on her.

She has crossed successfully for years in daylight at El Paso; the Border Patrol
reports that 60 percent of the million aliens apprehended in the last fiscal
year were caught along only two border sectors: Chula Vista, Calif., and El
Paso.

Her Employer Would Not Pay


The fines proposed by the bill do not apply to employers of fewer than three
illegal immigrants. It is thus likely that tens of thousands of domestic workers
and gardeners will remain in Houston as they are today, uncounted, invisible.

''There is still enticement to come to the United States illegally,'' said Ruben
Bonilla Jr., an immigration lawyer who is a member of the Texas Governor's Task
Force on Immigration. ''We are sending mixed messages. We want workers in
service to the rich, maids and busboys, but otherwise they are not welcome.

''The flow of illegals will continue. For one thing the pressures inside Mexico
are great. This legislation is being debated with the premise that our laws will
be understood in Mexico. Are Mexican laws understood by Americans? The magnet of
America will remain strong regardless of the legislation.''

Huge numbers who make the border crossing, particularly those from El Salvador
and Guatemala, come to stay. Increasingly, immigration statistics confirm, so do
those who come from Mexico.

75% Appear to Find Work


The large majority, 75 percent or more, according to most studies, do find work
of some kind. Then the undocumented workers melt into a covert society. They are
officially invisible, but their impact on their surroundings is enormous.

It is estimated that up to half the citrus and field crops in Texas and southern
California are harvested by illegal immigrants. The low wages and lack of
benefits undercut legitimate wage scales but mean cheaper produce.

A year ago, half the children born in four public hospitals in Los Angeles
County were born to illegal alien mothers; this year the figure is close to two-
thirds.

In Houston, the Harris County Hospital District, which administers 3 hospitals
and 10 clinics, recently asked each patient applying for treatment whether he or
she was a citizen. One out of 10 answered no, and the hospital estimated the
annual cost to taxpayers at $3.5 million to $4 million, out of a budget of $193
million.

Boon to Their Employers Seen


A recent analysis by a Rice University economics professor estimated that
nonpayment of taxes by employers hiring illegal immigrants amounted to $11
billion a year, and that all told $18 billion a year was ''being siphoned off
into the pockets of greedy employers'' through failure to pay taxes and provide
benefits and through payment of substandard wages.

The professor, Dr. Donald L. Huddle, has also maintained that for every 100
illegal immigrants employed in this country, 65 American workers were displaced.
The resulting cost in terms of unemployment benefits paid to the displaced
American workers, he says, is $18 billion a year.

Hispanic organizations dispute Dr. Huddle's finding, contending that the great
majority of the illegal immigrants take low-paying jobs American citizens will
not do for comparable wages, and thus few willing Americans are actually bumped
from the job market.

This is impossible to verify or reject. Because employers are not now required
to determine the citizenship of an employee, there is little hard information on
the kinds of jobs illegal immigrants take, how much they are paid and how many
workers they displace.

But what data are available indicate that a substantial number of Americans are
displaced, and that while wage exploitation is rampant, by no means are all
wages so low that Americans would sniff at them.

U.S. Checked the Wages


In a six-month period ending last March, for example, the Immigration and
Naturalization Service recorded the wages of 72,430 working illegal aliens they
apprehended.

Of those, 14 percent made less than the minimum wage of $3.35 an hour.
Fifty-eight percent earned $3.35 to $4.25 an hour, 17 percent $4.25 to $5.25 an
hour, and 11 percent earned more than $5.25 an hour, mostly in light industry
and construction.

Dr. Huddle estimated that a third of the commercial-construction jobs in Houston
were held by illegal immigrants at above the minimum wage.

At the same time, there seems to be little question that some jobs are created
by the availability of workers willing work for low wages. A study prepared for
the nonprofit Urban Institute in Washington by Thomas Muller, an economist,
concluded that ''perhaps 52,000 low-wage jobs in highly competitive
manufacturing industries would not exist if Mexicans were not present.''

In his study ''The Fourth Wave,'' Dr. Muller concludes, in contrast with some
other studies, that the typical immigrant family of Mexican origin in Los
Angeles, two-thirds of whom are illegal, absorbs $2,199 more in public services
than it pays in taxes.

At the same time, the Social Security Administration has found that three-
quarters of working illegal immigrants pay Social Security taxes, some inventing
numbers to avoid arousing suspicion, but far fewer ever collect, creating a net
gain for the Social Security Adminstration.

Maria H.'s family and their problem are tangled in these statistics, and they
agreed to discuss their case provided they would not be identified because of
the fear of deportation. The threat of exposure has been a constant, nagging
worry and now it is almost palpable threat because of the illness of the
youngest child.

A Child Who Does Not Cry

Lying in her crib in the little house festooned with religious icons and the
flag of Mexico, the new baby wrinkles her face as babies do, and opens her mouth
to cry. But there is no sound.

The child was born with paralyzed vocal cords and a respiratory problem that
requires continuous care and visits by trained nurses.

The bills are now close to the $30,000 ceiling in the husband's employee medical
insurance policy, so he took a desperate gamble: He applied for Social Security
disability benefits.

He used the valid number he held from the time his work permit was valid, but
now the couple live in fear they will be discovered and sent back.

What that would mean to the request for medical help for the baby is unclear.
Because the husband holds a Social Security card and deductions have continued,
it is possible medical assistance may be granted.

Money With No Numbers


Other immigrants who pay into Social Security will in no case collect. A rice
farmer south of Houston who has employed 6 to 10 illegal workers for nine years
makes it a point to calculate and send in Social Security taxes, though none of
the workers has a card. ''I keep sending it in, and they keep sending back a
letter asking for the numbers, and I just throw it away,'' he said.

Similarly, income taxes are withheld from the wages of most illegal workers, but
they never file for their refunds. The Internal Revenue Service thus reaps a
windfall.

Dr. Muller's study found that while recent Mexican and other immigrants, half of
them illegal, absorbed fully two- thirds of all the 644,000 jobs added in Los
Angeles County from 1970 to 1980, their presence did not cause unemployment to
rise among non-Hispanic minority group members.

New Jobs Covered the Gap


That is because the booming southern California economy created enough new jobs.

Demographers project that this might be the case nationally at least until the
end of the century: more jobs will be created than the American work force can
fill, particularly in the service fields, and the shortfall could logically be
filled by continued immigration.

At the same time, the immigration bill attempts to regulate and control the flow
of immigrants, including a provision for increased quotas of temporary farm
workers according to need, to be determined by application from growers.

Theoretically, the farm workers will return to Mexico when the season is over,
but critics of the program ask what would keep them from staying.

Further, critics of the immigration bill in the form approved by the House
maintain that it is likely to be unenforceable without development of a
''counterfeit-proof'' method of proving a person's status.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of illegal aliens (page D22)

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              129 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 21, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

HOUSE, BY 216-211, APPROVES ALIENS BILL AFTER RETAINING AMNESTY PLAN IN FINAL
TEST

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 5; National Desk

LENGTH: 1483 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 20


Capping a week of bitter debate, the House of Representatives today approved by
a five-vote margin a comprehensive immigration bill designed to stem the flow of
illegal aliens into this country. The final vote was 216 to 211.

The landmark bill, which represents the most significant change in the law
regarding aliens in more than three decades, would prohibit the employment of
illegal aliens and offer legal status to illegal aliens who can show that they
have have been living in the United States since January 1982.

The measure now is to go to conference with the Senate, which has passed a
similar bill twice before by margins of more than 4 to 1. President Reagan, who
last week said at a news conference that the nation had lost ''control of its
borders,'' has been a strong advocate of stemming the flow of illegal aliens.



Reconciliation Efforts


The Senate bill was introduced by Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of
Wyoming, who worked with Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky,
to devise legislation acceptable to both houses.

The narrow margin today reflected deep divisions within the House, which had
become evident in impassioned debate over the last seven days. Democrats opposed
the bill by a margin of 138 to 125. Ninety-one Republicans voted for the bill
and 73 voted against it, even though the Administration had urged all House
members to support the legislation.

The 15-minute roll-call vote teetered back and forth, with negative votes as
recorded on an electronic tote board exceeding ayes for much of the first 10
minutes. For a few seconds, the tally was tied with 210 votes on either side.



Close Vote Stuns Many


Most Congressmen were stunned by the closeness of the vote, and clustered in the
aisles of the House watching the totals mount slowly on the electronic
toteboards above the floor. At one point, when it looked as though the vote
might end in a tie, members pointed at Speaker Thomas P. O'Neill Jr., seated in
his massive chair, and joked that he might have to cast the deciding vote.

The Speaker generally only votes in case of a tie, and voting today would have
placed him in a tough position. The Speaker has been distinctly cool to the
bill, but would not like to be known as the man who killed it.

The affirmative side finally edged ahead when Representative William Thomas, a
conservative Republican from California, changed his vote from ''present'' to
''aye.'' Several other waverers followed suit and the margin widened slightly,
but there was little cheering from the floor. All the members knew they had cast
a difficult and potentially troublesome vote.

House Democratic leaders did not put pressure on Democratic members to vote for
or against the bill. The strength of opposition reflected, in part, a switch in
the position of the American Federation of Labor and Congress of Industrial
Organizations, which initially supported the bill but opposed it this week as a
result of amendments adopted during floor debate.

The chief sponsor of the House bill, Mr. Mazzoli, said he was surprised by the
number of negative votes.  ''I hoped we'd have a decent margin,'' he said in an
interview.  ''The dynamics of this bill defy rational analysis.''

Disappointment and Approval


Commenting on today's action, Representative Bill Richardson, Democrat of New
Mexico, a member of the Congressional Hispanic Caucus, said: ''It's a sad day
for Hispanics and for anyone who is brown or black or yellow. The American
people want immigration reform. I didn't have an alternative I could propose
that was any better.''

Attorney General William French Smith, voicing Administration reaction, said,
''We are very pleased that the House has today finally acted on immigration
legislation,'' and added: ''Although the bill passed by the House today contains
many excellent provisions, including many for which this Administration has long
worked, some of its features require substantial change. We remain confident
however that a House-Senate conference will make the neccesary changes.''

Earlier today, the House rejected a bid to eliminate provisions of the bill that
offer legal status, or amnesty, to illegal aliens. The proposal to delete the
amnesty was defeated by a vote of 233 to 195, with a majority of House
Republicans voting to eliminate the amnesty.

Most Significant Changes


The legislation would make the most significant changes in the law regarding
aliens since passage of the Immigration and Nationality Act of 1952.

Immigration experts on both sides of the Capitol said today that they expected
no major problems in negotiating a resolution of the differences between the
House and Senate versions of the Simpson-Mazzoli legislation.

Verne Jervis, a spokesman for the Immigration and Naturalization Service, said
today that the agency was prepared to conduct an information and education
campaign to help employers understand the new ban on hiring illegal aliens.

In addition, the immigration service has been working for more than a year with
private nonprofit groups and religious organizations, especially the Roman
Catholic Church, to prepare for the legalization of illegal aliens.

The basic bill was strongly supported by the Reagan Administration and resembles
proposals made by President Carter and by the Select Commission on Immigration
and Refugee Policy, a bipartisan advisory group that issued its report in early
1981.

The bill was opposed by Hispanic groups and Hispanic members of Congress, who
said that employers, to avoid penalties for hiring illegal aliens, would be
reluctant to hire people with dark skin or a foreign accent. Supporters of the
bill insisted that it contained safeguards to prevent such discrimination.

In defending the bill's amnesty program, Mr. Mazzoli noted that it had the
support of President Reagan and Attorney General Smith.  In a letter to House
members this week Mr. Smith said, ''A fair legalization program is the only
humane and practical response to the existence of millions of illegal aliens in
this country.''

How Amnesty Program Works

The amnesty program in the House bill is the one proposed by Representative Jim
Wright, Democrat of Texas, the majority leader. Illegal aliens who have lived in
this country since Jan. 1, 1982, could become legal ''temporary residents'' and
then, after two years in that status, could become lawful permanent residents.

In order to gain permanent resident status, the aliens would have to show that
they were studying to achieve a ''minimal understanding'' of English and of the
history and government of the United States. Aliens could offer rent receipts,
paycheck stubs or other documents to establish that they had been living in the
United States since 1982.

The terms of the amnesty in the Senate bill are more restrictive, offering legal
status to illegal aliens who arrived in the United States before Jan. 1, 1980,
and have lived here continuously since that date.

In the final vote on passage of the bill, the New York delegation was evenly
divided, with 17 members for and 17 against. In the Connecticut delegation, two
members voted for the bill and four opposed it. The New Jersey delegation was
split, with six for and seven against the bill on the final vote.

The Texas delegation was overwhelmingly against the bill, by a margin of 23 to
3. California members also opposed the bill, by a margin of 33 to 12. However,
in Florida, the state that absorbed an influx of 125,000 Cubans in 1980, there
was strong support for the bill. Seventeen Florida members voted for it while
two opposed it.

The three remaining Democratic Presidential candidates all oppose the bill, and
Hispanic leaders said they would urge the party to take a strong stand against
the legislation if it has not been finally approved by the time of the
Democratic National Convention.

Special Program for Harvests

The House bill, unlike its Senate counterpart, would create a special program to
permit farmers to bring aliens into the United States for seasonal work
harvesting fruits and vegetables.

Under the House bill, the Government could impose fines on employers who
knowingly hire illegal aliens. The first violation would bring only a warning,
or citation, but in a second offense the employer would be subject to a civil
penalty of $1,000 for each illegal alien hired. For subsequent offenses, there
would be a civil penalty of $2,000 for each illegal alien hired.

The Senate bill authorizes civil penalties up to $2,000, as well as a criminal
penalty of six months in prison and a $1,000 fine for an employer who shows a
''pattern or practice'' of violations.

Representative Dan Lungren, Republican of California, and Mr. Mazzoli, on the
Democratic side, supervised debate on the bill.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of RepresentativeRomano L. Mazzoli and Dan Lungren

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              130 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 21, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

BILL SPLITS LAWMAKERS FROM NEW YORK AREA

BYLINE: By JANE PERLEZ

SECTION: Section D; Page 21, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 729 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 20


Representative Major R. Owens of Brooklyn, one of three black members of the New
York Congressional delegation and a vigorous opponent of the immigration bill
that was narrowly approved by the House today, told his colleagues during the
debate that he was often mistaken for a West Indian.

That mistake, said Mr. Owens, who was born in Memphis, illustrated what he
feared most about the bill. He said he believed it would foster hasty and
discriminatory judgments against blacks and other minorities by employers
worried about hiring illegal aliens.

However, Stephen J. Solarz, a Democrat who represents another Brooklyn district
a few miles from Mr. Owens's, felt differently. Mr. Solarz's district, unlike
Mr. Owens's, has relatively few illegal aliens, Mr. Solarz said. While Mr.
Solarz said he was not responding to pressure from his constituents, he endorsed
the bill.

The immigration bill split the New York and New Jersey delegations, and to a
lesser extent the Connecticut members, as have few other recent issues. Many
members said it was the most difficult decision they could remember making.

Uncertainty for Schumer

Representative Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of Brooklyn, who usually knows his
mind, said he was still unsure as he walked into the chamber to cast his vote.
He finally voted for the bill.

The bill calls for penalties against employers who hire illegal aliens, and
provides for amnesty for those who came to the United States before Jan. 1,
1982. The Senate has already passed a version of the bill. The differences now
have be resolved.

For New York City and New Jersey there were sizable financial interests in the
bill, which in the end were resolved satisfactorally for them, officials said.
City officials say there are about 750,000 illegal aliens in the five boroughs.
New Jersey officials estimate there are about 300,000 illegal aliens in the
state. According to Representative Bruce A. Morrison, Democrat of New Haven,
Connecticut has about 10,000.

Mayor Koch and Governor Kean, who both endorsed the bill, have lobbied for
Federal reimbursement to states and cities for the cost of providing public
assistance, such as welfare and hospital care, to aliens with legal status. The
bill would disqualify legalized aliens from receiving Federal benefits,
including food stamps and Medicaid, for five years.

Prison Costs a Question

Under the House bill, states and cities would receive Federal reimbursement for
these costs, which New York City estimates could be $60 million a year for the
city. But the bill provides no exact figures. The Senate version does not
require hat states and localities be reimbursed for the full cost of services
they provide.

Another matter of concern to the city and New York State is Federal assumption
of the cost of keeping illegal aliens in prison. The city said that it was
saddled with about 100 such prisoners a day charged with various crimes. There
were an estimated 600 illegal aliens in state prisons in April, according to Jay
Michaud, a lobbyist for the city here. Just before final passage, Mr. Schumer
won an amendment that would require the Federal Government, at a cost estimated
at $26 million a year, to reimburse prison costs.

Some of the votes cast were surprising. Although many liberal Democrats opposed
the bill, Representative Robert G. Torricelli, Democrat of Hackensack, who likes
to call himself a progressive and whose grandparents came from Sicily in 1918,
strongly supported the measure.

Mr. Torricelli said that he was tired of funds being spent on education for
illegal immigrants while not enough was being devoted to the schooling of
American children.

Another opponent of the bill, Representative Robert Garcia, Democrat of the
Bronx and chairman of the Hispanic Caucus in the House, railed against it. One
of his chief objections, he said, was the specter of discrimination against
blacks and Hispanic people by employers.

Representative Charles B. Rangel, Democrat of Manhattan, never really doubted
that he would vote against the bill, but he said, ''It's one of the most
difficult decisions I've ever had to face.''

Representative Geraldine A. Ferraro, Democrat of Queens and chairman of the
Democratic Platform Committee, voted against the bill, saying that it was the
wrong bill at the wrong time.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              131 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 21, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

ROLL-CALL VOTE IN HOUSE ON BILL TO REVISE IMMIGRATION LAWS

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section D; Page 21, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 1469 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 20


Following is the 216-to-211 roll-call vote today by which the House passed the
immigration bill. A ''yes'' vote is for the bill; a ''no'' vote is against the
bill; xxx denotes those not voting. Voting yes were 125 Democrats and 91
Republicans. Voting no were 138 Democrats and 73 Republicans.  There is one
vacancy in the 435-member House.

ALABAMA

Democrats - Bevill, no; Erdreich, no; Flippo, no; Nichols, no; Shelby, no.

Republicans - Dickinson, no; Edwards, yes.

ALASKA

Republican - Young, no.

ARIZONA

Democrats - McNulty, no; Udall, no.

Republicans - McCain, no; Rudd, no; Stump, no.

ARKANSAS

Democrats - Alexander, yes; Anthony, yes.

Republicans - Bethune, no; Hammerschmidt, yes.

CALIFORNIA

Democrats - Anderson, no; Bates, yes; Beilenson, yes; Berman, no; Bosco, no;
Boxer, no; Brown, no; Burton, no; Coelho, no; Dellums, no; Dixon, no; Dymally,
no; Edwards, no; Fazio, no; Hawkins, no; Lantos, no; Lehman, no; Levine, no;
Martinez, no; Matsui, no; Miller, no; Mineta, no; Panetta, yes; Patterson, no;
Roybal, no; Stark, yes; Torres, no; Waxman, no.

Republicans - Badham, yes; Chappie, no; Dannemeyer, yes; Dreier, no; Fiedler,
no; Hunter, no; Lagomarsino, no; Lewis, no; Lowery, yes; Lungren, yes;
McCandless, yes; Moorhead, yes; Packard, yes; Pashayan, no; Shumway, no; Thomas,
yes; Zschau, no.

COLORADO

Democrats - Kogovsek, no; Schroeder, no, Wirth, no.

Republicans - Brown, no; Kramer, no; Schaefer, yes.

CONNECTICUT

Democrats - Gejdenson, no; Kennelly, no; Morrison, no; Ratchford, no.

Republicans - Johnson, yes; McKinney, yes.

DELAWARE

Democrat - Carper, yes.

FLORIDA

Democrats - Bennett, yes; Chappell, yes; Fascell, yes; Fuqua, yes; Gibbons, yes;
Hutto, yes; Ireland, yes; Lehman, yes; MacKay, yes; Mica, yes; Nelson, yes;
Pepper, yes; Smith, yes.

Republicans - Bilirakis, no; Lewis, yes; Mack, no; McCollum, yes; Shaw, yes;
Young, yes.

GEORGIA

Democrats - Barnard, no; Darden, no; Fowler, yes; Hatcher, no; Jenkins, no;
Levitas, yes; Ray, no; Rowland, no; Thomas, no.

Republican - Gingrich, yes.

HAWAII

Democrats - Akaka, no; Heftel, yes.

IDAHO

Republicans - Craig, no; Hansen, xxx.

ILLINOIS

Democrats - Annunzio, yes; Collins, no; Durbin, yes; Evans, no; Hayes, no;
Lipinski, yes; Price, yes; Rostenkowski, yes; Russo, no; Savage, no; Simon, no;
Yates, no.

Republicans - Corcoran, yes; D. Crane, no; P. Crane, no; Erlenborn, yes; Hyde,
yes; Madigan, yes; Martin, no; Michel, yes; O'Brien, yes; Porter, no.

INDIANA

Democrats - Hall, no; Hamilton, yes; Jacobs, no; McCloskey, yes; Sharp, yes.

Republicans - Burton, yes; Coats, yes; Hiler, yes; Hillis, no; Myers, yes.

IOWA

Democrats - Bedell, yes; Harkin, yes; Smith, yes.

Republicans - Evans, yes; Leach, yes; Tauke, yes.

KANSAS

Democrats - Glickman, yes; Slattery, yes.

Republicans - Roberts, no; Whittaker, yes; Winn, yes.



KENTUCKY

Democrats - Hubbard, no; Mazzoli, yes; Natcher, yes; Perkins, no.

Republicans - Hopkins, no; Rogers, no; Snyder, no.

LOUISIANA

Democrats - Boggs, yes; Breaux, yes; Huckaby, no; Long, yes; Roemer, no; Tauzin,
no.

Republicans - Livingston, yes; Moore, no.

MAINE

Republicans - McKernan, yes; Snowe, yes.

MARYLAND

Democrats - Barnes, yes; Byron, yes; Dyson, no; Hoyer, yes; Long, yes; Mikulski,
xxx; Mitchell, no.

Republican - Holt, yes.

MASSACHUSETTS

Democrats - Boland, yes; Donnelly, yes; Early, yes; Frank, yes; Markey, no;
Mavroules, yes; Moakley, yes; O'Neill, xxx (by tradition, the House speaker
seldom votes); Shannon, xxx; Studds, yes.

Republicans - Conte, yes.

MICHIGAN

Democrats - Albosta, no; Bonior, yes; Carr, no; Conyers, no; Crockett, no;
Dingell, yes; Ford, no; Herel, no; Kildee, no; Levin, yes; Traxler, yes; Wolpe,
no.

Republicans - Broomfield, no; Davis, yes; Pursell, no; Sawyer, yes; Siljander,
no; Vander Jagt, no.

MINNESOTA

Democrats - Oberstar, no; Penny, yes; Sabo, yes; Sikorski, no; Vento, no.

Republicans - Frenzel, yes; Stangeland, yes; Weber, yes.

MISSISSIPPI

Democrats - Dowdy, yes; Montgomery, yes; Whitten, yes.

Republicans - Franklin, yes; Lott, yes.

MISSOURI

Democrats - Clay, no; Gephardt, no; Skelton, no; Volkmer, no; Wheat, no; Young,
no.

Republicans - Coleman, no; Emerson, no; Taylor, yes.

MONTANA

Democrat - Williams, xxx.

Republican - Marlenee, no.

NEBRASKA

Republicans - Bereuter, yes; Daub, no; Smith, yes.

NEVADA

Democrat - Reid, no.

Republican - Vucanovich, yes.

NEW HAMPSHIRE

Democrat - D'Amours, yes.

Republican - Gregg, yes.

NEW JERSEY

Democrats - Dwyer, yes; Florio, no; Guarini, no; Howard, yes; Hughes, no;
Minish, no; Rodino, yes; Roe, yes; Torricelli, yes.

Republicans - Courter, no; Rinaldo, no; Roukema, no; Smith, yes.

NEW MEXICO

Democrat - Richardson, no.

Republicans - Lujan, no; Skeen, no.

NEW YORK

Democrats - Ackerman, no; Addabbo, no; Biaggi, no; Downey, yes; Ferraro, no;
Garcia, no; LaFalce, yes; Lundine, yes; McHugh, yes; Mrazek, yes; Nowak, yes;
Ottinger, yes; Owens, no; Rangel, no; Scheuer, yes; Schumer, yes; Solarz, yes;
Stratton, no; Towns, no; Weiss, no.

Republicans - Boehlert, yes; Carney, no; Conable, yes; Fish, yes; Gilman, yes;
Green, yes; Horton, no; Kemp, no; Lent, no; Martin, no; McGrath, no; Molinari,
yes; Solomon, no; Wortley, yes.

NORTH CAROLINA

Democrats - Andrews, yes; Britt, yes; Clarke, yes; Hefner, yes; Jones, no; Neal,
yes; Rose, yes; Valentine, yes; Whitley, yes.

Republicans - Broyhill, yes; Martin, yes.

NORTH DAKOTA

Democrat - Dorgan, yes.






OHIO

Democrats - Applegate, no; Eckart, yes; Feighan, yes; Hall, no; Kaptur, no;
Luken, yes; Oakar, no; Pease, yes; Seiberling, yes; Stokes, no.

Republicans - DeWine, yes; Gradison, yes; Kasich, yes; Kindness, no; Latta, no;
McEwen, yes; Miller, yes; Oxley, yes; Regula, no; Williams, no; Wylie, yes.

OKLAHOMA

Democrats - English, no; Jones, yes; McCurdy, yes; Synar, yes; Watkins, no.

Republican - Edwards, no.

OREGON

Democrats - AuCoin, no; Weaver, yes; Wyden, no.

Republicans - D. Smith, yes; R. Smith, no.

PENNSYLVANIA

Democrats - Borski, no; Coyne, yes; Edgar, no; Foglietta, no; Gaydos, no;
Goodling, no; Gray, no; Harrison, yes; Kolter, no; Kostmayer, yes; Murphy, no;
Murtha, yes; Shuster, no; Walgren, yes; Yatron, no.

Republicans - Clinger, yes; Coughlin, yes; Gekas, yes; McDade, yes; Ridge, yes;
Ritter, yes; Schulze, yes; Walker, yes.

RHODE ISLAND

Democrat - St Germain, yes.

Republican - Schneider, yes.

SOUTH CAROLINA

Democrats - Derrick, yes; Spratt, yes; Tallon, yes.

Republicans - Campbell, yes; Hartnett, no; Spence, no.

SOUTH DAKOTA

Democrat - Daschle, yes.

TENNESSEE

Democrats - Boner, yes; Cooper, yes; Ford, yes; Gore, yes; Jones, yes; Lloyd,
yes.

Republicans - Duncan, no; Quillen, yes; Sundquist, no.

TEXAS

Democrats - Andrews, no; Brooks, no; Bryant, no; Coleman, no; de la Garza, no;
Frost, no; Gonzalez, no; R. Hall, no; S. Hall, no; Hance, no; Hightower, no;
Kazen, no; Leath, no; Leland, xxx; Ortiz, no; Patman, no; Pickle, yes; Stenholm,
no; Vandergriff, no; Wilson, yes; Wright, yes.

Republicans - Archer, no; Bartlett, no; Fields, no; Gramm, no; Loeffler, no;
Paul, no.

UTAH

Republicans - Hansen, yes; Marriott, no; Nielson, yes.

VERMONT

Republican - Jeffords, yes.

VIRGINIA

Democrats - Boucher, yes; Daniel, no; Olin, no; Sisisky, yes.

Republicans - Bateman, yes; Bliley, no; Parris, no; Robinson, no; Whitehurst,
yes; Wolf, yes.

WASHINGTON

Democrats - Bonker, yes; Dicks, yes; Foley, yes; Lowry, no; Swift, no.

Republicans - Chandler, yes; Morrison, yes; Pritchard, yes.

WEST VIRGINIA

Democrats - Mollohan, no; Rahall, yes; Staggers, no; Wise, no.

WISCONSIN

Democrats - Aspin, yes; Kastenmeier, yes; Kleczka, yes; Moody, yes; Obey, yes.

Republicans - Gunderson, yes; Petri, yes; Roth, no; Sensenbrenner, xxx.

WYOMING

Republican - Cheney, yes.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: STATISTICS

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              132 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 21, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

TWO MEN WHO FASHIONED IMMIGRATION BILL AND LED IT THROUGH CONGRESS;
SENATOR ALAN SIMPSON'S INTERVENTION WITH O'NEILL LED TO HOUSE DEBATE

BYLINE: By MARTIN TOLCHIN

SECTION: Section D; Page 22, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 819 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 20


Senator Alan K. Simpson, a Wyoming Republican, sat in front of a bronze
sculpture of a cowboy on a bucking bronco and watched the House debate on a
television set that was on his office floor. The debate, on the immigration
bill, would probably not have occurred at all had he not interceded last winter
with the House Speaker, Thomas P. O'Neill Jr.

Mr. O'Neill, who had regarded the legislation as a no-win proposition without a
constituency, had blocked consideration of the bill by the full House last fall.

To Mr. Simpson, it seemed then that the immigration bill he had shepherded
through the Senate had reached the end of the line. In desperation, he sought
and obtained an audience with the Speaker. The Senator spoke of the nation's
need to control its borders and assured Mr. O'Neill that President Reagan had no
intention of embarrassing the House Democrats by vetoing the bill. In a
relatively rare occurrence, the Speaker reversed himself and restored the bill
to the House calendar.

''Tip saw I wasn't out trying to hose him,'' said Mr. Simpson, meaning that he
had no intention of trying to take advantage of the Speaker.  Mr. Simpson, a
tall, baldish, genial man, is regarded as a natural legislator by most of his
colleagues. He is a leading practitioner of the politics of consensus, which he
learned from his father, Milward Simpson, a former Governor of Wyoming who
preceded him to the Senate and who remains a close adviser. A candidate for
re-election, Mr. Simpson does not yet have a Democratic opponent.

If he stays in the Senate, many predict a leadership role for the 52-year old
freshman Senator, who is known for his candor and wit. In some respects, he is
in the mold of the Senate majority leader, Howard H. Baker Jr., Republican of
Tennessee, who will retire this year. Mr. Simpson, an unvarnished conservative,
is respected by his party's moderates and liberals. Like Mr. Baker, his politics
is low key, and he seldom allows it to interfere with his personal relationships
with his colleagues.

''Legislation is dry, tough stuff,'' the Senator said. ''It's fun if it's done
right, without cloying partisanship and trying to stick it to the other guy.''

List of Legislative Victories


As a freshman in the Senate, he has compiled a remarkable record of legislative
achievement. Mr. Simpson, chairman of the immigration subcommittee of the Senate
Judiciary Committee, is best known for his successful sponsorship of the
immigration bill that he worked out with Representative Romano L. Mazzoli,
Democrat of Kentucky, the House sponsor, and that bears both their names.

But Mr. Simpson has had other legislative victories. As chairman of the Veterans
Affairs Committee he won Senate approval for legislation that set up a mechanism
to weigh the claims of veterans exposed to the herbicide Agent Orange. As
chairman of the nuclear regulation subcommittee of Environment and Public Works
Committee, he sponsored successful legislation on disposal of nuclear wastes.

The ranking Democrats on his committees are Gary Hart of Colorado, on nuclear
regulation; Alan Cranston of California, on veterans; and Edward M. Kennedy of
Massachusetts, on immigration.

''I thought all three might run for President,'' Mr. Simpson recalled. ''I told
each of them, 'Don't use the committee for your Presidential quest, and I won't
use it to embarrass you in any way.'''

Mr. Kennedy, perhaps the Senate's preeminent liberal, praises Mr. Simpson for
responsive. However, he recalls that while working on the immigration bill ''I
differed with him on occasion.''

At one committee session, when Mr. Kennedy was became emotional in arguing
unsuccessfully against the elimination of an immigration preference for the
brothers and sisters of immigrants, he recalled that Mr. Simpson defused the
passion by leaning over and whispering, ''Now, don't get too excited, Ted.''

Showing His Temper


It was considered all the more remarkable, therefore, that Mr. Simpson lost his
temper in a celebrated Senate debate. It was just before midnight, four days
before Christmas and a week after a scheduled adjournment. Senator Jesse A.
Helms, a North Carolina Republican, was filibustering against a proposed
increase in the gasoline tax.

''Seldom have I seen in my legislative experience of 17 years or more, a more
obdurate and obnoxious performance,'' said Mr. Simpson, who had spent 12 years
in the Wyoming Legislature and had served as its majority leader.

Tempers cooled the following morning, when Mr. Simpson and Mr. Helms made a show
of shaking hands in the chamber. Mr. Helms abandoned his filibuster shortly
thereafter.

''Simpson broke the logjam with Helms,'' recalled an aide to the Senate
Republican leadership. ''The incident sent a signal that Alan Simpson carried a
lot more weight on the Senate floor than some people gave him credit for.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Senator Simpson and Representative Mazzoli

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              133 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 21, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

TWO MEN WHO FASHIONED IMMIGRATION BILL AND LED IT THROUGH CONGRESS;
ROMANO MAZZOLI DEVOTED FOUR YEARS OF QUIET, RELETNLESS WORK TO MEASURE

BYLINE: By STEVEN V. ROBERTS

SECTION: Section D; Page 22, Column 5; National Desk

LENGTH: 814 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 20


The ordeal was almost over and Representative Romano L. Mazzoli was all but
spent. ''I was at my mother's this weekend and I almost fell asleep into the
spaghetti,'' he said.

The Kentucky Democrat lost 12 pounds along with his sleep, and his face took on
a gaunt look. But he won a four-year battle in the House over altering the
nation's immigration laws when the House voted today to approve legislation that
Mr. Mazzoli and Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming, wrote. The
Senate passed a slightly different version last year.

''I'm going to carve a very modest role around this place,'' said Mr. Mazzoli, a
14-year veteran of the House who seems to believe in his own obscurity. ''But I
wanted to prove to the country and to the leadership that we could deal with an
emotionally laden and divisive subject in a way that brought credit to the
House.''

Immigration is one of the most emotional issues Congress ever considers, and the
Simpson-Mazzoli bill contains two sections that rankle large numbers of voters.
The House and Senate versions give legal status to aliens who came here
illegally but have been here for a number of years, and both impose penalties on
employers who knowingly hire illegal workers.

Assailed From Both Sides


Accordingly Mr. Mazzoli has been assailed from both sides and the 51- year-old
lawmaker jokes: ''I used to be 6 foot 7 until they kept pounding me down. Then I
became 5 foot 9.''

In an unusual tribute to the lawmaker some of his colleagues took the floor at
one late-night session to praise his stewardship of the bill. Representative
Abraham Kazen Jr., Democrat of Texas, said Mr. Mazzoli had taken criticism
''bordering on abuse,'' but in the end he ''has really withstood one of the
sternest tests'' ever faced by a Congressman.

The most common criticism of the bill is that it would cause employers to
discriminate against Hispanic and other foreign-looking workers.

''He doesn't understand the importance of the bill in the Hispanic community,''
said Representative Bill Richardson, Democrat of New Mexico whose mother was
born in Mexico. ''It's a blind spot with him, but an honest blind spot. He's a
very fair man.''

'A Conservative Guy'

A liberal Democrat on the Judiciary Committee added, ''Remember he's a
conservative guy. He votes with the Republicans as much as with the Democrats.''

Representative Don Edwards, Democrat of California, who opposed the bill, said
Mr. Mazzoli ''plays hardball'' when it comes to legislation but plays it well.
''He just very skillfully overcame all the roadblocks,'' Mr. Edwards said.

Mr. Mazzoli's father left Northern Italy 70 years ago and settled in Louisville
where he worked as a tile setter. The younger Mazzoli was first elected to
Congress by 211 votes and has had, by his own testimony, a ''constant struggle''
to keep his seat against Republican challengers.

He made few ripples in his first 10 years in the House and says of himself:
''Some people are flamboyant and some are not. I'm one of the are nots.'' But in
1980 Elizabeth Holtzman, the New York Democrat who headed the subcommittee on
Immigration, Refugees and International Law, left Congress to make an
unsuccessful run for the Senate.

Bill Blocked in House


As a result of this ''purely accidental'' development, Mr. Mazzoli inherited the
post and began what he calls his ''roller-coaster odyssey.'' The Simpson-Mazzoli
bill passed the Senate twice in the next three years but was repeatedly blocked
in the House when Hispanic groups convinced Thomas P. O'Neill Jr., the Speaker
of the House, that it would harm their constituents.

The three surviving Democratic Presidential contenders opposed the bill because
of its employer sanctions. The measure received another blow when Representative
Kent Hance, Democrat of Texas, almost won his party's Senatorial nomination by
attacking the bill's plan to legalize millions of aliens.

That race revealed the political pitfalls in the bill and Mr. Mazzoli says the
Hance campaign ''broke my heart.'' Indeed, Mr. Mazzoli's Republican foe this
year is attacking him for spending so much time trying to legalize undocumented
workers.

Speaker O'Neill eventually agreed that the House should debate the measure, but
the Speaker was so cool to the bill that the sponsor felt he was trying to
''kill it with apathy.'' Mr. Mazzoli was on his own and when the bill first came
to the floor last week the Kentuckian had so few allies he was constantly
scurrying around lobbying his colleagues to support his bill.

But after a day or two the House came to realize that the Simpson- Mazzoli bill
was going to pass. Four years of quiet but relentless effort were coming to a
climax.

''Mazzoli was enormously effective at building coalitions and getting votes,''
conceded Mr. Richardson. ''He whipped us good.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              134 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 21, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

The Immigration Bills: A Comparison

SECTION: Section D; Page 21, Column 4; National Desk

LENGTH: 712 words


Employer Sanctions HOUSE Requires employers of four or more persons to ask all
job applicants for documents to verify that they are citizens or aliens
authorized to work in the United States. Acceptable documents include United
States passport or a combination of driver's license with Social Security card
or birth certificate.  No requirement for study of or improvements in
identification system.  Requires Attorney General to establish a toll-free
telephone number that employers could call to validate Social Security numbers.
Employer would have a ''complete defense'' against charges of hiring illegal
aliens if he had validated their Social Security numbers.  After six-month
transition period, first offense is punishable by a citation or warning. For
second offense, there is a civil penalty of $1,000 for each illegal alien hired.
For third and subsequent offenses, there is a $2,000 civil penalty for each
illegal alien hired. No criminal penalties.  Forbids employers to discriminate
against United States citizens and legal aliens because of their national origin
or status as aliens.  Forbids immigration officers to enter farms or fields
without a search warrant or the owner's consent.  Increases criminal penalties
for anyone who brings aliens to the United States if the aliens do not have
''prior official authorization'' to enter this country or live here.  SENATE
Same.  Requires the President, after three years, to make such changes as ''may
be necessary to establish a secure system to determine employment eligibility in
the United States.'' No such requirement. After one-year transition period, the
Government may assess a civil penalty of $1,000 for each illegal alien hired by
an employer. Civil penalty for second offense is $2,000 for each illegal alien
hired. For a ''pattern or practice'' of violations, employer may be fined $1,000
and imprisoned six months.  Requires the President and the General Accounting
Office to study enforcement of the law to determine whether it results in
employment discrimination.  Same.  Has similar provision.  Settling Disputes
HOUSE Establishes the United States Immigration Board as an independent agency
in the Justice Department, to hear appeals from decisions by administrative law
judges.  SENATE Similar provision. But does not describe the Immigration Board
as an independent agency.  Money HOUSE SENATE Authorizes $200 million for the
fiscal year 1984 to carry out provisions of the legislation.  Legal Immigration
HOUSE SENATE Temporary Foreign Workers HOUSE Creates a three-year transition
program permitting farmers to adjust to the new law. They could employ their
usual number of illegal aliens the first year, 67 percent the second year and 33
percent the third year, with full compliance required after that.  SENATE
Similar provisions.  Amnesty HOUSE Aliens would be ineligible for most types of
Federal financial assistance in the five-year period starting with the day they
obtain legal status as temporary residents. Bill makes an exception for child
nutrition programs, assistance to the aged, blind and disabled, services to
pregnant women and emergency health services.  SENATE Aliens would be ineligible
for most types of Federal financial assistance during the time they are
temporary residents and for their first three years as lawful permanent
residents.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: STATISTICS

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              135 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               June 20, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

HOUSE BACKS PLAN LEGALIZING ALIENS IN U.S. BEFORE 1982

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 1403 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 19


The House of Representatives today tentatively approved a proposal that would
offer legal status to illegal aliens who have lived continuously in the United
States since Jan. 1, 1982.

The proposal was offered by Representative Jim Wright, Democrat of Texas, the
majority leader, as an amendment to a comprehensive immigration bill. The
proposal was approved this evening, 247 to 170.

Mr. Wright's proposal would permit illegal aliens to obtain legal status as
''temporary residents'' if they have lived here continuously since Jan. 1, 1982.



Permanent Status in Two Years


After two years, the temporary residents could become permanent residents if
they could demonstrate that they had achieved, or were pursuing studies to
achieve, a ''minimal understanding of ordinary English and a knowledge and
understanding of the history and government of the United States.''

After five years as permanent residents, aliens may apply for United States
citizenship.  One hundred nineteen Republicans and 128 Democrats voted for Mr.
Wright's amendment. Thirty-nine Republicans and 131 Democrats voted against it.

Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky, the chief sponsor of the
House bill, said: ''A bill without legalization is no bill at all. Without
legalization of some kind, the bill is not balanced.''



'The Precious Gift'

The bill does not specify how an alien would prove he had lived in the United
States for a specified period of time. But supporters of the bill said aliens
could offer rent receipts, paycheck stubs or other such documents that would
indicate they had been residing in the country. Critics of the amnesty said,
however, that such records could be obtained by fraud.

Mr. Wright said the English language requirement and other criteria in his
proposal would ''dignify the precious gift'' of permanent resident status.

''The applicant must demonstrate that he is employable, that he is not a felon
and that he is attempting to learn rudimentary English, so he or she can fully
participate in what our country ahs to offer,'' Mr. Wright said. ''I don't
believe we must homogenize America. I don't believe you have to obliterate the
cultural differences that give color to the rich fabric of American life. But I
don't think we want to create a temptation to balkanize American life. Language
is the thread, the common thread, that ties us all together.'' Today's vote was
tentative because the House is to have an opportunity to vote Wednesday on a
proposal eliminating all provisions of the bill that would offer legal status,
or amnesty, to illegal aliens. The eligibility criteria in Mr. Wright's
amendment were more stringent than those in the original bill approved by the
House Judiciary Committee, which would have given permanent resident status to
illegal aliens living here continuously since Jan. 1, 1982.On Mr. Wright's
amnesty amendment, 10 New York Representatives voted aye and 23 voted no. The
New Jersey delegation was split, with seven members supporting the amendment and
five opposing it. In the Connecticut delegation, two members voted for the
amendment and three against it.

By a vote of 245 to 181, the House today rejected a proposal that would have
moved the eligibility date to Jan. 1, 1980, the date specified in a bill passed
overwhelmingly by the Senate last year.

The amendment was proposed by Representative Dan Lungren, Republican of
California, and was supported by the Reagan Administration. Mr. Lungren
acknowledged that his proposal was less ''generous'' than the bill in its
treatment of illegal aliens.

Today's debate on amnesty indicated that it was, in the words of Representative
Kent Hance, Democrat of Texas, an ''explosive issue.'' Mr. Hance made a strong
but unsuccessful bid for his party's Senate nomination in Texas on the basis of
his opposition to the proposed amnesty.

Called a 'Jobs Issue'


Mr. Hance described amnesty as a ''jobs issue,'' and he warned that illegal
aliens who gained legal status would take jobs from American workers. ''If you
grant amnesty,'' he said, ''you are going to legalize the theft of American
jobs.''

He recalled the words of a constituent who told him, ''If undocumented workers
were taking jobs away from lawyers, bankers, doctors and Congressmen, it would
have been stopped a long time ago, and you wouldn't be granting amnesty.''

Representative Barney Frank, Democrat of Massachusetts, said the amnesty was an
essential corollary to another provision that would prohibit employers from
hiring illegal aliens. Without the amnesty, he said, the nation would have ''a
large class of potentially desperate people'' in its midst. He said aliens would
be here illegally, but could not work and could not support themselves, and many
probably could not be deported, because they would be so numerous.

Representative Peter W. Rodino Jr., Democrat of New Jersey and chairman of the
Judiciary Committee, defended the amnesty. He opposed the restrictions in the
Lungren amendment, saying they would consign many aliens to a state of ''legal
limbo.''

Like many Hispanic members of the House, Representative Robert Garcia. Democrat
of the Bronx, opposes the overall bill. But he supported the amnesty, saying:
''We are going to try to bring people out of the shadows. We are going to try to
give them dignity.''

Amnesty Criticized

Representative Bill McCollum, Republican of Florida, who supports the bill,
urged his colleagues to eliminate all amnesty provisions.

The amnesty, he said, would be ''a reward for lawbreakers,'' would burden
taxpayers with the expense of providing services for legalized aliens, and would
encourage aliens to come to the United States illegally in the hope of
qualifying for another amnesty in the future.

Moreover, he said: ''I think legalization is a slap in the face to millions who
have stood in line for years in foreign countries waiting to come to the United
States legally.''

House members said they had no reliable estimate of how many illegal aliens were
living in the United States or might qualify for legal status under the bill.
Some Federal officials have said they expected no more than two million to apply
for the amnesty. House supporters of an amnesty program, citing the experience
of other countries, predicted that many of the eligible aliens would not apply.

Representative Bill Richardson, Democrat of New Mexico, said, ''Only 60 percent
of the eligible aliens will actually seek to be legalized.'' They account for
only 20 to 30 percent of all illegal aliens, he said.

The Lungren amendment, like the Senate bill, would have established a two-tier
legalization program. Illegal aliens who entered the United States before Jan.
1, 1977, could have become legal permanent residents. Illegal aliens who arrived
from Jan. 1, 1977, to Dec. 31, 1979, could have gained legal status as
''temporary residents.'' After three years, they could have become permanent
residents.

After rejecting the Lungren amendment, the House then rejected, 246 to 177,
another amendment that would have offered legal permanent resident status to
illegal aliens who have lived continuously in the United States since Jan. 1,
1980. The second amendment was offered by Representative E. Clay Shaw Jr.,
Republican of Florida.

Biggest Change in 32 Years


The House has been working on the immigration bill for more than 43 hours over
six days. It would make the most significant changes in immigration law in 32
years. Supporters of the bill say it would help the nation regain control of its
borders; opponents deny that it would achieve that goal.

The legislation rests upon a precarious compromise that does not entirely
satisfy many lawmakers. The American Federation of Labor and Congress of
Industrial Organizations, the United Farm Workers of America, the Chamber of
Commerce of the United States, the American Civil Liberties Union and major
Hispanic organizations all oppose the bill in its present form. Mr. Mazzoli said
facetiously that the opposition of organized labor and the Chamber of Commerce
indicated the bill was ''an excellent piece of draftsmanship.''

The Senate bill was sponsored by Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming,
who had worked closely with Mr. Mazzoli to devise legislation acceptable to both
houses of Congress.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Representative Romano L. Mazzoli before immigration vote;
photo of Representative Mazzoli with staff members (Page A22)

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              136 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 19, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

COURT REFUSES TO HEAR APPEAL ON DEPORTATION

SECTION: Section A; Page 17, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 522 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 18


The Supreme Court today let stand an appellate court order to deport a member of
the Irish Republican Army who was convicted in Ireland of illegally
manufacturing and possessing explosives and firearms.

The Court, without comment, declined to hear an appeal by Michael O'Rourke, 32
years old, who has been at the New York Metropolitan Correction Center since
1979.

A spokesman for the Immigration and Naturalization Service, Verne Jervis, said
it would rule ''possibly this week'' on a motion filed by Mr. O'Rourke's lawyers
to prevent deportation. Mr. Jervis said that Mr. O'Rourke could be deported 24
hours later if the motion was denied.

Mr. O'Rourke was convicted in Ireland in 1975 on three counts of possession of
explosives and supervising an illegal bomb factory. He escaped from a Dublin
prison in 1976 and entered the United States in 1978 under the assumed name of
Patrick Mannion.

He was arrested in 1979 after the Philadelphia authorities received a tip that
he was planning to assassinate Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher of Britain on a
visit to the United States. American immigration officials have been seeking to
deport him ever since.

Hearings on Judge's Role

Meanwhile, hearings began today in the Senate Judiciary Subcommittee on the
Constitution on allegations that the immigration service had improperly forced a
Federal judge to excuse himself from the O'Rourke case. The judge, Ernest H.
Hupp, has said that he was leaning towards granting political asylum for Mr.
O'Rourke in 1981.

Judge Hupp removed himself from the case after saying he had been ''unjustly
harassed and intimidated'' by immigration service agents, who said they had been
investigating allegations that he was leaving work early without proper
authorization.

While conducting the deportation proceedings, Judge Hupp was followed by I.N.S.
agents for 125 miles on the way from the Philadelphia courthouse to his home in
Maryland.

In a memorandum written shortly after the incident, the judge said: ''I became
very scared for my life because I felt these men may mean harm for me and may be
sympathizers of the Irish Republican Army trying to intimate me in reaching a
decision on Michael O'Rourke,''

Testifying before the subcommittee, I.N.S. officials said there had been no
connection between the O'Rourke case and the surveillance of Judge Hupp, who has
since retired.

The director for the professional responsibility office of the immigration
service, Walter P. Connery, said he assigned two agents to trail Judge Hupp in
May 1981 after receiving an anonymous letter in March accusing the judge of
habitually leaving his Philadelphia office early without proper authorization.
The judge was never found guilty of any misconduct.

Mr. Connery said the investigation had been ''purely coincidental'' and had had
no connection with the O'Rourke case.

Judge Hupp, who declined to appear before the committee today, has told Senator
Arlen Specter, Republican of Pennsylvania, and Representative Robert A. Borski,
Democrat of Pennsylvania, that he was inclined to grant asylum to Mr. O'Rourke.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              137 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 19, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

CITY'S IMMIGRANTS SHOW CONCERN AS ILLEGAL ALIENS BILL NEARS VOTE

BYLINE: By JAMES BROOKE

SECTION: Section B; Page 6, Column 5; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 698 words


Immigration counseling offices in New York report a deluge of telephone calls in
the last week from immigrants worried about a bill nearing a vote in Congress
that would penalize employers of illegal aliens.

''Calls have quadrupled,'' said Peter Zendzian, director of the Catholic
Migration and Refugee Office of the Diocese of Brooklyn.

''For now, they are in a panic - some don't go to work,'' said Roger Laguerre,
who works in the Haitian Information and Documentation Center, a storefront
immigration counseling office in Brooklyn.

The bill, which may be voted on in the House of Representatives as early as
today, is seen as the sharpest change in immigration law in decades. Similar to
a bill already passed by the Senate, the House version would offer amnesty to
illegal aliens who came to the United States before a certain date - 1980 and
1982 are being debated - and would fine employers up to $2,000 for each illegal
alien they hired.

Second Largest Concentration


The New York metropolitan area has the nation's second-largest concentration of
illegal aliens, according to estimates by the Immigration and Naturalization
Service. Last year, immigration agents apprehended 14,163 illegal aliens here,
second only to Dallas.

About 100 people, including Representative Robert Garcia, Democrat of the Bronx,
demonstrated against the bill yesterday, walking in a picket line in front of
the immigration offices in Manhattan.

''One in four New Yorkers is foreign- born, and we fear employers will turn away
foreign-looking workers,'' said Lourdes Santiago, a spokeswoman for the
Committee for Fair Immigration Legislation, the sponsor of the rally.

The Committee, an association of Haitian, Dominican, Chinese and Filipino
groups, was formed in 1982 to fight an earlier version of the current House
bill, she said.

According to one Federal estimate, as many as 500,000 illegal aliens could be
working in the New York area, principally in restaurants, as domestic workers
and in the garment industries.

''For now, we are telling them to sit tight,'' said Father Francisco Dominguez,
director of Immigration Services of the Archdiocese of New York.

Father Dominguez, whose Manhattan office handled immigrants from 72 nations last
year, said he and other church workers were beginning to plan for ''a big flow
of people'' seeking information on the law.

''The four dioceses may get together to pool translation services,'' said Father
Zendzian, of Brooklyn. ''We want to train teams to go into every parish to
register people for the amnesty law.''



Official Stresses Benefits

In a telephone interview from Washington, a Federal immigration spokesman, Verne
Jervis, stressed the beneficial aspects of the bill. He estimated that one-third
of the illegal aliens living in New York would be eligible for the amnesty,
which could lead to full citizenship, and he predicted there would be ''an
education period'' for employers to adjust to the new situation.

The illegal aliens who did not qualify for the amnesty would continue to risk
deportation if they were detected.

The employers of one group of illegal aliens, the estimated 50,000 domestics
working in the New York area, would not be affected by the bill.

''The bill only affects employers who hire four or more illegals,'' said David
Scheinfeld, an immigration lawyer who specializes in helping illegal aliens who
work as domestics get their working papers. Under current state laws, he said,
it is legal to hire an undocumented alien in New York and New Jersey.

Immigration counselors in New York yesterday reported a high level of anxiety
among the city's often shadowy illegal immigrant population.

''It started last week,'' said Frey Garcia of the North Manhattan Coalition for
Immigrant Rights. ''The Latinos are frightened. It is not the Dominicans. The
Puerto Ricans are worried they will be mistaken for 'indocumentados' -
illegals.''

Chi-Yim Siu, a member of the Coalition of Asian-Americans for Fair Immigration,
said, ''We fear the law will be used as a pretext for discrimination against
anyone who speaks English with an accent and doesn't look Caucasian.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              138 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 19, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

WORKER IDENTITY SYSTEM MIGHT COST $1.5 BILLION

BYLINE: By DAVID BURNHAM

SECTION: Section B; Page 6, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1051 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 18


Under the immigration legislation now before Congress, the Federal Government
would establish a computerized identity system estimated to cost as little as
$185 million or as much as $1.5 billion in its first five years.

Some kind of national identity system for all working Americans is required by
an immigration bill now being considered by the House. Such a system is
considered an essential part of any enforcement of a similar bill already passed
by the Senate.

But a number of Congressmen, including Representative Don Edwards, Democrat of
California, fear the immigration legislation could lead to the requirement that
every American carry a kind of ''internal passport'' that would allow the
Government to track the movements of workers around the United States.

The House is to take a final vote on its version of the immigration bill later
this week, after which the differences between it and the legislation already
approved by the Senate are to be worked out in a conference committee.

Identity Systems Described


The descriptions of various possible identity systems and their estimated costs
have been provided by supporters of the immigration legislation pending before
the House and in a report prepared by the staff of the national Select
Commission on Immigration and Refugee Policy. It was the 1981 recommendations of
the commission that led to the legislation now before Congress.

Under the system tentatively approved by the House last week, a central
processing agency and 21 regional centers equipped with computers would be
established. Employers across the country would be able to telephone a toll-free
number to verify that the Social Security number presented by a new employee was
valid.

Representative Sam B. Hall Jr., Democrat of Texas, introduced the proposal. He
contended that the centers were technically feasible and would relieve employers
of having to judge the validity of the drivers' licenses, birth certificates and
other documents presented by those looking for work.

Mr. Hall estimated that the total five-year cost for the system would be $185
million.

''This amendment,'' he told the House, ''creates no new ID or worker
identification card and thereby avoids the pitfalls associated with those
systems.''

Others disagreed. ''What the amendment would do is mandate the use of the social
security card and number further down the road as an internal passport for
Americans generally,'' said Mr. Edwards, chairman of the House Judiciary
Subcommittee on Civil and Constitutional Rights. ''Sitting in Washington under
the control of big government, Big Brother in Washington, would be a system
where anybody could find out where somebody is. I assure you that there are
police agencies throughout the United States that would love to use this system
or something like it.''

A second criticism of Mr. Hall's plan is that it will not work because current
Social Security cards do not have photographs. Representative Dan Lungren,
Republican of California, said the lack of photographs meant that the cards
could be shared by different employees. ''That would destroy their
effectiveness,'' he said.

When the House tentatively approved Mr. Hall's Social Security verification
system last week, it eliminated a section of the bill that would have required
the executive branch to present for Congressional consideration within three
years various methods to identify legal workers. The Senate version of the
legislation, however, includes a provision requiring the Federal Government to
put into effect some kind of unspecified worker identification system on its own
after a three-year study.

A study by the select immigration commission outlined several different worker
identity systems that the staff recommended should be considered.

Names Collected by Computer


The most expensive system recommended was based on a new computerized data bank
which would have the names and a number of other distinguising characteristics
of all people seeking employment. As envisioned by the staff, every worker would
be given a new identity number by a new Federal office on the basis of existing
documents such as birth certificates, military discharge papers or tax returns.

That number, along with additional personal information such as a worker's
mother's first name, would be entered in a central data base where an employer
could check to make sure the job seeker was a legal worker. The commission staff
said that under its proposal, information about when and where a person applied
for a new job would not be made available to other agencies.

The staff estimated that in the first five years it would cost $1.5 billion to
acquire the necessary computers and enroll all United States workers. By not
requiring a card or other physical form of identification, the staff said, the
fears of civil libertarians could be somewhat alleviated.

The report concluded that the staff considered the best option to be an identity
system in which every worker would be issued a new card resistent to
counterfeiting. The report said the cards would cost $1.1 billion in the first
five years. The staff said the cards would carry the ''minimum information
necessary to identify a person: name, date of birth, sex, a photograph and an
indentifying numer unique to that individual.''

Worker Program Doubted


WASHINGTON, June 18 (AP) - A pivotal Democrat said today that he had been
assured a House-approved program allowing foreign workers to harvest United
States crops is unlikely to be in the final immigration bill approved by
Congress.

The Democrat, Representative Barney Frank of Massachusetts, softened a threat he
had made to vote against the bill because of the worker program. Representative
Henry B. Gonzales, Democrat of Texas, had called the program ''a rent-a-slave
device.''

Mr. Frank said Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming, chief sponsor of
the Senate version of the bill, had assured him that the foreign worker
provision is unlikely to be in the final legislation that goes to President
Reagan for his signature.

Mr. Simpson said he would oppose it when a conference committee reconciles
differences between the House and Senate versions of the bill, Mr. Frank said.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Senator Alan K. Simpson and Representative Romano L. Mazzoli

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              139 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 18, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

ALIENS BILL NEARS REALITY

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1074 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 17


Why, after so much delay, did a comprehensive immigration bill suddenly start
rolling through the House of Representatives?

The very factors that delayed the legislation for several years now seem to be
working in its favor. After five straight days of solid progress, the House
resumes consideration of the bill Tuesday, facing the politically difficult
question of whether to grant legal status to illegal aliens already in the
United States. A final vote on passage of the bill could come late Tuesday or
Wednesday.

The bill always had concentrated opposition and diffused support. The
concentrated opposition, from Hispanic leaders in particular, kept the measure
off the House floor for a year, but the diffused support proved more significant
when the full House started voting.

Every so often the House, as an institution, rises to a large challenge. ''A
failure to deal with this issue could be fatal to our ability to deal with other
issues of wide, sweeping social and economic impact,'' said Representative
Robert W. Kastenmeier, Democrat of Wisconsin. ''Institutionally, it's important
that we be able to report out a bill.''

Election-year politics, which had been expected to obstruct the bill, seemed
instead to increase the momentum behind it. House members said they did not want
to go back home having done nothing about illegal immigration, even though many
were unsure whether this specific bill was the right answer to the problem. To a
remarkable degree, House Republicans were united in favor of the bill, which is
strongly supported by the Reagan Administration, and Democrats fought among
themselves over various amendments.



No Unity for Democrats


The three Democratic candidates for President have all spoken against the bill,
but they did not unify the party behind their position.

The Congressional Hispanic Caucus fought tenaciously, but proved weaker than
expected. Representative Bill Richardson, a New Mexico Democrat whose mother was
born in Mexico, said: ''We as the Hispanic Caucus failed to come up with a
realistic alternative that could pass. We were not well organized. We did not
educate members.''

The bill authorizes the Government to fine employers up to $2,000 for each
illegal alien they hire. Hispanic groups asserted that this would lead to an
increase in discrimination because employers would avoid hiring people with a
foreign accent or dark skin. But the bipartisan coalition that usually supports
civil rights legislation was divided, and many of its members were able to
support the immigration bill with a clear conscience after adding legal remedies
for victims of discrimination.

Curbs on Legal Immigration


Restrictionist sentiment, a desire to restrict legal as well as illegal
immigration, proved stronger than expected. Representative Hal Daub, Republican
of Nebraska, said that ''no reasonable person'' wanted to stop immigration
entirely, but that it must be limited. ''The demographics and costs of
immigration are staggering,'' he said, and there is a ''growing resentment of
immigrants and immigration.''

Florida Republicans such as Representative Bill McCollum testified to the strain
that illegal immigration could put on a community. Haitians apprehended in a
boat off the Florida coast should not have any more legal rights than a stowaway
or a foreign crewman who jumps ship, he said.

Representative E. (Kika) de la Garza, a Texas Democrat, complained at one point:
''The basic intent of this legislation is not reform. It is a pervasive attempt
by someone to keep foreigners out.''

Those who want to retain the current policy encouraging legal immigration
prevailed over those who wanted to impose numerical limits, but the outcome was
in doubt for a while.

On key issues, the bill's chief sponsor, Representative Romano L. Mazzoli,
Democrat of Kentucky, positioned himself on what he said was a ''middle
ground.'' Organized labor, like the House Committee on Education and Labor,
wanted new safeguards to protect American farm workers and aliens brought into
the country to harvest seasonal crops. Farmers, like the Agriculture Committee,
wanted a new program to bring in aliens as temporary farm workers.

'Killer Amendments'


Usually this strategy worked; occasionally it failed. But Mr. Mazzoli persuaded
the House to defeat all the ''killer amendments,'' those that, in his view,
would have fatally undermined the bill.

Mr. Mazzoli had always said he had a clear majority in support of his position
on any major amendment and that the only question was whether House leaders
would give the House an opportunity to vote. The events of last week suggest
that he was right.

''Some thought the House would dissolve into rancor, bitterness and discord, but
that has not happened,'' Mr. Mazzoli said. 'The issue is not as nettlesome and
full of land mines as we were told by the opposition.''

The most powerful opponents of the bill in 1982, the growers who use illegal
aliens to pick fruit and vegetables, changed their strategy this year and,
instead of fighting the bill, successfully sought amendments.

With the help of a well-financed lobbying campaign, they persuaded the House to
create a special foreign worker program for producers of perishable crops. The
debate over the proposal highlighted the split in Democratic ranks: Leon E.
Panetta of California was the chief proponent; George Miller, also from
California, was the chief opponent.

Leeway for Agriculture


The House bill, like its Senate counterpart, would create a three-year
transition program for agricultural labor, giving farmers three years more than
other industries to halt the use of illegal aliens. And the House, by a vote of
285 to 133, upheld a section of the bill that would prevent immigration officers
from entering a farm or field except with the owner's consent or a search
warrant. The Senate bill contains a similar provision, so it is likely to remain
in the legislation.

For most of the 435 House members, immigration is a back-burner issue to which
they usually pay little attention. But it is also a subject about which they
feel strongly because it is intertwined with the history of America and its
ideals, as well as its future. ''What we are deciding here is the future of the
ethnic fabric of our nation,'' said Representative Robert Garcia, Democrat of
the Bronx.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: ANALYSIS

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              140 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 17, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

BILL TO CURB ILLEGAL IMMIGRATION: HOUSE DEBATE REFLECTS DIVERSITY OF NATION

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 21, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 2024 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 16


For nearly 40 hours this week, the House of Representatives has been conducting
a historic debate on immigration policy as it searches for ways to stem the flow
of illegal aliens into the United States.

Lawmakers from California and Texas spoke most often, but the debate reflected
the full geographic, social and economic diversity of the country, from the
apple orchards of Washington State to the sugar cane fields of Florida.

If the legislation is ultimately approved, it would make the most sweeping
changes in immigration law since 1952.

The debate, which continues next week, focused on a bill that would prohibit
employers from hiring undocumented aliens. Violators would be subject to a
graduated system of penalties, known as employer sanctions. The bill would also
offer legal status to many aliens who are already in the United States illegally
and would make it easier for farmers to bring aliens into the country for
seasonal work in harvesting crops.



Helping to Control the Borders


The bill was introduced by Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of
Kentucky. The Senate has twice passed, by ratios of more than 4 to 1, a similar
bill offered by Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming.

Supporters of the Simpson-Mazzoli legislation said it would permit the nation to
regain control of its borders. Opponents said it would not achieve that goal,
but could lead to an increase in employment discrimination against Hispanic
workers and members of other minority groups.

Under the bill, employers would have to ask job applicants for two documents to
verify that they were citizens or aliens authorized to work in this country.
Some of the most impassioned debate came on a section of the bill that would
have required the President to study the need for a more ''secure'' system of
identification. The House deleted this section, but it aroused fears and
concerns that pervaded the debate on other provisions of the bill.

The House voted to adopt an amendment creating a special foreign worker program
for producers of perishable fruit and vegetables. The amendment, offered by
Representative Leon E. Panetta, Democrat of California, forced lawmakers to
choose between the conflicting political demands of the agriculture industry and
organized labor.

Herewith are published some excerpts from the debate.



Peter W. Rodino Jr.  Democrat of New Jersey

Since the last time we considered this legislation, we have witnessed the
largest number of apprehensions on the Southwest border in our history. Over one
million persons were apprehended attempting to cross into our country illegally.
While there are no statistics to bear this out, it is readily accepted that
several million others succeeded in gaining illegal entry to this country.

When we consider the economic conditions and political turmoil in the countries
to the south of us, the problem of illegal crossing will continue to mount
unless action is taken.

Trent Lott Republican of Mississippi

The immigration problem is a ticking time bomb that must be dealt with now if it
is to be dealt with at all in an effective manner. The bill before us is the
product of a number of compromises, and I think it is fair to say that nobody is
completely happy with all its provisions. If you think our immigration problem
is difficult and controversial now, just think how intractable and heated this
will be if we fail to tackle the problem at this time.

Hamilton Fish Jr.  Republican of upstate New York

Mr. Speaker, in my judgment, this is the last opportunity this House will have
to deal responsibly with this issue of national importance. If we fail to act, I
fear the American people will not forever tolerate the ''revolving door'' on our
Southwest border. How many more years of millions of undocumented entering at
will will our people accept before demanding a repressive response?

E. (Kika) de la Garza Democrat of Texas

The whole context of the discussion earlier today was about the unscrupulous
employers who exploit. They speak as if every undocumented is exploited. Not so.
It is the exception, not the rule. As I travel throughout the country, I see in
our culture that the employer is the godfather of the little baby of the
undocumented who hails from Guanajuato or some other part of Mexico, Central or
South America.

I heard from proponents of this legislation that we must control our borders, we
must secure our borders for national defense purposes. From whom? From some peon
from El Salvador? A little Indian from Guanajuato, Mexico? We in this country
are the last beacon of democracy, liberty and justice. That is why they want to
come.

Patricia Schroeder Democrat of Colorado

Thomas Reed, twice Speaker of the House in the late 19th century, called reform
''an indefinable something to be done, in a way nobody knows how, at a time
nobody knows when, that will accomplish no one knows what.''

Nothing more perfectly fits Speaker Reed's recipe than the bill before us today,
the Immigration Reform and Control Act. The bill does not address where
immigrants come from, why they flee their countries, what they do when they
arrive here. It did not consider how many jobs are saved and created by
immigration.

Robert Garcia Democrat of the Bronx

The bill before us is a compromise effort. But at what price is the compromise?
Who must bear the burden of this compromise and its uncertainties? This is not a
delicate balance. There is an unfair burden placed on the backs of black, brown
and yellow people already living in this country.

There seems to be a fear that if we do not pass this bill, millions of people
south of our border will be flooding into the United States to steal our jobs
and break down our society. There are subtle racial overtones in this argument.
I do not believe it is true.

Bill McCollum Republican of Florida

Our immigration laws were not designed to handle the Mariel boatlift when
125,000 Cubans arrived in south Florida in 1980. We still have those same laws
today. As a result, we have 170,000 asylum applications pending before
immigration judges, compared to as few as 3,800 in 1978. It is no wonder that
even routine hearing determinations of status take years, and the opportunities
for delay in exclusion and deportation matters are great.

We must provide the tools to expeditiously and fairly exclude aliens who have no
color or right to enter the United States when they are apprehended trying to
get in. If they have some kind of documents that they claim give them a right to
be in the United States, or they are claiming asylum, then certainly we should
afford them an opportunity for a hearing before an administrative law judge. But
where there is no claim for asylum, no documents presented and no reasonable
basis for legal entry into the United States, we should turn them away
summarily.

Parren J. Mitchell Democrat of Maryland

There is no feature in this bill that frightens me more than the possibility of
a national identification system. That is totally inimical to the spirit and
character of America. If ever there was a civil liberties issue, it is this one.
Even the most remote suggestion of a study of an identification system is
repugnant to the democratic process.

Norman Y. Mineta Democrat of California

I do not think we should travel down the road that could lead toward national
identification cards, not one foot, not one inch. The idea of a possible central
national data bank listing everyone's ethnicity and heritage, a listing which
would be essential for such a system, is profoundly and overwhelmingly
abhorrent. It makes little difference if the cards are to be carried by each
individual or the data bases are to be tapped by phone calls.

Mickey Leland Democrat of Texas

We are indeed paranoid about studies, we are paranoid about identification
cards, we are paranoid about dog tags, about ribbons we have to tie around our
arms or tattoos that we might have to suffer from. The Jewish people of this
country have reminded me many times that they remember and will never forget
what happened to them in Eastern Europe.

And so we ethnic minorities in this country remember what our history is, and
therefore we will never forget and we will forever stand up and fight against
any kind of identification system or anything that would approach what those
cruel and evil people have done in Eastern Europe and other places.

William E. Dannemeyer Republican of California

Sanctions bothered me, but I concluded that sanctions and amnesty are
inseparable. If we think it through, if we adopt sanctions and we do not give
amnesty, if we follow the law, the day after we have sanctions we are not going
to have anybody working because that employer cannot establish that the worker
who is there has legal status to be employed.

I do not like amnesty because, frankly, it says to somebody who broke our law,
''We are going to forgive you.''

But look, we are in a mess. This is a pragmatic institution of legislation where
we have to give and take and modify all the conflicting demands. We have a
serious problem on our hands, and I am prepared to accept amnesty and sanctions.


Leon E. Panetta Democrat of California

My father, when he first came to this country, worked in the field with his
brothers because that was the nature of the jobs that were required in the
perishable crop area.

It has not been the kind of work, unfortunately, that has attracted large
numbers of domestic workers. There are all kinds of reasons: wages, the kind of
work that is involved here. It is not pleasant work. Believe me, I have done it.
It is not pleasant work. It is tough work.

When the bracero program was brought to a close, did that stop the use of
foreign workers? Absolutely not. We went into the massive illegal immigration
problem that continues to supply the workers in the fields. Today 50 to 80
percent of many of the crews are illegal. That is a reality that we have to deal
with.

Henry B. Gonzalez Democrat of Texas

I am opposed to the so-called guest worker program authorized by the pending
bill, and I am even more opposed to the pending amendment. The farm worker
program created in the bill itself is odious, but this amendment would even
offend a slave driver.

People who wanted slaves would at least buy them; this amendment is a
rent-a-slave device. The amendment does not even provide the skeletal labor
protections that existed under the infamous bracero program, which this Congress
terminated 20 years ago.

Barney Frank Democrat of Massachusetts

There are a lot of these agricultural workers under this amendment who will
spend more time in America than the average member of Congress. As I understand
it, without commenting on the travel habits of some of my colleagues, under this
amendment you can come here and be a temporary worker in America for 11 months
out of the year; one month out and you are O.K. As I said, there are members of
Congress who would not quite make it under this.

You will have a permanent Marxist army of the unemployed across the border able
to come in here, not as citizens, not as fellow human beings with full rights,
but just as that group of domestics that come and go. Maybe they will not do
windows, but they will do everything else.

Romano L. Mazzoli Democrat of Kentucky

Immigration is how America came to be America. Immigration is how we remain a
strong nation and how we will be able to weather the storms of the years ahead
into the 21st century.

The House does not want to do nothing with respect to immigration reform. The
House wants to do something.

If the capital of the United States were in southern California, we would have
done something about this problem many years ago.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Text

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              141 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 17, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

CAMPAIGN NOTES;
Jackson Bid for Meeting With Foes Turned Aside

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 18, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 130 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 16


The Rev. Jesse Jackson announced today that he wants to meet Monday with his two
rivals for the Democratic nomination for President and Lane Kirkland, the
president of the American Federation of Labor and Congress of Industrial
Organizations, on a much- disputed immigration bill. He was rebuffed
immediately.

''I am publicly requesting a meeting with Lane Kirkland, Walter Mondale and Gary
Hart no later than his coming Monday to prevent the Simpson-Mazzoli bill from
either being passed or going to conference,'' Mr. Jackson said.

A spokesman for Mr. Mondale said he was ''going to be in Minnesota on Monday and
won't be able to come back for a meeting,'' and spokesman for the labor
federation spokesman said Mr. Kirkland was in Europe. The Hart campaign had no
comment.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              142 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 17, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRANTS SPARED THE ISLAND TEST

SECTION: Section 4; Page 20, Column 6; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 200 words


To the Editor:


The renovation and restoration of Ellis Island has been mentioned in papers
recently, notably in articles and letters in The Times. Ellis Island did indeed
play a considerable role in the immigration that helped to build our country,
but I wonder how many of those who want to restore it are aware of the part that
class played in Ellis Island interrogation.

Only steerage passengers went through Ellis Island. While cabins on the liners
were occupied mostly by Americans and wealthy European tourists, this was not
invariably the case. I have an example in my own family.

My maternal grandfather came to the United States as an immigrant at the turn of
the century. He traveled steerage, like most other immigrants, and was
interrogated on Ellis Island. He was questioned closely about his prospects and
qualifications. He was not allowed to have a job, but had to have good
qualifications for one.

My grandmother and the children, who came over several months later, had enough
money to obtain second- class cabins. They were politely interviewed in the
ship's salon and waved ashore without ever seeing Ellis Island.

ARTHUR J. MORGAN New York, June 8, 1984

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: letter

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              143 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 17, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

MOVING BRISKLY ON IMMIGRATION-LAW CHANGES

SECTION: Section 4; Page 1, Column 1; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 440 words


A S though making up for lost time, the House last week took up a broad
immigration control bill and moved briskly through more than 50 amendments. By
week's end, the debate still hadn't ended, but many opponents of the measure had
begun to talk of the inevitabiliity of passage. ''Things don't look very good,''
said Robert Garcia, the Democrat from the Bronx who heads the Hispanic Caucus.

He and other critics, who argued that the legislation would result in
discrimination against those whose English is imperfect and whose skin isn't
white, won an early round. The House knocked out a section ordering a
Presidential study on how to create a foolproof identity system. Opponents
contended that such a system would lead inevitably to a national I.D. card,
which is anathema to civil libertarians.

But the opponents, who were led by Edward R. Roybal, Democrat of California,
didn't win much else. The House, in its first immigration debate since December
1982, voted to retain a provision that would outlaw the hiring of illegal
aliens.

Also approved was a new temporary foreign worker program that would offer visas
to foreign workers if American growers ask for their help.  The proposal was
sponsored by Leon E. Panetta, a California Democrat whose district is a large
user of hired farmhands. Representative Henry B. Gonzalez, Democrat of Texas,
said the importation of farm workers - opposed by organized labor, which
supports most provisions of the bill - ''would even offend a slave driver.''

The House also approved the stationing of more guards along the Mexican border
and a telephone verification system that would allow employers to check on the
validity of a job applicant's Social Security number.



Fear of a Backlash

Through all the frequently charged rhetoric, the political import of the debate
and the talk of a possible Hispanic backlash at the polls wasn't forgotten.
House Speaker Thomas P. O'Neill Jr. asserted that the measure, which the three
Democratic Presidential contenders oppose, was ''a Reagan bill more than anybody
else's.'' President Reagan said at his news conference Thursday night that the
legislation was overdue because ''the simple truth is, we've lost control of our
borders.'' Republicans, he maintained, have nothing to fear come November.

Still to be considered is a hotly contested proposal for a one-time- only
amnesty for illegal aliens who can show that they have lived in the United
States since Jan. 1, 1980. A final vote on the bill is likely this week.
Differences with a Senate version adopted in 1983 would have to be ironed out by
a conference committee.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of aliens caught by border patrolman

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              144 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 16, 1984, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

BACKERS STUDYING IMMIGRATION BILL

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section 1; Page 14, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 752 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 15


Several key supporters of a comprehensive immigration bill said today that they
were reconsidering their positions because of a decision by the House of
Representatives to include a program to bring aliens to the United States as
temporary workers to harvest perishable fruit and vegetables.

Representative Peter W. Rodino Jr., chairman of the Judiciary Committee, said he
had ''very, very serious questions'' about whether he could support the bill if
it authorized such a program.

Asked whether he would vote for the bill, the New Jersey Democrat said: ''I
haven't made up my mind. I'm in a dilemma.'' The House is expected to vote on
the full bill Tuesday or Wednesday.

Mr. Rodino said in an interview that he had been trying for 13 years to persuade
Congress to outlaw the hiring of illegal aliens because he wanted to protect
them from exploitation.

Aim of the Aliens Bill


The immigration bill, sponsored by Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of
Wyoming, and Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky, would
prohibit the employment of illegal aliens. But Mr. Rodino said he feared that
the temporary worker program would allow the very type of exploitation he had
been trying to end.  How Mr. Rodino decides to vote will probably influence
other House members who respect his expertise in immigration law and his
judgment on civil rights questions. Mr. Rodino said he had heard from ''an
impressive number'' of lawmakers who liked some features of the original bill
and disliked others, but believed there was ''no reason to support it'' if it
included a temporary worker program.

In remarks on the floor today, Mr. Rodino said, ''The bill is not in such a
state of disrepair that members ought to vote against it.'' But he emphasized
that the bill must be ''balanced.''

Representative Barney Frank, a Massachusetts Democrat who has played a central
role in floor debate on the bill this week, said the addition of the temporary
worker program, by a vote of 228 to 172 on Thursday, was converting him from a
supporter to an opponent of the bill. The temporary worker program was proposed
by Representative Leon E. Panetta, a California Democrat.

''With the Panetta amendment in the bill,'' Mr. Frank said, ''I'll vote no on
final passage.'' The temporary worker program, he said, resulted from ''an
overreach'' by farmers and their allies. ''They have endangered the bill,'' Mr.
Frank said.

Argument for Amendment


Supporters of the Panetta plan said that without the assistance of temporary
foreign workers, American farmers could not maintain their output of fruit and
vegetables. Mr. Panetta insisted the aliens would not be exploited and would not
reduce job opportunities for United States citizens.

Representative Hamilton Fish Jr. of upstate New York, the ranking Republican on
the Judiciary Committee, supported the Panetta amendment and said he saw no
reason that it might endanger the bill.

Mr. Mazzoli expressed confidence that he could still guide the bill successfully
through the House next week. He said he hoped the foreign worker program could
be modified in negotiations with the Senate to include greater protections for
the aliens. The Senate has twice voted to pass a comprehensive immigration bill,
by a margin of more than 4 to 1. The Senate bill does not create a special
foreign worker program for agriculture, but would make it easier for farmers to
bring in aliens under current law.

The House, meanwhile, began preliminary debate on whether to offer legal status
to illegal aliens already in this country. Mr. Mazzoli said he was delighted
that President Reagan had endorsed the amnesty for illegal aliens at his news
conference Thursday night.

Mr. Mazzoli said Mr. Reagan's statement would make it easier for House
Republicans to support the amnesty.

Mr. Reagan said the Reagan Administration supported a ''very generous amnesty''
for illegal aliens extending ''all the way up to 1982.'' The House bill would
give legal status to illegal aliens who have resided continuously in the United
States since Jan. 1, 1982.

Administration officials said today that Mr. Reagan had misstated the official
position of his Administration, which favors a two-tier amnesty program giving
legal status only to aliens who arrived before Jan. 1, 1980. Those who arrived
before 1977 would become permanent residents and those who arrived from January
1977 to December 1979 would become ''temporary residents.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              145 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 14, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

FINES FOR HIRING ALIENS ENDORSED IN HOUSE VOTE ON IMMIGRATION BILL

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 1044 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 13


The House of Representatives today endorsed the principle that employers should
be penalized for hiring illegal aliens, one of the most important elements of a
comprehensive immigration bill.

The bill would outlaw the employment of illegal aliens and would subject
employers to a civil fine of up to $2,000 for each illegal alien hired.

The House affirmed its support for the employer sanctions by rejecting a
proposal to delete them from the bill. The vote was 304 to 120. The proposal was
made by Representative Edward R. Roybal, Democrat of California, who is leading
the opposition to the bill.



Counterproposal Defeated


Twenty Republicans joined 100 Democrats in support of the Roybal amendment,
while 164 Democrats and 140 Republicans backed the sanctions. In place of the
employer sanctions Mr. Roybal had proposed to give the Labor Department
additional resources to improve enforcement of existing labor laws on the theory
that employers hired illegal aliens because they could be exploited.

By a vote of 274 to 137, the House also rejected a proposal to end employer
sanctions after three years. The amendment was offered by Representative
Patricia Schroeder, Democrat of Colorado, another opponent of the bill.

After these votes the chief House sponsor of the bill, Representative Romano L.
Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky, declared: ''We now have employer sanctions in our
bill. We have employer sanctions with strong teeth, but with strong protections
against unintended employment discrimination. I salute the courage of the
House.''

The Senate passed a similar bill with employer sanctions by a vote of 76 to 18
in May 1983. Both bills would offer amnesty to many illegal aliens already in
the United States and would make it easier for farmers to import aliens for
seasonal work harvesting crops.

The House today indicated that it had some ambivalence about employer sanctions
by voting to delete criminal penalties from the bill. These included a $3,000
fine and one year in prison. The vote to eliminate the criminal penalties, taken
with sparse attendance, was 14 to 12. in a sparsely attended House. No one
demanded a roll- call.  vote.  On another issue, the House tonight rejected, by
a vote of 231 to 168, a proposal to set a limit on legal immigration to the
United States.  Representative Carlos J. Moorhead, Republican of California,
proposed to set the limit at 450,000 a year, excluding refugees. He said this
was a ''reasonable ceiling.'' But Representative Peter W. Rodino Jr., Democrat
of New Jersey, denounced the proposed limit, saying it would interfere with
family reunification, one of the long-standing goals of United States
immigration policy.

Supporters of the bill apparently believed that the criminal penalties would be
restored in negotiations with the Senate if the bill is passed by the House. The
Senate bill authorizes criminal penalties of six months in prison and a $1,000
fine for an employer found to have engaged in ''a pattern or practice'' of
violations.

Today's action came in the face of what one Republican described as ''guerrilla
warfare'' against the bill by about 20 lawmakers who fear that a crackdown on
illegal aliens poses a threat to the civil rights and civil liberties of
American citizens.

Late Tuesday night the House voted 242 to 155 to establish a telephone
verification system that employers could use to validate the Social Security
numbers of people applying for jobs. The system was proposed by Representative
Sam B. Hall Jr., a Texas Democrat, who said that employers could call a
''toll-free Government agency telephone number'' to determine whether a Social
Security number was ''invalid, defunct or inaccurate.'' The employer would then
have a ''complete defense'' against any charge of hiring illegal aliens.

Government Is Responsible


Under this procedure, Mr. Hall said, ''a Government agency rather than the
employer is responsible for verifying the job applicant's eligibility to work.''

The Reagan Administration strongly supports the bill but opposed Mr. Hall's
amendment, preferring to study the feasibility of such a system.

Under another section of the bill, employers are required to ask job applicants
for two identification documents to verify that they are citizens or aliens
authorized to work in this country.

There was acrimonious debate over the bill's identification requirements, which
members of racial and ethnic minority groups found particularly distasteful.
Representative Parren J. Mitchell, a Maryland Democrat who is black, said,
''Even the most remote suggestion of a study of an identification system is
repugnant to the democratic process.''

'Ethnicity' Listing Opposed


Representative Norman Y. Mineta, an American of Japanese ancestry who was
interned by the Federal Government in World War II, said the bill raised the
prospect of a ''central national data bank listing everyone's ethnicity.'' The
California Democrat said this prospect was ''abhorrent.''

Mr. Mazzoli and Representative Dan Lungren, a California Republican, said the
bill did not require identification cards and contained elaborate safeguards to
prevent discrimination on the basis of race or national origin. Nevertheless,
the House, by a vote of 57 to 51, eliminated a section of the bill calling for a
Presidential study of more ''secure'' methods of identification.

The House's work today continued its slow but steady progress on the bill, which
would make the biggest changes in immigration law in 32 years.

With about 50 amendments still to be considered, it appeared unlikely that the
House would complete work on the legislation this week. But House leaders have
said they would permit the debate to continue next week. The House has yet to
debate two complex sections dealing with temporary foreign workers and the
amnesty for illegal aliens.

By a vote of 285 to 133, the House today approved a provision of the bill that
prohibits immigration officers from entering a farm or open field without a
search warrant or the owner's consent. Farmers and civil libertarians supported
the restriction. The Reagan Administration strongly opposed it, saying it would
interfere with enforcement.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              146 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               June 13, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

UNLIKELY IMPROVEMENT OF IMMIGRATION LAW

SECTION: Section A; Page 26, Column 6; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 165 words


To the Editor:


In ''Staring at Immigration,'' your June 6 editorial on the Simpson-Mazzoli
immigration bill, you express the belief that passage of that legislation will
''put America back in charge of its own borders.''

How can one believe that we will control our borders after telling millions who
are in this country illegally that they can be legalized?

How can we control our borders when we tell employers it's against the law to
hire undocumented aliens and that the penalty for breaking that law is not even
as much as a slap on the wrist?

How do we expect to enforce these new laws when we don't even have the manpower
to enforce the existing laws and the new bill does not make adequate provision
for the extra work?

Legislative reform is needed, but the Simpson-Mazzoli bill does not improve the
law. It cripples it.

HARRY A. DE MELL New York, June 6, 1984

The writer is a member of the Association of Immigration Attorneys' board of
directors.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Letter

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              147 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               June 13, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

HOUSE VOTES TO PROHIBIT EMPLOYING ILLEGAL ALIENS

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section A; Page 20, Column 4; National Desk

LENGTH: 842 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 12


Supporters of a comprehensive immigration bill made substantial progress today
in the House of Representatives, which voted to prohibit the hiring of illegal
aliens by employers of four or more persons. By a vote of 321 to 97, the House
approved the ban on employment of illegal aliens, a central provision of the
bill.

Under the bill, an employer would be required to ask all job applicants for
documents to verify that they were citizens or aliens authorized to work in the
United States. An employer, could, for example, satisfy his responsibility by
examining an applicant's Social Security card and driver's license.

The House today also voted, 242 to 155, to establish a telephone verification
system for employers checking the Social Security numbers of applicants. The
amendment was offered by Representative Sam B. Hall Jr., Democrat of Texas, who
said employers could call a ''toll-free government agency telephone number'' to
determine whether a Social Security number was ''invalid, defunct or
inaccurate.''

The employer would then have a ''complete defense'' against any charges against
hiring illegal aliens, he said.  Mr. Hall said this procedure was like the one
used thousands of times every day by merchants to check credit card
transactions.

The premise of the bill is that illegal aliens come to the United States mainly
to get jobs and that denying them jobs would curtail such immigration.  The bill
would also offer legal status to illegal aliens who have lived in this country
continuously since Jan. 1, 1982. In addition, the bill would make it easier for
farmers to bring workers into the countrylegally for seasonal harvesting.



60 Amendments to Go

With 60 amendments still to be considered, the fate of the bill was highly
uncertain. But opponents were downcast today.

One, Helen C. Gonzales of the Mexican American Legal Defense and Educational
Fund, said she was ''amazed that they are moving so fast.''

In eight hours, the House took action on eight amendments, including one that
would have established procedures for dealing with complaints of employment
discrimination on the basis of national origin or status as an alien.

The basic bill would authorize fines and prison terms for employers who
knowingly hire illegal aliens.

The Senate passed a similar bill by a vote of 76 to 18 in May 1983. The
legislation was sponsored by Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming, in
the Senate and Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky, in the
House.

The pace of today's action on the bill contrasted with the situation in December
1982, when the same type of bill died on the floor of the House.

Mr. Mazzoli said that a lopsided vote Monday to take up the bill showed that
''the House does not want to do nothing'' about the problem of illegal
immigration. That vote on a resolution clearing the way for the debate to begin
was 291 to 111.

Representative Don Edwards, Democrat of California, a leading opponent of the
bill who is known as a shrewd vote-counter, said today: ''We are not doing as
well as we had hoped. The bill is moving right along. People here know something
should be done. They don't want to go home and say they didn't do anything.''

Mr. Edwards said he did not believe the employer sanctions would be effective in
stopping illegal immigration.

Representative Tony Coelho, another California Democrat, who opposes the bill in
its present form, said: ''There is some discipline on the Republican side. If
they continue that, the bill will probably pass. The Democrats are rather free
and will be split. That split may be enough to carry the bill.''

The Speaker of the House, Thomas P. O'Neill Jr., after blocking action on the
bill last year, reversed himself and set aside this entire week for debate on
the legislation.

Representatives Robert Garcia of the Bronx and E. (Kika) de la Garza of Texas,
both Democrats who are Hispanic, complained that the bill was full of
''hypocrisy'' because it purports to curtail illegal immigration but provides
for the labor needs of farmers dependent on undocumented workers.



'Some Degree of Hypocrisy'


Mr. de la Garza, the chairman of the Agriculture Committee, noted that the bill
relied on employers to help enforce the ban on hiring illegal aliens. ''This is
ironic,'' he said, ''and it also has some degree of hypocrisy.''

He said proponents of the bill ''are saying how these employers abuse, how they
are not reliable and how they do everything possible to subjugate undocumented
workers, but then they are going to trust them to document that they are here
legally.''

By a vote of 404 to 9 the House approved an amendment that would prohibit
employment discrimination on the basis of national origin or alien status. The
amendment was offered by Representative Barney Frank, Democrat of Massachusetts.

Some opponents to the bill contend to avoid penalties for hiring illegal aliens
employers would avoid hiring citizens who look or sound foreign.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              148 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 12, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

HOUSE TO DEBATE IMMIGRATION BILL DESPITE PLEAS OF HISPANIC GROUPS

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1016 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 11


The House of Representatives voted today to begin a long-awaited debate on a
comprehensive immigration bill, overriding the objections of Hispanic groups
that wanted the debate put off indefinitely.

The 291-to-111 vote cleared the way for debate on the bill and 69 amendments
that deal with all its major provisions. House Democratic leaders have set aside
a full week for debate.

The Senate passed a similar bill by 76 to 18 in May 1983. Four House committees
completed action on the bill in June of last year, but the House leadership
deferred action at the request of the Congressional Hispanic Caucus and other
opponents.



Vote Was on Procedure


Today's House vote was on a procedural issue: whether to adopt the resolution,
or rule, setting the terms for debate. But the vote was significant because
there would have been no further proceedings on the bill if the rule had been
defeated.

The bill, called the Simpson-Mazzoli bill for ,its chief sponsors, Senator Alan
K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming, and Representative Romano L. Mazzoli,
Democrat of Kentucky, would authorize fines and prison terms for employers who
knowingly hired illegal aliens. The House version would also give legal status
to illegal aliens who had lived continuously in the United States since Jan. 1,
1982, and it would make it easier for farmers to bring aliens into the country
for seasonal harvesting work.

The vote today was more lopsided than many House members had expected, but it
was not necessarily an accurate indicator of sentiment on the bill itself. Many
lawmakers said that the immigration issue deserved a hearing and that the bill
was too important to be killed on a procedural vote. Some Democrats who have
doubts about the bill voted to start debate out of loyalty to the leadership,
which had made a commitment to allow debate.



Some Disagreements Expressed


Voting in favor of the rule were 152 Democrats and 139 Republicans. Eleven
Republicans joined 100 Democrats in voting against it.

There were indications that support for the compromise at the heart of the bill
might be eroding, as conservatives expressed disenchantment with the amnesty for
illegal aliens and liberal Democrats denounced the employer sanctions.

Representative Trent Lott of Mississippi, the Republican whip, urged his
colleagues to vote for the resolution. ''The Immigration Reform and Control Act
has been a long time coming, and it's long overdue,'' he said. ''The problem of
immigration is a ticking time bomb that must be dealt with now if it's to be
dealt with in an effective manner.'' Speaking of illegal immigration, Mr. Lott
said: ''If we don't deal with it now, the problem is not going to go away. It's
not going to get better. It's going to get worse.''

Mr. Mazzoli said the rule was ''open, fair and responsible'' because it imposed
no time limit on debate. ''The bill is not a partisan issue,'' he added. ''There
is support for this bill in the country. A vote against the rule, purely and
simply, is a vote for the status quo.''

Representative Peter W. Rodino Jr., Democrat of New Jersey, the chairman of the
Judiciary Committee, said: ''There is no question that the issue is
controversial, it's emotional, it's complex, but it's a matter that we must deal
with now. The problem is such that we cannot stay with the status quo.''



Carter's Role Cited

Representative Dan Lungren, Republican of California, urged his colleagues not
to dodge the issue by defeating the rule. ''This bill,'' he said, ''is the
product of four administrations, Democratic and Republican. The Carter
Administration is the progenitor of this legislation as a result of a task force
that was established by President Carter.''

In response to the House action, Attorney General William French Smith said:

''The nearly 300 members of the House of Representatives who today supported the
rule that now permits full floor consideration of the immigration reform bill
deserve the whole- hearted commendation of the American people.''

But Hispanic members of Congress and some California lawmakers spoke out against
the bill and urged the House not to take it up now. ''The bill is definitely
unfair and is not immigration reform,'' said Representative Edward R. Roybal, a
California Democrat leading the opposition. ''It opens the door to a national
identification system. It is special-interest legislation because it provides
for the importation of millions of guest workers without restriction.''

Representative Don Edwards, another California Democrat, said his ''real
objection'' to the bill was its establishment of penalties against those who
hire illegal aliens. The sanctions, he said, represent ''an opportunity and an
invitation to discriminate.''

Representative Robert Garcia, Democrat of the Bronx, argued that the bill would
increase the likelihood of discrimination against ''persons who are black,
brown, yellow or white and speak with an accent.'' He and other opponents of the
bill contend that employers, in an effort to avoid hiring illegal aliens, would
discriminate against citizens and legal aliens of Hispanic or Asian ancestry.

In the New York delegation, there were 19 ayes and 13 nays. In the New Jersey
delegation, nine members voted for the rule and three opposed it. The
Connecticut delegation was evenly divided, with three for and three against.

The variation in regional sentiment on the bill was illustrated by the votes of
lawmakers from states most affected by illegal immigration. The entire Florida
delegation voted to take up the bill. Of the California representatives, 17
supported the rule and 25, all Democrats, opposed it. In the Texas delegation,
19 members voted against the rule and eight supported it.

Thus, more than half of all the negative votes came from California, Texas and
New York.

Originally, most of the opposition to the bill arose from concern about the
employer sanctions. But in recent weeks, there has been evidence of growing
opposition to the section that offers legal status to illegal aliens.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              149 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 12, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

CHRONOLOGY OF EVENTS ON THE STATUS OF ALIENS

SECTION: Section A; Page 19, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 476 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 11


Following is a list of events that preceded today's debate on a comprehensive
immigration bill:



Aug. 4, 1977: President Carter asks Congress to prohibit the hiring of illegal
aliens and to give legal status to illegal aliens living here since 1970.

October 1978: Congress establishes the Select Commission on Immigration and
Refugee Policy, which included eight members of Congress and four members of
President Carter's Cabinet.

April 1980: Cuba allows the first of 125,000 ''boat people'' to sail for
Florida, heightening concern in the United States about illegal immigration.

Feb. 26, 1981: Select Commission on Immigration and Refugee Policy, headed by
the Rev. Theodore M. Hesburgh, recommends a one-time amnesty for most illegal
aliens, penalties for employers who hire illegal aliens and a ''modest
increase'' in legal immigration.

July 30, 1981: The Reagan Administration announces its immigration proposals,
which resemble the Hesburgh commission's recommendations.

March 17, 1982: Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming, and
Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky, introduce a
comprehensive immigration bill incorporating many proposals of the Hesburgh
commission.

Aug. 17, 1982: Senate approves the bill by a vote of 80 to 19.

Dec. 18, 1982: Immigration bill dies on the floor of the House as time runs out
with nearly 300 amendments pending.

May 5, 1983: Starting over again in a new Congress, the House Judiciary
Committee approves the immigration bill by a vote of 20 to 9.

May 18, 1983: The Senate, by vote of 76 to 18, approves the Simpson-Mazzoli bill
again.

June 1983: Three House committees (Agriculture, Education and Labor, and Energy
and Commerce) propose amendments to the bill.

Oct. 4, 1983: Thomas P. O'Neill Jr., Speaker of the House, blocks action on the
immigration bill for the rest of 1983, saying he can find ''no constituency''
for the bill.

Oct. 19, 1983: President Reagan, at a news conference, reaffirms support for
immigration legislation.

Nov. 22, 1983: Speaker O'Neill reverses himself and says he will bring the bill
to the floor soon after Congress reconvenes in January.

Jan. 13, 1984: David A. Stockman, director of the Office of Management and
Budget, expresses concern about the cost of the Simpson-Mazzoli bill.

Feb. 22, 1984: Representative Edward R. Roybal, a California Democrat, with
support of Hispanic groups, introduces an alternative to the Simpson-Mazzoli
bill.

May 2, 1984: Speaker O'Neill postpones action on the Simpson-Mazzoli bill until
after the California Democratic primary June 5. Walter F. Mondale had asked for
such a delay.

June 8, 1984: The House Rules Committee clears the way for debate on the
immigration bill and 69 amendments.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: CHRONOLOGY

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              150 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 12, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

DEBATE ABOUT IMMIGRATION CHANGES IN BRIEF

SECTION: Section A; Page 20, Column 4; National Desk

LENGTH: 538 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 11


Following is a summary of major provisions of the immigration bill considered by
the House of Representatives:

Employer sanctions - The bill would authorize civil and criminal penalties for
employers who knowingly hire illegal aliens. For the first offense, the
Government would issue a warning. For subsequent offenses, the employer would be
subject to fines of $1,000 and then $2,000 for each illegal alien. The maximum
penalty would be one year in prison and a $3,000 fine for each illegal alien
hired. The Justice Department could also ask a Federal District Court to issue
an injunction to stop a ''pattern or practice'' of hiring illegal aliens.

Identification - Once cited for a violation, an employer would have to ask all
job applicants for documents, such as a passport or a birth certificate and
driver's license, to confirm that they were either citizens or aliens authorized
to work in the United States. An employer establishes an ''affirmative defense''
for himself by following these procedures and is not required to check the
authenticity of the documents.

The bill says it does not authorize use of ''national identification cards.'' It
would increase penalties for the use of false identification documents. Within
three years, the President would have to report to Congress on steps that might
be needed to establish ''a secure system to determine employment eligibility.''
He would have to consider, as one possibility, a telephone call-in system
similar to the one used by retail stores to get approval for a customer's credit
card transactions.

Amnesty - Illegal aliens who have resided continuously in the United States
since Jan. 1, 1982, may qualify for legal status as permanent resident aliens.
For five years after obtaining legal status, they would be ineligible for
Medicaid, food stamps and other Federal benefits, with some limited exceptions.
The Federal Government could reimburse state and local agencies for the cost of
providing public assistance to such aliens if Congress made the money available.


Adjudication procedures - The bill establishes new procedures for handling
asylum and deportation cases. The Government could more quickly expel aliens who
did not have the necessary documents or ''any reasonable basis for legal entry
into the United States.''

Temporary foreign workers - The bill makes it easier for employers to bring
aliens into the country for seasonal work harvesting fruit and vegetables. The
bill does not set a quota, but growers say it could lead to an increase in the
number of aliens admitted legally as temporary foreign workers. The number of
alien farm workers admitted under the program, now about 20,000 a year, could
rise to 200,000 or 300,000. The Labor Department would have to certify that the
use of aliens ''will not adversely affect the wages and working conditions'' of
domestic workers.

Cost - Estimates vary greatly, but the Congressional Budget Office has estimated
that the bill would cost $8.6 billion over five years. That includes the cost of
additional staff for the Justice Department and $35 million for use by the
Border Patrol if the President declared an ''immigration emergency.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              151 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 11, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

The Calendar

BYLINE: By Marjorie Hunter

SECTION: Section B; Page 6, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 687 words


Monday

President Reagan, back from a 10- day trip to Europe, is expected to have a
light public schedule this week. But both houses of Congress will be busy, with
the House beginning debate on an immigration reform bill and the Senate
continuing debate on a Defense Department money bill.

Stock Exchange: The American Stock Exchange will hold a two-day conference with
Treasury Secretary Donald T. Regan, Defense Secretary Caspar W. Weinberger,
Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige, William J. Casey, Director of Central
Intelligence, and David A. Stockman, budget director, among the speakers. 8:45
A.M., State Department.

Democratic Rules: The Democratic Platform Committee will begin its final
hearings before fashioning the party's 1984 platform. Today's witnesses will
include Senator Gary Hart and the Rev. Jesse Jackson. 9:45 A.M., Shoreham Hotel.
Immigration Protest: Fifteen organizations, including various Hispanic groups
and the United Farm Workers, will outline their opposition to the pending
immigration legislation. 9:30 A.M., Room 2237 Rayburn.

Toxic Wastes: The National Campaign Against Toxic Hazards will identify 15 toxic
waste sites that could qualify for Federal cleanup money. 1 P.M., Room 2322
Rayburn.

Public Policy: Senator Nancy Landon Kassebaum, Republican of Kansas, will
address the opening session of a National Association of Manufacturers' forum on
public policy. 6 P.M., Capital Hilton.

Tuesday

The Leadership Conference on Civil Rights will observe the 20th anniversary of
the signing of the 1964 Civil Rights Act with a dinner honoring former Senator
Jacob K. Javits of New York and the late Lyndon B. Johnson, Clarence M. Mitchell
Jr. and Roy Wilkins. The Hubert H. Humphrey award will be presented to a
Washington lawyer, Joseph Rauh. 6:30 P.M., Capital Hilton.

Aging Exhibit: The National Center on the Aging will hold a Congressional
reception marking the opening of a new exhibit, ''What About Aging? Your
Changing Senses.'' 5:30 P.M., 600 Maryland Avenue S.W.

National Security: The National Committee for National Security will sponsor a
women's leadership conference on the economics of national security. 8 A.M.,
George Washington University's Marvin Center.

Festival: The Library of Congress will open the first in a series of summer
chamber programs featuring 14 young musicians from six countries. 8 P.M.,
Coolidge Auditorium.

Wednesday

This is Harmon Killebrew Day, by resolution of Congress, and the man who will be
inducted this year into the Baseball Hall of Fame will be in the city for a
series of events to raise money for the National Kidney Foundation. His day will
begin with a 10 A.M. news conference at the Hyatt Regency on Capitol Hill.

Drinking Age: Several members of Congress will join in a rally, sponsored by
Save Our Students and Mothers Against Drunk Drivers, in support of House-passed
legislation designed to persuade states to set 21 as the minimum drinking age.
10 A.M., East Front Steps, the Capitol.

Bank Business: The Federal Reserve Board chairman, Paul Volcker, and the
chairman of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, William M. Isaac, will be
among witnesses at a hearing, by a House banking subcommittee, on Federal
assistance to the Continental Illinois Bank. 10 A.M., Room 2128 Rayburn.

Thursday

Secretary of Energy Donald P. Hodel will discuss the Reagan Administration's
energy policies. 12:30 P.M., National Press Club.

Economic Future: Ten major environmental groups will release a report on
''America's Economic Future.'' 9 A.M., 1701 18th Street N.W.

Doctor's Bills: Results will be released from a survey of American physicians on
their attitudes toward rising costs of health care. 12:15 P.M., Room 106
Dirksen.

Pay Equity: Experts will examine the question of pay equity on campus at an
opening session of the annual meeting of the American Association of University
Professors. 10:30 A.M., Capitol Holiday Inn.

Friday

Carl Rowan, the syndicated columnist and television commentator, will discuss
news coverage of this year's Presidential election campaigns. 6:45 P.M.,
National Press Club.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: drawing

TYPE: Schedule

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              152 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 10, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

ROYBAL DIGS IN HIS HEELS ON IMMIGRATION

BYLINE: By STEVEN V. ROBERTS

SECTION: Section 4; Page 3, Column 1; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 1033 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON


Representative Edward R. Roybal remembers the incident clearly, and painfully. A
fellow Congressman approached him several years ago and said to the California
Democrat: ''I didn't know you were a Mexican. I thought all Mexicans were short
and fat and wore mustaches.''

Mr. Roybal is a slender man of medium height, and he does not wear a mustache.
But he does wear his ethnic heritage with great pride, and he tells the story to
illustrate his argument that many lawmakers still know little about Hispanic
people, and care little about their feelings.

Lately, however, Mr. Roybal has been forcing Congress to pay a great deal of
attention to Hispanic concerns. Almost single-handedly, he has led the fight
against a bill that would tighten the nation's immigration laws, arguing that
the measure would cause discrimination against his people.

Because of his efforts, the House has delayed consideration of the measure
several times over the last year. Now the legislation - which received its final
clearance from the Rules Committee on Friday - is scheduled to reach the House
floor tomorrow for the start of perhaps as much as a week's debate. Most
analysts agree that the odds are good that Mr. Roybal and his allies will be
able to kill it or amend it severely.

''There's a lot of concern out there'' about the bill, Thomas P. O'Neill Jr.,
Speaker of the House, said last week. ''I've not found anyone in my district,
except the newspapers, that likes the bill.'' A similar measure was killed two
years ago when opponents, led by Mr. Roybal, offered dozens of amendments; the
bill was finally withdrawn. The Senate has twice adopted immigration
legislation.

To supporters like Representative Barbara Boxer, a California Democrat, Mr.
Roybal has emerged as ''the conscience of the House'' on the immigration issue.
But he has made powerful enemies in his single-minded campaign to derail the
legislation. Speaker O'Neill is openly irritated with Mr. Roybal's tactics, and
feels that the Congressman has gone back on a promise made last year to abandon
his obstructionist role and help fashion a positive alternative.

At a press briefing last week, the Speaker said he had ''leaned over backward''
to accommodate Mr. Roybal, and did not appreciate his colleague's continuing
guerrilla campaign. Another Democrat close to the issue said there has been ''a
lot of bad blood'' between Mr. Roybal and Mr. O'Neill, and added: ''The Speaker
feels he's been misled.''

Mr. Roybal points out that he has drafted an alternative approach, which would
basically beef up enforcement of existing laws. He dismisses the friction with
the Speaker as temporary. ''We're both professional politicians,'' he says.
''We'll have a drink when it's over and forget about it.''

What is not temporary is Mr. Roybal's dedication to the Hispanic cause. The
Congressman can trace his ancestry back at least eight generations in the
territory that is now New Mexico. According to family legend, his direct
ancestor was a teenage squire with the band of Spanish conquistadores who
founded Santa Fe in 1610. Roybals still occupy the remnants of an original
Spanish land grant in New Mexico, the first state to send a person of Hispanic
origin to Congress.  The first elected outside New Mexico was Representative
Henry B.  Gonzalez of San Antonio, who arrived in Washington in 1961. He was
followed a year later by Mr. Roybal, who had served 13 years on the Los Angeles
City Council. The entire Hispanic delegation still consisted of only five
members when Mr. Roybal organized the Hispanic Caucus in 1976 and became its
first chairman.  In the beginning, Mr. Roybal recalled, ''no one seemed
interested in participating,'' but the Hispanics' sense of identity seemed to
grow with their numbers, which now include nine voting members and two non-
voting delegates from Puerto Rico and the Virgin islands.

A prospective 10th voting member, Albert Bustamente, won the Democratic
nomination in the 23rd district of Texas this year; he is expected to be an easy
winner in November.

The political influence of the Hispanic lawmakers has been greatly magnified
this year by the lively competition in both parties for Hispanic voters, and the
widespread belief that these voters could determine the outcome of the
Presidential election.

Representative Dan Lungren, a California Republican who supports the immigration
bill, took note of this political reality recently when he said sourly: ''We've
had all three Democratic Presidential candidates, those who want to sit across
from the table of Mr. Chernenko and save the Western world, afraid of upsetting
Eddie Roybal.'' Accordingly, he added, all three Democrats oppose the
immigration bill now before Congress.  One section of the legislation that Mr.
Roybal especially dislikes would make it illegal for an employer to hire an
undocumented worker. The Congressman contends that all Americans would have to
wear ''dog tags'' to prove their citizenship.  Like many Hispanic leaders, he
also fears that employers would simply reject all foreign-looking applicants,
particularly those with Spanish accents.  To many of his colleagues, Mr.  Roybal
throughout the debate has seemed like a man with something to prove. In 1978, he
was reprimanded by the House for failing to report a $1,000 campaign
contribution from a Korean businessman and then lying to the House Ethics
Committee. Victory on the immigration bill, said one aide to the House
leadership, would be something of a vindication for the lawmaker. Moreover,
added a Democratic Representative, Mr. Roybal has always wanted to be a ''major
actor'' on the Washington scene, but has never really achieved top billing. Now
that Hispanic people have political clout, newer and younger politicians are
competing for the spotlight, and as the Democrat noted, the immigration issue
enables Mr. Roybal ''to claim national leadership of the Hispanic community.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Representative Edward R. Roybal

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              153 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 9, 1984, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

HOUSE PANEL BACKS BILL ON IMMGIRATION FOR ACTION MONDAY

SECTION: Section 1; Page 28, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 301 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 8


The House Rules Committee today cleared the way for the House to take up a
comprehensive immigration bill Monday, but it set no time limits for debate on
the measure, which has been politically vexatious for both parties for more than
two years.

By a unanimous voice vote, the committee approved a resolution authorizing
debate on the bill, which is designed to curtail illegal immigration to the
United States.

The resolution, or rule, would allow House members to offer 69 amendments to the
complex piece of legislation. The rule fixes no time for a final vote on passage
of the bill, so House members said there was much uncertainty about the outcome.
In theory, under the rule each member of the House could speak for five minutes
on each amendment.

The bill would authorize fines and prison terms for employers who knowingly
hired illegal aliens. It would also offer legal status to many illegal aliens
already in the country. Once cited for a violation, an employer would have to
ask all job applicants for documents to confirm that they were either citizens
or aliens authorized to work in this country.

The Reagan Administration strongly supports the immigration measure.  The Senate
approved a generally similar bill by a vote of 76 to 18 in May 1983.

Hispanic organizations and civil liberties groups have stepped up lobbying
against the bill. They contend the employer sanctions would increase the
likelihood of discrimination against Hispanic workers. Supporters of the bill
say it contains many safeguards to prevent discrimination.

The rule sets the terms of debate. If the House approved the rule by a majority
vote, it will set the stage for a wide-ranging, debate on immigration policy. If
the House defeats the rule, there would probably be no further action on the
bill.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              154 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 8, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

IN EXPLOSIVE HAITI, MUCH HUNGER AND LITTLE HOPE

SECTION: Section A; Page 2, Column 3; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 1049 words


Trim picture as needed.

At least seven people were dead after a sailboat packed with Haitians capsized
when American immigration agents boarded her. Page D19.





By CLYDE H. FARNSWORTH

CAP-HAITIEN, Haiti, June 5 - In this the second city of Haiti, Michel Do Dieu,
29 years old, with his wife and six children to feed, has not found a steady job
in three years.

He lives with his family in one room in the middle of a block of attached
houses, built when the French were masters here in the 18th century.

For a living, he hustles old coins that he has dug out of the hills to the
tourists who hardly come any more.

Philibert Piseme is 18. He is a fisherman, but he can find no work either. He is
struggling to learn English, hoping that somehow this will be his ticket to a
better life in the United States.

Both were here last week when crowds stormed the CARE warehouse and were beaten
back after four hours of battles with the militia that left three dead,
according to the Roman Catholic radio station, Radio Soleil.

Sympathetic to the Demands

Neither was actually in the angry mob of several hundred people. But both
sympathized with the demands for more food.

''It's calm now,'' Mr. Do Dieu said, predicting an end of the crisis, ''because
the Government is handing out food and money.''

''The conditions are not good,'' Mr. Piseme said, predicting the crisis would
get worse.

Earlier, at Gona"ives, a town over the mountains and to the south, toward the
capital of Port-au-Prince, there had been similar food riots, which were quelled
after the dispatch of seven truckloads of soldiers.

At Gona"ives, the Government reacted by sweeping out the local administration
from the prefect on down, and, according to Altedor Jean-Baptiste du Plex, it
also tried to conciliate the people by handing out food and money. He is an
18-year-old student and son of one of the town's most prominent lawyers.

The 'Forgotten' People

In taking a reporter through the Raboteau section of overcrowded, tin- roofed
shanties and nearly impassable dirt roads, he said with intensity: ''The
Government has forgotten the people here.''

The explosions in Cap-Ha"itien, Gona"ives, Bombardopolis on the northwest coast
and a few other villages and towns in the last half of May served as warnings to
the 13-year-old Government of President-for-Life Jean-Claude Duvalier.

''It was the movement of hungry people who got angry,'' said Aubelin Jolicoeur,
an independent commentator who edits a weekly review called Le Petit Samedi Soir
in the capital.

''To stop it the Government has to take measures, has to give food,'' he added.
''The food was there but it was not distributed. They have CARE here, but they
don't care.''

'People Eating Dog'

Gregoire Eug ene, leader of the Haitian Social Christian Party and one of the
main opposition leaders, said:

''The people were eating dog and overripe fruit. The Government turned a deaf
ear. But Gona"ives and Cap- Ha"itien used a language that was loud enough to be
heard in Port-au-Prince.''

Both Mr. Eug ene and Mr. Jolicoeur were interviewed in Port-au-Prince.

The Government has undertaken a huge program to attract foreign investment,
hoping that this will ease unemployment, which stands at more than 50 percent.

A Government official said the situation was under control. He cautioned against
sensationalizing what had occurred and attributed the events to outside economic
forces, such as the ''disastrous'' decline in visitors from the United States.
''Tell your people that Haiti is a good place to visit and to do business,'' he
said.

The American Embassy's reading is that the country is not at the edge of
revolution but that it must continue to make economic and political changes to
forestall more explosions.

''Clearly, there is widespread hunger,'' an American analyst said. ''Clearly,
there is dissatisfaction with the Government. Clearly, people feel it is not so
dangerous now to stand up and complain. Clearly, the Government is less willing
to use massive force.''

Alfreda Brewer of Cleveland directs activities at the CARE warehouse in a
compound next to an open-air market in Cap Ha"itien.  She spoke with a reporter
next to stacks of 100-pound sacks of cornmeal, bulgar wheat and milk powder and
rectangular gallon cans of soybean oil.  CARE distributes the food to 82,000
schoolchildren in the area, as well as to nutrition centers and orphanages.

While the market crowds still seem tense and stare at a stranger, there is no
sense of violence. Smiles for the most part are readily returned.

''You are American,'' a young man shouted. ''We love Americans.''

Miss Brewer gave this account of what happened.

On May 20, trucks were taking rotten food - about 1 percent of the food is
spoiled in transit - to an experimental poultry farm for use as chicken feed.
This gave rise to a misunderstanding among the crowds at the market that the
CARE food was being diverted for sale on the black market.

Miss Brewer said food was not distributed to individuals but only to
organizations.

''Part of it was a misunderstanding,'' she said. ''Part of it also was a
statement against the Government.''

Land 'Speaking to Us'

CARE is the biggest of 300 private relief organizations from the United States
that are trying to help Haiti, one of poorest countries in the world with
per-capita income of only $264 a year.

Karen and Don Davis operate the Evangelical Christian Mission of the Good
Shepherd at nearby Milot, which feeds and educates nearly 500 children.

Mrs. Davis, herself a mother of five, compared the hunger she saw in town to
that of the Milwaukee slums where she also had worked. But she added that there
was ''real hunger in the nearly inaccessible villages in the mountains.

''We really felt that this land was speaking to us, and that the people needed
our help,'' she said.

Sadness was also in a poem by a 19- year-old Haitian, Nicole Barbier, who was in
Cap-Ha"itien to find actors for a play she has completed: I have seen mournful
children On this planet Dying men plaintive In this lost corner of earth I have
seen the rich happy At the crossroads of fortune The unhappy poor Avenging
misfortune.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Haitians at market

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              155 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 8, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

HOUSE GIRDS TO TAKE UP TOUCHY IMMIGRATION BILL

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section A; Page 14, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 785 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 7


House Democratic leaders today reaffirmed their intent to bring up comprehensive
immigration legislation next week but expressed doubt that it would pass.

More than half the 268 House Democrats attended a party caucus in the Capitol to
discuss the bill. The session was closed, but most of the speakers were reported
to have criticized the bill.

The bill's chief sponsor, Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of
Kentucky, was said to be one of the few who strongly defended the proposal.
Designed to curb the influx of illegal aliens, the bill would penalize employers
for hiring them and would offer legal status to many illegal aliens already in
the country.

The Immigration and Naturalization Service apprehended 1.2 million illegal
aliens in the last fiscal year, including more than a million near the Southern
border.

A Monday Vote Set


The first test will come Monday when the House plans to vote on a rule setting
the terms of debate. The Speaker of the House, Thomas P. O'Neill Jr., said today
that the proposed rule would probably permit 73 amendments with no time limit on
debate. He has set aside all of next week for debate on the bill.

But opponents, including many Hispanic groups, hope to prevent House action on
the bill by encouraging members to defeat the rule so there would be no further
debate.

Representative Robert Garcia, Democrat of the Bronx, chairman of the
Congressional Hispanic Caucus, said: ''It's not clear that the rule can be
defeated. We will have to do a lot of lobbying.''

Democrats assume that most Republican representatives will support the rule and
the bill, which is strongly supported by the Reagan Administration. But many
Republicans, like many Democrats, are deeply interested in particular
amendments.

In May 1983, the Senate voted 76 to 18 to approve a generally similar bill
introduced by Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming.

Pledge by O'Neill


At his daily news conference today. Mr. O'Neill answered no when asked whether
he would be disappointed if the House defeated the rule Monday, precluding
further action on he bill. But he said he would be true to his word, given
repeatedly over the last six months, and would bring the legislation to the
floor.

''This is a Mazzoli- Simpson bill,'' Mr. O'Neill said, ''This is not a
Democratic bill.'' In response to a question, he said, ''I haven't found any
avenues except the editorials of my newspaper who are for the legislation.''
Making his personal views even clearer, the Massachusetts Democrat said, ''I'm
cool to the bill, to be perfectly truthful.''

The majority leader, Representative Jim Wright, a Texas Democrat, who was once
optimistic about the chances of achieving a compromise, said: ''I have just worn
out my pick on this mountain. The issue is so emotional, anything you do that
satisfies one faction alienates another faction.''

The fate of the bill has always been uncertain in the House. But doubts about it
appear to have increased in the last few months as lawmakers began to study the
proposal. The three leading candidates for the Democratic Presidential
nomination spoke out forcefully against it.

Two See Potential Damage


Representatives Garcia and Geraldine A. Ferraro, Democrat of Queens, told the
caucus that passage of the bill in this election year could be politically
damaging to the party, especially in its effort to attract Hispanic voters.
''The Democratic Party is truly a mosaic,'' Mr. Garcia said. ''We have people
who are black, brown, yellow and white. It's ludicrous to me that we as
Democrats end up in a debate against those people who historically have
supported the Democratic Party.''

Representative Bill McCollum, a Florida Republican, has offered an amendment to
delete the amensty provisions. He and others contend that amnesty would be an
insult to people in foreign countries who have been waiting for years for United
States visas; that it would draw more illegal immigrants, and that it would be a
burden to taxpayers, who might have to finance social services for some of the
legalized aliens.

Supporters of the bill reject all those arguments. Attorney General William
French Smith today told House Republicans that the Administration was strongly
committed to the Simpson- Mazzoli bill.

Many opponents of the legislation are lining up behind an alternative proposed
by Representative Edward R. Roybal, Democrat of California. The Roybal bill
omits employer sanctions.  Instead, it would authorize additional money for the
Government to enforce labor standards set by current law, on the theory that
employers hire illegal aliens because they can be exploited.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              156 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 8, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

7 DEAD IN CAPSIZING OF VESSEL FILLED WITH FLEEING HAITIANS

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section D; Page 19, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 464 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, June 7


A seventh body was pulled from the sea near Haiti today, and the Coast Guard and
Navy searched for at least two more people missing after a sailboat capsized
when United States immigration agents boarded the vessel to check for illegal
aliens.

Sixty-one people were rescued, many of them injured women and children, after
the sailboat capsized Wednesday, according to Petty Officer 1st Class Joe
Gibson, a Coast Guard spokesman here. He said three of the injured, including a
pregnant woman, had been flown to the United States Navy base at Guantanamo Bay,
Cuba.

The 30-foot wooden boat, packed with as many as 70 Haitians, capsized after
Coast Guard officers and an Immigration and Naturalization Service interpreter
boarded the vessel from the cutter Hamilton, Mr. Gibson said.

The two missing people included the interpreter, Jacques Crevecoeur, 47 years
old, said Brenda Flint, a Coast Guard spokesman.

Site of Capsizing


The sailboat overturned about 5:30 P.M. Wednesday about 20 miles north of
Haiti's coast and about 500 miles southeast of Miami.

''When our Coast Guard team came on board the vessel, a large number of Haitians
ran up from out of a hold and all ran to one side of the deck,'' Lieutenant
Simpson explained. ''The vessel listed to that side. The rudder broke and the
vessel capsized.'' The area of the round-the-clock search had three-foot waves,
aggravated by winds of 18 knots, Mr. Gibson said. Visibility was reported to be
good and the water temperature was about 80 degrees today, Miss Flint said.

The Hamilton had halted the sailboat as part of the Haitian Migration
Interdiction Operation. The September 1981 agreement with Haiti allows the Coast
Guard to board vessels, interview passengers to determine their status and
return them to Haiti if they are found to be ''illegal migrants,'' Lieutenant
Simpson said.

Fate of Survivors


Paul Alexander, Haitian Consul-General in Miami, predicted that most of the
Haitians who survived the capsizing would be sent back to Haiti. ''That's the
usual procedure,'' he said.

But the Rev. Gerard Jean-Juste, a spokesman for the Haitian community in Miami,
pleaded with the United States Government to allow the survivors to enter the
United States.

Immigration officials in Miami say about 333 illegal aliens from Haiti entered
the United States through South Florida last year, a substantial decrease from
1980, when 15,093 Haitians were reported to have entered the country illegally.

Many of the Haitians contend they are political refugees fleeing the regime of
President Jean-Claude Duvalier. But the immigration service says they are
economic refugees leaving their island nation, the poorest in the Western
Hemisphere, to seek jobs in the United States.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              157 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 6, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

COURT RULES NARROWLY IN AN IMMIGRATION CASE

BYLINE: By LINDA GREENHOUSE

SECTION: Section A; Page 23, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 914 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 5


The Supreme Court ruled unanimously today that an alien seeking political
refugee status must demonstrate a ''clear probability'' of persecution in his
home country to avoid imminent deportation.

The Court rejected a more lenient standard of proof adopted by the United States
Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit, in New York. That court ruled two years
ago, in the case of a Yugoslav who contended that his anti-Communist activities
in the United States would place him in danger if he was deported, that an alien
need show only a ''well-founded fear'' of persecution to avoid deportation.

The High Court's decision today was a narrow one, and a case that had been
expected to produce the definitive ruling on the status of political refugees
led instead to a puzzling decision of limited practical significance.

Asylum Issue Avoided


To the surprise of most people familiar with the case, the Court's opinion,
written by Associate Justice John Paul Stevens, did not define the standard that
an alien must meet to win political asylum. ''That issue is not presented by
this case,'' it said.

But all parties in the case, including the Immigration and Naturalization
Service and the civil liberties groups that were challenging the Government's
deportation standard, had assumed that the standard for avoiding deportation and
the standard for winning asylum were the same. No other court had ever suggested
that there was a difference between the two, and the point was not argued by any
party.

The standard for obtaining political asylum is a more important issue than the
standard for avoiding deportation because a ''withholding of deportation'' is
typically a last-ditch effort that an alien attempts only after all else has
failed. Asylum gives an alien the right to remain in the United States;
suspension of a particular deportation order carries no such right, and the
alien may still be deported to any other country that agrees to accept him.

Most aliens who view themselves as political refugees apply simultaneously for
both political asylum and for ''withholding of deportation.''

Asylum Is Discretionary


Under the Immigration and Naturalization Act of 1952, as amended by the Refugee
Act of 1980, the Attorney General must suspend the deportation of an alien whose
''life or freedom would be threatened'' in his home country ''on account of
race, religion, nationality, membership in a particular social group, or
political opinion.''

By contrast, a grant of asylum is discretionary. An alien who meets the legal
requirements is eligible for asylum but is not entitled to it.

The legal issue before the Court was whether the Refugee Act of 1980 made the
standard for avoiding deportation more lenient or whether it simply continued
the previous standard while using somewhat different words.

In 1968 the United States signed a United Nations protocol on the status of
refugees, which defined ''refugee'' as a person having a ''well-founded fear of
being persecuted'' in his native country. Federal law at that time used the
phrase ''clear probability of persecution.'' Neither phrase was defined with any
precision.

Congress passed the Refugee Act of 1980 in order to streamline certain
immigration procedures and to bring Federal law into conformity with the United
Nations protocol. The Immigration and Naturalization Service maintained that the
two phrases meant the same thing and that the substantive standard had not
changed. But the Court of Appeals, ruling in the case of the Yugoslav, Predrag
Stevic, said Congress had intended to make it easier for an alien to avoid
deportation.

Objective Evidence Required


The Supreme Court today rejected that interpretation. Justice Stevens said that
both the White House and the Senate believed, when the United Nations protocol
was signed in 1968, that the protocol was ''largely consistent with existing
law'' and ''did not require any modification of statutory language.'' The
Refugee Act, he said, simply carried forward the old standard, requiring an
alien to demonstrate a ''clear probability'' of persecution.

The Court defined that standard as requiring aliens to show, based on some
objective evidence, that it was ''more likely than not'' that they would face
persecution. The Court's approach seemed to differ from that of the appeals
court by de-emphasizing the subjective state of mind of the alien.

The Government had argued that the same legislative history applied to the
standard for winning asylum. Justice Department lawyers said today that by
suggesting the proceedings might be governed by different standards, the Court
was insuring a new round of litigation on the refugee issue.

That view was shared by Arthur C. Helton of the Lawyers Committee for
International Human Rights, which filed a brief on behalf of Mr. Stevic. Mr.
Helton said the Court's opinion would affect ''very few people'' while insuring
''another series of battles for another series of cases.''

The Court's failure to reach the asylum issue may indicate that the case was
more difficult than it appeared to be from the unanimous opinion. The narrow
treatment may have been the result of a behind-the-scenes compromise designed to
break a six-month deadlock. The case, I.N.S. v. Stevic, No. 82-973, was argued
Dec. 6, making it one of the oldest cases on the Court's docket. The Court does
not ordinarily take that long on a case it decides unanimously.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              158 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 6, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

Staring at Immigration

SECTION: Section A; Page 26, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 692 words


''I am committed,'' said House Speaker O'Neill last month, to bringing the
Simpson-Mazzoli immigration reform bill to the floor right after the California
primary. This is the day after the California primary and, despite past wobbles,
Mr. O'Neill now looks to be as good as his word.

The House Rules Committee may clear the bill by Friday, and it's quite possible
that next week the House can do what the Senate has already done twice, by fat
margins: vote to put America back in charge of its own borders. After delays
dating back to Christmas Eve 1982, the case for immigration reform can finally
be made on the merits.

The merits are substantial, despite all the dust recently thrown up by some
Hispanic leaders and by the Democratic primary campaign. Indeed, the striking
thing about the debate over Simpson-Mazzoli is the weakness of the arguments
against it.

The bill tackles two problems - how to control the illegal aliens flooding into
the country and how to relieve the exploitation suffered by illegals already
here. As to control, the bill shrewdly aims at the economic magnet: jobs.
Simpson-Mazzoli would finally make it illegal for employers to hire illegal
aliens.

As to exploitation, the bill would legalize aliens who have been in this country
for some time. There are a million or more, often so afraid of being caught that
they won't call the cops when victimized by crime. Even so, the idea of giving
them amnesty excited heated criticism in the recent Texas Democratic primary.


It's not hard to recognize a political bargain here: the justice of enhanced
enforcement is balanced with the mercy of amnesty. What's hard to understand is
the arguments against the Simpson- Mazzoli proposal. There are three main ones:

B Big Brother. If employers are to turn down illegal aliens, legal job-seekers
must be given a way to identify themselves. That means degrading national
identity cards or dehumanizing numbers for everybody.

The bill leaves the method of identification to be determined, but a likely way
is for people to give their Social Security numbers - as Americans have been
doing for decades. Many people not only have a national number but also
willingly pay $35 a year to a credit card company for it. They don't object when
clerks check out the number to verify credit. The only freedom that would be
lost by this system of identification is the freedom to use a forged Social
Security card.  B Hiring discrimination against Hispanics. If employers fear
being punished for hiring illegal Hispanics, they'll err on the side of safety
and refuse to hire anyone who looks Hispanic. That argument makes sense in the
abstract. But growers and other employers do not live in the abstract; in their
real world, low-skilled labor is already short. If the illegal tide were
curtailed, workers would be even harder to find. That being so, why would any
employer become more finicky?  B Enforcement discrimination against Hispanics.
Creating sanctions against employers will increase the likelihood of ugly
Federal raids. Says Gov. Toney Anaya of New Mexico: ''If we have sanctions, I
can assure you that it will only be those of us who look foreign or sound
foreign who will be caught up in the raids and have to prove that we're from
here.'' On reflection, the likely result would be quite the reverse. The
Immigration Service can make raids now. If employer sanctions were in place, it
could for the first time calmly examine personnel files instead of rudely
rounding up people. In any case, what of the painful, indisputable
discrimination inflicted on all those illegal aliens? By creating an amnesty,
Simpson-Mazzoli would bring them out of the shadows.  Hispanic leaders can be
forgiven for wanting to have the bargain go all one way, for wanting more
amnesty and less enforcement. But if the Simpson- Mazzoli bill should fail, they
will need to examine their responsibility for what comes next. As the Democrats'
experience in the Texas primary suggests, many Americans are veering toward
quite a different bargain: no amnesty and more, much more, enforcement.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: EDITORIAL

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              159 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 5, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

JACKSON BATTLING TO WIN MORE HISPANIC SUPPORT

BYLINE: By RONALD SMOTHERS

SECTION: Section A; Page 22, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 958 words

DATELINE: SAN FRANCISCO, June 4


With his opposition to a proposed change in the immigration laws and his trip to
Mexico last week, the Rev. Jesse Jackson has been running hard to make more real
the Hispanic component of his ''rainbow coalition.''

The Democratic Presidential candidate has been endorsed by few Hispanic elected
officials in New Mexico, California and New Jersey. Out of the five states
holding primary elections Tuesday, only those three have significant Hispanic
populations.

But many officials, such as Gov. Toney Anaya of New Mexico, predict that Mr.
Jackson will get ''his share'' of the Hispanic vote because of the issues he is
stressing. Nevertheless, the Governor notes that Walter F. Mondale's long
history of friendship with Mexican-Americans has borne fruit in their support at
the polls.

Although few Hispanic labor leaders are endorsing Mr. Jackson publicly, some
such as Dolores Huerta, a vice president of the United Farm Workers, which is
predominantly Mexican- American, speak of divided loyalties among their members
between Mr. Jackson and Mr. Mondale. The union has remained neutral.

Link to Issues Cited

Antonio Rodriguez, chairman of the the executive committee of Latinos for
Jackson, said Mexican-American voters in California had shown a responsiveness
to what he called ''progressive and liberal positions.''

He cited the 1982 vote in the state on a nuclear freeze proposal on the ballot.
Studies of three heavily Hispanic Congressional districts in Los Angeles County
showed as many favorable votes on the freeze as were received by the victorious
Mexican-American candidates in those districts.

In three days of campaigning in New Mexico last week and several additional
recent campaign visits to California, Mr. Jackson has generated some of the same
kind of enthusiasm among Mexican-American voters that he has among blacks.

Rosalinda Palacios, a 32-year-old health planner in Sacramento who is running as
a Jackson delegate there, contrasted her long involvement in politics, and that
of other young Latinos, with what she called the apathy of some older
Mexican-Americans.

Change Is Discerned


For example, she said, for years her mother did not register to vote despite
repeated urging, basically because politics seemed ''an Anglo thing'' that had
little to do with the lot of Mexican- Americans.

''But this time she registered and is voting for Jackson,'' said Miss Palacios.
''It wasn't because of me, because I never mentioned the Jackson campaign to
her.''

Studies of Hispanic voters and electoral politics by the Southwest Voter
Registration Education Project show there were nearly one million Hispanic
Americans registered to vote in California in 1980 and more than 777,000
unregistered Hispanic Americans.

Mr. Rodriguez said that combined efforts by Latinos for Jackson, the Jackson
campaign in California and the Southwest Voter Registration Education Project
sought to increase that number by nearly 200,000 over the last few months, but
he acknowledged that the rise in the upcoming primary was likely to be about
40,000.

One of the main points of attraction to the Jackson campaign, many supporters
contend, is his vigorous opposition to an immigration bill that would impose
sanctions on employers hiring undocumented workers. Opponents of the bill say
this provision will hurt Hispanic immigrants,

In mid-May Mr. Jackson led 5,000 people in a demonstration in downtown Los
Angeles to oppose the bill. He described it as a measure that would legitimize
some of the worst stereotypes of ''illegal aliens.''

Term 'Illegal Aliens' Avoided


In speeches he has avoided the use of the term ''illegal aliens'' and made a
point of it by saying:

''Heroin is illegal and E.T. was an alien. We're talking about human beings
here.''

The line draws applause and laughs from his audiences, but, more significantly,
Miss Palacios and Mr. Rodriguez said, Hispanic residents see a black person
taking issues of concern to them to the national forum.

Young, issue-oriented Mexican- American activists who make up a large part of
Mr. Jackson's Hispanic support, say there is a possibility of unity among blacks
and Hispanic voters on certain issues.

Until now, many black groups had supported the immigration bill, maintaining
that undocumented workers were robbing blacks of jobs.

Mr. Jackson attacks that issue squarely in his speeches, noting that for the
most part, undocumented workers from Mexico and Latin America were ending up in
jobs as farm laborers and at the lowest level of factory work. He said they were
not getting positions for which blacks were clamoring.

Governor Anaya, a Mondale supporter, said that Mr. Jackson's efforts on
immigration and his trip to Mexico would help him among Hispanic voters in both
California and New Mexico.

Fred Mondragon, the New Mexico state Democratic chairman, while conceding that
little of substance was achieved in Mr. Jackson's one-day visit to Mexico, said
that it would signal to Mexican-American voters his concern about issues
affecting them. This is something that Mr. Jackson's rivals, Mr. Mondale and
Senator Gary Hart, have not done as effectively, he said.

At the same time Governor Anaya said that Mr. Mondale had a long history of
friendship with Mexican-Americans and that in the end that fact, along with the
support of Mexican- American officials, would give Mr. Mondale an edge over both
Mr. Jackson and Mr. Hart.

That turned out to be the case in largely Mexican-American districts in Texas,
where Mr. Mondale, supported by local political leaders, won more votes than Mr.
Jackson. In New York City the two divided almost evenly the districts that were
heavily Hispanic.



LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Rev. Jesse Jackson greeting supporters

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              160 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 3, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

HOMOSEXUAL, A U.S. RESIDENT 19 YEARS, FACES DEPORTATION

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 40, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 942 words

DATELINE: DALLAS, June 2


The Immigration and Naturalization Service will begin immediate deportation
proceedings against a businessman who did not acknowledge his homosexuality when
he was admitted to the United States in 1965, the director of the agency's local
office says.

The move follows the United States Supreme Court's refusal Tuesday to hear an
appeal in the case, letting stand lower-court decisions denying citizenship to
Richard John Longstaff.

''From the immigration service's standpoint, the issue is not homosexuality,''
said Ron Chandler, the Dallas director. ''The law is on the books, and we're
merely enforcing that law. We don't discriminate against anyone.''

Though officials do not inquire about sexual orientation when a foreigner seeks
to enter the United States, Federal law still bars homosexual aliens, along with
psychopaths and those with mental defects.

When Mr. Longstaff, a Briton, first sought to become a citizen nine years ago,
he said yes when asked if he was homosexual. But a decade earlier, when applying
for status as a permanent resident, he had said no when asked if he was
afflicted with a ''psychopathic personality.''

Strong Reaction Seen


Now 44 years old, Mr. Longstaff is preparing for an extension of his long legal
fight. ''If they start deportation hearings against me, I think there is going
to be a fervor much greater than what happened during the Anita Bryant
campaign,'' he said, referring to the singer's 1977 effort to overturn a
homosexual rights law in Miami. ''I think it's going to hurt and upset so many
gay people, they are now going to look at their own lives and see what security
they have in this country.''

The day after his appeal was denied, Mr. Longstaff was back at work, greeting a
swarm of supporters from behind the front counter of the Union Jack, his
clothing and haircut emporium here. He answered a flurry of telephone calls,
some from opponents. ''Nothing really threatening, just nastiness,'' Mr.
Longstaff said. ''They say, 'Faggot, go home.' And the religious types are all
trying to save me.''

Mr. Longstaff and his lawyers had hoped the Supreme Court would hear the case
because of a ruling last year by the United States Court of Appeals for the
Ninth Circuit in San Francisco that a medical certification of homosexuality was
required to deny entry to an alien. The Public Health Service discontinued that
practice in 1979, saying homosexuality could not be determined through medical
examination.

Mr. Longstaff's legal battles began in 1975, when he decided to seek
citizenship. At his first interview with I.N.S. agents, Mr. Longstaff said, he
was asked about homosexuality. The agent ''pointed his finger at me and said,
'Are you gay?' '' he recalled. ''And I said yes. It was either do that or lie. I
later got a letter saying they were going to deny my application.''

Interviews and Investigations


He wrote Congressman Jim Mattox, now the Attorney General of Texas, and his case
was reopened. At an interview with immigration officials in Dallas, Mr.
Longstaff was ''interrogated on how many times I had sex, where and how long,
and how long between intervals,'' he said. When he refused to answer questions
about his sex life, Mr. Longstaff said, he was told his application for
naturalization would be denied because of lack of candor.

More interviews and investigation of Mr. Longstaff's friends, customers and
business associates were conducted in Houston and Dallas and the case went
before Federal District Judge Joe E. Estes in 1979. ''He kept screaming, 'Are
you a homosexual?' '' Mr. Longstaff said. ''I felt it was none of the
Government's business.'' The application was denied because of lack of candor,
moral turpitude and violation of a Texas sexual conduct law.

An appeals court ordered a new trial, and in 1982 Judge Estes again denied Mr.
Longstaff's petition, because he had entered the country illegally by not
disclosing his homosexuality.

''Illegal entry, in my case, was not claiming myself as a homosexual and a
psychopath when I entered this country,'' he said. ''There was one question on
the medical document: 'Are you a psychopathic personality?' I said no.
Unbeknownst to me, I was a psychopathic personality, according to American
laws.''

Situation Called Unique


Another appeal to the Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit failed, leading to
the Supreme Court action.

Mr. Longstaff now charges that his civil rights have been violated and believes
that he has been singled out for harassment. ''I know they want to get me out of
the country,'' he said. ''But why? Someone in the immigration department must
have a terrible homophobic complex.''

Mr. Longstaff's Dallas attorney, Brian Bates, says his client is caught in a
unique situation. ''He is the only person that I have ever heard of who's ever
been asked about sexual preference at a naturalization interview,'' Mr. Bates
said. ''The only way someone can be excluded from the country now is if they
walked in and said, 'Hello, I'm a homosexual.' ''

One alternative would be to take the case to the Ninth Circuit court, whose
ruling on medical certification stands for nine Western states. ''But I would
have to take up residence there,'' Mr. Longstaff said, ''and because of my
business this is an impossibility..''

He is unsure of his next step, except for being certain that he will not leave
voluntarily. ''This is the most fabulous country in the world and I wanted to be
a part of it,'' he said. ''If I didn't apply for naturalization, and had stayed
a permanent resident, this never would have been a problem.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              161 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                May 31, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
Ex-Nazi Suspect Loses Immigration Court Case

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 16, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 173 words

DATELINE: CLEVELAND, May 30


An immigration judge has denied political asylum for John Demjanjuk, accused of
being former Nazi death camp guard, and he faces deportation, an official said
Tuesday.

The official, Russell Ezolt, chief legal officer for the Immigration and
Naturalization Service here, said he had received the opinion from Immigration
Judge Adolph Angelilli of Detroit. According to Mr. Demjanjuk's attorney, Mark
J. O'Connor of Buffalo, N.Y., the ruling gives Mr. Demjanjuk 30 days to leave
the country on his own. If he fails to do so, he will be deported, according to
the decision.

The ruling denied Mr. Demjanjuk's requests for political asylum and a suspension
of deportation, making him deportable, Mr. Ezolt said.

Mr. O'Connor said the ruling would be appealed to an administrative appellate
body in Fairfax, Va.

Mr. Demjanjuk, a retired automobile worker from Seven Hills, Ohio, was stripped
of his United States citzenship in 1981 when a Federal judge ruled that he had
lied about his whereabouts in World War II to hide his past.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              162 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                May 30, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

JACKSON SETS PEACE RALLY JULY 4 AT MEXICAN BORDER

BYLINE: By RONALD SMOTHERS

SECTION: Section A; Page 18, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 637 words

DATELINE: ALBUQUERQUE, N.M., May 29


The Rev. Jesse Jackson, before leaving Mexico City and resuming his Presidential
campaigning here, said today that he would hold a peace demonstration July 4 at
the Mexican-American border and would make trips as a ''peace activist'' to
other Central American countries and possibly Cuba.

The Democratic candidate, at a news conference, brushed aside suggestions that
his brief visit to Mexico City had accomplished little other than to demonstrate
his agreement with many of Mexico's approaches to peace initiatives in Central
America, the international debt crisis and on immigration.

''This trip marks an important and vital step in my own political evolution and
in our efforts to bring peace and justice to Central America,'' he said.

Mr. Jackson met with only one official in the administration of President Miguel
de la Madrid. That was Foreign Affairs Minister Bernardo Sepulveda Amor, whom
Mr. Jackson talked with privately for 40 minutes. Mr. Jackson said that one
result of the meeting was the willingness of Mr. Sepulveda to call together
representatives of Mexico, Venezuela, Colombia and Panama, a four-nation group
that is seeking a peace settlement in Central America, ''so that I might share
in their invaluable work.'' He said no date had been set for a meeting with
officials from the four nations, which first met on the Panamanian island of
Contadora and became known as the Contadora Group.

(However, The Associated Press reported that a spokesman for the Mexican Foreign
Ministry, who declined to be identified, denied that a that a meeting of the
Contadora group was being set up for Mr. Jackson. ''Contadora is not going to
meet in order to invite Mr. Jackson,'' he said.)

Mr. Jackson said that no plans had been made yet for the possible trip to Cuba,
adding that no formal invitation had been extended by the regime of Fidel
Castro. Mr. Jackson said his staff would work on such a trip. He repeated his
call, made with Mexican senators, for reviving United States relations with
Cuba.

Mr. Jackson said he was ''exploring the possibility'' of a demonstration July 4
along the border between the United States and Mexico to ''highlight our
commitment to end tyranny and oppression.''

''We will meet at the border and reach across that border to each other,'' he
said. ''We will pledge not to kill each other and to promote peace.''

Plan Grew Out of Setback


The proposed demonstration grew out of one of the setbacks suffered by the
42-year-old civil rights leader in his visit, which began Monday. A rally at the
Autonomous National University of Mexico scheduled for Monday night was
canceled, largely at the urging of Mexican officials, who feared demonstrations,
according to both high Mexican officials and a member of the Jackson party.

More than 60 students, angered by the cancellation, appeared at the candidate's
hotel late Monday night. They said they wanted to to apologize to Mr. Jackson
for the cancellation. They spoke of him as a person in the ''frontlines of the
efforts for peace'' and a strong critic of current United States policy in
Central America.

Today, with many of the same students in the Mexico City hotel, Mr. Jackson
announced planning for the border demonstration.

Mr. Jackson, who he had previously said that his trip would be paid for by
''private funds and not campaign funds,'' said today he did not have the figures
on the cost for his party of 16 and did not know when his aides would have them.
He said the figures would be given to reporters when they were available.

(Mr. Jackson did not commit himself to release all the financial information on
the Mexican trip, according to The Association Press, which reported the trip
was financed by private sources Mr. Jackson has repeatedly refused to identify.)


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              163 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 May 28, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

MEXICO AWAITS JACKSON WITH POLITICAL WARINESS

BYLINE: By RICHARD J. MEISLIN

SECTION: Section A; Page 9, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 721 words

DATELINE: MEXICO CITY, May 27


The Rev. Jesse Jackson will arrive here Monday for a visit that he says is
intended to increase his understanding of the Latin American view of the region,
the international debt problem and immigration.

The visit of a day and a half will include a meeting with Foreign Minister
Bernardo Sepulveda Amor, talks with members of the foreign affairs committees of
the Mexican Congress and with officials of the governing Institutional
Revolutionary Party and a rally at a national university.

It was arranged only after resolving serious reservations from top Mexican
officials, who were concerned that it might appear that the Government was
meddling in the United States elections or being used to promote the fortunes of
a particular candidate.

As late as Thursday afternoon, an official of the Foreign Ministry said that the
Government had still not decided whether to allow the candidate for the
Democratic Presidential nomination to see the officials he wanted, or even
whether to permit him to enter the country at all.

Careful Delineation of Visit


Permission was granted late Thursday, but the visit was carefully portrayed here
as being at the invitation of Senator Miguel Gonzalez Avelar, the leader of the
Mexican Senate, to keep it as separate as possible from the executive branch.

A top aide to President Miguel de la Madrid said Wednesday that there was ''no
way'' Mr. de la Madrid would meet with the candidate, because of the political
implications, even as Jackson aides were saying they held out hope for such a
meeting.

Mr. Jackson said in New Jersey on Saturday that he would be making the trip as
''a private citizen and peace activist who happens to be a candidate.'' But
Government officials here, conscious of the trip's publicity value among the
substantial Mexican and Mexican-American populations of California and New
Mexico, were privately dubious.

In most important respects, Mr. Jackson's views on Central America, the Latin
debt crisis and Mexico- United States immigration coincide with the official
stands of the Mexican Government.

He has strongly favored the Contadora group, an effort by Mexico, Colombia,
Venezuela and Panama to negotiate a settlement to the Central American conflict
through diplomatic rather than military means.

Support for Contadora View


Last month, Mr. Jackson called for the United States to ''stop our funding of
terror in Nicaragua and El Salvador now and to withdraw all our troops from
Central America,'' which follows in its sentiment, if not in its lower-key
diplomatic tone, the Contadora statement of objectives.

He expressed his endorsement of Mexico's position as well in his original letter
requesting the visit, which was addressed to Senator Gonzalez Avelar on May 14.
Mr. Gonzalez Avelar, who supported the visit, said that it was ''interesting for
us to talk to leaders of different places and different political currents.''

On Saturday, Mr. Jackson also said that peace in Central America was linked to a
solution of the Latin American debt crisis, which has gained new prominence in
recent weeks as a rise in United States interest rates has increased pressure on
the heavily indebted Latin countries.

'Options of Poor' Cited


The need to resolve worsening economic conditions, Mr. Jackson said, could
''make the economic powers lean toward more austerity programs, which will
strangle the options of the poor.'' He said this could be ''the basis for a
reaction, an explosion and for rebellion.''

And in a brief visit to the Mexican border city of Tijuana earlier this month,
Mr. Jackson criticized a proposed immigration bill that the Mexicans fear would
limit employment across the border, thereby putting increased pressure on their
own social system.

Characterizing Mexican immigrant labor as ''a cheap labor base strengthening our
economy,'' Mr. Jackson called for more humane treatment of Mexican laborers who
illegally enter the country.

Mexico's unemployment rate is officially put at 8 percent, but a study released
here Saturday by the National Autonomous University of Mexico projected that
could rise to more than 14 percent by the end of the year. More than 40 percent
of the working population is believed to be earning less than the minimum wage
of $25 a week.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              164 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                May 24, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

COOPER UNION IS HAILED FOR EDUCATING THE POOR

BYLINE: By WILLIAM R. GREER

SECTION: Section B; Page 1, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 599 words


The head of the Ford Foundation praised Cooper Union at its 125th commencement
yesterday for having offered a free education since its founding and having
unlocked the ''doors of learning'' to the poor.

''Among the ambitious students who enrolled here were some of the new immigrants
who poured into America during the years following Cooper Union's beginning,''
said the foundation's president, Franklin A. Thomas.

''Similar institutions for adjustment and assimilation are as urgently needed
today as they were a century ago, for once again America is experiencing a huge
wave of immigration.''

The Cooper Union for the Advancement of Science and Art ''has always been an
entry point to those motivated to win their way into America's mainstream,'' Mr.
Thomas said.



Obligations for Graduates

As a result, he added, the 224 seniors graduating from the private, tuition-
free college ''have more than an ordinary obligation'' to seek solutions to the
problems faced by the new wave of immigrants entering the country.

One of those graduating from Cooper Union's Schools of Architecture, Art and
Engineering was a 21-year-old fine- arts major named Sung K. Paik, whose family
brought him to the United States from Seoul, South Korea, 11 years ago. His
father, Nam S. Paik, runs a fruit and grocery stand on Columbus Avenue.

Immigrants come to America ''to become something,'' the graduate said in an
interview.  ''I always dreamed of getting a degree in art, and here I am.''

Mr. Thomas spoke at the ceremony in Cooper Union's Great Hall, in the basement
of the school's building on Seventh Street between Third and Fourth Avenues. In
the tradition of the hall, he used the podium that Abraham Lincoln used to give
his ''Right Makes Might'' speech against slavery in 1860.

Cooper Union was founded in 1859 by Peter Cooper, a New York industrialist and
inventor who, with his wife, invented a gelatin dessert that was the predecessor
of Jell-O. Mr. Cooper never received a formal education, but once said he
believed that education ''should be as free as air and water.''

In keeping with that belief, every student admitted to Cooper Union is given a
scholarship, although there is a $300 administrative fee, said Judith Garten, a
school spokesman. There are 1,035 students enrolled in the school, which has
about 10 applicants for each place and no financial restrictions on who can
apply, she said.

To celebrate its 125th anniversary, Cooper Union gave honorary degrees for the
first time in its history.

These were the recipients: ARTHUR A. HOUGHTON JR., former chairman of the Cooper
Union board of trustees and former president of Steuben Glass, Doctor of Humane
Letters, for his commitment ''to the achievement of good for all'' and for
''working always with institutions and men of high ideals.'' ADA LOUISE
HUXTABLE, former architecture critic for The New York Times, Doctor of Fine
Arts, for creating ''the precedent in the public realm for the intelligent
critique of architecture and of our urban society.'' LOUISE NEVELSON, sculptor,
Doctor of Fine Arts, for giving ''substance to shadow and light and assembled
houses of the spirit for us all.'' FRANK STANTON, former chairman of CBS, Doctor
of Humane Letters, for ''dedicated, courageous advocacy of the constitutional
rights of broadcast journalism.'' LISA TAYLOR, director of the Cooper-Hewitt
Museum, Doctor of Fine Arts, for increasing ''public awareness of historical and
contemporary design'' and for showing ''the old and the ordinary in a new and
illuminating way.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Franklin A. Thomas

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              165 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 May 22, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

THE ETHNIC AUTHENTICITY OF 'MOSCOW'

BYLINE: By ELEANOR BLAU

SECTION: Section C; Page 11, Column 2; Cultural Desk

LENGTH: 1152 words


When Vladimir, the Russian circus musician who defects in Bloomingdale's in Paul
Mazursky's ''Moscow on the Hudson,'' meets his first Americans - they are almost
all from someplace else.

Vladimir, played by a bearded Robin Williams, falls in love with an Italian
saleswoman at the cosmetic counter. He is represented by a Cuban lawyer. A
Jamaican immigration official interviews him. A doctor from India and a nurse
from the Philippines smile down at him as he is borne on a stretcher after
hyperventilating at the sight of so many brands of coffee in a supermarket.

''If you came to New York from another country,'' said Mr. Mazursky, the film's
director, producer and co- author, ''I think you'd be shocked - not in a bad way
- at how ethnic it really is. All the colors and types would seem extremely
exotic compared with what you were used to.''



A Mixed Cast

Finding just the right types for ''Moscow on the Hudson,'' he said, was a major
concern. In fact, Mr. Mazursky considered the choice of extras almost as
important as the choice of major characters.

Most of the cast is multi-ethnic. Vladimir's girlfriend is played by a
Venezuelan actress, Maria Conchita Alonso, who struck the director as a cross
between Sophia Loren and Carmen Miranda. The lawyer is the Argentine-born actor
Alejandro Rey. Cleavant Derricks plays the Bloomingdale's guard who invites
Vladimir to stay with his family in Harlem.

To round them all up, Mr. Mazursky chose Joy Todd, a casting director who
specializes in extras as well as in regular actors.

Recalling a scene in which immigrants are being sworn in as citizens, he said:
''When the camera was going across those faces in the courtroom, I wanted it to
look almost like a documentary. But I arranged them so the 'best' faces - the
most vivid - were prominent; an Oriental couple, Indians, several Latins,
blacks. I chose a black judge because I wanted to show that in America, even
judges come from varied backgrounds.''



He Cites Opportunity

Although ''Moscow on the Hudson'' has done well at the box office and he has
received his best reviews since his 1978 film ''An Unmarried Woman,'' which won
many awards, Mr. Mazursky said: ''Some people have trouble with the so-called
patriotism in the film.'' He added, ''I have no trouble. I suppose they think a
glib, cynical anti-Americanism would be more chic. We are working awfully hard
at thinking the country stinks.''

The 54-year-old-director said that he was neither patriotic nor unpatriotic:
''What I'm saying is, in America it's possible for immigrants to be integrated
into society and have a life. That's not true in other countries.

''I've been a critic of the country. I still think our policy in Central America
is awful. But - look at the freedom here. Look at the power of that freedom.
It's awesome.''

One advantage in casting in New York is that regular actors are willing to work
as extras, so there are more to choose from than in California, where ''extras
are extras'' - some 200 of them, he said, who keep showing up in different
films. ''I recognize them,'' Mr. Mazursky said. ''When I see a Hollywood film, I
say, 'Oh, there's Harry,' and 'there's the white- haired one,' '' he said.



Talked With Russians

A problem was that ''you have to use union extras,'' the director said. ''But
you can get a waiver if you prove you can't get what you want. We got one for
the scene where they dance in the Russian club in Brooklyn. We needed the real
thing.''

Before writing the script, Mr. Mazursky and his co-author, Leon Capetanos, who
had also been his collaborator in ''Tempest,'' talked with Russian immigrants in
Los Angeles and New York as well as Munich, which is where the movie's Moscow
scenes were shot. They also visited the Soviet Union for about three weeks,
walking the streets of Moscow, Leningrad and Kiev and managing meetings with
citizens who invited them to their homes.

From the beginning, he knew the scenes showing Vladimir's life in Moscow would
have to be done in Russian. He didn't want the kind of film in which ''Errol
Flynn would parachute and there would be Raymond Massey with a German accent.''

Robin Williams spent five months, five hours a day with one man, learning
Russian. Mr. Mazursky made a pact with Mr. Williams to learn it also, but found
the task too dificult. So, he said, he felt ''a little helpless'' while the
scenes with Vladimir's Moscow family were being acted. ''I had a translator with
me,'' he recalled, ''and Robin had his teacher with him.  And I'd ask, 'Are they
saying what I want them to say?' Sometimes my guy and his guy would argue.''



Hundreds of Munich Extras

Other than Mr. Williams, the Russian characters with speaking parts were
Russians, found through a variety of sources, including Russian-language
newspapers. Vladimir's grandfather was played by Alexander Beniaminov, a former
Soviet stage and screen actor. Ludmila Kramarevsky, a former circus performer,
showed up at auditions merely to help translate for Mr. Beniaminov but so
impressed the director that she wound up getting the part of Vladimir's mother.
Elya Baskin, formerly a member of the Moscow Comedy Theater Company, plays a
clown who is Vladimir's best friend.

Hundreds of Russian extras from Munich were used for the scene shot there of
Russians lined up for blocks to buy toilet paper. Mr. Mazursky wanted real
Russians, who he said would know how to stand on a long line without impatience.

Though it was a winter scene, the line actually was shot on a hot summer day.
Underneath their overcoats, huddling amid fake snow, extras wore bathing suits.
At one point, they sat down and sang Russian songs. ''It was a very powerful
experience,'' Mr. Mazursky said. ''They still miss Russia in certain ways.''
Emigres, he observed, have a ''terrible conflict.''



Shifts in Emotion

Then how was he to make the movie funny? For Mr. Mazursky has approached films
as a humorist since his first collaborations, with Larry Tucker: ''I Love You,
Alice B. Toklas'' (1968) and ''Bob & Carol & Ted & Alice'' (1969). The director,
who once worked as a stand-up comic and as a writer for Danny Kaye, decided that
''The movie would have to have the quality that a real defection situation would
have - bordering between slapstick and terror. And the movie does walk that
tightrope at times.''

Particularly, he said, when it shifts abruptly from the antics of the defection
in Bloomingdale's to a scene outside as the exhilarated Vladimir, waving to his
comrades departing in a bus, realizes he will never see them again and sobs,
trying to smile.

A few American-born types are seen in ''Moscow on the Hudson,'' including three
whose roles are ''in'' jokes. That Bloomingdale's manager is actually Mrs.
Mazursky. And the tourist couple briefly seen on a beach: the casting director,
Miss Todd, and Mr. Mazursky himself.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of scene from ''Moscow on the Hudson''

TYPE: INTERVIEW

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              166 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 May 20, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

JACKSON LEADS 5,000 PROTESTING IMMIGRATION BILL

BYLINE: By RONALD SMOTHERS

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 26, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 525 words

DATELINE: LOS ANGELES, May 19


The Rev. Jesse Jackson led a march of an estimated 5,000 people today to protest
raids conducted by the Immigration and Naturalization Service and pending
immigration legislation.

In a style reminiscent of the civil rights era, the candidate walked at the head
of the mile-long march up Broadway. Those marching at the front with him, arms
entwined, included Latinos, Asian-Americans, blacks and whites.

Mr. Jackson is vigorously trying to make more visible his Rainbow Coalition of
various ethnic and interest groups in this state, which holds its primary June 5
and has those groups in significant numbers. Last week he appeared before a
group of Asian-Americans, homosexuals and Hispanic people.

Seeking a Wider Base


Aides to Mr. Jackson said that California offered the opportunity to make his
varied support more visible than it had been. He has steadily swept the black
vote while gaining only slight white support, polls show.

The civil rights leader underscored the theme of the various groups at a rally
on the south lawn of City Hall, where the march ended.

''I want to congratulate all of the non- Latinos who are here today,'' he said.
''Unfortunately too many for too long have seen the immigration issue as purely
a Latino problem. As a consequence, Latinos have had to fight largely on their
own.''

But he said his Rainbow Coalition had embraced their cause, and he compared the
pending bill to pre-Civil War classification of any black as three- fifths of a
person and to the interning of Japanese-Americans in World War II.

'Virtual Hysteria' Cited


The bill would impose sanctions on employers who hire illegal aliens, grant
amnesty to those who have been in the country illegally for a set period of
time, allow the temporary entry of some noncitizens for seasonal labor and
permit wider latitude to Federal agencies in seeking out undocumented workers
and preventing their return.

''There is a virtual hysteria against the undocumented, fanned by the last two
Administrations, that allows such inhumane treatment to continue,'' Mr. Jackson
said. ''This hysteria is fueled by a combination of myth, stereotype, meanness
and political expediency.''

Perhaps the one indicator today that the enthusiasm of the crowd for Mr. Jackson
was not completely representative was the absence of Cesar Chavez, president of
the United Farm Workers, who is an opponent of the bill. The rally organizers
said Mr. Chavez would be there. Dolores Huerta, vice president of the union, who
did attend, said both the march organizers and Jackson campaign officials knew
that was never the case.

She explained that the union had not endorsed any candidate. Although she and
others favored Mr. Jackson's approach, there was a loyalty in the union to
former Vice President Walter F. Mondale ''which can't be negated.'' He, like Mr.
Jackson, opposes the immigration proposal now before Congress. The other
candidate for the Democratic Presidential nomination, Senator Gary Hart, has
opposed some provisions of the bill, and supported an amendment to it which many
Hispanic leaders feel is not adequate.




LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              167 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                May 19, 1984, Saturday, Late City Final Edition


;
IMMIGRANTS PLACE NO STRAIN ON THE AMERICAN ENVIRONMENT

SECTION: Section 1; Page 22, Column 4; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 361 words


To the Editor:


In an article on your May 8 Op-Ed page, Russell W. Peterson, president of the
National Audubon Society, rehashes familiar myths about the dangers of
''increasing population'' in this country. Mr. Peterson advocates greater
restrictions on immigration to this country and claims that our steadily
increasing population is ''straining the land's natural carrying capacity.''

Such arguments fly in the face of the most elementary demographic facts. The
truth is that the U.S. has a very low population density when compared with most
similarly advanced industrialized countries (e.g., the Netherlands' and Japan's
population density is 344 and 314 people per square kilometer, respectively, as
against 25 for the U.S).

Furthermore, in spite of the alleged burdensome number of immigrants admitted
yearly into this country, the percentage of the foreign-born in our general
population has decreased dramatically since the early part of the century, from
14.6 percent in 1910 to 4.7 percent in 1970. Countries like Great Britain,
Sweden, Switzerland, France, Australia and Canada have a larger share of
foreign-born people in their populations than the U.S.  As to the matter of
environmental pollution, this can hardly be blamed on the relatively modest
increase of our population. It is rather the result of carelessness and
inadequate environmental protection measures. There have been many spectacular
improvements in environmental conditions in many countries in recent years, and
they had nothing to do with population control.

Finally, the above issues do not even begin to address the profound moral and
historical grounds upon which this country's generous immigration policies have
stood ever since the Founding Fathers first declared this land a bastion of
freedom.

To restrict immigration unduly would not only go against the very character of
this country, it would deprive us of the great benefits we have derived from
those uncounted immigrants who have made outstanding contributions to our
social, cultural and economic life.

GEORGE P. MANN Detroit, May 11, 1984

The writer is an immigration lawyer.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: drawing

TYPE: letter

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              168 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 May 15, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

JESSE JACKSON CROSSES INTO MEXICO TO DENOUNCE AN IMMIGRATION BILL

BYLINE: By FAY S. JOYCE

SECTION: Section A; Page 24, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 508 words

DATELINE: TIJUANA, Mexico, May 14


The Rev. Jesse Jackson sought Hispanic votes today with an unexpected dart
across the Mexican border, where he declared that illegal immigrants were a boon
to the United States economy, not a drain.

''These workers are not hurting our economy - they're a cheap labor base
strengthening our economy,'' he said. He called for more humane and civil
treatment of Mexicans who illegally enter the United States looking for work.

Mr. Jackson left behind his Secret Service agents, who said international
agreements made it impossible for them to accompany him without sufficient
notice, and walked through a revolving gate at a border crossing just south of
San Diego.

Black Muslims in suits and bow ties, who often turn up at his appearances,
stayed at his side and kept others away.

The Mexican Perspective


Then he entered a car and rode to the Center for North American Border Studies
past roadside stands selling ponchos and brightly colored pottery.

He said that by visiting the research center, he hoped to call attention to the
Mexican perspective on border problems and the need for a regional solution.

Mr. Jackson said he did not favor opening the American border to Mexicans
without controlling immigration, but said he did not favor ''brutal'' treatment
of undocumented workers either.

He opposes enactment of the Simpson-Mazzoli immigration bill, which he said
would require Americans to carry pass books as South Africans do. Sponsors of
the bill strongly deny this.

In the last few days, in an attempt to broaden his reach beyond his black
constituency, Mr. Jackson has campaigned among white farmers in Nebraska,
Chinese in San Francisco's Chinatown and Mexican-Americans meeting in San Jose.

Hispanic Vote in California


The Hispanic vote is important in California, accounting for one of every six
Democratic votes, according to an aide to Walter F. Mondale.

Mr. Mondale, Mr. Jackson and Gary Hart all campaigned for the endorsement of the
Mexican American Political Association in San Jose Sunday. Mr. Mondale won, but
by only four votes over Mr. Jackson, a margin so narrow that some analysts
predicted Mr. Jackson might score well among Hispanic voters in the California
primary June 5.

In his forays in California Mr. Jackson continued to call on President Reagan to
intensify his efforts to talk the Soviet Union into entering the 1984 Olympics.

He said the ''Carter-Mondale Administration'' was wrong in boycotting the 1980
Olympics and declared that the United States was paying the price for that
error.


The Democrats:

A Delegate Update


Alaska, Kansas, Louisiana and

Virginia. ''Other'' represents 36

delegates for Mayor Harold

Washington of Chicago and 22 for

George McGovern. Some tallies

represent incomplete delegate

selection processes and are

subject to change.  Mondale1,528 Hart886 Jackson303 Uncomm.329 Other58
TOTAL3,104

TOTAL DELEGATE VOTES: 3,933

NEEDED TO NOMINATE: 1,967 Source: United Press International

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              169 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 May 14, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

SIMPSON-MAZZOLI PENALTY FOR LAW-ABIDERS

SECTION: Section A; Page 14, Column 4; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 298 words


To the Editor:


Your most recent editorial on the Simpson-Mazzoli immigration bill (''Hispanic
Votes vs. Public Interest,'' April 27) only increases the public's
misunderstanding of what this law would do. I agree with the proposition that
''it's wrong to favor illegal at the expense of legal entrants.'' How, though,
can you twist this statement to support the Simpson-Mazzoli bill?

The bill would accomplish the laudable purpose of granting some type of legal
status to some of the aliens illegally in the country, although many might not
qualify for that relief. However, it would also severely restrict the number of
aliens who could obtain permanent residence through existing legal channels, and
would therefore add years of delay to the long waiting periods that aliens
already experience.

For many aliens who have invested years while patiently waiting to receive
immigrant visas, and whose ability to become residents in the U.S. depends upon
their turn being reached before they marry, or attain a certain age, etc., the
Simpson-Mazzoli bill would eliminate any chance to join their families here. In
this sense, Simpson-Mazzoli would certainly favor the illegal entrants at the
expense of those who have abided by the law.  Your capsule description of the
Roybal bill, an alternative to Simpson-Mazzoli, fails to mention the key
difference between the two. The Roybal bill would enact employer sanctions for
hiring undocumented aliens by increasing existing penalties under the
minimum-wage, OSHA and similar laws, for which the enforcement structure is
already in place. That bill deserves serious consideration, or at least an
objective description of its terms.

ALAN VOMACKA Houston, April 30, 1984

The writer is an immigration lawyer.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Letter

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              170 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 May 14, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
 Cubans Said to Arrive From Central America

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 10, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 81 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, May 13


More and more Cuban refugees are immigrating illegally to Florida from Central
America, United States immigration officials say.

In the last three months, 30 Cubans have been arrested at Miami International
Airport after inspectors detected fake passports, according to Perry Rivkind,
district director of the Immigration and Naturalization Service. He made the
comment in an article published today in The Miami Herald.

The majority came from Panama, the rest from Costa Rica.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              171 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                May 10, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

Spain Is Closing In on Rumasa Fugitive

BYLINE: By JOHN DARNTON

SECTION: Section D; Page 6, Column 3; Financial Desk

LENGTH: 882 words

DATELINE: MADRID, May 9


The eyes of Jose Maria Ruiz-Mateos, the financier who left the country after his
shaky multibillion-dollar business empire was expropriated last year by the
Government, stare from the cover of almost every weekly magazine here.

For months, the Spanish press has been following every twist and turn of his
complicated travels abroad, a story filled with declarations and denunciations,
frequent disappearances, and sightings from Europe to Jamaica.

Today, however, as Spain decided to seek the extradition of Mr. Ruiz- Mateos
from West Germany, there was a sense that the chase was nearing an end.

The 53-year-old businessman- turned-fugitive was arrested on April 25 with the
help of Interpol when he passed through immigration at the Frankfurt airport
after stepping off a flight from the United States. He is being held in
Preugesheim prison in Frankfurt.



Faces Many Charges

The former president and founder of Rumasa faces a variety of charges arising
from his business dealings when he headed the holding company, which was said to
be the country's largest private business enterprise. The charges include fraud,
embezzlement, falsification of documents and nonpayment of withheld taxes and
social welfare benefits.


He has also been charged with insulting the head of state, King Juan Carlos.
This crime, punishable by six months to 12 years in jail, stemmed from magazine
interviews he gave earlier this year while living in London.

In the articles, the entrepreneur sought to implicate the King in what he
contended was a bribe offered in 1981 to obtain the dismissal of a Bank of Spain
deputy governor who was looking into Rumasa's affairs. Neither of the two
documents that he produced in an attempt to substantiate the charge, including a
photocopy of a transfer of funds from a Swiss bank to a New York bank, in any
way implicated the King.



Petition Approved by Cabinet

The extradition petition, approved today by the Cabinet, apparently did not
include the charge of ''insults to the head of state.'' According to Jose Luis
de Vicente-Retortillo, one of Mr. Ruiz-Mateos's lawyers, this may mean that the
charge will be effectively dropped and that the financier will stand trial only
on the economic crimes.

Speaking of the allegations against the King, which raised a storm of
indignation against Mr. Ruiz-Mateos in the Spanish press and among the public,
Mr. Vicente-Retortillo said: ''We warned him not to do it. We thought any
declaration of this kind would be bad for Spain. But he went ahead anyhow.'' The
Government seized the Rumasa empire, with its 647 companies and 60,000
employees, in February 1983, charging that it was close to a collapse that could
put the financial system of the country in jeopardy.



Fought Takeover From London

The following month, Mr. Ruiz- Mateos went to London, where he began a long
court battle against the takeover and ignored summonses demanding court
appearances in Spain. He was formally charged in July but remained beyond the
reach of Spanish justice because Spain and Britain have no extradition treaty.

His residency permit in Britain expired earlier this year, and though he was
able to obtain extensions, he was forced to leave April 18. He went to Miami,
where he has business interests, and on April 24 took a plane from New York to
Frankfurt. The order for detention through Interpol came on April 23.

A spokesman for the United States Embassy here said that the order had either
not been received or did not reach the appropriate authorities in time to detain
the financier in the United States. He said that American officials had ''been
in touch all along with the Spanish authorities'' and hinted that they played a
role in forwarding information leading to the arrest in Frankfurt.

It remained something of a mystery why Mr. Ruiz-Mateos should have risked going
to Frankfurt, where he also has business interests, since West Germany and Spain
have an extradition treaty. His attorneys noted that he had visited Frankfurt
only 10 days earlier and suggested that the detention request had taken both
them and their client by surprise. They said they would fight the extradition
demand.

Deficit Put at $1.7 billion

An audit showed that Rumasa had accumulated a deficit amounting to $1.7 billion
at the time of the takeover. The Government is issuing securities to cover the
deficit. It also showed that Rumasa executives had deposited $167.5 million
illegally in foreign banks. Losses since the takeover have amounted to $540
million, according to Miguel Boyer, Minister of Economy, Finance and Commerce.

In December, the Constitutional Court ruled that the seizure, which was done by
royal decree for purposes of speed and surprise, did not contravene the
Constitution. The decision cleared the way for negotiations on the resale of
Rumasa companies to private owners, which the Government had promised to do.

So far, about 17 companies including Banco Atlantico, the largest of the 20
Rumasa banks, have been sold back to the private sector.

Rumasa officials said they expect to sell back many other companies by this
summer, including 17 banks, a hotel chain, a supermarket chain, three insurance
companies, and a champagne production company.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Jose Maria Ruiz-Mateos

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              172 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                May 9, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

THE FAIRER CURE FOR U.S. IMMIGRATION PROBLEMS

SECTION: Section A; Page 26, Column 6; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 448 words


LIVES THAT NEED SAVING

To the Editor:

The Simpson-Mazzoli Bill is controversial and complex. Truth is little served,
however, by your editorial caricaturing serious debate on the issues as
''Hispanic Votes vs. Public Interest.''

The real problem is not, as you say, one of pitting a special Hispanic interest
against general American interests. It is the dilemma of how we as a country can
formulate effective immigration laws that will safeguard American citizens and
at the same time help to save lives of thousands upon thousands of people from
other lands who daily face death.

You deflect discussion of essential facts by a vague emotional appeal for
fairness and contort the content of the controversy to fit your own conclusions.
Three points illustrate this:


* By implication, Hispanic immigration is portrayed as an economic issue. While
economics is involved in almost all human activity, the underlying reason for
the tremendous flow of Hispanic people, rich and poor, into this country is not
lack of money but fear. Death squads, ''disappeared'' persons, terrorism,
torture and imprisonment are not the result of personal economic plight but of
oppressive political conditions.


* Your appeal for equity toward ''legal immigrants from around the world'' is
not new. It was one of the arguments used by leaders in this country for not
admitting larger numbers of Jews when the Hitler regime was allowing Jewish
emigration. Cries for equity have become standard fare of those unprepared or
unwilling to address directly the brutal reality of human extermination.


* You accuse Hispanic people of being concerned with only their ''special
interests'' when they oppose a bill that seems to be but a first step toward
major legislation to ''secure the borders'' of the United States against all
''foreigners.''

The Hispanic community is encouraging debate on this bill precisely to
demonstrate that it is not, as you assert, ''carefully balanced.'' It is filled
with problems and unanswered questions and reflects a total disregard for
current life-and-death realities.

As the immigrant group primarily affected by Simpson-Mazzoli, Hispanic people
wish to alert all citizens to monitor pending and forthcoming legislation
carefully and to support bills that will contribute to the preservation of human
life. This is what we call fairness. And this is the principal reasoning behind
the Catholic Church's consistent call for the widest possible discussion on
immigration reforms that will benefit all.

MARIO J. PAREDES New York, April 30, 1984

The writer is executive director of the Northeast Catholic Pastoral Center for
Hispanics.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: letter

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              173 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                May 9, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

THE FAIRER CURE FOR U.S. IMMIGRATION PROBLEMS

SECTION: Section A; Page 26, Column 4; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 550 words


To the Editor:


Your April 27 editorial ''Hispanic Votes vs. Public Interest'' presents a
distorted picture of the Hispanic community's opposition to the Simpson- Mazzoli
immigration reform bill.

The Roybal alternative immigration bill, H.R. 4909, does not simply provide for
the hiring of more border patrolmen. It is a comprehensive bill that deals with
our immigration problems equitably.

Instead of employer sanctions, H.R. 4909 places an emphasis on labor law
enforcement. The Secretary of Labor would target key industries that are
believed to hire a large number of undocumented people. The bill authorizes $25
million for fiscal year 1985 and $30 million for fiscal year 1986 for the
Department of Labor to carry out this enforcement.

The enforcement of labor laws would have the dual effect of improving working
conditions and wages, thereby making jobs more attractive. Also, it would take
away the incentive for employers to hire undocumented people since exploitation
would no longer be possible.

In addition, a 1982 General Accounting Office study on employer sanctions
programs already being used by 19 countries and Hong Kong stated that ''although
each country had laws penalizing employers of illegal aliens, such laws were not
an effective deterrent to stemming illegal employment. . .'' Sanctions would,
however, be discriminatory, and as the study points out, there is no guarantee
that they work.

The Roybal bill separates the ''package'' of sanctions and legalization.
Legalization, all parties agree, is necessary, but sanctions are not necessary
for legalization. The enforcement of labor laws and beefed- up border patrols
along with other aspects of H.R. 4909 would prove to be enough of a curb on
undocumented immigration to permit a comprehensive legalization program.  As
long as poverty is rampant south of our border, we will have an immigration
problem. Simpson-Mazzoli does not consider this aspect of immigration reform;
H.R. 4909 does. It does so by establishing a special commission to conduct
studies on the foreign policy, or push-pull, aspect of immigration problems.
While this would not provide an immediate solution to immigration problems, it
would be a first, positive step toward establishing a long-term solution.  As
far as Hispanic groups ''speaking passionately'' for people yet to come from
Mexico and Latin America, we do have a special feeling for people from Latin
America and the Caribbean, especially the poor and the hungry. Yet, we're
Americans. We understand the need to protect our borders. What we don't want to
see is those of us living here or those yet to come having to suffer under a law
that would create even more barriers for our community.

Simpson-Mazzoli may be trying to become this generation's immigration bill, but
Hispanic people are this generation's immigrants. That means that we will not
allow ourselves to be pushed aside because a legislative proposal seems to look
good, particularly if the price is further discrimination against our community.
I suggest you take a closer look at H.R. 4909 before deciding that
Simpson-Mazzoli is the answer to our nation's immigration problems.

(Rep.) ROBERT GARCIA Chairman, Congressional Hispanic Caucus Washington, April
27, 1984

*

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: letter

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              174 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                  May 7, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

AGENCIES BATTLE TO CONTROL U.S. BORDER INSPECTIONS

BYLINE: By LESLIE MAITLAND WERNER

SECTION: Section A; Page 15, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1378 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, May 6


Efforts to streamline the system of clearing travelers into the country have hit
roadblocks, Senate aides and Administration officials say.

The goal of reorganizing entry inspections is being threatened by power battles
between the Customs Service and the Immigration Service, battles that are joined
by the Congressional committees that oversee them and the Treasury and Justice
Departments.

Nearly everyone agrees there is no reason to make travelers wait to be cleared
twice, by immigration and customs officials. An end to this has been urged for
more than 30 years, but calls for change have increased with the approach of the
Olympics in Los Angeles.

Right now, a Customs Service spokesman on the West Coast says, it takes about 45
minutes to get through customs and immigration in Los Angeles but things get so
jammed sometimes that passengers are held aboard airplanes on the ground as long
as 30 minutes before they debark. Although facilities are expected to be
expanded for the Olympics, change in the basic double inspection system in time
for the games is unlikely.

Millions Screened Each Year


Nationwide, 252 million people enter the country's land borders annually,
returning United States citizens and foreigners alilke, and 32 million more come
in at seaports and airports.

Dennis Murphy, a spokesman for the Customs Service, said a number of factors
affected how long a traveler must wait: the port of arrival, the season and the
time of day. An American arriving at Kennedy International Airport from abroad,
he said, offering an example, would cope with all formalities with one stop and
this should take 30 minutes. Foreign visitors at Kennedy must stop at both the
Customs and Immigration Services.

According to Mr. Murphy, there are 28 other airports that use such a system. In
addition, he said, there are nine airports with a relatively low volume where
foreigners and Americans are checked only once.

Everywhere else, he said, Americans and foreigners alike are checked separately
by immigrations and customs.

There was nearly a riot in the New Year's period of 1983 at Miami International
Airport, where passengers had to wait as much as four hours to enter the
country. And at peak season at Kennedy, an Immigration Service official said, it
was ''not uncommon for arriving passengers to endure waits of up to two hours''
aboard planes or in hallways.

In many respects, the dispute over solving this problem is a textbook example of
how the competing interests of agencies can block reform.

'Bureaucratic Wrangling'


''It's all bureaucratic wrangling,'' said Edward C. Schmults, a former Deputy
Attorney General who has been involved in the problem through two rounds of
negotiations, 10 years apart. Last year he represented the Immigration and
Naturalization Service, which is part of the Justice Department, and in 1973 he
was in the Treasury Department and represented its agency, the Customs Service.

''It's wrangling for personnel, resources and jurisdiction,'' Mr. Schmults said.
''Bureaucrats won't let you change, and Congressional committees won't let you
change. They all want to have as much of the world to rule as they can. They
forget the convenience of the passenger.''

The Reagan Administration has developed a plan to give both services a share of
the inspection mission. But even Administration officials who devised it say it
is not ideal.

Those who consider it important to consolidate inspections are disappointed with
the compromise, developed last fall by Joseph R. Wright, the Deputy Director of
the Office of Management and Budget, working with Mr. Schmults and his
counterpart at the Treasury Department, Deputy Secretary R. T. McNamar.

Under the plan, the Immigration Service would have jurisdiction for land
borders, where its inspectors would continue to search for people trying to
enter the country illegally but would also take on examining of luggage.

The Customs Service would have jurisdiction over seaports and airports, where it
would examine papers as well as luggage. At all stations, a small backup team of
the other agency would be on hand.

Under the plan, 622 customs inspectors and 165 customs patrol officers would be
transferred to the Immigration Service, while 505 immigration inspectors would
go to the Customs Service. The net loss of 282 Customs positions is one reason
that service, along with its Congressional committees, is more opposed to the
plan than the Immigration Service and its supporters.

Previous Cuts in Personnel


They note that the Customs Service lost 400 positions last year and that the
Administration is seeking to cut 950 more in its budget for the 1985 fiscal
year.

In the Senate and House, there is strong feeling that the Administration
provided no solution. Consolidation has been urged by Congressional committees,
as well as by a recent study on reducing waste, directed by the industrialist J.
Peter Grace.

Mr. Wright said consolidation had proved politically unworkable. He said giving
everything to one agency would have created a struggle between Treasury
Secretary Donald T. Regan and Attorney General William French Smith. ''In that
case, the President couldn't have made a decision,'' Mr. Wright said.

A King Solomon Role


As a result, Mr. Wright said in an interview, he was forced to compromise.

''I fully agree this does not go all the way,'' Mr. Wright said. ''But it's a
step in the right direction. Congress thrust it on O.M.B. to find a solution. We
found one that we thought was politically palatable.''

Alan C. Nelson, Commissioner of Immigration and Naturalization, said that
''certainly there have been 'turf' problems.'' He conceded that an earlier
proposal to consolidate the inspection process in the Customs Service had been
abandoned because of opposition by his agency.

Charles Parkinson, clerk to the Republican majority on the Treasury, Postal
Service and General Government Subcommittee of the Senate Appropriations
Committee, said such problems existed in Congress as well.

'Bones' Thrown to Each Side


''The big problem is a turf problem'' that includes the committees in the
Senate, Mr. Parkinson said.

Mr. Parkinson said Senator James Abdnor, the South Dakota Republican who was
chairman of the subcommittee, believed the Administration ''basically threw
bones out to each side.''

Robert Mills, clerk to the Democratic minority on the subcommittee, agreed that
the plan only further fragmented the inspections system.

Mr. Parkinson said there was ''considerable concern on the Hill'' that the loss
of further Customs positions would damage the service, ''particularly in terms
of narcotics enforcement.''

While Customs and Treasury officials are obliged to support the Administration's
compromise publicly, privately they have opposed it.

In a letter to Mr. Wright last fall, a copy of which was obtained by the Senate
subcommittee, Deputy Treasury Secretary McNamar said the plan had ''little
merit,'' would weaken narcotics enforcement and subject the Administration to
''ridicule'' for solving problems of fragmentation by further fragmentation.

A Bill in Trouble


Mr. Parkinson and other Senate aides said opposition was sufficiently strong
that it might jeopardize passage of a bill to grant the President the authority
for limited reorganizations in the executive branch. Administration officials
and Senate aides said they believed passage of this bill was needed for
execution of the proposal on border inspections.

The House has already passed the bill, but in the Senate, the bill is being held
up because of the border issue.

President Reagan has wanted such a bill since soon after he took office, and
Senators opposed to the border plan hope he will give the plan up rather than
lose the current measure, Senate aides said.

Even if the bill passes, however, Mr. Parkinson said, it will give Congress 90
days to examine any proposed reorganization and the power to reject it. A
maneuver that indefinitely delays a vote on the bill, as well as the 90-day
review period entailed in the bill, makes it unlikely the border plan could win
approval this session, he said.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              175 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                  May 6, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

BAR UNIT SAYS POLITICS GOVERNS ASYLUM POLICY

BYLINE: By DAVID MARGOLICK

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 21, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 660 words


A committee of the New York City Bar Association has charged that foreign and
domestic political considerations are intruding with growing frequency into what
should be the ideologically neutral process of granting asylum.

In a report issued Thursday the association's committee on immigration and
nationality charges that refugees fleeing Communist-bloc countries are far more
likely to receive political asylum than those from ''authoritarian'' or
''totalitarian'' regimes allied with the United States.

Last year, the report states, asylum was granted in 78 percent of all
adjudicated cases of Russian applicants, 53 percent of Afghan applicants and 44
percent of Rumanians. For the Philippines and Pakistan the figures are less than
12 percent and for Haiti around 2 percent, the report says.

This policy, the report states, violates the Refugee Act of 1980, which states
that eligibility for asylum is to be determined solely on the basis of whether
an alien has a ''well-founded fear of persecution'' in the country from which he
fled on account of his race, religion, nationality, political opinion or
membership in a particular social group.

Asylum 'Crisis' Cited

The report of the bar panel, led by Arthur C. Helton of the Lawyers Committee
for International Human Rights, says that in some cases aliens have been
returned to their countries of origin, despite risks of persecution there.

''The asylum 'crisis' lies not in the increasing numbers of asylum seekers, but
in the foreign and domestic policy considerations which have invaded the asylum
process,'' the report states.

Maurice Inman, general counsel of the Immigration and Naturalization Service,
denied that the Government had discriminated, calling the charge ''easy and
popular'' for critics of the Administration. He said the United States had
granted asylum to both leftists and rightists from El Salvador.

He also disputed assertions that aliens deported, particularly to Haiti, had
suffered.

''No one has furnished one shred of evidence that one person returned to Haiti
has been harmed in any way,'' he said.  ''The Government of Haiti is well aware
that if one of these people was harmed, the substantial aid it receives would be
reduced if not totally eliminated.''

Most Claims 'Frivolous'

Mr. Inman asserted that 90 percent of claims for political asylum are
''frivolous,'' designed to lengthen stays in the United States and to circumvent
normal American immigration procedures. He said the United States admits more
political refugees than the rest of the world combined.

In the late 1970's, requests for asylum averaged less than 3,000 annually. There
were 15,955 requests in 1980, 63,202 in 1981 and 37,027 in 1982. By the end of
last year, only 8,423 applications had been filed but 165,998 claims were
pending.

T. Alexander Aleinikoff, a law professor at the University of Michigan, asserted
that the Government had overstated the figures; 115,000 claims, he said, dealt
with Cubans from the Mariel boat lift and would be covered by a bill pending in
Congress.

The bar association report states that because of a lack of training, officials
dealing with asylum applications defer to the State Department, which files an
advisory opinion for each individual seeking asylum.

''This heavy reliance on the foreign- policy perspective of the State Department
has resurrected the ideological allocation of asylum which the 1980 Refugee Act
was designed to replace,'' the report states.

Joachim Henkel of the office of the United Nations High Commissioner for
Refugees said that in recent years many developed countries had tightened asylum
policies.

''We have to find a compromise between legitimate government concerns and the
necessity to provide for asylum seekers a fair hearing by well-trained officers
or judges,'' Mr. Henkel said. ''Otherwise, the whole fabric designed to protect
refugees may collapse.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              176 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                  May 6, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

THE NATION ;
Immigration Bill

BYLINE: By Caroline Rand Herron, Richard Levine and Michael Wright

SECTION: Section 4; Page 2, Column 2; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 197 words


On Back Burner




With squabbles among Democrats boiling over as they battle it out in the
primaries, House Speaker Thomas P. O'Neill Jr. again put a controversial
immigration bill on the back burner last week. California Democratic
Congressmen, who overwhelmingly oppose it, asked the Speaker to postpone debate
on the legislation, which has already been passed by the Senate, until after the
state's June 5 primary.

Although none of the California legislators faces a tough primary challenge,
they want to avoid a raising such a contentious issue; some Democrats support
the bill, which would penalize employers who knowingly hire illegal aliens and
would grant legal status to many aliens already in the country. Hispanic
American groups - as well as the Democratic Presidential candidates - are
critical of the measure, saying it would encourage job discrimination against
people of Hispanic descent. Organized labor, however, supports a ban on
employment of illegal aliens. Although the California Democrats may seek a
further delay on the bill, Mr. O'Neill has said he won't oblige them next time.
''This is definitely the last postponement,'' he said.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              177 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 May 3, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

O'NEILL TO DELAY DEBATE ON ALIENS

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section A; Page 21, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 866 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, May 2


The Speaker of the House, Thomas P. O'Neill Jr., agreed today to postpone debate
on a comprehensive immigration bill until after the California Democratic
primary June 5.

The Massachusetts Democrat said he was taking the action in response to a plea
from the California Democratic delegation in the House. Walter F. Mondale,
campaigning for the Democratic Presidential nomination, also asked the Speaker,
in a telephone call today, to postpone action on the bill, a spokesman for Mr.
O'Neill said.

Representative Don Edwards, the chairman of California's Democratic delegation,
and Representative Douglas H. Bosco, the secretary-treasurer, said sentiment in
the delegation was running overwhelmingly against the bill.

The legislation, designed to curtail the influx of illegal aliens into this
country, was introduced by Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming, and
Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky. It would penalize
employers who knowingly hired illegal aliens and would offer legal status to
many illegal aliens already in the country. The Senate last May passed a version
of the bill supported by the Reagan Administration.

New Date for Debate

The House bill is generally similar, but differs in numerous details. House
Democratic leaders had been planning to call it up for debate the week of May
21. Mr. O'Neill said today that he would instead schedule the debate for the
second week of June.

''This is definitely the last postponement,'' Mr. O'Neill said.

But California Democrats said they would probably seek further delays, first to
get past the Democratic National Convention in San Francisco July 16 to 20, then
to defer action until after the Nov. 6 elections.

Representative Dan Lungren, a California Republican who has supported the
Simpson-Mazzoli bill, said he was ''extremely disappointed'' with today's action
by the Speaker. ''This is a Presidential election year,'' he said, ''the House
calendar is fragmented, and every delay makes it less likely that we will be
able to act successfully on the bill.''

Immigration proposals have divided the Democratic Party, pitting some Hispanic
American groups against organized labor. The American Federation of Labor and
Congress of Industrial Organizations seeks a statutory ban on employment of
illegal aliens, saying they depress wages and working conditions for American
citizens. But Hispanic groups oppose a ban, saying it would increase the
likelihood of discrimination against people of Hispanic descent.

The three Democratic candidates for President have said they oppose the
Simpson-Mazzoli bill, and the legislation has also become an issue in some
Senate races. For example, Representative Kent R. Hance, a candidate for the
Democratic Senate nomination in Texas, has repeatedly emphasized his opposition
to the bill, especially its provision to grant amnesty for illegal aliens
already in this country. The amnesty, he said, would encourage illegal
immigration, and the illegal aliens would take away jobs from Texans.

The House Rules Committee is drafting a resolution that would set the terms of
debate on the immigration bill. Representative Claude Pepper, Democrat of
Florida, the committee chairman, said in a letter to several House members, ''It
is likely that a large number of amendments will be in order.''

80 Possible Amendments


An outline of the resolution being circulated among committee members lists 80
amendments that might be allowed. An earlier version of the Simpson-Mazzoli bill
died on the floor in December 1982 as the House ran out of time, with nearly 300
amendments pending.

Christopher J. Matthews, a spokesman for Mr. O'Neill, said today, ''He doesn't
want this bill amended to death as it was last time.'' Mr. Matthews said the
Speaker was willing to let critics of the bill have ''a fair day in court.'' But
he added that Mr. O'Neill was ''steaming over the possibility'' that they might
try again to obstruct action by the House.

Mr. O'Neill blocked action on the bill last year at the request of Hispanic
members of Congress, who asserted that President Reagan would veto it to win
favor among Hispanic Americans. At the time, Mr. O'Neill said there was no clear
constituency for the bill, but proponents insisted there was wide support for
it. The Speaker then reversed himself and promised to let the House vote on the
bill this year after receiving assurances that President Reagan would sign a
compromise measure.

The Speaker has asked Representative Bill Richardson, a freshman Democrat from
New Mexico, to try to negotiate a compromise. Mr. Richardson is a member of the
Congressional Hispanic Caucus. Most caucus members support a very different bill
offered by Representative Edward R. Roybal, a California Democrat. Mr. Roybal
rejects employer sanctions as ''unworkable and discriminatory.'' His bill would
provide more money to enforce existing labor laws, on the theory that employers
hire illegal aliens because they can be exploited.

Mr. Roybal wants to offer key provisions of his bill as amendments to the
Simpson-Mazzoli legislation. He has proposed more than 20 such amendments.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              178 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                April 29, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 40, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 112 words


A Ghanaian Who Fled Ship Is in U.S. Custody


By United Press International

A 17-year-old stowaway from Ghana who jumped from a cargo ship onto a tugboat in
New York Harbor has been turned over to Federal immigration authorities, the
police said yesterday.

The stowaway, identified as Michael Odamety, told officials his jump Friday from
the cargo ship, the Columbo Maru, had been prompted by the shipboard slaying of
another stowaway.

The police said they were not immediately able to confirm the report.

Mr. Odamety jumped onto the tugboat Dorothy Moran at about 12:30 A.M. Friday,
according to Sgt. Raymond O'Donnell, a police spokesman.




LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              179 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                April 29, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

Fumes Fell 30 at Border

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 33, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 68 words

DATELINE: SAN YSIDRO, Calif., April 28


About 30 Federal employees assigned to the San Ysidro border crossing were
overcome Friday by a chemical being used to clean floors, San Diego fire
officials say. Most of the workers, employed by the Customs Service and the
Immigration and Naturalization Service, were treated at the scene, but eight
were taken to hospitals for treatment, said Bob Radder, spokesman for the San
Diego Fire Department.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              180 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                April 27, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

Hispanic Votes vs. Public Interest

SECTION: Section A; Page 26, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 582 words


Citing their painfully won knowledge of discrimination, Hispanic groups have
mobilized against the Simpson-Mazzoli immigration reform bill and the Democratic
Presidential candidates have rushed thirstily to their side. What a sad mistake
for all concerned.

For one thing, the effort will not help all Hispanics but might well cost a
million or more of them something priceless: legal status.

Worse, the effort pits parochial special interest against the general interest -
and against fairness. It's fairness, most of all, that's offered by the
Simpson-Mazzoli bill, which has twice passed the Senate resoundingly and is
almost all the way home in the House. And fairness is the best reason for
Congress now to finish the job.


Simpson-Mazzoli represents a carefully balanced political bargain. It would
legalize illegal aliens already in this country, freeing them from a cloud of
exploitation and fear of discovery, fear so strong some won't call the police
even after robbery or rape.

At the same time, Simpson-Mazzoli would finally make it illegal for an employer
to hire illegal workers. Thus turning off the economic magnets would probably be
the most effective thing America can do to regain control of its borders.
Closing the back door would relieve mounting pressure to close the front door to
legal immigration. The pressure is so strong that there are now urgent calls in
Congress to halve the number of legal immigrants from around the world.

Legalization and employer sanctions can probably only be enacted as a package.
Hispanic groups, however, embrace the sweet and scorn the sour.  They call for
even more generous legalization while denouncing employer sanctions, arguing
that these would make employers reluctant to hire anyone who looks Hispanic,
legal or not. It's a hard argument to follow. Employers already face labor
shortages. Under Simpson-Mazzoli, they'd find it harder, if anything, to locate
workers; they'd have every reason not to discriminate.  In place of employer
sanctions, the Hispanic groups endorse a bill sponsored by Representative Edward
Roybal of California. It calls for hiring many more Border Patrolmen. But that
would have pallid enforcement effect compared with employer sanctions, and it's
something the Administration proposes doing anyway. The Hispanic alternative is
no alternative at all.  More understandable than the public arguments against
Simpson-Mazzoli is the not-so-public belief among Hispanics who have made it to
the Promised Land that they must not betray those yet to come - indeed, must
protect the illegal path. It's a humane, even admirable feeling. Yet it collides
with something else humane: equity.  There are millions, all over the world, who
also want to enter the Promised Land. Hispanic groups speak passionately for
''undocumented workers'' yet to come from Mexico. But who speaks for the
millions waiting patiently elsewhere? To tolerate a continued illegal tide
sorely tries American patience with all foreign migrants.  By any standard of
decency, it's wrong to favor migrants from one country at the expense of all
others. It's wrong to favor illegal at the expense of legal entrants.
Simpson-Mazzoli, this generation's immigration reform bill, would right those
wrongs. It serves the general interest, and the Democratic Presidential
candidates know it. If they're serious about showing their independence of
special interests, here's a gleaming chance for them to do it.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: EDITORIAL

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              181 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               April 25, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

BANGLADESHI AND INDIAN TROOPS EXCHANGE GUNFIRE ACROSS FRONTIER

SECTION: Section A; Page 8, Column 3; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 384 words

DATELINE: NEW DELHI, April 24


Indian and Bangladeshi troops exchanged fire across their border today. It was
the second such clash in the last five days.

An Indian spokesman said the firing had been started by Bangladeshi troops in an
attempt to thwart construction by Indians of a 10-foot-high barbed-wire fence
along the border aimed at stopping illegal immigration into India. The spokesman
said that Indian troops had then fired back and that the exchanges of fire had
continued through much of the day.

At least one Indian official was said to have been wounded in today's incidents,
which began soon after an Indian crew started work on the fence in the Dhubri
district of the northeastern Indian state of Assam.

One Bangladeshi soldier was reportedly killed and another wounded in the
previous skirmishing, which took place last Friday. Each side accused the other
of having started that firing, which was said to have occurred near the
Bangladeshi district of Kurigram.

'Aggressive Actions'

After today's exchanges, an Indian spokesman warned Bangladesh against what he
denounced as ''aggressive actions'' and provocations and said, ''We do not seek
and do not want any sort of conflict with this neighboring country.'' He called
on Bangladesh to ''respect our sovereignty and our right to raise a fence on our
side of the border.''

Angered by the Indian decision to go ahead with the fence, Bangladesh today
announced a counter plan to build watch towers along its side of the poorly
marked, 1,000-mile frontier.

Bangladesh has vigorously opposed the fence plan, describing it as an unfriendly
act. It also has denied that any of its people have moved illegally into Assam
and other parts of northeastern India.

Last year an Assamese movement against the aliens exploded into widespread
ethnic and religious violence in which more than 5,000 people were reported to
have been killed.

The issue of the fence has further soured the relationship between India and
Bangladesh, previously marred by territorial disputes.

The two countries have clashed in the past over the sharing of the waters of the
Ganges River for irrigation. The river flows through both nations. They also
have disputed each other's claims to sovereignty over pockets of land on the
border and an island in the Ganges Delta.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: map of India

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              182 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                April 22, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

BILL ON ALIENS A DIVISIVE ISSUE FOR DEMOCRATS

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 1, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 1021 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, April 21


Proposals to rewrite the nation's basic immigration law have deeply divided the
Democratic Party, pitting Hispanic groups against organized labor on a potent
election-year issue.

With the House nearing debate on the question, the American Federation of Labor
and Congress of Industrial Organizations is pressing for a statutory ban on
employment of illegal aliens, contending that they depress wages and working
conditions for American citizens. Hispanic groups vehemently oppose a ban,
saying it would increase the likelihood of discrimination against Americans of
Hispanic descent.

The best-known bill on the issue was introduced by Senator Alan K. Simpson,
Republican of Wyoming, and Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of
Kentucky. It would penalize employers who knowingly hired illegal aliens and
would offer legal status to many illegal aliens already in the country.

The Senate last May passed a version of the bill supported by the Reagan
Administration. A generally similar bill, which differs in many details, is
awaiting action in the Democratic-controlled House and may reach the floor soon
after Congress reconvenes next week.

Vilma S. Martinez, former president of the Mexican American Legal Defense and
Educational Fund, said: ''This issue pits two of the Democrats' constituencies
against each other. For the party, it comes down to the question: Whom do you
love more?''

Ann F. Lewis, political director of the Democratic National Committee, said the
immigration issue was causing ''stresses and strains within the Democratic
coalition.'' But she added: ''I don't think a single issue of this kind will
tear up the party. The diversity of our coalition has always been a strength.''

President Reagan and the Republican Party are ardently wooing Hispanic voters in
the belief that many share Mr. Reagan's conservative views on national defense
and social issues. Although the Reagan Administration has supported the Simpson-
Mazzoli bill since it was introduced in 1982, Administration officials have not
been active or outspoken in pushing the bill this year.

Peter D. Kelly, chairman of the California Democratic Party, said: ''If the
Simpson-Mazzoli bill passes, the political consequences for Democrats,
especially in the Southwest, would be disastrous. It would be a slap in the face
to one of our biggest voting blocs, Hispanic Americans, and it would give
Hispanic voters a strong reason to stay home or vote for President Reagan.''

Mr. Simpson and Mr. Mazzoli have said the legislation is essential if the
country is to regain control of its borders. But the Hispanic Caucus of the
Democratic National Committee, at a meeting last month, adopted a resolution
saying it was ''firmly and unequivocally opposed to the Simpson-Mazzoli bill.''

Dissent by Caucus Member


One caucus member, J. F. Otero, filed a dissent. Mr. Otero, vice president of
the Brotherhood of Railway and Airline Clerks, serves as a spokesman for the
A.F.L.-C.I.O. on questions of immigration and refugee policy.  In a letter to
Representative Geraldine A. Ferraro of Queens, chairman of the Democratic
Platform Committee, Mr. Otero expressed ''strongest opposition'' to the position
taken by the Hispanic Caucus. He warned that the caucus resolution ''would be
very divisive for Hispanics and the Democratic Party.''

In a policy statement, the A.F.L.- C.I.O. said an immigration bill should impose
penalties on employers hiring illegal aliens, establish ''a system for
verification of the identity of job applicants'' and provide a ''generous''
amnesty for illegal aliens already here. The federation also supports amendments
to the Simpson-Mazzoli bill that are designed to prevent employment
discrimination.

In its resolution, the Hispanic Caucus of the Democratic National Committee said
it opposed any bill that ''uses employer sanctions as a means of controlling
immigration.'' It says a worker identification system could violate the civil
liberties of citizens and permanent resident aliens. It contends that illegal
aliens ''do not take jobs away from U.S. citizens.''

Manatt to Meet With O'Neill


Hispanic Democrats are urging the chairman of the Democratic National Committee,
Charles T. Manatt, to use his influence to block action on the Simpson-Mazzoli
bill or at least to guarantee full, open debate in the House. Mr. Manatt said he
wanted to ''respond to the Hispanic leaders' concern'' and would meet soon with
the Speaker of the House , Thomas P. O'Neill Jr., Democrat of Massachusetts, to
discuss the issue.

There has always been some tension between labor unions and Hispanic groups in
their approach to immigration, but the strains increased this year as the House
prepared to take action on the Simpson-Mazzoli bill. Political interest in the
issue may reach a peak as candidates for the Democratic Presidential nomination
campaign in Texas, which holds caucuses May 5, and California, which holds a
primary June 5.

The candidates, Walter F. Mondale, Gary Hart and the Rev. Jesse Jackson, all
oppose the Simpson-Mazzoli bill on the ground that it could increase
discrimination against Hispanic workers. Michael Kantor, co-chairman of the
Mondale campaign in California, who is also a partner in Mr. Manatt's law firm,
said, ''The bill's use of employer sanctions and a worker identification system
is anathema to the coalition we are trying to create.''

Mr. Mondale said last week that he supported ''the thrust'' of an alternative
immigration bill offered by Representative Edward R. Roybal, a California
Democrat. Mr. Roybal rejects employer sanctions as ''unworkable and
discriminatory.'' His bill would provide more resources to enforce existing
labor laws, on the theory that employers hire illegal aliens because they can be
exploited.

Representative Bill Richardson, a freshman Democrat from New Mexico, said he had
been asked by Speaker O'Neill to try to negotiate a compromise acceptable to all
factions in the House. ''My role is to be a broker,'' said Mr. Richardson, a
member of the Congressional Hispanic Caucus.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              183 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                April 22, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE WORLD;
India and Bangladesh Exchange Fire on Border

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 5, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 207 words

DATELINE: NEW DELHI, April 21


Indian and Bangladeshi troops exchanged gunfire Friday night in a dispute over
India's construction of a fence along the border to prevent illegal immigration.
At least one person was killed, an Indian spokesman said today.

The dead man was identified as a member of the Bangladesh Rifles, which patrols
the border. Another Bangladeshi soldier was seriously wounded in the gunfight in
Dhubri district, in the state of Assam, according to a report from Dhaka.

(In Dhaka, a Foreign Ministry spokesman said the Indian High Commissioner had
been summoned to receive a protest note over the shooting incident, Reuters
reported.)

Bangladesh has described India's plan to build the barbed wire fence along its
1,000-mile border as an ''unfriendly act.'' The fence was proposed last year
after some 5,000 people were killed in rioting in Assam during protests against
illegal immigration from Bangladesh.

According to the Indian spokesman, Bangladeshi troops crossed into Assam, filled
up trenches that were dug for the fence and uprooted pillars marking the border.
Later, a Bangladeshi patrol fired at Indian workers and soldiers without
provocation and the Indians returned the fire in ''self defense,'' the Indian
spokesman said.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              184 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                April 20, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

IN PARIS, A YOUNG BLACK SOCIETY

BYLINE: By JOHN DUKA

SECTION: Section A; Page 16, Column 2; Style Desk

LENGTH: 1229 words

DATELINE: PARIS, April 15


In the past 10 years, the young blacks here from Africa and the West Indies have
created a highly developed network among themselves as well as their own popular
culture. While the recent immigration, both legal and illegal, of black workers
from Africa has created racial tension in France, young, educated blacks born in
France and known as the second generation seem to be successfully developing a
way of life not unlike that of the young people of other Western countries.

This may not be readily apparent, however, to many people who visit the city.

George Mingo, an American black on vacation in Paris, sat in an outdoor cafe on
the Right Bank as a soft rain speckled his trench coat.

''I've looked and looked but I couldn't find one black club, or very many young
blacks,'' he said. ''As far as I can see, all the blacks here just hold menial
jobs. I can't wait to go home.''



Varied Levels

If Mr. Mingo had stayed a little longer, or looked a little deeper, he just
might have discovered that the levels of black culture in Paris are as varied as
in the United States.

The city boasts black radio stations, such as Tropique FM and Afrique FM; black
restaurants, including Le Kaissa, 11 Rue des Deux- Gares, and La Savane, 4 Rue
Marie- Stuart; black food shops; black discoth eques, like Rex, at 3 Boulevard
Poissonni ere, and Ruby's, on the Rue Dauphine; black publications such as
''Jeune Afrique''; black beauty salons; even a black library.

Black style has even been adapted by Jean-Paul Gaultier, the young fashion
designer, whose recent fall collection was partly an act of homage to the street
style of blacks. Yet despite the new visibility of black culture in Paris, it is
often paradoxically closed off to American blacks.

''To the French,'' said Carol Mongo, a black American writer who has lived in
Paris for five years, ''black Americans are Americans first and blacks second.
And that is exactly the way black Africans look at us. Our tastes are different.
Our ways of looking at things are different. It's a little like saying that just
because we're black, we're the same. But we're not.''

Moreover, cultural differences often sharply divide blacks from Africa and those
from the West Indies.

''Black Africans often don't like blacks from the Caribbean and vice versa,''
said Josee Alnalt, a young black from Martinique, who danced with a group of
friends one day at Bataclan, 23-36 Rue de la Grange- aux-Belles. Bataclan is one
of the three most popular clubs here, catering to youths of high-school age who
dance there on Saturday afternoons. ''Africans feel people from the Caribbean
try to ignore that they were once African,'' he said. ''They often say we have
black skins but white minds.''

Nevertheless, it is becoming more and more difficult for this highly
particularized kind of discrimination among blacks to withstand the ameliorating
influences of music and fashion, both of which are causing a cultural mixing.
Indeed, cross-cultural blending is more and more commonplace in Paris between
blacks, particularly those in high school and college, and other young people.



Music Crosses Barriers

''Music is cutting across all barriers,'' said Sydney Duteil, whose Sunday
afternoon television dance show is called ''Hip-Hop.''

''In general, young blacks are creating a new culture for themselves in Paris,''
he said. ''We listen to reggae, to music from Africa, to English and to American
music. Michael Jackson is a role model. Everyone was very surprised, for
example, that my TV show didn't get any hate mail because there are blacks and
Arabs and whites dancing with each other. But music is becoming a powerful
weapon against racism.''

So is fashion. Although the vogue for black models in Paris has cooled recently,
the fashion world of Paris is one area in which blacks can still make it and
make it big. One of these is Mounia Orosemann, a black from Martinique who is
one of the most successful mannequins in Paris and who uses only her first name.

''I don't see a lot of racism,'' said Mounia as she sat in her apartment in
Neuilly. On the sofa behind her were drawings by the fashion photographer Guy
Bourdin that she had just purchased. ''My father is white, my mother is black,''
she said. ''I'm a mixed person and my mind is very modern. Many of the other
young blacks in Paris are the same way. We don't think about our national
differences. We think, instead, about mixing, about being modern, about a modern
black community that can embrace everything.'' The young black culture of Paris
often closely parallels that of blacks in America. On weekends, for example, Les
Halles, a shopping district of Paris, is filled with many young blacks wearing
their version of the latest fashions. The earmarks of the new black style in
Paris worn by both men and women include plain sweat clothes set off with at
least one patterned garment, yachting caps, black sunglasses, felt hats with
small brims and large crocheted caps. Almost everyone wears something tied
around his neck, whether it is a scarf or a sweater. And hair, in a variation of
the cornrows that became popular in the 1970's, is tightly braided and often
piled up to look like a turban.

On any given day, a visitor to the Metro at Les Halles can find impromptu black
music groups playing on the various levels of the subway, Rastafarians playing
reggae on one floor, black Africans on another. And on Wednesdays and Saturdays,
the Trocadero, the square that overlooks the Eiffel Tower, becomes a sort of
monumental stage set for young blacks, who do break dancing or the Smurf, their
version of the electric boogie. One of them was a young man named George from
Cameroon.

''This is where I learned to break,'' he said, as three young blacks skated by,
one of them carrying a large portable cassette player that boomed music into the
atmosphere. ''My friends here are from Martinique and Guadeloupe. There may be
racism, but when you're friends you don't think about where you come from.''

''I think the future is one of mixing,'' said Jean-Baptiste Mondino, one of the
leading art directors in Paris, who has just completed a black rock video.
''People mixing their cultures, for example. Black culture mixing with Arab
culture and all of it mixing with technology. The future will belong to
mulattoes.''



Interracial Marriages

In fact, interracial marriages are not uncommon among the young in Paris.
Christine Brossart, for example, is young, blond and French and works for
Scooter, a leading French accessories manufacturer and boutique. Her husband is
a musician from Senegal. ''In Paris, people don't stare at you if you're black
or if you are white and walking with a black,'' she said. ''When we walk our
child, no one notices.''

This breaking down of racial and national differences, although still in its
early stages, is also being experienced by professional blacks from a number of
countries. At Ruby's, for example, black diplomats, lawyers, doctors and
executives from Africa and the West Indies stay up late into the night dancing,
often with whites. Owned by Samba Watt, Ruby's is a private club with a front
door that has one of those speakeasy windows in it. To get in, the face on the
other side must recognize you, otherwise the answer is ''Sorry, we're full.''
And Ruby's generally is.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photos of young blacks

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              185 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               April 19, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
Comment on Aliens Angers Ethnic Leaders

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 16, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 140 words

DATELINE: SAN JOSE, Calif., April 18


An immigration official's assertion that one-fourth of the workers in the
electronics concerns near here are illegal aliens has drawn an angry response
from Hispanic leaders.

''I think it's a real gross distortion,'' said Esther Medina, executive director
of the Mexican American Community Services Agency.

Fernando Chavez, president of the Mexican-American Political Association, the
son of the farm labor leader Cesar Chavez, called the estimate ''ridiculous''
and ''ludicrous.''

But Harold Ezell, regional commissioner of the Immigration and Naturalization
Service, is sticking by his estimate. He says that, if anything, the actual
percentage of illegal workers is probably higher.

Mr. Ezell issued his estimate Monday as his agency marked the opening of a new
office here with 19 arrests in raids at two electronic concerns.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              186 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               April 18, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

HIGH COURT BACKS FACTORY SEARCHES FOR ILLEGAL ALIENS

BYLINE: By LINDA GREENHOUSE, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1178 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, April 17


The Supreme Court ruled today, 7 to 2, that immigration officials may conduct
unannounced raids on factories and businesses to look for illegal aliens.

The decision, overturning a lower court's ruling, validated one of the
Immigration and Naturalization Service's most widely used and effective
techniques for finding illegal aliens.

Under this technique, immigration officials enter a factory after obtaining
either the owner's permission or a search warrant. While some agents stand at
the doors, others walk through the factory, questioning workers about their
immigration status.



20,000 Arrests in a Year


Those workers who cannot answer to the agents' satisfaction or produce
immigration papers, often as many as half of all the workers, are arrested. The
surveys have resulted in as many as 20,000 arrests a year in the Los Angeles
area alone.

The United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit, in Los Angeles, ruled
in 1982 that the technique was unconstitutional. The court said that the method
constituted a ''seizure'' of a factory's entire work force, in violation of the
Fourth Amendment's prohibition against unreasonable searches and seizures. It
also ruled that an individual worker could not be questioned unless the agents
had a ''reasonable suspicion'' that the worker was an illegal alien.



Both Aspects Overturned


In an opinion by Associate Justice William H. Rehnquist, the Supreme Court today
overturned both aspects of the appellate court's reasoning. The entry and
behavior of the agents could not be regarded as a ''seizure'' of the entire work
force, Justice Rehnquist said, because the factory's occupants remained at least
theoretically free to walk out at any time. Anyone who tried to leave would have
been questioned, he said, but would have been allowed to go after answering
satisfactorally.

''Mere questioning,'' Justice Rehnquist said, ''does not constitute a seizure.''

Justice Rehnquist said that while actual detention required at least ''some
minimal level of objective justification'' under the Fourth Amendment, the brief
and limited questions asked of most workers and answered were simply ''classic
consensual encounters'' that raised no Fourth Amendment issue.

Outside of the nine Western states in the Ninth Circuit, the Immigration Service
has continued to conduct factory raids.  The Ninth Circuitcovers California,
Montana, Idaho, Washington, Oregon, Arizona, Nevada, Alaska and Hawaii.  In the
New York metropolitan area, a raid in South Plainfield, N. J., led to the arrest
of 107 suspected illegal aliens last August.  The Federal and city authorities
raided 27 massage parlors and nightclubs in February 1983 and charged 22 people
with attempting to bribe immigration officials. The authorities also arrested 46
illegal aliens, most of whom were described as Korean women who had been
''smuggled'' into the United States to work in massage parlors here.

Verne Jervis, a spokesman for the Immigration Service in Washington, said the
agency kept no records on the numbers of raids it conducted or the numbers of
people apprehended in the metropolitan area.

Justice Rehnquist's opinion, I.N.S. v.  Delgado, No. 82-1271, was joined by
Chief Justice Warren E. Burger and Associate Justices Byron R. White, Harry A.
Blackmun, John Paul Stevens and Sandra Day O'Connor.

Associate Justice Lewis F. Powell Jr. wrote a separate concurring opinion. He
said the factory raid should be regarded as the equivalent of an immigration
checkpoint at the border, which the Court has found to be constitutional.

Associate Justice William J. Brennan Jr. wrote a dissent that was joined by
Associate Justice Thurgood Marshall. While they agreed that the entire work
force had not been seized, they said that ''only through a considerable feat of
legerdemain'' could the individual questioning not be regarded as a ''seizure.''

They said the raid was a ''frightening picture of people subjected to wholesale
interrogation'' under conditions designed to intimidate.

The practice was challenged by the International Ladies Garment Workers Union
and four of its members who had been questioned in Immigration raids on two Los
Angeles factories. Two of the members were citizens and two were legal
residents, so none of the plaintiffs in the 1978 lawsuit had actually been
detained. Their request for a declaration that the raids were unconstitutional
was denied in Federal District Court before the Court of Appeals ruled in their
favor.

Other actions at the Court included these:

Outdoor Areas

Voting 6 to 3, the Court reaffirmed a doctrine of the law of search and seizure
first announced in a 1924 decision by Justice Oliver Wendell Holmes. Under this
doctrine, the police do not need a search warrant to enter and search an outdoor
area beyond the immediate environment of a private home, even if the area is
posted with ''no trespassing'' signs and is clearly intended to be private.

The owner's desire for privacy is irrelevant, the Court said in an opinion by
Justice Powell. Such an expectation of privacy in an open field is not
''legitimate in the sense required by the Fourth Amendment,'' Justice Powell
said, noting that the amendment explicitly protects only ''persons, houses,
papers and effects.''

The opinion decided two cases, both of which concerned warrantless police
searches of fields where marijuana was being cultivated. In one case, Oliver v.
U.S., No. 83-15, the United States Court of Appeals for the Sixth Circuit relied
on the open fields doctrine in upholding the search of a secluded patch of
marijuana deep in the Kentucky woods. The Court today upheld that decision.

In the second case, Maine v. Thornton, No. 82-1273, the Court overturned a
ruling by the Supreme Court of Maine, which had ruled that a similar search
violated the landowner's privacy.

Justice Marshall wrote a dissent, which was joined by Justices Brennan and
Stevens. They called the Court's opinion ''startling,'' noting that the Court
had given Fourth Amendment protection to telephone conversations, offices and
other locales not mentioned by the amendment itself.

California Land

The Court ruled that California must compensate landowners if it wants to impose
public uses on privately owned coastal land that before 1848 was part of Mexico.
A major portion of California's coast is in that category.

The 8-to-0 decision overturned a ruling by the California Supreme Court, which
had applied the state's ''public trust'' doctrine to coastal areas that had been
in private hands continuously since the treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo ended the
Mexican War.

Under that doctrine, the state could evade normal eminent domain procedures and
use the land without compensation to the owners.

In an opinion by Justice Rehnquist, the Court said California could not now
claim these areas unless it had asserted a claim in the 1850's. The case, Summa
Corp. v. Calif., No. 82-708, concerned a small lagoon near Marina del Rey.
Justice Marshall did not vote in the case.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              187 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                April 17, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

SECTION: Section A; Page 19, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 188 words


General's Trip Cost Put at $683,727


WASHINGTON, April 16 (AP) - Attorney General William French Smith's 23-day trip
around the world in 1982 to campaign for greater drug control efforts cost more
than $683,727, according to documents made public today.

That figure does not include salaries or hotel charges for 16 Justice Department
officials and 11 Federal agents who went along, nor any of the expenses for six
officials from the State Department, Drug Enforcement Administration and
Immigration and Naturalization Service.

The figure also leaves out all the costs of preparing for the trip, except
world, three by a consultant and one by Mr. Smith's spokesman, Tom DeCair.

In response to a request by The Associated Press under the Freedom of
Information Act, the Justice Department made public the expense vouchers for Mr.
Smith and his party more than 17 months after the unprecedented trip ended Nov.
10, 1982.

Department officials had said the announcement was delayed because some expenses
had not been submitted. Mr. Smith himself was the latest to submit his expense
account, filing it Feb. 3.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              188 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                April 16, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

C.I.A. CHIEF SEES MIGRATION, NOT MINING, AS PUBLIC WORRY

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 8, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 334 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, April 15


The Director of Central Intelligence, William J. Casey, says he believes the
American public is more concerned about the wave of immigration that would
follow new Soviet and Cuban gains in Central America than about reports that his
agency has supervised the mining of Nicaraguan harbors, according to an
interview in U.S. News & World Report.

In the interview in this week's issue of the magazine, Mr. Casey declined to
comment on the mining, which is intended to curb a flow of weapons that the
Reagan Administration says the leftist Government of Nicaragua is channeling to
guerrillas in El Salvador.

But the head of the Central Intelligence Agency was quoted as saying: ''I think
that people in the long run are less concerned about reports of mining
Nicaraguan harbors than they are about the danger of creating a wave of
immigration into this country if Central America or any part of it should fall
under Soviet-Cuban domination.''

''If we have another Cuba in Central America, Mexico will have a big problem and
we're going to have a massive wave of immigration,'' he was quoted as saying.
''The effort to prevent this from happening is not going to excite Americans as
much as the threat they would face if things go wrong.''

Mr. Casey also said rebels seeking to overthrow the Sandinista regime in
Nicaragua, some of whom are reportedly supported by C.I.A. funds, are likely to
fail.  ''I think there's no chance that they will be able to overthrow the
Government,'' he was quoted as saying. ''In the resistance you have, it is said,
perhaps 15,000 men with rifles scattered around the open, unpopulated parts of
the country, which is where guerrillas can hide.

''They can't go into the cities, which the Government is protecting with tanks
and 75,000 men in the army, the militia and the security forces.''

He said chances that the Nicaraguan population would rise up and overthrow the
Government was ''a very long shot and unlikely'' because it is kept under close
control.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of William Casey

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              189 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                April 13, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

State Dept. Fights Bill Favoring Salvadorans

BYLINE: Reuters

SECTION: Section A; Page 4, Column 4; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 132 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, April 12


A State Department official said today that Salvadorans illegally in the United
States should not be given special status to stay here because of what might
happen to them if they were deported.

''Some groups argue that illegal aliens who are sent back to El Salvador meet
persecution and often death,'' Elliott Abrams, Assistant Secretary of State for
Human Rights, told a House subcommittee on immigration and refugees.

''Obviously, we do not believe these claims or we would not deport these
people.''

Mr. Abrams testified against a bill that would allow Salvadorans illegally in
the United States to remain in this country for at least three years. This
status is given when the Government believes conditions in another country
jeopardize the safety of those forced to return.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              190 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 April 8, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION BILL IS HARDLY HOME FREE

BYLINE: By

SECTION: Section 4; Page 2, Column 3; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 979 words


ROBERT PEAR

WASHINGTON - Once again last week there was a flurry of activity over
immigration legislation, which has passed the Senate and seems to have a better
than even chance of reaching the floor of the House.

Immigration has always aroused strong passions among a wide range of interests
including labor unions, business organizations, farmers, religious groups and
Hispanic Americans. But in an election year, when voters choose 435 House
members as well as a President, the passions are perhaps stronger than usual.
Republicans, eager for swift floor action, accuse Democrats of delaying it for
reasons related to partisan politics.

The Speaker of the House, Thomas P. O'Neill Jr., after blocking action on the
bill last year at the behest of Hispanic lawmakers, was excoriated by
Republicans, who demanded that he ''free'' the immigration legislation. Mr.
O'Neill is now putting pressure on other House leaders to move the bill to the
floor. Aides to the Speaker said he wanted to let the House ''work its will,''
even though a full-blown debate would almost certainly be the occasion for
bitter strife among Democrats. ''There will be a lot of blood spilled,'' said
Garner J. Cline, staff director of the House Judiciary Committee, ''and
unfortunately it's all Democratic blood.''

The basic bill, as approved by the House Judiciary Committee last May, would
outlaw the hiring of illegal aliens while offering legal status to those who
entered the United States illegally before Jan. 1, 1982. In this respect, it is
more liberal than the Senate-passed bill, which would grant permanent residence
to those who arrived before 1977 and temporary resident status to those who came
later, but prior to 1980.

The Reagan Administration supports the bill, sponsored by Representative Romano
L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky. The push for such legislation has been a
bipartisan effort, led in the Senate by Alan K. Simpson, a Wyoming Republican.
The basic argument for the measure is that it would permit the nation to regain
control of its borders. Representative Dan Lungren, a California Republican,
notes that ''apprehensions of illegal aliens at the United States-Mexico border
exceeded the one million mark for the first time in our history in the fiscal
year ending Sept. 30, 1983.'' The Simpson-Mazzoli legislation seeks to cut off
the supply of jobs that are presumed to be the principal attraction for illegal
aliens.  The fight over immigration legislation by outside lobbyists is mirrored
within the House itself, where several committees have proposed major amendments
to the Mazzoli bill. The Agriculture Committee, for one, reflecting the concerns
of farmers who grow perishable fruits and vegetables, would establish a
guest-worker program. The Education and Labor Committee, more sensitive to the
pleas of union lobbyists, would raise labor standards and add statutory
protections to prevent any adverse effect on domestic workers.

Some Hispanic organizations and Hispanic lawmakers, tired of being denounced as
obstructionists, have recently come up with their own proposal, sponsored by
Representative Edward R. Roybal, a California Democrat. It omits the
guest-worker program and the penalties on employers for hiring illegal aliens.
But it would authorize stricter enforcement of existing labor laws, would
increase the budget of the Border Patrol and would, like the Mazzoli bill, offer
legal status to illegal aliens who arrived before 1982.

Hopes for CompromiseThe House Rules Committee, which serves as a kind of
gatekeeper, deciding what bills go to the floor and under what conditions, began
to sort through all these proposals last week. It heard testimony from 25
members of Congress and plans to hear from at least 20 more this week, an
unusually large number. Committee members hoped they could avoid a messy floor
fight by inducing the witnesses to negotiate some compromises before the bill
reaches the floor. In a post- election session in 1982, a similar bill died on
the House floor as opponents staged a ''filibuster by amendment.'' It was, said
Mr. Mazzoli, ''the search for perfection, the futile, quixotic search for
perfection'' that killed the bill then.

The Rules Committee may be able to avoid a repetition of that experience by
restricting the number of amendments that can be offered. If the House is
allowed to work its will, the best guess of many Congressional aides and
lobbyists is that the House would approve an expansion of the temporary foreign
worker program, reject proposals for stronger safeguards against discrimination
and adopt stricter criteria for the amnesty program, moving the eligibility date
back to 1981 or 1980, as in the Senate bill.

Mr. Simpson, Mr. Mazzoli and other key lawmakers could probably reconcile
differences between Senate and House bills if given an opportunity to do so. But
the legislation could get tied up in election-year politics. Walter F. Mondale,
Gary Hart and the Rev. Jesse Jackson have all stated their opposition to the
Simpson-Mazzoli bill. If it comes to the floor of the House in May or June, just
as Texas is holding caucuses and California prepares for its Presidential
primary, the Democratic candidates might try to outdo each other in their
efforts to block action on the bill.

If Congress fails again to pass a comprehensive immigration bill, Federal
authorities might step up enforcement of existing laws, both at the border and
inside the country. Congress could enact separate bills to deal with specific
problems, such as the claims of 7,200 Haitians and more than 100,000 Cubans who
came to the United States in 1980. A large influx of illegal aliens, prompted
perhaps by further turmoil in Central America, could intensify the pressure on
Congress to restrict all immigration.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: drawing

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              191 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 April 8, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition



SECTION: Section 10; Page 27, Column 1; Travel Desk

LENGTH: 331 words


Airports

To the Editor: John F. Burns's article ''Moscow's Airport: Soviet to the Core''
(Travel, March 4) was a true and chilling picture of Soviet customs practices. I
was particularly interested in the paragraph about literature and confiscation.
It happened to me. Last October I was bringing in four copies of my own book,
''American Mosaic: The Immigrant Experience in the Words of Those Who Lived It''
(co-authored with Joan Morrison), as gifts for my Russian friends. This is an
oral history of American immigration, and I was well aware that a few of the
stories were not exactly glowing testimonials to Soviet life. However, I
reasoned, the book itself was not anti-Soviet, and, besides, no customs agent
would take the time to pore through 457 pages in English searching for a
possible negative statement.

I was wrong. The scene was Borispol Airport, outside of Kiev, and although it
was not in the ''back room'' mentioned by Mr. Burns, I was detained and
questioned for a period of two and a half hours. Although several customs
officials were present from time to time, one man was clearly in charge. I
noticed that he studied the table of contents carefully and then turned to
specific pages in the book. Finally, he approached me. His English, though
accented, was excellent, and he was quite familiar with American life and
American literature. He was charming and pleasant, his questions about my
motives interspersed with observations about American writers. He smiled a lot
and even joked. But in the end he pointed to one sentence in the book that
closed the issue once and for all. One of the people I interviewed had
complained, ''Russian life (is) like a life in jail.'' My friendly customs agent
didn't agree, and he suggested that such a dangerous opinion belonged in the
United States and should stay there.

And so, my books were confiscated. Maybe some K.G.B. agents are studying them
right now.

CHARLOTTE FOX ZABUSKY Pittsburgh

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of departure hall at Sheremetyevo Airport, Moscow

TYPE: letter

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              192 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                April 7, 1984, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

CONGRESS;
ON IMMIGRATION, A POWER BEHIND THE SCENES

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section 1; Page 7, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 1021 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, April 6


When people search for reasons to explain why Congress did not pass a
comprehensive immigration bill last year, one name is repeatedly mentioned:
Garner J. Cline, staff director of the House Judiciary Committee.

In theory, Mr. Cline is one of many anonymous, self-effacing employees who make
the paper flow on Capitol Hill. In fact, he demonstrates how a knowledgeable
staff member who knows his way around Capitol Hill can wield power that far
exceeds what his title would suggest.

In private conversations, Mr. Cline, who is widely respected for his knowledge
of immigration law and of the political process, has, like many lawmakers,
expressed doubts about the workability of the immigration bill.

The bill would forbid employers to hire illegal aliens, while offering legal
status to many of them. It is supported by the Reagan Administration, which sees
it as a way to curtail illegal immigration. But it is opposed by Hispanic
groups, which fear the bill would lead to an increase in employment
discrimination.

All agree that it would have widespread legal, economic and social implications.
The bill has yet to reach the floor of the House, but there was renewed interest
this week as the Rules Committee held a hearing on it.  The rules panel sets the
terms of debate and decides which amendments may be offered on the floor.

Long Ties to Immigration


A dapper, round-faced man, Mr. Cline came to Washington in 1951, operated
elevators in the Capitol while attending Georgetown University Law School and
then went to work for Francis E. Walter, his hometown Representative in
Congress, who was the father of a landmark immigration bill, the McCarran-Walter
Act. Only seven of the 435 people now serving in the House were members when Mr.
Cline started work on Capitol Hill. Mr. Walter, like Mr. Cline, was a Democrat
from Easton, Pa.

Mr. Cline's current patron, Representative Peter W. Rodino Jr. of New Jersey,
the Judiciary Committee chairman, entered into negotiations to obtain an
acceptable immigration bill last spring. Mr. Cline privately and correctly
predicted that the bill would get tangled in a clash of conflicting interests.
The Senate passed a similar version of the legislation last May, two weeks after
the bill was approved by the House committee.

Mr. Cline's admirers, including some Hispanic lobbyists, say he shows realism
and wisdom born of long experience on Capitol Hill. His critics say he has
obstructed the bill in defiance of public opinion and the will of Congress.

Senator Alan K. Simpson, a Wyoming Republican who heads the immigration
subcommittee, and his House counterpart, Representative Romano L. Mazzoli,
Democrat of Kentucky, have labored for two years to win approval of the
legislation.

'A Whale in the Pond'


''Jim Cline is a heavyweight, a real heavyweight,'' says Mr. Simpson. ''He's an
old pro. He has seen lots of Simpsons and lots of Mazzolis come and go. He's an
awesome part of the process, a whale in the pond. His lack of enthusiasm for the
bill is contagious in the House.''

Without question, Senator Simpson said, he ''has been more influential than some
members of the House on immigration.''

Mr. Cline, seen by a nationwide television audience in 1974 when he called the
roll of Judiciary Committee members as they voted articles of impeachment
against President Nixon, now runs a staff of 84 people and a committee budget of
$1.6 million. His own salary is $67,200 a year.

Like most Congressional aides, he is modest about his role. ''I just work
here,'' Mr. Cline said. ''I don't determine policy. It's my practice to keep a
low profile, to be seen as little as possible.''

From 1955 to 1957, Mr. Cline gained valuable experience as clerk to the
Democratic committee that allotted patronage jobs to party members based on
seniority. In 1957 he moved to the House Judiciary subcommittee on immigration,
where he met Frances Christy, the subcommittee clerk, whom he later married. She
is an immigration lawyer.

Lawrence H. Fuchs, executive director of a blue-ribbon study group in the Carter
Administration, the Select Commission on Immigration and Refugee Policy, said
Mr. Cline would ''sit there like a pasha'' while others thrashed out complex
questions. ''He seemed to be so convinced that immigration reform was impossible
that he did not actively engage in the work of our commission as other
Congressional staff people did,'' Mr. Fuchs said.

''That's true,'' Mr. Cline said, ''and there was a reason for it.'' The
commission staff, he said, ''was wasting time'' on questions that Congress had
thoroughly explored.

Roger Conner, executive director of the Federation for American Immigration
Reform, a coalition seeking more restrictive immigration laws, said Mr. Cline's
role had been to ''slow and divert the Simpson-Mazzoli bill at crucial points.''

Mr. Cline and Mr. Rodino ''delayed the bill with casual, subtle foot-dragging,''
Mr. Conner asserted. ''I'm not saying they were against the legislation, but
their strategy helped create the situation where it bogged down.'' Hispanic and
other groups took advantage of the delay to galvanize opposition to the bill, he
said.

'I Can't Delay a Bill'


Mr. Cline disputed that account. ''I can't delay a bill,'' he said. ''I don't
schedule bills.'' Aides to Mr. Rodino said the New Jersey Democrat had, for more
than a decade, led efforts to revise the immigration law and to stop the hiring
of illegal aliens.

Dale Frederick Swartz, president of the National Immigration, Refugee and
Citizenship Forum, a private nonprofit group, said Mr. Cline ''may have more
practical experience and wisdom on immigration issues than anyone else in
Washington.''

''Some people may assert that he is obstructing the Simpson-Mazzoli bill, but
that doesn't mean he is obstructing immigration reform,'' Mr. Swartz said. ''He
is committed to reforms that can be effectively implemented. To achieve that
goal, he wants active participation by the wide variety of constituencies and
Congressional committees most expert in this complex area.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: drawing

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              193 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               April 4, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

BAR PANEL URGES END OF LAW THAT LIMITS ENTRY INTO U.S.

BYLINE: By DAVID MARGOLICK

SECTION: Section A; Page 12, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 364 words


A law that authorizes Federal officials to bar foreigners from entering the
United States because of their political beliefs hampers the free flow of ideas
and should be repealed, a City Bar Association panel has recommended.

In a report issued this week, the bar group concludes that the statute, the
McCarran-Walter Immigration and Nationality Act, contravenes the spirit of both
the Helsinki accords of 1976 and the First Amendment, and amounts to Government
regulation of ''what we see, hear, and experience.''

The statute lumps Communists and anarchists with prostitutes, polygamists,
professional beggars, stowaways, lepers and psychopaths, and permits consular
officials or the Attorney General to deny them visas.

In recent years, it has been used to bar entry into the United States to a wide
range of figures, including the Rev. Ian Paisley, the Northern Irish Protestant
leader, Roberto D'Aubuisson, a Salvadoran presidential candidate, and Gabriel
Garcia-Marquez, the well-known Colombian writer.

''Foreign visitors are turned away, discouraged from applying to enter or
granted visas only after intolerable delays, solely because of suspect
beliefs,'' the report, written by the bar association's committee on immigration
and nationality, states. ''As a result, our citizens are denied exposure to
ideologies relevant to our world, however antithetical to our dominant beliefs.

The statute attacked in the report was enacted in 1952, in the middle of the
McCarthy era, and bears the name of its chief Senate sponsor, Pat McCarran,
Democrat of Nevada.

The McCarran-Walter Act authorizes a consular official or the Attorney General
to deny visas to people seeking entry into the United States to ''engage in
activities prejudicial to the public interest'' as well as to those advocating
''the economic, international, and governmental doctrines of world Communism.''

Under a 1977 amendment to the act, the Justice Department can grant waivers to
people whom the department deems ''inadmissible.'' But this procedure, the bar
panel says, is ''cumbersome and expensive,'' and can cause those submitting to
it to miss the very event they had sought to attend.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              194 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               March 29, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

Chilean Exile Is Suicide

BYLINE: Reuters

SECTION: Section A; Page 12, Column 3; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 73 words

DATELINE: TORONTO, March 28


A Chilean seeking refugee status committed suicide before he was to testify at
an immigration hearing. The Chilean, Raul Rivadeneira, hanged himself on Monday
and left a note asking that his lawyer, John House, send his belongings to his
wife and four- year-old son in Chile. Mr. House said Mr. Rivadeneira was
dreading the prospect of recounting the torture he was subjected to after being
arrested during the military coup in 1973.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              195 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                March 27, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE WORLD;
MEXICAN EX-POLICE CHIEF IS HUNTED IN MONTREAL

BYLINE: Reuters

SECTION: Section A; Page 7, Column 4; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 127 words

DATELINE: MONTREAL, March 26


The Royal Canadian Mounted Police have staked out a suburban Montreal house
owned by the wife of a former chief of police of Mexico City, who faces charges
in Mexico involving weapons, tax evasion and smuggling.

Police and immigration officials said the Mounties were on the lookout for
Arturo Durazo, Mexico City's police chief between 1976 and 1982.

''We know for certain that he has invested his money here,'' one immigration
official said, adding that Mr. Durazo had deposited millions of dollars in a
Canadian bank.

Mexican officials want Mr. Durazo on charges of illegal possession of weapons,
tax evasion and smuggling electronic equipment, cars, liquor and motorcycles.

Mr. Durazo's wife said her husband and their 22-year-old son were in Paris.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              196 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                March 25, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

DEPORTING OF DAUGHTER OF SPY FOR U.S. BARRED

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 20, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 553 words

DATELINE: SAN FRANCISCO, March 24


A Federal judge here has blocked an attempt by the Immigration and
Naturalization Service to deport the daughter of a man described as this
country's top spy in the Philippines in World War II.

In the ruling Friday, Bernard J. Hornbach, an administrative law judge, canceled
the deportation hearings for Belen Guido Ver, 59 years old, the daughter of Col.
Jose de Guido.

Judge Hornbach ruled Friday that the Immigration and Naturalization Service had
failed in its obligation to inform Mrs. Ver that she had been granted permanent
residence status by a special act of Congress in 1949 and that the agency could
not withhold that status from her now.

End to 'Injustice'


''The injustice which has occurred in this case will not be perpetuated,'' Judge
Hornbach said.

After the hearing, Mrs. Ver said she was ''happy and grateful'' and hoped to
become a naturalized citizen.

Mrs. Ver is one of three surviving children of Colonel de Guido, who worked for
American intelligence in his native country, both before and during the Japanese
occupation of the Philippines, gathering information and assisting American
soldiers caught behind enemy lines. The Japanese executed him and three of his
sons in 1945.  In 1949, in recognition of Colonel de Guido's service to the
United States, Congress granted permanent resident status to his widow and
children who were living in this country on temporary visas. The bill, signed by
President Truman that year, directed the Immigration and Naturalization Service
to record the beneficiaries of the bill. To that end, two weeks after the bill
was signed, the State Department informed the Immigration and Naturalization
Service of the visa numbers assigned to the family.

Never Learned of Bill


But the family was never informed of its new status. When Colonel de Guido's
widow became ill in 1951, the entire family abandoned hope of ever becoming
permanent residents and returned to the Philippines. Belen Guido, one of the
Colonel's two daughters, married and raised five children over the next 32 years
in Manila. In 1982, while she was living temporarily in the United States for
business reasons, Mrs. Ver learned through her attorney about the passage of the
special law.

The Immigration and Naturalization Service concedes that it never informed her
that the law had passed and that her status had changed. But Jane Leroe, an
agency attorney, argued at the deportation hearing Friday that immigration
officials had no statutory duty to so notify Mrs. Ver.

Miss Leroe argued that Mrs. Ver had become a permanent resident when President
Truman signed the bill into law and that she had abandoned that status by living
outside the United States for so many years.

Martin J. Lawler, the San Francisco lawyer who represented Mrs. Ver at the
hearing, told Judge Hornbach that his client could not have given up a right she
did not know she had. The immigration agency's failure to inform Mrs. Ver of her
lawful status ''voids a legislative enactment,'' Mr. Lawler said.

Judge Hornbach ruled that Mrs. Ver's ignorance of her true legal status did not
mean that she had forfeited the rights given to her by Congress in 1949 and
canceled the deportation proceedings. Miss Leroe said the Government would
appeal the ruling.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              197 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               March 22, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
Officials May Overlook Caravan of Refugees

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 16, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 140 words

DATELINE: BURLINGTON, Vt., March 21


Federal immigration officials say they doubt they will take legal action against
a group transporting a family of illegal immigrants to Vermont.

The Guatemalan family of seven, accompanied by a group that calls itself an
''underground railroad'' is to arrive in Vermont Saturday. The monks at Weston
Priory in Weston, Vt., have offered the family sanctuary.

The priory is one of 110 churches and other religious institutions in the
country that have declared themselves sanctuaries for refugees.

Immigration officials said the group transporting the family was committing a
felony. But Arthur Poulin Jr., director of the Vermont and Maine district office
of the Immigration and Naturalization Service, indicated that charges were
unlikely.

''I'm not rushing right out for them,'' he said. ''We have bigger fish to fry.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              198 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               March 14, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

WHEN A ROUTINE VISA TO U.S. ISN'T ROUTINE



BYLINE:
By STEPHEN ENGELBERG

SECTION: Section B; Page 6, Column 4; National Desk

LENGTH: 1023 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, March 13


Two weeks before El Salvador chooses a new President, the United States finds
itself in the curious position of supporting the elections but discouraging
visits to this country by any of the six candidates.

The announcement by the State Department last week that the presidential
contenders would be discouraged from applying for visas was the latest twist in
the application of a McCarthy-era immigration law that has stirred criticism
from both the right and the left.

Some seven million people routinely receive permission to enter the United
States each year. But in the last two decades, a small but well- publicized
group of journalists, political figures and scholars have been refused visas
because their visits were viewed as ''prejudicial'' to American interests
abroad.

In its first three years, the Reagan Administration has rejected roughly the
same number of visa applications for political reasons as the Carter
Administration, according to State Department records. But President Reagan's
actions under the 1952 McCarran-Walter Immigration Act have nonetheless spurred
protests because many of those turned down are critics of American foreign
policy.

33 Reasons for Rejection

There are 33 grounds for refusing a visa to an alien, ranging from evidence of
drug abuse to the advocacy of anarchy. Two sections of the law cover most of the
politically sensitive cases. One provides for the denial of visas to applicants
belonging to a proscribed organization like the Communist Party, and the other
allows the State Department to reject anyone it has reason to believe would
''engage in activities which would be prejudicial to the public interest, or
endanger the welfare, safety or security of the United States.''

In the case of the Salvadoran presidential aspirants, the State Department's
announcement was aimed at one candidate in particular: Roberto d'Aubuisson, a
former military officer who has been linked to the activities of death squads in
El Salvador.

State Department officials, saying they believe an electoral victory by Mr.
d'Aubuisson would make it more difficult for the Administration to muster
Congressional support for its policy on Central America, asserted that they did
not want to signal any official toleration of his political style on the eve of
the March 25 elections.

The Administration recently defended its use of the immigration law in Federal
court, and it provided some details about the secret deliberations that
accompany the denial of a visa.

'Extremely Important Aspect'

Responding to lawsuits filed in Washington by New York City and by several
groups that had unsuccessfully tried to invite foreign visitors to give
speeches, Under Secretary of State Lawrence S. Eagleburger said, ''The power to
deny aliens admission to the United States for foreign policy reasons, although
rarely exercised, is an extremely important aspect of the Executive's ability to
conduct the foreign relations of the United States.''

''The issuance or denial of a visa to a foreign government official,'' Mr.
Eagleburger wrote in a sworn statement, ''may be taken by the alien's government
as a reflection of United States foreign policy vis- a-vis that government.
Similarly, the denial of visas to foreign government officials is one of the
tools available to a Government to communicate its attitude about the policies
of other states.''

The lawsuits were filed after the State Department refused visas to Tomas Borge,
the Interior Minister of Nicaragua; Nino Pasti, a retired Italian Army general
opposed to the deployment of American missiles in Europe, and two Cuban women,
Olga Finlay and Leonor Rodriguez Lezcano.

New York City joined the case because the city's Commission on the Status of
Women had invited Miss Finlay and Miss Rodriguez to discuss the role of women in
Cuban society.

First Amendment an Issue

The suits argue that the visa denials violate the First Amendment rights of
Americans in the prospective audiences. They contend that Administration
officials ''have employed their visa authority to shape and limit political
debate within the United States.''

Mr. Eagleburger told the court that the reasons for the visa denials were
classified, and he offered to submit an affidavit in closed session. In denying
that the visa actions were motivated by an effort to stifle debate on foreign
policy issues, he offered some explanation of the State Department's procedures
on such denials.

Each case begins with an application by an alien or his government to a United
States consular officer abroad. Because of the sensitivity of visa questions,
possible denials under the political sections of the act are automatically sent
to senior officials of the State Department, Mr. Eagleburger said.

The intelligence agencies and the Department of Justice are then consulted for
what Mr. Eagleburger described as ''routine checks.''

'The Ultimate Determination'

''Depending on the sensitivity of the case,'' he said, ''the ultimate
determination may be made either by the Secretary of State or myself in the
light of Administration foreign policy goals and objectives.''

Mr. Eagleburger, the third-ranking official in the State Department, said he
personally decided to deny a visa to Mr. Borge, the Nicaraguan Interior
Minister.

He said Mr. Pasti's application was denied because he belongs to an
organization, the World Peace Council, that is considered an ''instrumentality''
of the Soviet Government by the State Department.

The two Cuban women were apparently denied visas because the United States
considered their trip to be of an ''official governmental nature,'' he said. The
trip included speeches in New York and before groups like the Cornell Women's
Studies Program and the Harvard University Law School's Women's Law Association.

Miss Finlay was allowed to travel to the United States a month later to attend a
conference when ''the purpose of her trip was, however, altogether different and
not in conflict with United States foreign policy interests,'' the Government
said in court papers.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: drawing

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              199 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                March 11, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

NOTED WITH PLEASURE

SECTION: Section 7; Page 35, Column 1; Book Review Desk

LENGTH: 946 words


Some passages from current and recently published books that we find
particularly appealing.

At Castle Garden


What it was like to arrive in America as a poor immigrant in the 1860's - a
passage from J. F. Federspiel's novel ''The Ballad of Typhoid Mary'' (Dutton).


Among the first sights to welcome the immigrants was the inside of a fortress,
rebuilt to serve as an opera house, though it had served for dogfights as well.
Hard-bitten wrestlers and boxers with bare fists had given performances there,
along with fire-eaters and screeching singers who had been chased off the stage
in Vienna or Berlin. Castle Garden - the new name given Castle Clinton - had
been an opera house for a short time. . . . Its doors were sealed, and in 1855
the New York Immigration Authority decided to rebuild the place as a processing
center for immigrants. Needless to say, there was little reconstruction. The
trashy decor was stripped off, the chandeliers were auctioned, and with all the
hammering, the stucco fell from the ceiling. The once luxurious lounges were
turned into showers. No immigrant was permitted to set foot on the clean new
land without taking a shower, and his clothes had to be disinfected in a steam
oven before he was allowed to put them back on. Only then did the painful
questions begin.

Wherefrom? Whereto? Howcome? Howmuch?  Journeys Never Made


The late Richard Rovere looks back, half ruefully, on his literary career in
''Final Reports'' (Doubleday), his ''personal reflections on politics and
history in our time.''

My past is strewn with abandoned projects and plans for journeys never made. The
books I have started and put aside far outnumber those I have completed. This is
true of many writers, perhaps of most. Visions that take radiant shape in the
darkness have a way of fading in daylight. It is almost in the nature of
enthusiasms that they become wasting assets. But I think that this has happened
with me more often than with most. For one thing, working journalists regularly
chase wild geese. Like firemen, they answer alarms, many of them false; not
their own passions but those of others determine much of what they do. Self-pity
is an occupational disease, sometimes disabling, and I have spent God knows how
many hours asking myself if I was really put on this earth to write about the
likes of Richard Nixon and Joe McCarthy, to spend years chronicling the madness
of our war in Vietnam. To feel thus ill-used is, of course, unworthy, but though
eight books bear my name I cannot deny that I have wasted much time thinking
about how much time I was wasting, and I have explored many a mare's nest in
search of a solid structure. I have consoled myself with the thought that some
runners, I among them, are sprinters, and that some run the marathon, and that
both are valued in their own contests. And with the saying - I think it comes
from the Reverend Sydney Smith - ''Give me a short book on an inescapable
subject.'' Center and Circumference


Margaret Atwood discusses Canada and Canadian-American relations in her new
collection of essays, ''Second Words'' (Beacon Press).

Finally, in the very last year of high school, by which time many future
citizens had dropped out anyway, we got a blue book called ''Canada in the World
Today.'' It was about who grew the wheat, how happy the French were, how well
the parliamentary system worked for everybody and how nice it was that the
Indians had given us all their land in exchange for the amenities of
civilization. The country we lived in was presented to us in our schools as
colorless, dull and without much historical conflict to speak of, except for a
few massacres, and nobody did that any more. Even the British war of conquest
was a dud, since both of the generals died. It was like a hockey game in which
both teams lost. . . .

I remember ''Canada in the World Today'' with modified loathing - ''Canada comes
of age,'' it trumpeted, not bothering that what happened to you when you came of
age was that you got pimples or a job or both - and still not a year passes
without some politician announcing that Canada has finally grown up. Still, the
title is significant. Canada sees itself as part of the world; a small sinking
Titanic squashed between two icebergs, perhaps, but still inevitably a part. The
States, on the other hand, has always had a little trouble with games like
chess. Situational strategy is difficult if all you can see is your own borders,
and beyond that some wispy brownish fuzz that is barely worth considering. The
Canadian experience was a circumference with no center, the American one a
center which was mistaken for the real thing.  Against Self-Sufficiency


One of Wendell Berry's notes on ''Unspecializing Poetry'' in his collection of
essays ''Standing by Words'' (North Point Press).

The notion that a poem is autonomous seems to appropriate the divine character
of self-sufficiency - which theology and biology deny to creatures - to apply it
to the creature of a creature.  On the Subject of Satyrs


''The Clown's Report on Satyrs,'' from ''Maximum Security Ward amd Other Poems''
(Persea Books), a substantial new selection from the work of the late Ramon
Guthrie, edited by Sally M. Gall. On the hoof or dead, a satyr weighs about the
single same. They mingle with goddesses and singe themselves in flame that they
ignite with steady gaze while they recite the name of One who in the olden days
slept on Naxos' shingle, and they are golden ruddy in the sun and hold
themselves aloof. A satyr on the hoof is fleet. Slaughtered, their dark red meat
is strong.B

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: drawings

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              200 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 March 2, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION REFORM TOO TOUGH ON REFUGEES

SECTION: Section A; Page 26, Column 4; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 378 words


To the Editor:


In a Feb. 19 news article, U.S. immigration service officials are quoted as
describing pending immigration reform legislation (the Simpson-Mazzoli Bill) as
a solution for about 120,000 asylum applicants whose cases are pending in the
United States.

The goal sought by the legislation is laudable, but the manner in which that
goal is achieved is fraught with risk. In fact, if enacted in its current form,
the legislation would adversely affect refugees.


* The legislation introduces a new ''summary exclusion'' procedure which makes
it possible to turn back at the border those aliens who do not have valid
passports or visas - and many people who flee persecution in their own countries
arrive without personal documents.

Moreover, many will be hesitant to make their claims to uniformed border
officials, who may remind them of oppressive authorities back home. Safeguards,
such as announcing the right to counsel and the right to apply for asylum, would
be necessary to protect refugees from being returned to territories where they
would face persecution.


* Other provisions would diminish refugees' access to Federal courts, and the
courts have recently played an important corrective role on behalf of asylum
seekers, including Haitians and Salvadorans. Access to the courts to insure fair
consideration of asylum claims should be maintained.


* Strict time limitations would be imposed upon refugees. Given the particularly
vulnerable situation of people who are often unfamiliar with our language and
our legal system, and who may have undertaken long and perilous journeys through
unfamiliar territories, those limitations may cause great injustices. Sufficient
flexibility should be permitted so that asylum seekers will have enough time to
obtain legal assistance and to present their claims adequately.  Immigration
reform is surely desirable, and fair and expeditious asylum determination is a
humane goal. However, it is important not to let the desire for reform lead to
procedures that deny refuge to those who really are fleeing persecution.

ARTHUR C. HELTON New York, Feb. 22, 1984

The writer heads the political asylum project of the Lawyers Committee for
International Human Rights.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: letter

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              201 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              February 28, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
U.S. Judge Lifts Order On Detention of Minors

SECTION: Section A; Page 14, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 104 words

DATELINE: LOS ANGELES, Jan. 27


Nine hundred and seventy-four children held for up to four days in Immigration
and Naturalization Service detention centers were again eligible for release or
deportation today after a Federal district judge lifted a temporary restraining
order barring the immigration service from deporting unaccompanied illegal alien
minors.

Six hours after the order was lifted, the Border Patrol began taking youths to
the Mexican border in buses for expulsion.

Judge Edward Rafeedie warned the immigration service that any violation of an
earlier injunction that protects alien minors' rights may amount to contempt of
court.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              202 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               February 26, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

ANTI-DEPORTATION ORDER CROWDS HOLDING CENTERS

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 32, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 486 words

DATELINE: LOS ANGELES, Feb. 25


Immigration officials fumed and Border Patrol holding stations filled up with
children after a Federal district judge temporarily barred the Immigration and
Naturalization Service from deporting alien minors not accompanied by adults.

By noon Friday, roughly 200 juveniles were being held around the country under
the terms of the order. Last weekend, motel rooms had to be rented to
accommodate children who could neither be deported nor released, and officials
expressed concern about even worse crowding this weekend.

The ban, issued late Wednesday by Judge Terry Hatter, followed the accidental
deportation of a 14-year- old legal resident who spent five days wandering in
Tijuana and San Diego before being reunited with his family last Monday. The
order will remain in effect at least until this Monday.



Youth Says He Was Intimidated

The youth, Mario Moreno Lopez, a resident alien living in Santa Ana, Calif., was
arrested along with 33 people suspected of being illegal aliens. He said he was
twice intimidated into signing voluntary deportation forms and was not advised
of his right to demand a hearing before deportation.

The youth said he did not have his papers identifying him as a legal resident
because his father, Juan Moreno Garcia, was afraid he would lose them.

Judge Hatter, a former juvenile court judge, said he was ''rather appalled'' by
the immigration service's actions and that such mistakes can seriously damage
juveniles.

The Immigration and Naturalization Service is investigating whether the youth's
civil rights were violated and whether the agents involved should be
disciplined.



Mistakes Rare, Officials Say

Officials of the service said the temporary order would cause hardships for
their officers because they could release the children only to their parents,
who are often not to be found. They said the accidental deportation was a rare
occurrence.

''It's a very unusual situation, and it wouldn't have happened if the boy had
had his proper documentation or had not changed his story,'' said Duke Austin, a
spokesman for the immigration service in Washington.

Immigrant rights organizations and attorneys in the case disagreed. Attorneys
for the two groups that sought the injunction also contend the immigration
service has violated an earlier Federal court order that says unaccompanied
alien juveniles must not be coerced into signing voluntary deportation forms and
must be informed of their rights.

''This is just one of many instances of the abuse of rights by the I.N.S.,''
said Linton Joaquin, an attorney for the National Center for Immigrants' Rights.
''In the earlier case that brought about the first injunction, we've documented
15 other cases of children being coerced into waiving their rights.''

Peter Schey, an attorney for Mr. Moreno Lopez and his father, said the father
was considering suing the service.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              203 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               February 26, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

HEADLINERS

SECTION: Section 4; Page 7, Column 3; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 131 words


Mario Moreno Lopez left home without a certain green card recently, and it cost
him a lot more than the inconvenience of not being able to charge a meal. Mario,
who is 14 years old, was picked up by immigration officials on a sweep of
illegal immigrants in Santa Ana, Calif., where he resided legally with his
father. He said he told the Federal agents that he had left his ''green card''
at home, but said he confessed to being an illegal immigrant when he saw the
agents physically abuse another detainee. He was subsequently deported to
Tijuana, Mexico, where his father searched for him for several days. They were
reunited last week after Mario sneaked back into the United States. Mr. Lopez
said he was considering a lawsuit.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of Mario Moreno Lopez

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              204 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              February 25, 1984, Saturday, Late City Final Edition


;
AT THE HEART OF U.S. IMMIGRATION PROBLEMS

SECTION: Section 1; Page 22, Column 4; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 282 words


To the Editor:


Deploying more border patrolmen and removing jobs that lure undocumented workers
into the United States, two approaches cited in a Feb. 13 news article, are not
ways to solve the nation's immigration problems. Once again, the blame is placed
on the victims.

Unless one gets to the reasons people come to this country for work, it will be
difficult to find solutions. The fact is that U.S. employers want a cheap labor
force, whether it is through use of undocumented workers or through ''guest''
employee programs. Further, undocumented people - principally from Mexico - are
driven by conditions of poverty in their own country to seek jobs in the U.S.

There would be some relief of the overall problems if the U.S. would increase
the number of immigration visas from Mexico and other countries by doing away
with country-by-country quotas. That could mean more workers coming to the U.S.
from Mexico, and fewer from Sweden, for example, which never fills its quota.

Further, U.S. labor laws should be enforced for the benefit of all workers -
especially those regarding the minimum wage and safety regulations. This would
remove the incentive for employers to hire undocumented or ''guest'' workers.
There also should be a stepped-up legalization program for people already in
this country, and Border Patrol officers should be trained to be more sensitive
to detainees, to explain their rights to them and to avoid discriminatory
practices against Hispanic people in this country.

DOMINGO GONZALEZ Philadelphia, Feb. 15, 1984

The writer is national representative of the American Friends Service
Committee's Mexico/U.S. Border Program.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: drawing

TYPE: Letter

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              205 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              February 23, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

NICARAGUAN JEW SEEKS U.S. RELIGIOUS ASYLUM

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section A; Page 3, Column 4; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 102 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, Feb. 22


A 22-year-old Nicaraguan Jew has made a 'highly unusual' request for religious
asylum in the United States, asserting that life in his homeland is 'impossible'
for Jewish people, immigration officials said Monday.

Most refugees in the United States ask for political asylum, said George
Waldroup, a spokesman for the United States Immigration and Naturalization
Service.

'I'm not here trying to turn the U.S. people against Nicaragua,' the refugee
told The Miami News. 'But things are getting bad there. The people are afraid,
and they're hungry. And for a Jew living there it is just impossible.'


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: map of Nicaragua

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              206 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             February 22, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
Official Urges Inquiry Into Deporting of Youth

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 10, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 148 words

DATELINE: LOS ANGELES, Feb. 21


An immigration official today called for an investigation of agents who deported
a 14-year-old Mexican youth who was in the United States legally.

The youth, Mario Moreno Lopez of Santa Ana, said Immigration and Naturalization
Service agents intimidated him into waiving his rights and that he sneaked back
into the United States after being taken to Tijuana. The boy was found wandering
in San Diego late Monday and was reunited with his older brother today, five
days after he was dropped off at the border.

Because of discrepancies between the boy's statements and immigration agency
accounts of his experience after he was rounded up on a Santa Ana street corner
Feb. 15 with 33 other suspected illegal aliens, Ernest Gustafson, district
director of the immigration service, said he was asking the Justice Department's
Office of Professional Responsibility to investigate.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              207 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              February 21, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
2 Bahamians Convicted In Drug Conspiracy

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 12, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 133 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, Feb. 20


A Federal court jury convicted two Bahamians today of drug conspiracy for
accepting a $100,000 bribe to arrange a cocaine shipment to Florida.

Jurors deliberated more than four hours before finding Samuel Miller, a
businessman and chairman of the National Progressive Party, and John J. Rolle,
an immigration officer in Nassau, each guilty of two conspiracy counts.

Mr. Miller was also convicted on eight counts of travel in furtherance of the
conspiracy. Mr. Rolle was found guilty of two travel counts.

District Court Judge Sidney Arnovitz set sentencing for March 28.

The two men were arrested Oct. 29, 1983, in Miami. The Drug Enforcement
Administration said they had just accepted an $88,000 second payment of a
$100,000 bribe. Videotapes of the meeting were played at the trial.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              208 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               February 19, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. STILL BLACKLISTS 3,000 CANADIANS FOR POLITICS

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 21, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 613 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Feb. 18


More than 3,000 Canadian citizens are still barred from entering this country
because they have been identified as Communist Party members or sympathizers,
according to the Immigration and Naturalization Service.

The agency said this week that a list of such people was drawn up under the
terms of the 1952 McCarran-Walter Immigration and Nationalty Act. One of the
law's sections prohibits what it terms subversives - including what it defines
as Communist Party members or sympathizers - from entering the United States.

''I think it's outrageous,'' said Representative Barney Frank, Democrat of
Massachusetts. ''We shouldn't keep people out because we don't like their
politics.''

Mr. Frank has introduced a bill to prohibit the immigration service from
excluding foreigners on the basis of their political affiliation. Mr. Frank said
he has been promised that the House Judiciary Committee's subcommittee on
immigration will hold hearings on the bill this spring.

The Immigration and Naturalization Service estimates that 8,000 people from 98
countries are restricted from entering this country because of their political
beliefs. Duke Austin, a spokesman for the agency, said that the Canadians form
the largest group excluded.

Among those whose names have appeared on the list over the years is Pierre
Elliott Trudeau, now the Canadian Prime Minister. Mr. Trudeau's attendance at an
economic conference in Moscow in 1952 prompted the Immigration and
Naturalization Service to classify him a Communist sympathizer. But his name was
struck from the list after an interview with immigration officials at the United
States consulate in Montreal in 1954.

In practice, the excluded Canadians often enter this country on highways where
border enforcement is lenient, according to an attorney with a client on the
list. They may also request a temporary waiver to legally enter the United
States.

Such waivers are good for up to one year, and virtually all requests are
granted, Mr. Austin said. To process each waiver, however, can take from two
weeks to several months and cost $500 to $1,000 in legal fees.

''It boggles my mind,'' said Martin Berger, whose family law firm in Montreal
has assisted many Canadians on the list in the past 20 years. ''I don't believe
that at any point a majority of these people were fervent Communists. And today,
they're politically harmless.''

Some Canadians on the list contend United States immigration officials treat
them as they would dangerous criminals, political terrorists and drug dealers,
who are among the other 40,000 foreigners branded as inadmissable to this
country. The list is kept at all seaports, airports and highway border
crossings.

Edward Zackon, an Ottawa insurance salesman, said United States immigration
officials have stopped him three times in American airports. Mr. Zackon, who is
62 years old, said he severed all ties with the Communist Party in 1956. But in
1971, Mr. Zackon said, he was detained in New York, questioned by an immigration
official and escorted by armed guard to his connecting flight to Montreal.

Getting off the list altogether is a difficult process. Individuals must apply
for ''defector status'' from the Communist Party, provide character affidavits
from five people and prove they have ''actively opposed the Communist doctrine''
since they left the party. This can sometimes take several years and cost
several thousand dollars in legal fees.

''Not too many go through the process,'' Mr. Austin conceded.

Canadian and United States officials said they're willing to re-examine
individual cases, but a blanket amnesty is impossible without changes in the
law..


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              209 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               February 19, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

Immigration Official Quits

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section 1; Part 2; Page 61, Column 5; National Desk

LENGTH: 48 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Feb. 18


Gerald Riso, deputy commissioner of the Immigration and Naturalization Service,
has resigned effective Feb. 24 to return to private business. Alan Nelson, in
announcing the resignation Friday, said Mr. Riso was instrumental in preparing
pending immigration reform legislation.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              210 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               February 13, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

BIGGER BORDER PATROL CAN'T HALT INLUX, AGENTS SAY

BYLINE: By ROBERT LINDSEY

SECTION: Section A; Page 12, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 1191 words

DATELINE: SAN YSIDRO, Calif., Feb. 12


The Reagan Administration has drafted plans to deploy hundreds more
law-enforcement officers along the Mexican border in a new effort to halt the
influx of illegal aliens.  But Border Patrol agents say it will take more than
additional manpower to end illegal immigration.

''You need something to remove the lure that brings them here, jobs,'' said Alan
Eliason, who heads operations of the United States Border Patrol here at the
southwestern corner of the nation. Government investigators say most illegal
aliens come in through this area.

''Last year in this sector of the border, which is 66 miles long, we apprehended
more than 430,000,'' Mr. Eliason said. ''This year I don't see any letup. The
flow is continuing at high, extraordinarily high levels. It's as if we were
under siege.''



Not All Are From Latin America

He said his agents recently noticed increasing numbers of people from countries
outside Latin America seeking to enter illegally.

In its proposed budget for the 1985 fiscal year, the Reagan Administration is
seeking an increase of more than $41 million, to a total of $574 million, for
the Immigration and Naturalization Service, of which the Border Patrol is a
part.

Included in the proposal is a projected expansion of the Border Patrol by more
than than one third, to a total of 3,200 agents.



Total of 3,200 Agents

According to officials of the service, most of the 850 additional agents would
be assigned to the 66-mile border sector here, where more than 40 percent of the
million illegal aliens caught trying to enter the country last year were
apprehended, and to a somewhat shorter stretch near El Paso, the second most
popular point of attempted illegal entry.

The budget also proposes more electronic detection equipment, motor vehicles and
aircraft to help police the border.

Even if the additional equipment and manpower are authorized by Congress, Border
Patrol officials interviewed last week predicted that large numbers of
immigrants from Mexico, Central America, Asia, the Middle East and other parts
of the world would still manage to enter the country illegally.

Easy to Find Holes


They asserted that it would be relatively easy for aliens to find unguarded
holes in the 1,952-mile-long border between the United States and Mexico.

''It will help, but I would hate to think that people will think the new
personnel will solve all the problems, because they won't,'' said Larry
Richardson, the Border Patrol's chief at El Paso.

Without legislation imposing sanctions on employers that hire illegal aliens, he
said, the new agents ''will be swallowed up'' by an increasing influx of poor
people propelled by visions of jobs in this country.

Illegal aliens, often willing to work for low wages, have become an important
source of labor for agriculture, restaurants and hotels and in the garment
industry, among many other manufacturing enterprises.

Congress Debates Penalties

Among the central issues in the long Congressional debate over the future of
immigration policy are whether employers should be subject to fines or criminal
penalties for knowingly hiring illegal immigrants and how tough the penalties
should be.

Such sanctions are part of an immigration reform bill drafted by Senator Alan K.
Simpson, Republican of Wyoming, and Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat
of Kentucky.  Though the legislation was approved by the Senate last year,
action on a slightly different version of the bill was blocked in the House by
Speaker Thomas P. O'Neill, Democrat of Massachusetts.

He cited his concern that President Reagan might veto the legislation and score
an election-year advantage with Hispanic voters. He also cited opposition from
some Hispanic Congressmen who argued that the bill could hurt all Americans of
Hispanic ancestry because some employers might deny them jobs merely on the
basis of their appearance.

Bill Now Moves Forward


After Administration officials reassured him that Mr. Reagan would not veto the
bill, which also includes a limited program of amnesty for some illegal aliens
already in this country, Mr. O'Neill reversed himself. He has allowed the
legislation to move forward and has predicted it will be passed.

The bill is expected to reach the floor of the House next month. Hispanic
Congressmen and some organizations of farmers and businessmen are expected to
try to weaken the provisions for employer sanctions.

Representative Daniel E. Lungren, Republican of California, the ranking minority
member of the House subcommittee handling the bill and one of its principal
backers, said in a telephone interview that he expected the bill ''to pass, and
pass by a good margin.''

But Mr. Lungren said he was concerned that the employer sanctions would be
''watered down,'' adding, ''The jobs factor is something we can and must deal
with.''

Groups Oppose Sanctions


Representative Robert Garcia, a Bronx Democrat who heads the Congressional
Hispanic Caucus, confirmed in a separate interview that attempts would be made
to weaken proposals for employer sanctions.

''I believe that employer sanctions must be avoided,'' he said, adding that if
they are necessary, they must ''not discriminate against people who have an
accent or look 'different.' ''

According to the Immigration and Naturalization Service, more than a million
aliens were caught trying to enter the country illegally in the fiscal year that
ended last Sept. 30, 40 percent over the previous year.

The agency says it has no idea how many managed to enter, but some officials say
probably only a small fraction were captured.

Aliens Work in Many Areas


Last year, the mothers of an estimated two-thirds of the children born in Los
Angeles County's three major public hospitals were illegal aliens. Labor leaders
and Government officials say the undocumented immigrants are holding jobs that
could be taken by unemployed citizens.

''People think all of the illegals work on farms - that's not true,'' said
Arthur W. Shanks, deputy district director for the immigration service in San
Francisco. ''We've had lots of illegals who were making in excess of $10 an
hour.''

The Reagan Administration and, to some extent, state officials in California and
Texas have been raiding farms, factories and other places where illegal aliens
work, and have also been refusing to grant work permits to aliens who have
applications pending for legal status.

But officials say several court decisions objecting to such policies as
unconstitutionally discriminatory, have limited their effectivness.

Last month the United States Supreme Court heard arguments in what immigration
officials said was a pivotal case, an appeal by the Justice Department of a
lower court ruling that it is unlawful for Border Patrol agents to go to a work
place and detain and question anyone who appears to be of Hispanic ancestry.

But Mr. Eliason, chief of the Border Patrol here, said that until it becomes
impossible for illegal aliens to find work, ''this thing will go on and on.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: photo of aliens crossing the Rio Grande into the U.S.

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              211 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               February 13, 1984, Monday, Late City Final Edition

FLORIDIANS SEEK RESIDENCY STATUS FOR HAITIANS, ALONG WITH CUBANS

SECTION: Section A; Page 15, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 528 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, Feb. 12


Quick passage of a bill introduced by Representative Peter W. Rodino Jr. to
legalize the immigration status of some 7,200 Haitian refugees is being urged by
some Miami leaders as a way to lessen tension between Cubans and Haitians here.

Representative Claude Pepper, Democrat of Florida, and others called for the
Reagan Administration to endorse the bill after the White House was reported to
be offering permanent residence status to some 125,000 Cubans who came to this
country by sea in 1980 from the Cuban port of Mariel. Classified as ''Cuban/
Haitian Entrants - Status Pending,'' they are ineligible for resident status in
this country.

The New York Times reported today that the Administration had decided to extend
to the ''Marielitos,'' as the Cubans are known, the provisions of the 1966 Cuban
Adjustment Act, under which Cubans who arrived here before the boatlift became
residents.

Priest Tells of Support


''The Reagan Administration should endorse the Rodino bill,'' said the Rev.
Thomas G. Wenski, of the Notre Dame of Haiti Catholic Church in Miami. ''I
talked with many of my parishioners after masses today and their perception is
that granting adjustment to the Cubans is patently a political action to obtain
Hispanic votes. Most Haitians are glad the Cubans will become residents, but
they don't want to be discriminated against. Besides, with all the racial
problems here now we don't need this new friction.''

Mr. Rodino, chairman of the House Judiciary Committee, introduced his bill
Thursday. He said that ''technically'' both groups ''have never been illegal
aliens,'' and that they have been ''suspended in a legal limbo with uncertain
future.''

''We want them to be treated the same,'' he said.

Mr. Pepper said today that he hoped the bill, with ''some modifications,'' could
be passed this session.

Meetings With Lawmakers


Dr. Eduardo G. Padron, the Cuban- born chairman of Greater Miami United, an
organization that has worked for more than a year to adjust the status of the
Cubans and Haitians, said his group had recently met with the Speaker of the
House, Thomas P. O'Neill Jr., several members of Congress from Florida and
members of the Congressional Black Caucus who promised to ''push the Rodino
bill.''

''I believe it is an error not to give the Haitians the same opportunity to
become residents as is being given to the Marielitos,'' said Paul Cejas,
chairman of the Dade County School Board, who was born in Cuba. ''The status
both groups now have represents hardship for them. It makes them ineligible for
holding certain jobs, for example receiving teacher certifications, even though
they are de facto residents of the United States.''

Msgr. Bryan O. Walsh, a Roman Catholic Church immigration expert, who was
instrumental in the drafting of the 1966 act, said that ''to act only for the
Cubans is an invitation to divisiveness.'' ''For the welfare of this
community,'' he said, ''it is important that Congress pass the Rodino bill
quickly. It can be done if there is will. The Administration should have given
adjustment opportunities to both groups 18 months ago.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              212 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               February 12, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

CUBAN ALIENS, BUT NOT HAITIANS, WILL BE OFFERED RESIDENCY STATUS

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 1, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 1072 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Feb. 11


The Reagan Administration is planning to offer legal status and citizenship
opportunities to more than 100,000 Cubans who came to the United States by sea
in 1980 from the Cuban port of Mariel.

Immigration officials and Justice Department lawyers said they had concluded
that the Cubans were eligible for legal status under a 1966 law, the Cuban
Adjustment Act.

But in a stance that has angered Representative Peter W. Rodino Jr., chairman of
the House Judiciary Committee, the Immigration and Naturalization Service is not
planning to offer legal status to the 7,200 Haitians who also came to the United
States in 1980. The benefits of the 1966 law are not available to Haitians, the
officials said.



Carter Move Brought Cubans In


As the Government decided it must grant legal status to the ''Marielitos,'' the
Cubans were planning to file a lawsuit in Federal district court to compel such
action.

The Cubans were allowed into the United States in 1980 by President Carter, who
was exercising his emergency parole power. The Carter Administration expected
Congress to pass legislation giving the Cubans permanent resident status, but
Congress failed to do so. Lawyers for some of the Cubans have filed applications
for legal status under the 1966 law.

The law, which was passed in response to Cuban migration from 1959 to 1962 and
resuming in late 1965, authorizes legal status for any Cuban who was ''admitted
or paroled into the United States subsequent to Jan. 1, 1959.''

The immigration service has accepted the Cubans' applications but has not
formally approved or denied the claims, mainly because the Reagan Administration
has been waiting for Congress to take care of the Cubans and Haitians as part of
a new and comprehensive immigration bill.

The Cuban and Haitian refugees have been living in an uncertain legal status
since they arrived in Florida in 1980. They are still officially classified as
''Cuban/Haitian entrants - status pending.'' Under current law, they may not
bring their relatives into the United States, and if they leave this country
they generally may not come back.



Two Bills Could Clear the Way


Both obstacles would be removed if they became lawful permanent residents under
the 1966 statute or if one or both of two pending bills became law.

Some Democrats, after learning of the Administration's plan, said they suspected
it was a politically inspired attempt to win the support of Cuban- Americans.
Alan C. Nelson, the Commissioner of Immigration and Naturalization, denied that.
He said his agency had concluded that the Cubans ''have an entitlement to some
relief under the 1966 law'' and that it would be ''very unfortunate'' if the
Government got into protracted litigation leading to a court-directed
legalization program.

Under the 1966 law, the Cubans could become permanent resident aliens. They
could then apply for citizenship after waiting another two and a half years.
They could not vote in this year's Presidential election, immigration officials
said.

Andrew J. Carmichael Jr., an associate commissioner in the immigration agency,
recommended legal status for the Cubans in a recent memorandum to Mr. Nelson.
The memorandum said, ''I.N.S. should advise Congress that it intends to allow
Cubans who are otherwise eligible to adjust status to permanent residents''

Under the 1966 law, Mr. Carmichael said, ''Congress should be requested'' to
repeal key portions of the law if it objects to this procedure.

Representative Rodino, Democrat of New Jersey, strongly objected. Mr. Rodino
said in a letter to Attorney General William French Smith on Feb. 1, ''Any
program to adjust Cuban entrants must also include Haitian entrants, who have
entered this country under similar, if not identical, circumstances.'' To treat
the two groups differently, he said, would ''violate fundamental fairness.''

A Bill for Both Groups


Cubans and Haitians alike would be eligible for legal status under bills
sponsored by Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming, and Representative
Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky. The bills would establish penalties for
employers hiring illegal aliens and would offer legal status to many illegal
aliens already here.

The Senate has passed a version of the Simpson-Mazzoli bill, but according to
members of Congress, it is impossible to say for sure what action the House will
take. On Thursday, Mr. Rodino introduced a separate bill that would grant lawful
permanent resident status to Cubans and Haitians who arrived here before Jan. 1,
1982. Referring to the Haitians, he said, ''No group in recent history has been
subjected to more injustices by the immigration service.''

Mr. Nelson said the delays in Congressional action on the Simpson-Mazzoli bill
had forced the Administration to consider the Cubans' applications for legal
status under the 1966 law.

'Some Adjustment' in Works


''Planning is going forward with the idea that there will be some adjustment of
status under the 1966 law,'' Mr. Nelson said. He said he could not give a date
for the start of the program. ''It's like the space shuttle,'' he said. ''We
have a lot of things to check out before we launch it.''

At the time of the refugees came here by sea, President Fidel Castro said Cuba
was ridding itself of common criminals, social misfits, mentally retarded
people, political dissidents and other ''scum.''

Philip M. Zyne, a Miami lawyer representing the Cubans from Mariel, said less
than 10 percent of them had criminal records or mental problems. He said many of
the Cubans had held jobs and paid taxes in the past four years.

About 1,100 Cubans who came from Mariel are being held in a Federal prison in
Atlanta. They have been found inadmissible under the immigration law for various
reasons, such as a conviction for crimes involving ''moral turpitude.'' They
would not be eligible for the legalization program, immigration officials said.

The Pros and Cons


In his memorandum to Commissioner Nelson, Mr. Carmichael listed arguments for
and against granting legal status to the Cubans. If the immigration service used
the 1966 law, he said, it ''may appear that the service is favoring the Cubans
over the Haitians.'' He said also some people saw the Mariel Cubans as ''not
deserving'' legal status because of how they entered the United States.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              213 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               February 12, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

CENTRAL AMERICAN REFUGEES' PLIGHT DESCRIBED

BYLINE: By JAMES LeMOYNE

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 41, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 640 words

DATELINE: STONY POINT, N.Y., Feb. 11


Civil war and political persecution have created a refugee crisis in Central
America, a leading refugee worker told a conference on ''The World's Uprooted''
here today.

''We are facing a situation in which more people have fled as refugees in
Central America than from Indochina,'' the worker, Patrick A. Taran, director of
the Immigration and Refugee Program of the Church World Service, said. The
service is a major aid organization that represents 15 major Protestant
denominations.

El Salvador and Guatemala are the countries most affected, Mr. Taran said. The
United Nations and church organizations have estimated that up to one million
Salvadorans have been displaced from their villages, he added. At least 300,000
Guatemalans have also been forced from their homes, most by Government troops
fighting leftist rebels, he said.

More than half a million of the displaced Central Americans have illegally
entered the United States, Mr. Taran said.

The vast majority are from El Salvador, he added, estimating that up to 500,000
Salvadorans have migrated to the United States. About half of them have come
since civil war broke out between leftist guerrilla forces and the Salvadoran
Government, he said.  Precise figures are impossible to come by, but as many as
100,000 Salvadorans may be living in the New York metropolitan area, according
to Joseph Azar, a conference delegate and head of the Central American Refugee
Center in Westbury, L.I.

Mr. Azar said he saw Salvadorans every week who have recently entered the United
States without visas, making them illegal aliens subject to deportation.

Most of the recent Central American immigrants have entered the United States
without visas, Mr. Taran said. United States immigration authorities have sent
up to 400 Salvadorans and Guatemalans a month back to their countries, he added.

Contending that the deportees risk political persecution in their homelands, Mr.
Taran urged the conference to suport Congressional efforts to grant them at
least temporary political asylum. Catholic Church officials in El Salvador have
estimated that more than 40,000 civilians have been killed there in four years
of civil war, most by right-wing death squads and Government security forces.


United States Immigration and State Department officials have said, however,
that Central Americans have chiefly entered the United States seeking employment
and have failed to show a ''well-founded fear of persecution'' needed to qualify
for political asylum and refugee status.

Some 22,000 Salvadorans had applied for political asylum in the United States by
September 1983, Mr. Taran said. Asylum was granted in only 74 of the 1,100 cases
decided by that date, he added.

The conference in this Rockland County town was sponsored by the Maryknoll
Mission Institute, the Union Theological Seminary in Manhattan and the Stony
Point Center, a part of the Presbyterian Church U.S.A. It was attended by about
100 church, refugee and social workers.

Concentrating on the problem of Central American refugees, the conference
included workshops on providing church sanctuaries, legal aid and community
support to illegal aliens.

Phillip Wheaton, director of the Ecumenical Program for Interamerican
Communication and Action, a Washington-based refugee aid group, said that at
least 100 American churches have declared themselves as ''sanctuaries'' for
Central Americans who have entered the United States illegally. The sanctuary
churches provide shelter, food and support to the refugees.

''This is a century of uprooted people and we have not really understood what to
do about the problem,'' one of the participants, Prof. Kosuke Koyama of the
Union Theological Seminary, said in an interview. ''I think it is part of a
Christian commitment to do as much as we can.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              214 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               February 12, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. RECONSIDERING DEPORTATION ORDER

BYLINE: By ALFONSO A. NARVAEZ

SECTION: Section 11NJ; Page 6, Column 5; New Jersey Weekly Desk

LENGTH: 770 words


NEWARK

A33-YEAR-OLD woman from Northern Ireland whose application for political asylum
in the United States was denied and who was ordered deported has been granted a
stay while her application is reviewed by the State Department.

Last Monday, Judge William Strasser of the Department of Justice's Executive
Office of Immigration Review, held a closed-door hearing here on an appeal of
the order deporting Ann M. Devenny, who said she feared for her life if sent
back to Northern Ireland.

The judge, citing the introduction of new evidence, ordered the case sent to the
Office of Humanitarian Affairs of the State Department for reconsideration.

Judge Strasser acted after Representative Robert G. Torricelli, Democrat of New
Milford, submitted a deposition saying he felt that Miss Devenny would be in
danger if returned to her home in Derry City.

''I am concerned about what will happen to Ann Devenny if she had to be returned
to Northern Ireland,'' Mr. Torricelli said in the affidavit. ''I do not believe
she will be safe in that area.'' Mr. Torricelli, who spent three days in
Northern Ireland last month, said the country appeared to be under military
siege.

''It was clear to me that the British forces constituted an army of
occupation,'' he said in the statement.

Miss Devenny, one of nine children, said she feared for her life because she had
recognized one of six members of the Royal Ulster Constabulary, who, she
charged, broke into her home in April, 1969 and beat her father, Samuel Devenny.

Mr. Devenny, 42 at the time, died three months later.

Her mother and her brothers and sisters are living in Northern Ireland, Miss
Devenny said, and are being harassed by the authorities. She said she was not
involved with any political group, either in the United States or in Northern
Ireland.

Miss Devenny, who is staying with an uncle in Teaneck and working as a hospital
switchboard operator, said she had come to the United States in 1980 on
vacation, then stayed on when her grandmother became ill. She said her
grandmother died in 1981 and she applied for asylum here.

However, the application was denied last July.

''I was in total shock,'' Miss Devenny recalled. ''I couldn't believe it. They
told me I had two weeks to pack my things and leave.''

Miss Devenny said that her father had not been active in the political strife in
Northern Ireland. However, she said she feared being hounded and persecuted
because of the new wave of publicity that her attempts at asylum have received
both in the United States and Europe.

''As a result of the information generated with the public as a result of my
situation, there has been increased attention drawn to the still- unsolved
murder of my father,'' Miss Devenny said. ''The perpetrators of the crime are
still at large.

''I was the only eyewitness to the entire incident. I gave statements to the
press, a filmed statement and testified at the inquest. I fear that if I am
returned to Northern Ireland, the Republic of Ireland or Great Britain, I will
be subject to harassment and that people will try to kill me in an attempt to
silence me.''

Miss Devenny said she feared for her safety even in the Republic of Ireland
because it was only five miles from Derry City to the border, which, she said,
was open and thus enabled people to pass easily from one country to the other.

''The same forces who killed my father, and who harassed me and persecuted me
and members of my family, could easily cross into the Republic of Ireland to
harm me,'' she said.

''In addition, I have no family or friends in the Republic of Ireland. I would
not be afforded emotional support, nor would there be anyone to protect my
safety. I would live in constant fear, and I am concerned that my health would
deteriorate further.''

After the hearing, Miss Devenny said she was pleased with the results and hoped
she would be allowed to remain in the United States.

''I love it here,'' she said. ''There is so much freedom and contentment. Life
is so normal. I had forgotten what a normal life could be like. People are so
generous, so caring.''

Mr. Torricelli, who received special permission from the House Ethics Committee
to intercede in a case in which the Government is a party, said that the
decision to return the case to the State Department for review had been correct
because of the complexity of the case.  ''The situation in Northern Ireland is
out of control and dangerous,'' he said. ''We don't want someone who has been
here among us returning to it.''

''Just let me stay here in peace,'' Miss Devenny added.




LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              215 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               February 12, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

GRANT TO JERSEY CITY INSTITUTE TO AID 'UNDOCUMENTED' ALIENS

BYLINE: By PAMELA MARGOSHES

SECTION: Section 11NJ; Page 23, Column 1; New Jersey Weekly Desk

LENGTH: 890 words


JERSEY CITY

 T HE International Institute of Jersey City has received a one-year, $12,000
grant to provide low-cost, legal-aid services for ''undocumented'' aliens, and
to compile information for a study on nonprofit, public-interest law firms and
clinics that deal specifically with immigration issues.

For indigent clients, the legal aid would be free.

Undocumented aliens are those who entered the United States without having gone
through standardized immigration procedures.

The grant, from the Fund for New Jersey, a foundation in East Orange, will allow
the institute to hire a paralegal aide to assist undocumented aliens in the
following areas of immigration law:


- Political asylum claims.


- Labor certification documentation.


- Relative petitions (for people with families already in the United States).


- The right to public education for children of undocumented aliens (a right
recently reiterated by a United States Supreme Court ruling).


- The preparation of all necessary documents (affidavits, supportive
documentation and briefs, etc.) for the adjudication of cases now pending before
the Immigration and Naturalization Service and for cases to be presented to it.

The small fees charged for legal services would be directly funneled into the
legal-defense project.

''The undocumented have certain constitutional rights,'' said Phyllis Bianca,
the institute's attorney. ''They are entitled to administrative hearings and to
legal representation.''

Robert Corman, executive director of the fund, said:

''This is a unique grant, I believe, in the State of New Jersey, and we're
really excited about it.

''This is a new area for us. In the past, we've supported groups dealing with
environmental issues, the homeless and the support of farmworkers in South
Jersey, but we've never gotten into the area of legal defense for the
undocumented.

''I do believe that it's also a first for the state because I called many of the
public-interest agencies, including the American Civil Liberties Union, and none
of them were doing anything to protect the legal rights of the undocumented.

''We're hoping that the institute will be able to set up a kind of information
base with this money. We do understand that this is a controversial area.''

The institute is part of a network of 33 ethnic service organizations affiliated
with the American Council for Nationalities Service. It is the only
International Institute in New Jersey, a state that, according to 1980 Census
figures, has more than 700,000 foreign-born people.

The nonprofit institute serves such disparate groups as Vietnamese and other
Indochinese, Russians, Afghans, Chinese, Poles, Haitians, Egyptians, Iranians
and Hispanic people. It has an annual budget of about $300,000 and receives
funds from the United Way, the Federal Government and charitable contributions.
It has 11 full-time staff members.

In its 65 years in Jersey City, the institute has provided resettlement
services, classes in English, social and translation services and career
counseling. It continues to provide these services.

It also functions as an information bureau on immigration patterns in the state
and on the characteristics, history and institutions of ethnic groups in New
Jersey. In addition, it makes referrals for people seeking to link up with other
organizations that work with ethnic groups.

''We were delighted to receive the grant because this enables us to expand our
service capacity,'' said Dr. Nicholas V. Montalto, the institute's executive
director. ''Although this is a rather controversial area, we are pleased to be
able to provide services for this population.''

Dr. Montalto explained that the grant would not mean that the institute would
focus exclusively on undocumented aliens.

This grant, he said, finances only one activity of the institute, which will
continue to provide a full range of services to all immigrants and refugees.

The International Institutes began at the turn of the century as immigrant
service agencies set up by the Y.W.C.A. The first institute was organized in
1910 in New York City.

For the legal-aid project, undocumented aliens will be reached through
advertisements in the ethnic press and word of mouth.  ''Our institute has an
excellent word-of-mouth reputation among the ethnic community,'' Dr. Montalto
said. ''We don't anticipate problems in reaching out to the undocumented.''

According to Dr. Montalto, it is difficult to correctly assess the number of
undocumented aliens in New Jersey.

''But,'' he said, ''I heard estimates that, for example, there are as many as a
million Salvadorans in the United States now, and there may be as many as 20,000
in New Jersey.''

On March 10, the institute will be the sponsor of a ''career fair'' in Jersey
City for refugee professionals. ''Mentors'' - American and foreign- born
professionals in the fields of engineering, teaching, medical services and other
areas - will conduct workshops to familiarize the refugees with the vicissitudes
of the labor market.

Anyone interested in further information about either the career fair or other
activities at the institute can call Nancy Long, the program director, at (201)
653-3888.

The International Institute is at 880 Bergen Avenue and is open weekdays from 9
A.M. to 5 P.M.




LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              216 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               February 7, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

Cuban Defects in Canada

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section B; Page 20, Column 6; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 45 words

DATELINE: GANDER, Newfoundland, Feb. 6


A 29-year-old Cuban defected from an East German airliner at Gander during the
weekend, Canadian immigration officials said today. He was the ninth person to
defect from an airliner at Gander this year and the second Cuban factory worker
to do so in three days.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              217 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              January 26, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

OUSTER OF SALVADORANS DEFENDED

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section A; Page 6, Column 4; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 296 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Jan. 25


The United States immigration agency said today that up to 50 Salvadorans
reported killed after their deportation from the United States could not have
been granted asylum on the ground that they might die in ''random violence.''

Duke Austin, a spokesman for the Immigration and Naturalization Service, said
the central question concerning such deaths was, ''Were they singled out for
persecution upon return or were they the innocent victims of random violence''
in the war-torn country.

''Just because those people were returned and may have become innocent victims
of some level of random violence in El Salvador does not mean the judgment on
their asylum claims was inaccurate,'' Mr. Austin said.

He was responding to a report in The Los Angeles Times today on preliminary
findings of a study tracking the fate of Salvadorans who were refused asylum in
the United States.

The State Department said it was not familiar with the report and had no
comment.

Peter Schey, head of the Center for Immigrants' Rights, said in the report that
the names of 50 out of 2,500 deportees checked so far appeared on death lists
kept by independent Salvadoran human rights organizations.

Mr. Schey stressed in the report that it still had to be determined whether the
names were those of people who were deported or other Salvadorans with the same
names. ''If the study established that even one out of 100 deportees is met with
torture or death upon their return to El Salvador, that should both morally and
legally be more than a sufficient basis upon which to temporarily suspend such
deportations,'' he told the newspaper.

The study, to be completed later this year, is being conducted jointly by the
American Civil Liberties Union and the Center for Immigrants' Rights.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              218 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              January 26, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

TWO CAMBODIAN YOUNGSTERS' CONTINUING BURDEN

SECTION: Section A; Page 22, Column 5; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 213 words


To the Editor:


I was outraged by the Immigration and Naturalization Service's decision to deny
entry into the United States to two Cambodian unaccompanied minors because, at
ages 11 and 12, they had worked for Pol Pot's forces (news story Jan. 15).

While working with unaccompanied minors in a refugee camp in Thailand in 1982, I
heard numerous children tell of the horrors they had lived through. Child after
child told of how he was forcibly taken away from his family during the
political turmoil in Cambodia in the late 1970's and put to work at some menial
task for Pol Pot's forces, on whom he was completely dependent for food and
survival.  During the Vietnamese invasion of Cambodia in 1979, these children
survived an arduous journey through the jungles of Cambodia into Thailand. Now
they endure the intense anxiety of refugee camp life, not knowing what the
future holds. Many have been in camps for four years, waiting for U.S. and U.N.
bureaucratic wheels to turn.  That any of these children should be denied entry
into the U.S. because they did what they were required to do at such young ages
to survive the intense social upheaval and tragic conditions under Pol Pot seems
absurd and inhumane.

MELANIE WENTZ Brooklyn, Jan. 16, 1984

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Letter

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              219 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              January 21, 1984, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

ELLIS ISLAND'S COMMEMORATION OF TRIUMPH

SECTION: Section 1; Page 20, Column 5; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 224 words


To the Editor:


In his Jan. 14 letter, Arnold H. Vollmer calls for the destruction of the United
States Immigration Station at Ellis Island because immigrants were not cordially
received there.

The Statue of Liberty, he says, should be preserved at any price, but Ellis
Island speaks only of humiliations dealt the would-be Americans who entered it.
To Vollmer, the corridors behind that virile Beaux-Arts facade seemed like a
''charnel house.''

I believe this betrays a very sterile and limited sense of what a monument
should be. The battlefield at Gettysburg, which really did resemble a charnel
house, yearly draws tens of thousands of visitors, and we would all be the
poorer if it were turned into a trailer park because unpleasant things had
happened there.

For the immigrants who passed through it, the station at Ellis Island was only
the first of many hardships they would encounter in their new homeland. It is
their struggle and eventual triumph that Ellis Island rightly commemorates.  The
statue and the island are indispensable to each other: without the station to
mark the reality of the immigrants' experience, the serene, welcoming features
of the Goddess of Liberty would become merely insipid.

RICHARD F. SNOW Managing Editor American Heritage Publishing Co.  New York, Jan.
14, 1984

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: letter

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              220 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               January 20, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

Psst! About That Immigration Bill . . .

SECTION: Section A; Page 22, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 471 words


In Washington, city of lawyers, there's one respect in which lawyers are not
needed. Opportunities for legislative evasion are endless, but when political
practitioners give their word they require no contracts. When they strike a
bargain, it can be counted on. Usually.

There's reason now to wonder how much the Reagan Administration can be counted
on regarding the tortured subject of immigration reform.

Speaker O'Neill must have thought he had a bargain with the President on the
Simpson-Mazzoli bill, a sensible, humane proposal to keep out illegals and halt
the exploitation of aliens already here. The Senate passed the bill easily, but
last October Mr. O'Neill killed it in the House. He feared that if it passed,
the President would veto it, currying favor with some Hispanics - and making the
Democratic House look bad.

Mr. O'Neill's decision prompted a wave of protest from liberals and
conservatives eager for immigration reform. Attorney General Smith and Senator
Alan Simpson brought word from the White House that there would be no such veto,
and the President himself announced that ''I want to sign'' immigration
legislation quickly. Reassured, Mr. O'Neill changed his mind. Next November, he
said, the bill ''will come to the floor; it will pass.''

It would now be understandable if Mr. O'Neill wonders about being torpedoed
after all. Budget Director David Stockman has just circulated a paper expressing
''budgetary and policy concerns with the immigration legislation.'' The cost of
the present House bill, he writes, would make it ''unacceptable.'' What, at this
late stage in the history of the Simpson-Mazzoli bill, is Mr. Stockman up to?
He's worried for sure about spending, and considering the size of the deficit,
deserves sympathy. By one estimate, the Senate version of the bill would cost
$3.6 billion over five years. The present House version might cost three times
that. For Mr. Stockman to resist figures like that is only to do his job. But he
doesn't stop there. He also specifies a series of ''policy'' concerns, like the
effectiveness of immigration enforcement proposals.  Mr. Stockman has to know
the dangers here, to know how hard it has been to get the bill this far and how
many snipers still lie waiting, right and left. His new memorandum can only
encourage them to read between the lines, where he seems to say: ''Psst! Forget
what the President said. That's just to appease the Speaker. We're really
against immigration reform after all.'' Mr. Stockman may have had not the
slightest desire to create doubt about the Administration's intentions. The
Attorney General and the President are probably four-square in their support for
the immigration bill and abhor any impression to the contrary. If so, there's an
easy way for them to make that clear: Say so.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: EDITORIAL

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              221 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              January 19, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

STOCKMAN WARNS IMMIGRATION BILL MAY BE TOO COSTLY

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 4; National Desk

LENGTH: 925 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Jan. 18


David A. Stockman, director of the Office of Management and Budget, has
expressed new concern about a comprehensive immigration bill, saying the cost
would probably be ''unacceptable.'' President Reagan has publicly supported such
legislation.

In a recent memorandum to members of the Cabinet Council on Legal Policy, Mr.
Stockman listed many ''budgetary and policy concerns'' about the bill, which
would offer amnesty to some illegal aliens and penalize employers for hiring
illegal aliens in the future.

He said he was especially concerned about the costs of benefits that would be
authorized for aliens who obtained legal status under the legislation. The
memorandum, which was obtained from Administration officials, was written to
brief the Cabinet council, which discussed immigration proposals at a meeting
this week.



O'Neill's Fear of Veto

The Speaker of the House of Representatives, Thomas P. O'Neill Jr., blocked
floor action last year on a comprehensive immigration bill that many Hispanic
Americans opposed. He said he feared Mr. Reagan would try to score a political
coup by vetoing the bill to win Hispanic support in the Presidential election
this year.

At a news conference Oct. 19, Mr. Reagan reaffirmed his support for ''some
immigration legislation.'' He said, ''I supported actively and worked hard for
the passage twice of the Senate bill on immigration.'' He said he had ''some
disagreements'' with the House bill but concluded, ''I want to sign, as quickly
as possible, immigration legislation.''

Mr. O'Neill, in a reversal, then said he would let the bill come to the House
floor early this year.



'Serious Budget Implications'

However, in the memorandum, dated last Friday, Mr. Stockman wrote, ''Both the
House and Senate bills have serious budget implications for 1984-89.''

He said the Senate-passed bill would cost $10.1 billion and the House bill $13.3
billion over that period, mainly because of social welfare benefits that would
be made available to aliens granted legal status. In budget documents given to
Republican members of Congress earlier this month, Mr. Stockman estimated that
the Federal deficit would average $189 billion a year for the next five years.

If the House passed an immigration bill, it would probably seek a compromise
with the Senate through a conference committee composed of members from both
chambers, according to members of Congress.

''Given the costs of the current House and Senate bills,'' Mr. Stockman wrote,
''the conference outcome (if it splits the difference) is likely to be an
unacceptable $11.7 billion for 1984-89 without forceful intervention by the
Administration.''

Deputy Attorney General Edward C. Schmults, who presided over the Cabinet
council meeting, said disclosure of Mr. Stockman's position ''plays into the
hands of those people who oppose immigration reform'' because it might suggest
that some elements of the Administration were less than enthusiastic about the
bill. Mr. Schmults said the Justice Department disagreed with some of Mr.
Stockman's cost estimates, but he added, ''Intramural differences over the
numbers won't affect our overall stance, our desire to get some solid
immigration legislation passed.''

In his memorandum, Mr. Stockman said it was essential for the Administration to
clarify its position because Congress intended to seek Mr. Reagan's
''concurrence'' before taking final action on any compromise bill. This unusual
arrangement, virtually precluding a veto, ''puts pressure on the President to
take responsibility for the outcome of the bill,'' Mr. Stockman said.

The Office of Management and Budget previously expressed concern about the cost
of immigration legislation, but the last official estimates were lower: $11.5
billion for the House bill and $8.2 billion for the Senate bill. Those
estimates, made last July, covered a shorter period, from 1984 through 1988.

Concern About Cost of Benefit

In his memorandum, Mr. Stockman expressed new ''policy concerns,'' including
reservations about the Senate bill, which the Administration had previously
endorsed. Under House and Senate bills, he noted, some aliens would, in time, be
legally entitled to receive benefits such as welfare, food stamps and Medicaid.

''Both bills,'' according to Mr. Stockman's memorandum, ''create a large new
entitlement group of legalized aliens contrary to Administration efforts to
control entitlement spending.'' Benefits under such programs are automatically
available to people who meet certain eligibility criteria.

Meanwhile, Agriculture Department officials said they were lobbying within the
Administration to gain support for a program that would permit aliens to pick
fruit and vegetables in the United States. Agriculture Secretary John R. Block
attended the Cabinet council meeting this week and, according to his aides, has
expressed support for this guest worker program, which is strongly favored by
producers of perishable commodities.

The Agriculture Department officials said they supported a program similar to
one proposed by Representative Leon E. Panetta, Democrat of California. The
House Agriculture Comittee has approved his proposal, under which it is
estimated that 250,000 aliens would be admitted each year. The American
Federation of Labor and Congress of Industrial Organizations has generally
supported comprehensive revision of the immigration laws, but has opposed this
type of program, on the ground that it would take jobs from American farm
workers.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              222 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               January 15, 1984, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. ENTRY FOR POL POT YOUTHS DEBATED

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 3, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 876 words


An immigration policy dispute has developed over whether children who worked for
Pol Pot's forces in Cambodia in the 1970's should be allowed to enter the United
States, according to United States officials and leaders of human rights and
refugee resettlement organizations.

Several employees of the Joint Voluntary Agency, which screens refugees in
Thailand for the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service, have
challenged the service's rejections of two Cambodian youths.

The dispute centers on how the immigration service should interpret State
Department guidelines designed last year to prevent members of the Pol Pot
forces, which were responsible for countless murders, from entering the United
States.

Although the guidelines do not specifically mention minors, all sides to the
policy dispute agree that many of the killings were the work of execution squads
that included teen-agers, some of whom had been forcibly separated from their
families.

Questions Being Raised

One question being raised by employees of the Joint Voluntary Agency, which is
run by the New York-based International Rescue Committee, is whether children
who performed only menial tasks for the Pol Pot forces should be denied asylum.
Another question, more heated, is whether even those children who were involved
in the killings should be judged more leniently than adults.

The Immigration and Naturalization Service in Thailand rejected the two children
on the basis of their affiliation with Mr. Pol Pot in 1978, when they were 11
and 12 years old, according to Joint Voluntary Agency caseworkers who read the
service's report on the two cases. As many as 100 other youths now waiting in
the Khao I Dong camp, the largest refugee camp on the border with Thailand,
could be similarly turned away, the workers said.

Frank Sieverts, a State Department spokesman in Washington, said about 4,000
refugees in the Khao I Dong camp had ties to the Pol Pot forces. He said
immigration officers had been given a ''broad approach'' to determine which, if
any, were eligible for entry to the United States.

He said officers had to be on the watch for minors who misrepresented themselves
as being separated from their family. Those who do so can become ''anchors'' in
another country and thereby help adult family members join them later. Meantime,
Mr. Sieverts said, ''there are lots of other eligible refugees who should be
processed'' while the issue is resolved.

Under current law, unaccompanied minors are automatically allowed to enter the
United States unless it is shown that they participated in the persecution of
others. The two children rejected by the immigration service were denied on the
ground that they had assisted the Pol Pot forces, even though the Joint
Voluntary Agency's caseworker reported that they had only cleaned engines and
served as messengers. ''The rejections would appear to be illegal,'' the
caseworker said in a memoradun recommending that the cases be presented again.

Immigration officials have refused to discuss specific cases. However, John
Gibson, an immigration officer in Bangkok, said in a telephone interview that
immigration officers consider the recommendations from Joint Voluntary Agency
caseworkers but the final decision is made on the basis of their own interviews
with applicants. He said neither Congress nor the State Department had made a
distinction between children and adults in the law and guidelines on the
handling of cases linked to Mr. Pol Pot.

''Anyone that assisted in the persecution in its varied forms'' might be refused
entry under current interpretation of the guidelines, he said. ''Certainly, many
of the killings were committed by young people,'' he added.

'That's Guilt by Association'

That approach has drawn criticism.

''That's guilt by association,'' said Nicolas Van Praag, the public affairs
officer for the United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees in New York. ''The
whole idea of the unaccompanied minors category is that they are not responsible
for their actions.''

Employees of the Joint Voluntary Agency said there was a sense of urgency in
processing the minors, since many are now in their late teens and, as adults,
will have to prove they were persecuted - something that is difficult for an
18-year-old to document. Additionally, the dry season is beginning, and
officials fear that Vietnamese forces in Cambodia will soon attack refugee camps
near the Thailand border as they have for the past five dry seasons, forcing
thousands more refugees into the Thailand camps.

Charles Sternberg, the executive director of the International Rescue Committee
that oversees the Joint Voluntary Agency in Thailand, said he planned to ask for
a review of the two cases. He said the committee might seek reconsideration by
the immigration service if it could be shown that the children received a ''raw
deal.''

One caseworker, who is familiar with the youths who were rejected, said he felt
the issue was a moral one.''These kids were shown the absolute worst in man,''
he said. ''They were told what war is. That's all they have been given by the
adult world. Let's take these kids and show them what is right. We owe them
that.''


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              223 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               January 13, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

Sharon Asks Portfolio In Israeli Government

SECTION: Section A; Page 3, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 216 words

DATELINE: TEL AVIV, Jan.  12


Ariel Sharon, smarting from being rejected for a high immigration job on
Wednesday, today lashed out at his colleagues in the governing Herut Party for
denying him a portfolio in the Government of Prime Minister Yitzhak Shamir.

The war hero has been a Minister Without Portfolio, a largely honorary post,
since he was ousted as Defense Minister in February 1983 at the recommendation
of an inquiry commission. The group had found him indirectly responsible for a
Lebanese massacre of Palestinians in Beirut refugee camps that were in areas
under Israeli military control.

Appearing before the Herut Central Committee, Mr. Sharon reacted to a member's
criticism of Arye Dulzin, the head of the Jewish Agency, an international
Zionist organization that handles many aspects of immigration to Israel. The
Herut Party had nominated Mr. Sharon as head of the agency's immigration
department, but Mr. Dulzin successfully opposed the bid.

''Mr. Dulzin is not to blame that I have no function in the Government,'' Mr.
Sharon told the Herut leaders, ''and he is not responsible that for nearly a
year I sit at home and operate a tractor on the farm.''

As Prime Minister Shamir and Cabinet colleagues at the presiding table listened
gravely, Mr. Sharon said the problem began within the party.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              224 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               January 13, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

CORRECTIONS

SECTION: Section B; Page 1, Column 6; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 33 words


A Jerusalem dispatch yesterday on the rejection of former Defense Minister Ariel
Sharon as chairman of the Jewish Agency's immigration department misstated the
vote against?him. It was 59 to 48.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: correction

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              225 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              January 12, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition
                              Correction Appended

SHARON IS REJECTED FOR JOB OF INDUCING ISRAELI IMMIGRATION

SECTION: Section A; Page 12, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 361 words

DATELINE: JERUSALEM, Jan. 11


Former Defense Minister Ariel Sharon lost tonight in his bid to become chairman
of the Jewish Agency's immigration department. The vote against him, by Israeli
and foreign members of the General Zionist Council, was 58 to 49.

Such a post in the Jewish Agency, an international Zionist organization that
handles many aspects of immigration to Israel, would have made Mr. Sharon one of
the main forces in the drive to induce more Jews to come here.

Mr. Sharon, now a Minister Without Portfolio in the Cabinet, received strong
public support this week for his candidacy from both Prime Minister Yitzhak
Shamir and the current Defense Minister, Moshe Arens. Speaking on Israeli
television tonight, Mr. Shamir called Mr. Sharon's defeat ''an injustice to the
man.''

Resigned Last February

Mr. Sharon resigned as Defense Minister last February after an Israeli
commission of inquiry found that he bore ''personal responsibility'' for
Israel's decision to send Lebanese Christian militia into two Beirut refugee
camps where hundreds of Palestinians were then massacred.

Opponents of Mr. Sharon's candidacy for the immigration post said the disputes
surrounding him would have a negative effect on attempts to encourage
immigration to Israel.

In Parliament today, Mr. Sharon was denounced by one opposition member, Michael
Bar Zohar, for ''mudslinging at his rivals, attacks on the United States, nasty
relations with Arabs, attacks on the Israeli justice system, attacks on
democracy, on journalism and on the opposition.''

In response, Dov Shilansky, Assistant Minister of Absorption, said the
immigration portfolio of the Jewish Agency was allotted, according to a
long-standing agreement, to Mr. Sharon's Herut Party, to fill as it saw fit.
Herut, the dominating group in the ruling Likud coalition, nominated Mr. Sharon
for the position last week.

In a meeting after the vote, some of Mr. Sharon's Herut allies spoke of asking
Prime Minister Shamir to appoint Mr. Sharon to a specially-created position as
Minister of Diaspora Affairs or Minister for the Jewish People. Mr. Shamir said
he would consider the idea if someone officially proposed it.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

CORRECTION-DATE: January 13, 1984, Friday, Late City Final Edition

CORRECTION:
A Jerusalem dispatch yesterday on the rejection of former Defense Minister Ariel
Sharon as chairman of the Jewish Agency's immigration department misstated the
vote against?him. It was 59 to 48.

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              226 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              January 11, 1984, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

JUSTICES TIGHTEN RULES FOR ALIENS

BYLINE: By LINDA GREENHOUSE

SECTION: Section A; Page 13, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 833 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Jan. 10


The Supreme Court today tightened one of the standards that deportable aliens
must meet to avoid deportation.

The Court ruled that a provision of the Immigration and Nationality Act setting
seven years of ''continuous physical presence'' in the United States as a
precondition for a suspension of deportation is to be interpreted literally.
Even a brief or casual trip out of the country at any time in the seven years is
sufficient to disqualify an alien from meeting the standard, the Court said.

The Justices voted, 9 to 0, to overturn a ruling by the United States Court of
Appeals for the Ninth Circuit, in California. That court adopted a flexible
interpretation of the statute and ordered the Bureau of Immigration Appeals to
reconsider a Thai woman's eligibility for a waiver of deportation.

The woman, whose visa had long since expired, had made a three-month trip to
Thailand within the previous seven years. The immigration board viewed that
absence from the country as disqualifying the woman from consideration for the
suspension of deportation that the Attorney General has the discretion to grant
under some circumstances.

A Continuous Physical Presence

While all nine Justices agreed that the three-month absence was a
disqualification, only five Justices joined the majority opinion, written by
Associate Justice Sandra Day O'Connor. The three other Justices refused to sign
the majority opinion, contending that it went too far in ''compelling a wooden
interpretation of the statutory language.''

Associate Justice William J. Brennan Jr., writing for himself and Associate
Justices Thurgood Marshall and John Paul Stevens, said the Court should have
left room for a more flexible interpretation in future cases.

In her majority opinion, Justice O'Connor said that Congress, when it last
addressed the discretionary waiver of deportation in 1952, changed the existing
requirement of seven years' ''continuous residence'' to one of ''continuous
physical presence.''

That change, she said, ''was no simple accident of draftsmanship'' but
intentionally imposed a more restrictive standard. ''Residence'' is a legal
concept that would permit someone to leave the country briefly with the
intention of returning.

Other Requirements Listed

In addition to the seven-year requirement, an alien seeking to qualify for a
possible suspension of deportation must be of ''good moral character'' and must
persuade the Attorney General that deportation would ''result in extreme
hardship'' to other members of the family.

The majority opinion, I.N.S. v. Phinpathya, No. 82-91, was joined by Chief
Justice Warren E. Burger and Associate Justices Byron R. White, Harry A.
Blackmun, Lewis F. Powell and William H. Rehnquist.

The Court today issued two decisions on the question of when the Federal
Government may relitigate issues it has lost in earlier, similar lawsuits. The
question is highly technical but of considerable practical importance because of
the frequency and scope of litigation involving the Government.

The Government won one case and lost the other, both in 9-to-0 decisions written
by Justice Rehnquist.

In U.S. v. Mendoza, No. 82-849, the Court ruled that the Federal Government is
free to relitigate an issue that it has previously lost as long as the
subsequent lawsuit involves a different party. This is an exception for the
Government from the rule that normally applies to private parties under a
doctrine known as collateral estoppel. Under that doctrine, a party is bound by
the findings of law or fact made by a court in a previous lawsuit.

Effort by Filipino Veteran

The Mendoza case involved an effort by a Filipino veteran of World War II to
become a naturalized citizen under a special program that was briefly available
after the war. The veteran sued on the ground that his constitutional due
process rights had been violated.

Because the Government had previously lost a similar case, which it had not
appealed, a Federal District Court in California applied collateral estoppel and
in effect barred the Government from defending the lawsuit. The Ninth Circuit
upheld that decision. Reversing the appellate court, the Supreme Court said that
because the Government is involved in litigation of ''substantial public
importance'' throughout the country, it must be free to forego appeals without
being bound by the first decision in a lower court.

But in the second case, U.S. v. Stauffer Chemical Co., No. 82-1448, the Court
said the Government was barred, as any private party would be, from relitigating
an issue it had earlier lost against the identical party.

The decision upheld a ruling by the United States Court of Appeals for the Sixth
Circuit, which said the Government was bound by a case it lost against Stauffer
Chemical in another circuit involving the same question, whether the
Environmental Protection Agency could use private contractors to inspect the
company's factories.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              227 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               January 10, 1984, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

SHAMIR FIRMLY BACKS SHARON

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 10, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 180 words

DATELINE: JERUSALEM, Jan. 9


In a declaration of support for Ariel Sharon, Prime Minister Yitzhak Shamir said
today that those who opposed his appointment to a key immigration post were
smearing Israel with responsibility for the 1982 massacres in two Beirut refugee
camps.

Mr. Shamir told the World Zionist Organization's General Council that rejection
of Mr. Sharon ''would be interpreted by the world as Israel accepting the
verdict that it was responsible for the Sabra and Shatila affair.

''And we all know,'' he said, ''that no Israeli soldier or civilian perpetrated
that crime.''

He was responding to an opposition Labor Party delegate in the audience of 500
Jewish leaders, who shouted that Mr. Sharon's connection with the massacres made
him unsuitable for the immigration position.

Mr. Sharon, 55 years old, formerly Defense Minister and now a Minister Without
Portfolio, was nominated by Mr. Shamir's Herut Party to head the immigration
departments of the World Zionist Organization and the Jewish Agency. The job
deals with the immigration and settlement of foreign Jews in Israel.


LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company


                              228 of 228 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               January 5, 1984, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

Books: Illegal Aliens

BYLINE: By Richard F. Shepard

SECTION: Section C; Page 16, Column 3; Cultural Desk

LENGTH: 472 words


THE TARNISHED DOOR: The New Immigrants and the Transformation of America. By
John Crewdson. 354 pages. Times Books. $17.95.

NOBODY knows how many illegal immigrants enter the United States, but there are
estimates that have placed their number as high as one million in recent years.
According to John Crewdson, who won a 1981 Pulitzer Prize for his reporting in
The New York Times on immigration problems, perhaps a half million newcomers
arrived illegally in 1980, while three-quarters of a million arrived within the
law.

This sort of enormous movement of humanity has indeed created problems, but Mr.
Crewdson, now national editor of The Chicago Tribune, defines the problems much
differently than do those who fear that the nation is being swamped by alien
tides. In ''The Tarnished Door,'' he assiduously ticks off the pluses and
minuses, bulwarking his outlook with compelling statistics and other
documentation.

Most of his thesis deals with the Mexican border, and he studies the absolute
certainty of immigration caused when a country that cannot provide work for its
people borders on one that offers workers better remuneration than they could
ever hope for at home. There is no single villain here, but the incompetence,
brutality and corruption he and others found in the Immigration and
Naturalization Service add up to a major problem, elements that frustrate the
most honest and dedicated employees. Moreover, he maintains that the service is
hampered by a welter of confusing laws and a legislative reluctance, born of
pressure by large-scale employers of alien labor, to come to grips with budget
and enforcement.


As for the immigrants themselves, Mr. Crewdson believes they are not the
problem. In his view, they fill jobs, demonstrably, that Americans, even the
most destitute, will not take. He argues that they contribute more to our
economy than they take from it, and they help the economy of their depressed
homelands in a way that alleviates the need for foreign aid. They are the
hardest workers - in fact, the problem is to protect them from exploitation by
unscrupulous labor manipulators. They are in the finest American immigrant
tradition, although they probably hail from different areas of the globe than
those of us who preceded them. In so doing, they are changing - certainly not
for the worse - the very texture of American life.

Mr. Crewdson is thorough and certain of himself in his exposition, which is
cogently and interestingly presented. Since he does not agree with what others
designate as ''the problem,'' he does not offer solutions, but rather seems to
question those proposals that others see as remedies. ''The Tarnished Door'' is
a controversial but an absolutely refreshing and different perspective on what
has been called one of our country's most pressing issues.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: REVIEW

                   Copyright 1984 The New York Times Company
